United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:04:35:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60657 # Positions  1 State  MD City  Silver Spring Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  3831 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165727879.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,bde34557c9a9c06dca286dc1fc4aea98
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:04:09:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate Quality Technician-POS_75045088-1DescriptionWho We AreSanofi Pasteur, the vaccines division of Sanofi, is a global company that provides more than one billion doses of vaccine each year, making it possible to immunize more than 500 million people across the globe. A world leader in the vaccine industry, Sanofi Pasteur offers the broadest range of vaccines protecting against 20 infectious diseases. The company's heritage, to create vaccines that protect life, dates back more than a century. Every day, the company invests more than one million Euros in research and development.Parent company; Sanofi is an integrated global healthcare leader which discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in the field of healthcare with seven growth platforms: diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and the new Genzyme.Position Summary: Perform testing in the Quality Control Microbiology laboratory while strictly adhering to site work instructions, Federal Regulations, cGMP and Sanofi Pasteur policies and procedures. Perform testing as scheduled to support production, method validation as well as the stability program.This position will be filled as an off-shift position; which includes second shift and/or weekendsPosition Responsibilities:Assist with maintaining safety and compliance of the laboratory work area. Perform cleaning of laboratories, equipment, and ancillary areas as required. Attend/Contribute to scheduled team meetings, department meetings, and safety meetings. Participate in training activities including their individual professional development, creation/revision of training modules as well as provide training to others on processes, procedures, assays, and equipment with which they are proficient. Understand and support change controls, CAPAs, and deviations in the QA system. Develop a working knowledge of appropriate compendia and/or regulatory guidance.Duties may include (but not limited to): Visual Evaluation of vials, syringes, plates, bottles and canisters. Setup and breakdown of equipment. Documentation, waste disposal, cleaning of laboratories and all other activities as assigned. . Technical competencies and soft skills:Knowledge and experience of sterility and bioburden testing is preferredCandidate must be able to work in a team environmentPrior Quality Control experience preferredExperience reading environmental monitoring plates and aseptic process simulation containers is desiredKnowledge of cGMPs and regulatory requirements cGMP guidelinesSAP, Trackwise, LIMS, Documentum, etc.Microbiological techniques including sterility, bioburden and microbial identification Strength in several LEAD Competencies-Think Strategically, Act for Change, Strive for Results, Cooperate Transversally, Commit to Customers, Make DecisionsSoft Skills:Communication WritingPeople SkillsAnalyticalBalanced Decision MakingNegotiationOrganizationDetail OrientedWho You AreYou are inspired and driven by sanofi pasteur IO mission to improve worldwide human health. You would fit in well with our sanofi values of innovation, solidarity, confidence, respect and integrity and our ways of working (Focus, Agility, Accountability and Simplicity). Sanofi Pasteur SA is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.#LI-spQualificationsBasic Qualifications: BS/Microbiology/Biological Sciences1+ years’ experience in a cGMP, Regulated, Quality Control facility Must pass an eye exam to be eligible for this position.Job:QualityPrimary Location:United States-Pennsylvania-SwiftwaterJob Posting:Mar 3, 2016, 3:41:10 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Associate Quality Technician Job in Swiftwater,"Full Time, Employee","Swiftwater, PA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Quality-Technician-Job-Swiftwater-PA-US-165880835.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=8,,General/Other: Quality Assurance/Safety,d1e89f701a1b6a7a01b52f80d8433e6b
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:03:45:29,No,jobs.monster.com," Job Description  Job Title:Quality Engineer          Department: Quality ControlReports To:        Quality ManagerFLSA Status: Exempt  SUMMARY The Quality Engineer will help to analyze internal and external data to drive improvements within product and customer performance.  This position will work closely with the Quality Manager and Director of Operations to ensure that high quality product is consistently being delivered to customers. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.  Other duties may be assigned.  Nothing in this job description restricts management’s right to assign or reassign duties and responsibilities to this job at any time.Develop and implement Process Quality Plans including inspection documents, test procedures and training plansVisit Customers to better understand Critical to Quality attributes and ensure compliance through updating and implementing Process Quality PlansOversee management of Vision System (ex. Emhart Vision Systems)Statistical Process Control (SPC) support and analysis to drive quality and productivity improvementFacilitate corrective and preventive action by utilizing Quality tools:Root Cause Analysis Failure Modes and Effects Analysis (FMEA)5 Why AnalysisFishbone AnalysisGauge R&RDesign of ExperimentsLead cross functional teams in improvement effortsAnticipate potential problems through observation and data analysisWork with Shop Floor personnel to resolve issuesConduct Process Audits SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES This position does not have any direct reports, but will be responsible for leading cross functional teams during quality improvement initiatives.   KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS  The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Applies fundamental problem solving concepts to project work and identified issues to provide root cause analysis and issue resolutionWorking knowledge of quality tools such as FMEA, 5 Why, Fishbone Analysis, Gauge R&R, Design of Experiments, SPC, SQC, Mistake Proofing/Poka-Yoke and statistical sampling.  Project management experience EDUCATION AND WORK EXPERIENCE Minimum Bachelors Engineering degree (chemical, mechanical or electrical). Minimum 3 years as Quality Engineer in Manufacturing. Preference in Heavy Industry / Process Manufacturing  CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS Six Sigma Black Belt preferred PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENTProduction/Warehouse/Office Environment",Quality Engineer Job in Millville,Full Time,"Millville, NJ 08332",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Millville-NJ-US-164897027.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ddd9ddb700c0358a006c7ac08cb2d9e9
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:03:28:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60641 # Positions  1 State  NY City  East Rochester Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  10844 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165648929.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,70014c528689aec1655675ac93a98bb6
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:03:27:55,No,jobs.monster.com,Battle Creek based company is seeking a CMM programmer   - Ability to operate and program CMM machines   - Ability to program with PC-DMIS   - Mitutoyo experience is a plus   - 1st shift position   - Pay is DOE,CMM Programmer with PCDMIS Job in Battle Creek,Full Time,"Battle Creek, MI 49015",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CMM-Programmer-with-PCDMIS-Job-Battle-Creek-MI-US-164903000.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9e019e3bfaca16d28f9d7381cbf6a48e
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:03:08:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  58975 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Aptos Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5965 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165385430.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=5,,Project/Program Management,338baffd94e93e9c724b3c2eca5d9a03
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:03:06:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking an Assistant Project Manager to join our Boston Project Management team.The Assistant Project Manager will be responsible for managing and overseeing all of the workflow for specific accounts through the agency in a timely and effective manner. Duties include: Developing schedules, helping to scope jobs/projects, meeting and managing projectdeadlines/deliverable dates and planning for a clientsâ€™ longer-term needs. Will betasked with driving the internal process and committed to executing jobs to the highestquality standards.Candidate must be energetic, organized, extremely proative. Professionalism and aneffective communication style is a necessity in this position. 0 â€“ 1 year experience.Four-year degree is required.0-1 years of experience. You must be eligible to work in the United States to be considered for this position.We are an eoe and do not discriminate against applicants due to race, age, ethnicity, gender, religion, national origin, veteran status or on the basis of disability.",Assistant Project Manager Job in Boston,Employee,"Boston, MA 02109",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Project-Manager-Job-Boston-MA-US-165860078.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),2e9a7be804e046f9455be12db41e716d
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:03:05:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experienced project manager to join well established MEP office in Northern Virginia and be responsible for the delivery of MEP designs for hi-profile building projects in the Capital region.  Should have prior consulting experience for entire project life cycle for large commercial, scientific, academic and historical buildings.  Degree required and engineering license is preferred.   Ability and experience in working with RFIs and submittals and tracking of project schedules and budgets. ",Engineering Project Manager Job in Alexandria,Full Time,"Alexandria, VA 22314",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Engineering-Project-Manager-Job-Alexandria-VA-US-165223309.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9dd5b2c36af2811beebc19b8d171f0dd
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:02:37:35,No,jobs.monster.com," A Burlington County, NJ manufacturing company has an exciting opportunity for a positive, energetic, detail oriented Food Safety and Compliance Manger.  We have a strong history of ethics and a purpose of nourishing people. We offer a diverse, supportive environment where you will grow personally and professionally as you learn from some of the most talented people in the field.The successful candidate will have a thorough understanding of SQF, HACCP, Food Safety and cGMP’s practices.Essential Job FunctionsResponsible for the overall Quality Assurance of all products received and manufactured by the company.Monitoring all operating conditions.Manages SQF and ISO programs.Manages all HACCP, Food Safety, cGMP and packaging procedures, product storage.Manages environmental swabbing program.Monitors all QC and QA testing procedures and results.  ManagesQA and QC data for customers.Customer QA analysis.Responsible for conducting GMP and Safety walks and internal audits within the facility on a weekly basis.Works with customers and Quality Team to resolve customer complaints.Conducts housekeeping auditing and maintains all necessary quality processes and procedures.Responsible for all documentation control.Preforms risk assessments and develops all written safety and quality protocols.Trains new hires on all Quality and Food Safety Programs.Conducts annual training on GMPs and Quality and Food Safety Programs.Enforces all plant policies.Requirements4+ years’ experience in Quality / Food Safety in food industry.Experienced SQF Practitioner or equivalent experience with another GFSI certification body.Bachelor’s Degree in Science or related field preferred.Team Player and excellent communicator- works closely with all departments.Ability to identify and solve problems as well as using a proactive approach to managing the plant.Primarily a day shift position, but must have some flexibility on occasion, to monitor and train other shifts.Proficient in computer programs- Microsoft word and ExcelBenefitsCompetitive base salary and bonus structureComprehensive benefits (Full medical, dental, 401k, Paid Time Off)    ",Food Safety and Compliance Manager Job in Burlington,Full Time,"Burlington, NJ",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Safety-Compliance-Manager-Job-Burlington-NJ-US-165256903.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fd760a4cfb0ec05584983d60b6afd226
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:02:36:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"The ideal candidate will drive large scale enterprise IT implementations to completion. The person will work directly with client and the onsite project team.  The activities performed include requirements analysis, design, and solution/systems technology. Position Requirements:   6-10 years consulting and/or implementation experience in a SAAS/cloud consulting or technical consulting environment Project management experience with Agile project methodology desired Proven client facing and communication skills Minimum of a Bachelor's Degree   Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 SuccessFactors - Learning PL4 Required 2 SuccessFactors - Compensation PL4 Required 3 SuccessFactors - Recruiting PL4 Required 4 SuccessFactors-Employ Central PL4 Required     * Proficiency Legends     Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.       Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at http://www.cognizant.com/ or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/       Additional Information:",IT Project Manager Job in Cambridge,Full Time Employee,"Cambridge, MA 02142",All,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Project-Manager-Job-Cambridge-MA-US-165861436.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,08883b2f668bb7b745b466fce6f3eaa0
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:01:43:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Zodiac Aerospace, Cabin and Structures has been in business since 1972, growing from a supplier of interior components, to a supplier of integrated interior systems for all the major aircraft manufacturers as well as directly to airlines world-wide. Our in-house capacity extends from raw material fabrication to final assembly. We have grown to over 6,000 employees and 15 facilities in 6 countries. It is our philosophy to provide profitable world-class aerospace products, with the spirit and service of a local business; to make ourselves an indispensable resource to our customers, and a satisfying place of work for our employees, measuring our success by the satisfaction of both. The Production Manager oversees the manufacturing operation, manages employees, plans and makes changes according to production schedule, promotes safety, supports and communicates company goals, rules, and standards, to employees. Promotes lean manufacturing and continuous improvement processes.  Job Duties: Responsible for the development and implementation of effective production Department planning, policies, and procedures.Responsible for the efficient, timely, and accurate completion of Production functions.Effectively supervises assigned personnel, ensuring optimal performance. Assumes responsibility for maintaining effective communication, coordination, and working relations with Company personnel and management.Trains, advises, and counsels employees on current production methods. Provides suggestions to improve performance and productivity.Works closely with purchasing, and engineering departments to maintain schedules and implement changes and revisions in operational procedures.Assists with personnel decisions including hiring, terminations, wage decisions, and promotions.Responsible for safety compliance of Production Employees.  Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree required.  Focus on Industrial or Manufacturing Engineering preferred.Strong understanding of production, procedures, standards.  Knowledge of Quality Control Standards and systems. Be able to use shop tools such as micrometers, vernier calipers, height gauges, etc.  Read and understand Engineering Blueprints.Knowledge of LEAN concepts.8+years experience in an operational management role, preferably in an aerospace environment, definitely in a manufacturing environmentData-driven approach to management; should have experience in using key performance indicators (KPIs) to manage their workflow. Have a good vision of what a good KPI suite looks like and know how to create one if none exists.Material control experience beneficialSense of urgency, communication skills, etc from your production supervisor job descriptionAction oriented, proactive problem solving skillsKnowledge of plan, do, check, act approach  Zodiac Aerospace is an Equal Opportunity Employer; we encourage Minorities, Females, Disabled and Veterans to apply.  ",Program Manager Job in Huntington Beach,Full Time,"Huntington Beach, CA 92647",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Program-Manager-Job-Huntington-Beach-CA-US-165552109.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,,7f5d6023bb32feac752518d34eb8c2e7
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:00:27:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"QA Inspectors COMPANY INFORMATION Millstone Medical Outsourcing, headquartered in Fall River, MA is a fast-growing company in need of motivated individuals to assist in its growth.  Millstone Medical Outsourcing’s business focus is sterile and non-sterile packaging of medical devices. Millstone also engages in other activities, such as mechanical inspection and assembly, which are designed to meet the outsourcing requirements of medical device manufacturers seeking to reduce costs while maintaining high levels of quality, accuracy and timeliness. Millstone Medical Outsourcing is FDA and ISO registered and employs a detailed internal quality system to ensure ISO compliance. We are currently seeking experienced QA Inspectors for 1st and 2nd shifts. JOB DESCRIPTION  The QA inspector is responsible for verifying product, labeling and packaging specification per the customer’s and Millstone’s specific requirements.  Attribute & mechanical inspection of medical instruments & other medical products. Experience with optical comparators, calipers, GD&T, micrometers & plug, ring & thread gages.  REQUIREMENTS -         Ability to use scales/gauges/calipers/micrometers-         Must have experience with Optical Comparator and CMM-         Intermediate math skills (geometry and formulas)-         Intermediate computer knowledge including Microsoft Word and Excel-         Ability to read and follow all department procedures-         High School Diploma or equivalent CONTACT Interested candidates should send resumes to hr@millstonemedical.com.   FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION Millstone Medical Outsourcing offers a competitive salary, health, dental and vision benefits, 401(k) with company match and a warm, friendly working environment.  To learn more about Millstone Medical Outsourcing’s opportunities, visit us online at www.millstonemedical.com",QA Inspectors st & nd Shift Job in Fall River,Full Time,"Fall River, MA 02724",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-Inspectors-1st-2nd-Shift-Job-Fall-River-MA-US-164459513.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c0d760e1baed36274ab3ec9f0a74b5cd
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:20:18:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Michael Page is partnering with a global consumer goods company that is looking to grow their QA team with a highly intelligent and engaging engineer. This is an open position for a Sr. Product Quality Engineer.Client DetailsMichael Page is partnering with a global consumer goods company that is looking to grow their QA team with a highly intelligent and engaging engineer. This is an open position for a Sr. Product Quality Engineer.DescriptionThe Sr. Product Quality Engineer will:Function within the quality team and on multi-functional product development teams in matters relating to quality engineering.Support design control and process validation for new and change product efforts.Ensure effective and efficient use of Quality Engineering techniques such as risk analysis, test method development, statistical data analysis, and the development of sample plans.Full knowledge and understanding of APQP functions.ProfileThe Sr. Product Quality Engineer should possess:BS in Mechanical Engineering4+ years of experienceNew product development and design assurance experienceExcellent communicatorCan work in fast paced environmentsJob OfferHighly reputable companyGlobal engineeringdiverse and dynamic teamsMultiple projects and new productsCompetitive compensation package",Sr. Product Quality Engineer Job in Waltham,"Full Time , Employee","Waltham, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-product-quality-engineer-job-waltham-ma-us-169462953.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=16,"90,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",,f9236a5ba7b46c35c504b59e15062d05
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:20:30:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"American Air Liquide offers industrial gases and related services to a variety of customers including those in large industry, industrial manufacturing, electronics and healthcare marketplaces. Position Description:Job Responsibilities:Fully supports, accurately completes, maintains, and instills corporate Health, Safety, and Environmental policies & procedures and relevant documentation at the facility in operating and maintaining responsibility for a safe, efficient, and environmentally friendly facilityActively demonstrates identified skill sets in daily operational duties, in addition:Actively is pursuing owns growth and career development through self-initiative practices and working with resources made available as coordinated with supervisor Participates in operational and routine maintenance tasks within facility work group without interruption of customer product deliveries Fosters open communication amongst all facility technicians in relation to best practices, operational or Facility needs, safety issues or concerns, conflicts of interest between shifts or other departments, and sharing operational knowledge and expertise with all other TechniciansAssists and works closely with Lead Production Technician or Plant Manager with daily facility needs including Facility record keeping and documentationCMMS input and work order generation Studying and maintaining site-specific Standard Operating Procedures, P&ID's, PFD's, and all other technical documentation as relates to operational or equipment processes Innovations and improvement project involvementGenerating initial documentation for on-site contractors, vendors, guests, or visitors site-specific training needsEscorting on-site contractors, vendors, guests, or visitors throughout facility as neededActive participation in facility safety meetings and inspectionsFacility Operations and Customer Relations DevelopmentUnloading cryogenic transports as necessaryShift Coverage and Rotation Fills in for vacations and emergency shift relief coverage as situations warrant Follows policies and procedures on proper notification procedures for vacation scheduling, floating holidays, and personal days offGeneral Qualifications: High School Diploma or GED required; Associates degree or technical training preferred 2+ years of related industrial operations experience preferredDemonstrates basic computer (PC) skills and ability to use required software computer applications Ability to wear required PPE safety equipment including hardhat/safety glasses/safety shoes/boots and FRC clothingAbility to lift up to 50lbsAbility to work 12 hour rotating shifts ",Technician - Production / ALI Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN 37415",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/technician-production-ali8006-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169036622.aspx?mescoid=1700230001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,19e089c4f5f0494815c1267102edfee1
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:20:31:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is working on a retained exclusive search for a successful, growing regional CPA Firm in Braintree, MA to find a Senior Auditor for their growing Higher Education Practice. The ideal candidate will have 3-5 years of experience in public accounting, a bachelor's degree in Accounting and have prior experience with Higher Education. Responsibilities: Plan, conduct and supervise engagements Prepare and review financial statements and workpapers Develop management recommendations Prepare and review tax returns for partnerships, S corporations, individual and non-profits Participate in client planning with Partners and Managers Participate in several engagements simultaneously Pro-actively look to provide additional services to clients Why this CPA firm? Competitive salary and benefits including medical, dental, life, disability and 401k match Generous tuition reimbursement Modified flex time - when in office you can start your day anytime between 7:00 AM and 10:00 AM and end the day 8.5 hours later (not applicable during tax season) Staff training and development Early office closure at 3:00 PM on Fridays from Memorial Day through Labor Day Active social calendar including a great holiday party, after tax season party, summer party, softball and basketball games and other events Young growing firm with great ability for advancementREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting 3 to 5 years of public accounting experience with at least one in a Senior audit role Experienced user of Pro-fx tax, Engagement and Document is preferred CPA license or actively pursuing CPA license Higher Education audit experience is preferred Proficient with Microsoft office suite, particularly Excel Strong research, verbal/written and organizational communication skills",Senior Audit Job in Braintree,Full Time Employee,"Braintree, MA 02184",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-audit-job-braintree-ma-us-169378688.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,"65,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),c0cc23db8ed0bcb71b96e6b450a026c6
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:21:25:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that better care begins at home.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladder for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Physical Therapist, you will:Plan and administer prescribed skilled physical therapy treatment and training for patients suffering from various injuries, illnesses and functional disabilities to attain highest level of physical function. Test/screen the patient’s physical strengths to assist the physician in evaluating the patient’s level of function and records findings to develop or pursue treatment programs and establish measurable training objectives.Develop/implement a conditioning/rehabilitation program consistent with physician’s Plan of Treatment and the overall goals of the patient/rehab team.  Adjust treatment as needed to achieve maximum results.Confer with physician and clinical team members to obtain additional patient information and assist in developing, implementing and revising the therapy treatment program and Plan of Treatment.Provide Physical Therapy Assistants and Home Health Aide staff with written instructions/care plan that reflects current plan of care as related to therapy, supervise/evaluate staffs' performance.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by physical therapy assistants and home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Accurately, promptly and thoroughly document patients' care observations, interventions and evaluations.  Assure that interim (verbal) orders received from the physician and physical therapist are promptly and accurately documented, submitted for physician signature and implementedReport patient's progress to the patient's physician, Clinical Manager, staff, patient and family.  Submit evaluation, treatment plans, progress reports and discharge summary to the supervisor and care management staff.  QualificationsDegree from an accredited Physical Therapy Program (approved by the APTA)Minimum of one year physical therapy experience preferredHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Physical Therapy licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Keywords:Acute care, ADL, ADLs, ALF, Balance dysfunction, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, clinical rotation, geriatric, geriatrics, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, inpatient, inpatient PT, inpatient P.T., inpatient physical therapist, inpatient therapist, licensed therapist, licensed PT, licensed P.T., licensed physical therapist, modalities, neuro, neurological, ortho, ortho PT, ortho P.T., ortho therapist, ortho physical therapist, orthopedics, orthopedic, orthopedic PT, orthopedic P.T., orthopedic physical therapist, PT, P.T., physical therapist, physical therapy, DPT, doctorate PT, doctorate P.T., doctorate physical therapist, medical, medical care, therapist, therapy Care Manager, therapy case manager, therapy case management, therapy Job, therapy Jobs, PT job, PT jobs, P.T. job, P.T. jobs, physical therapy job, physical therapy jobs, physical therapist job, physical therapist jobs, Oasis, outpatient, outpatient clinic, out patient, outpatient rehab, outpatient PT, outpatient P.T., outpatient therapist, outpatient physical therapy, outpatient physical therapist, PRN, PDM, rehab, rehab PT, rehab P.T., rehab physical therapist, rehab setting, rehabilitative, therapeutic, safe strides, safe strides PT, safe strides P.T., safe strides physical therapist, skilled visit, SNF, sports med, sports medicine, sports med therapist, sports med physical therapist, sports medical physical therapist, subacute, sub acute, post acute, therapy, travel PT, travel P.T., travel therapist, travel physical therapist, traveling PT, traveling P.T., traveling physical therapist, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA",Per Diem Home Health Physical Therapist for Boston-KAH Job in Weymouth,"Per Diem, Employee","Weymouth, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/per-diem-home-health-physical-therapist-for-boston-kah-job-weymouth-ma-us-169169423.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,94e85f266a11a0dcf4088fd30cd5fb31
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:21:26:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Full-Time - Night Shift - Highgate (Dedham, MA) ( Job Number: 277818 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progress in achieving restorative goals. *CB CNA Certified Nursing Assistant Certified Nursing Assistants Certified Nurse Assistant Certified Nurse Aide Certified Nursing Aide CNAs C.N.A. Transitional Care Rehabilitation #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : MA-Dedham-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate Organization : 0681 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate",Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Full-Time - Night Shift - Highgate (Dedham,"Full Time, Employee","Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Full-Time - Night Shift - Highgate (Dedham, MA) ( Job Number: 277818 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progress in achieving restorative goals. *CB CNA Certified Nursing Assistant Certified Nursing Assistants Certified Nurse Assistant Certified Nurse Aide Certified Nursing Aide CNAs C.N.A. Transitional Care Rehabilitation #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : MA-Dedham-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate Organization : 0681 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-nursing-assistant-cna-full-time-night-shift-highgate-dedham-ma-job-dedham-ma-us-169332571.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,7ec7fc76ebe64d47832a48ea8d6ef452
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:21:35:11,No,jobs.monster.com," Registered Nurse – Operating Room RN – OR RN – Operating Room NurseRN, Registered NurseBoston, MA   Here is a great opportunity for a highly motivated and experienced registered nurse to work as a OR RN at a reputable hospital located in Boston, MA!  OR – Registered Nurse ·        BSN Required ·        Looking for candidates with at least 1 year of OR experience·        This hospital has a great local and national reputation and offers competitive pay and excellent benefits!    Contact me today to learn more about this great opportunity!  1-800-995-2672 ext. 1517  Michael CircharoPlacement Counselor, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group1-800-995-2673 x1517michael.circharo@coremedicalgroup.com  Registered Nurse – Operating Room RN – OR RN – Operating Room NurseRN, Registered NurseBoston, MA   All applicants must be a Registered Nurse. The ideal candidate will have 2+ years of recent Operating Room experience.   Interested in hearing more details? Call me today! 1-800-995-2672 ext. 1517  Michael CircharoPlacement Counselor, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group1-800-995-2673 x1517michael.circharo@coremedicalgroup.com   keywords: director, neuro, neurology, neuro ICU, nurse manager, rn, registered nurse, r.n., service line director, msn, bsn, telemetry, surgical, med/surg, stepdown, pcu, med/surg, medical surgical, tele, nurse manager, director, msn, cardiac, cardiacvascular, cardiology, progressive care unit critical care, intensive care, cardiac, management, director, head nurse, medical surgical, acute care  ",Registered Nurse – Operating Room RN – OR RN – Operating Room Nurse Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-%E2%80%93-operating-room-rn-%E2%80%93-or-rn-%E2%80%93-operating-room-nurse-job-boston-ma-us-169414934.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,f0181b718c91359d130e01d7d0aedfd2
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:21:56:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.As an Inside Sales Representative, you will meet or exceed your sales goals by driving sales of T-Mobile products and services through targeted outbound calling. You will use your passion for wireless and technology to educate and expand relationships with existing business customers. Success will be based on the ability to meet sales expectations through a variety of metrics focused on building the business. The quality and method of work must be consistently completed in accordance with T-Mobile""s core values.1+ years sales experience in a commissioned or quota driven environment.Ability to thrive in fast paced sales environment and independently manage to multiple priorities and deadlines.The flexibility to work weekends and other varied shifts periodicallyProfessional verbal and written communication skills, including ability to type a minimum of 30 words per minute with accuracyHigh School Diploma / GEDDesired:Inside sales experience, business sales experienceWireless / telecommunications industry experienceKnowledge of CRM applications such as SalesforceRequires competency in customer focus, change & innovation, strategic thinking, relationship building & influencing, talent management, results focus and inspirational leadership.Uses provided customer base through CRM application to drive sales and expand buying relationship with business clients through targeted outbound cold-calling (60-80%)Attains productivity and sales goals based on established metricsMeets/exceeds all departmental goals and business objectivesUsing targeted accounts, gains referrals to build baseUtilize negotiation and problem solving skills in order to ensure customer retention and loyalty. Quickly and effectively resolves customer issuesExtensive system navigation and utilization required. Analyzes customer needs and offers appropriate products and services, with emphasis on growing business and revenue. Accuracy and efficiency in data entry requiredSuccessfully completes continuing training to maintain knowledge of products, services, promotions, and sales approachesDemonstrates positive and cooperative behavior with customers and coworkers. Demonstrates personal leadership in consistently maintaining high standards for ethical and professional conductPerforms all needed organization and administrative activities for ultimate successManages leads and opportunities using SalesforceEfficiently organizes day around sales opportunitiesRuns ad hoc reporting to identify customer solutions or selling opportunitiesAppropriately disburses adjustments and credits within established limits and criteriaWe Take Equal Opportunity Seriously - By Choice T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with our Company values and will not be tolerated. Furthermore, such discrimination or harassment may violate federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Inside Sales Representative - Chattanooga Job in Chattanooga,,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",,http://jobview.monster.com/inside-sales-representative-chattanooga-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169284679.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,,,140225317a4a2f0417ca33c210818d84
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:21:57:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce client is seeking a Senior Accountant to join their team in Quincy, MA. You will be responsible for preparing financial statements and facilitating timely monthly, quarterly and year end close processes. As well as oversee deferred revenue, analyzing inventory and costs versus estimated costs. In addition, you may assist with tax audits and financial analysis. The Senior Staff Accountant is a vital part of their vibrant 5-person finance team.Essential Duties & Responsibilities: Primary responsibility is to prepare financial statements and supporting schedules according to monthly close schedule Facilitate and complete timely monthly, quarterly and year end close processes Perform the processing of functional and benefits expense allocations, monthly accruals, amortization of prepaid expenses, fixed assets depreciation and recording of adjusting Analyze revenues and expenses to ensure they are recorded appropriately on a monthly basis Resolve inventory discrepancies and irregularitiesREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor degree or Equivalent in Accounting, Finance or Business Administration 3+ years of accounting experience required; non-profit sector preferred JD Edwards experience preferred Strong understanding of accounting theory Ability and desire to work independently and as a team member with the community and other employees Positive, upbeat and enthusiastic",Senior Accountant Job in Quincy,Full Time Employee,"Quincy, MA 02169",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-quincy-ma-us-169437355.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e858d83c50af6f70ca1539823091f183
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:22:02:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Perform quality assurance checks on radiographic and photographic medical imaging data to ensure protocol specific requirements are met Perform established image processing techniques (converting imaging formats, performing preliminary measurements of lesions and volumes) across multiple modalities (including but not limited to CT, MRI, Ultrasound) using proprietary software as well as other third party software Perform DXA Image processing, Longitudinal Instrument Quality Control, and Cross Calibration tasks. Perform image processing and measurements on Ophthalmic imaging; Identify quality issues (including poor image acquisition, artifacts, opacities, and other medical/surgical conditions) and work with Investigator Sites to rescan patient images and/or correct imaging techniques Perform project specific tasks in compliance with Good Clinical Practices (GCP), regulatory requirements (21CFR Part 11), applicable departmental and companywide SOPs, and project specific protocols Act as liaison with investigator site personnel to resolve issues that arise over the course of the clinical trial. Ability to prioritize and manage time sensitive tasks for multiple projects Mentor and assist in training of internal personnel Perform other duties as required by the position QualificationsSkillsClear, effective and professional communication skills, written and verbalComputer literate and proficient in Microsoft Office Products and ability to learn proprietary softwareFunctional knowledge of Microsoft Excel preferredAbility to see detail at close range and sit at a workstation for long periods of timeHighly organizedAttention to detailAbility to work independently and in a team environment with minimal supervisionAbility to prioritize tasksAbility to work with a global/virtual teamEducationBachelor’s Degree in Health Sciences or equivalent medical imaging related work experience requiredMinimum Work ExperienceMinimum 1-3 years of experience in clinical research or imaging related field or equivalent skills preferred.EEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Imaging Research Associate Job in Billerica,Full Time Employee,"Billerica, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/imaging-research-associate-job-billerica-ma-us-169212910.aspx?mescoid=1900305001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fea8b83fdfe99ef8b61caa7dfaac065c
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:22:08:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Powered by Zip Team at Coldwell Banker Residential Brokerage is looking for experienced, enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated real estate sales agents to work with home buyers.  We are a unique full-service, client-focused, residential real estate sales brokerage, but we're different; we have a better way. Our award-winning lead/customer management tool streamlines the real estate sales process. Consumers are embracing our approach, and our website, cbzhomes.com, is one of the most-visited real estate sales brokerage websites in the world! Qualifications:·         Active real estate sales agent license·         Vibrant personality and professional presence·         Drive and determination ·         Demonstrated skills in customer service, sales, and customer negotiation·         Entrepreneurial spirit Advantages:·         ZAP (Zip Agent Platform): our industry-leading online real estate sales agent platform and client management system·         Dozens of new client leads every single month·         Your own real estate sales page/portal on cbzhomes.com·         Top-notch education and business coaching is available We can provide you with everything you need to build and grow your real estate sales business. Apply now and learn more about the advantages of being an independent real estate sales agent affiliated with Coldwell Banker Residential Brokerage on the Powered by Zip Team.",Real Estate Sales - Licensed - Leads provided - Greater Boston Area Job in Woburn,,"Woburn, MA 01801",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/real-estate-sales-licensed-leads-provided-greater-boston-area-job-woburn-ma-us-169482016.aspx?mescoid=4100687001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,10e904bf96367968813bb4d85bd673a0
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:22:42:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Systems Engineer - InfrastructureThis company is a global pioneer in Investment Management, having $50 Billion in assets under management, and is located in the Financial District in Boston. The Senior Systems Engineer will install and maintain core business applications and services for this firm's infrastructure department. This role will also require the professional to plan, coordinate and manage engineering projects. Act as lead in defining and executing systems engineering activities within a project. Provide comprehensive definition of all aspects of system development from analysis of mission needs to verification of system performance. This role will report directly to the Infrastructure Manager.Job ResponsibilitiesSystems and Network Setup and MaintenanceManage server based applications delivery environment.Maintain team documentation and manage day to day operations of data center.Install, configure and maintain business applications.New Project WorkExamine and evaluate new technical products and services.Find network solutions to solve business problems.Discover ways to leverage new and existing software.Optimize efficiency of the data systems.Advanced User SupportWorks to resolve advanced level technical issues.Provide advanced level support to all users.Ensure timely response to higher level issues.DocumentationMaintain and update policies and procedures that are related to the infrastructure.Ensure changes adhere to company security policy.Job Requirements8+ Years of Systems Engineering, trouble shooting, and program management.Extensive experience using VMWare.Experience data center migrations to colocation facilitates.Work closely with consultants and vendors addressing business needs.Experience using IIS configuration.Experience with Citrix Secure Gateway.Flexible work schedule outside normal business hours.Bachelor's Degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or relevant field.SkillsSOC1.Cisco UCS.VMWare SRM, Zerto, SAN Replication.Create detailed written procedures.Strong project management experience.If you are a professional that is serious about making an impact at one of the most prestigious asset management firms at the highest level, please send your resume to the attention of Zachary Phelps, at Huxley Associates - Boston.",Senior Sysytems Engineer - Infrastructure Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee",Boston   MA,,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-sysytems-engineer-infrastructure-job-boston-ma-us-169375036.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=3,,,dc5b24a2eec280344527e50de639075e
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:22:51:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Retail Sales Merchandiser FULL TIME   Retail Sales Merchandiser candidates are organized, self-motivated and friendly. As a member of our Top Performing Sales Team, you will work in full time Retail Sales with oversight and responsibility for increasing sales of our client’s products for leading brands in chocolate, candy/confections, sports drinks, soda products, and snacks. This Retail Sales position services and sells to retail accounts within an assigned territory, ensuring Client standards are met and sales volumes are increased. The ideal candidate for this Retail Sales position is independent, ambitious and driven to succeed with strong sales skills and the confidence to influence key decision makers at the store level. This is a great opportunity to work with Advantage Solutions, the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.   Responsibilities:   Meet and exceed sales goals, by maintaining proper product inventory Engage with store management using the latest technology to drive sales and enhance client satisfaction  Maintain client objectives  Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers, building rapport with clients and customers Perform merchandising duties QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or higher education or equivalent job-related experience Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Position Summary   The Retail Sales Merchandiser (RSM) is responsible for servicing and selling to retail accounts within an assigned territory to ensure Client standards are met and volume is increased.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities   Sales and Merchandising Maintain Client objectives by ensuring secondary placements of product(s) are fully stocked, correctly signed, properly faced, and set to schematics Shelf Standards and Conditions: authorization of items to meet Client shelf schematic standards Meet Client and Company objectives by maintaining full distribution on existing SKUs. Take direction regarding tagging, rotating, and placing POS materials for products on shelf Prepare for and respond to audits Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Complete accurate and timely paperwork and reports, recaps, itineraries, timesheets, expense reports, etc. May provide feedback for Client audit objectives  Customer Relations Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers Build rapport with Clients and Customers Field questions and proactively develop action plans to resolve issues Additional Responsibilities: Demonstrates high degree of professionalism in communication, attitude and teamwork with customers, peers and management Demonstrates high level of quality work, attendance and appearance Adheres to all Company Policies & Procedures and Safety Regulations Adheres to local, state and federal laws Performs the job safely utilizing proper equipment and safety techniques Additional responsibilities as assigned by supervisor related to the position/department Supervisory Responsibilities   Direct Reports   This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports   This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are essential duties and function of this job  Travel up to   20%         Must maintain current and valid driver’s license and valid proof of current insurance Minimum Qualifications Minimum Qualifications   The following are the minimum job-related qualifications which an individual needs in order to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities of the job   Education Level: (Required): High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience   Field of Study/Area of Experience:  Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels. Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills Demonstrate good judgment and show respect for others Works cooperatively with others toward common group objectives, demonstrates respect for the ideas and contributions of other team members, cultivates positive relationships with other associates, and provides assistance and support to others Ability to communicate with email and basic internet skills Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Demonstrate commitment to meet or exceed customers’ expectations Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Administrative Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work may be performed in an office, field, retail store, or warehouse environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 50 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.      Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).      ",Retail Sales Merchandiser Full Time Job in Ooltewah,Full Time Employee,"Ooltewah, TN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-merchandiser-full-time-job-ooltewah-tn-us-168801782.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=9,,Retail,bd6b92b718cc453be2bebcd9875b9e6a
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:22:51:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:The ASM 2 - Sales Support Lead is responsible for the daily warehouse/stockroom/receiving and sales support activities and for driving sales and assisting customers on the retail sales floor as required. This individual is responsible for assisting the Store Manager (SM) and the ASM 1 - Sales Supervisor in achieving or exceeding all operational standards and sales and profit goals on a daily, monthly and annual basis while adhering to all company policies, procedures, governmental regulations and customer service expectations. The ASM 2 - Sales Support Lead is also responsible for the overall management and operation of the store in the absence of the Store Manager (SM) and the ASM 1 - Sales Supervisor. This is considered a ""key carrier"" position and is responsible for opening and closing the store and routine handling of bank deposits. Job Title: ASM 2 - Assistant Store Manager 2 (Sales Support Lead)Department:Store OperationsReports To:Store ManagerJob Status:Non-Exempt (Hourly)Budget Managed ($):NonePosition Qualifications:High school diploma, GED equivalency, or work experience sufficient to demonstrate high school level retail math and English skillsOne to three years of related sales/retail/customer service experience; hardwood flooring knowledge a plusPrevious warehouse/stockroom experience preferredMust possess a valid driver's license and acceptable driving recordBasic Microsoft Office skills (Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook)Experience with Point of Sale (POS) systems, preferredOutstanding telephone skillsAbility to drive/operate a forklift required (forklift certification required prior to operating equipment)Physical Requirements:Constant (more than 50% of the time) standing, walking, and hand/finger dexterity; lifting & carrying up to 80 lbs; pushing & pulling up to 80 lbsFrequent (between 33%-50% of the time) reaching, squatting, kneeling, bending, and twistingOccasional (up to 33% of the time) sitting, using ladder to climbVision (Near, Distance, Color, Peripheral, Depth Perception)General Work Schedule:This position will generally work a standard full time work week including evenings, frequent weekends (Saturday and Sunday), holidays and overtime as scheduled based on business and customer needs. Regular and predictable attendance is an essential function of this position. Work Environment:ASM 2 - Sales Support Leads generally work in a warehouse/ stock area and retail sales environment that involves the use of office equipment, such as computers, POS equipment and telephones, machinery/mechanical equipment, ladders and heavy equipment (forklift). Routine exposure to frequent and heavy lifting, moderate noise, outdoor elements (heat and cold) and airborne particles. Limited travel required. 1-15 associates supervised indirectly. Please refer to the job description.",Assistant Store Manager  - Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-store-manager-2-chattanooga-tennessee-tn-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169172266.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),ac90b567bae81b43c0ffa73d9c37cdcf
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:23:27:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"This person would work in conjunction with other team members to address inquiries from clients and prospects. In addition this position supports the administrative needs of the sales and management staff and acts as a liaison for facility vendors. Provide excellent customer service through active listening and professional communication, to identify root causes of customer issues and ensure timely resolution. Process orders, respond to inquiries, answer requests for information, and respond to service needs in a prompt, courteous and effective manner. Maintain accurate and current inventory records in accordance with customer and company specifications. Continually focus on the improvement of his/her processes to ensure customer's needs are being met, while maintaining high quality, cost effective logistics services. Consistently adhere to corporate values and objectives. Customer Service Representative essential responsibilities: 1. Resolve problems as they occur and ensure that accurate and complete information is conveyed to all. 2. Provide reliable, consistent service to both internal and external customers. 3. Write and complete accurate business correspondence to customers and team. 4. Copy sales personnel on customer correspondence. 5. Take ownership of quote process, which includes receiving customer requests for quotes via phone or email and ensuring that necessary information, is obtained. Process and submit quote information to operations, marking up costs based on sales guidelines and providing final quote to customer in an efficient, timely and professional manner. 6. Accept booking requests via email or phone. Notate information provided and research additional information as needed. 7. Complete special assignments by establishing objectives, determining priorities, management time, gaining cooperation of others, problem solving and making necessary adjustments. To be successful in this position, the Operation Specialist must have the ability to: 1. Apply professional, polite telephone communication skills. 2. Deliver extraordinary customer service in a courteous, efficient and professional manner. 3. Pay attention to detail to detect discrepancies on records or reports. 4. Listen for hidden messages to obtain information from customers and internal staff. 5. Maintain professionalism at all times in all interactions. 6. Juggle multiple priorities simultaneously, efficiently and effectively. 7. Meet commitments; accept accountability and stay focused under pressure. 8. Execute high degree of tact, discretion, diplomacy and sensitivity in dealing with situations of a stressful nature. Administrative Specialist essential knowledge areas: 1. Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer service. This aptitude includes customer needs assessment, meeting quality standards for services, and evaluation of customer satisfaction. 2. Knowledge of the structure and content of the English language including the meaning and spelling of words, rules of composition, and grammar. 3. Strong practical experience with Microsoft Office suite. Qualifications: To be successful in this position, an individual must be able to perform each responsibility, have required knowledge and possess the traits listed in this document. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential functions. Education/Experience: * High school diploma or equivalent.",Logistic Customer Service Representative Job in Woburn,Full Time,"Woburn, MA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/logistic-customer-service-representative-job-woburn-ma-us-168959520.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=17,14.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,,e6b4ccc53b355849ef6e1b6ecb4513ae
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:23:29:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Introduction:Design Group is a leading engineering, systems integration, and technology consulting firm, capable of providing complete operating solutions for consumer products, life sciences, and other industrial sectors.  Design Group provides engineering, project management, regulatory compliance, and other technology services to the world’s leading companies.  Our organization is staffed by over 1,000 engineering and technical specialists, operating from over 35 offices in the U.S. and Puerto Rico. Design Group provides professional engineering, architectural and construction management services through our wholly owned and professionally licensed subsidiary, Design Group Facility Solutions, Inc.  We are focused on providing our professionals with opportunities for leadership and career advancement within a thriving work environment and a unique “people-centric” culture. We offer a robust, centralized learning and development program to improve the career experience for every professional.Responsibilities:·         Our Controls Engineer will develop automation solutions and participate in specification through development and startup of a variety of automated manufacturing processes and equipment. ·         Responsibilities include designing low voltage (typically 480VAC and lower) power and control systems for automated packaging applications including but not limited to conveyors, OEM equipment, and variable frequency drives; and for processing equipment including process control system panels, motor controls and skidded utility systems. ·         This will include PLC and HMI programming for these systems.  ·         Your professional experience will demonstrate your computer skills, ability to handle multiple projects, communication skills, ability to diagnose automation problems and interact with teams, clients and vendors.Education:·         BS Electrical Engineering, Engineering Technology or related engineering experience.Experience:·         3+ years’ experience with controls for automated equipment in a manufacturing or capital project execution role. ·         Proficiency with any of the following is required: PLC’s and HMI’s, including Siemens S7, Wonderware Intouch/Archestra, GE iFix and Rockwell Software products such as, RsLogix 5, 500, 5000, Rockwell Factory Talk Suite of products, Panelview or similar applications.  Travel:Flexibility for travel up to 50% at times for installations and startup is required.Benefits: Design Group offers a team focused work environment with a competitive salary, performance based incentive pay, and benefits including medical, dental, life insurance, and 401(k) with matching contributions.   Other: Design Group is an equal opportunity employer.  M/F/D/V. All applicants must be authorized to work in the US. Hair Sample Drug Screening is part of our employment process. This organization uses E-Verify. Contact:To apply for this position please APPLY ONLINE.Design Group operates as an independent and autonomous unit of Barry-Wehmiller Companies, a leading supplier of engineering consulting and manufacturing technology across a broad spectrum of industries. With more than 11,000 team members spread among 100-plus locations around the globe, we remain united by a common belief: we can use the power of our business to build a better world. For more information, visit our CEO’s blog at www.trulyhumanleadership.com.  ",Controls Engineer Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee","Boston, MA",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/controls-engineer-job-boston-ma-us-168969089.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=7,,Engineering,50e62711740b939498d2757a36190c18
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:05:28:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"That race you ran last month…that was us. That city basketball team you just joined…that was us. That fishing license for this weekend’s tournament…us, too. You’ve used our software, now help others use it, too.   ACTIVE Network is a service-based software company providing participant management solutions to event and activity organizers.  ACTIVE helps its customers manage participants making their activity a smooth and streamlined experience. ACTIVE is seeking a Client Application Specialist to join the team. We are a company full of self-driven, dedicated individuals who live the ACTIVE life and promote a positive work environment through teamwork and collaboration. Our casual workplace environment encourages ACTIVE employees to live by our mantra, work hard and play hard! Our Client Application Specialist team is comprised of technology gurus, recent college graduates, problem-solvers, and product experts reminding our clients that behind our innovative software applications are great people who are passionate about what they do!   What does a Client Application Specialist do? Deliver solutions by identifying problems, researching answers, and guiding users through corrective steps. Educate clients and explain features and functionality of software applications. Use outstanding customer service to troubleshoot and resolve issues in a timely manner. Provide telephone, email, live chat, and remote support to clients. Improve system performance by identifying issues and recommending changes. Continue product expertise by updating job knowledge, education training, and maintaining personal networks. Take on additional responsibilities and projects as needed.   What makes a successful Client Application Specialist? Excellent problem-solving, communication and, interpersonal skills along with patience, a customer-friendly attitude, and the ability to work in a team environment. Technology background or strong personal interest in technology. Ability to troubleshoot and resolve difficult problems. Strong work ethic and high level of initiative and efficiency. Great communication skills that can be tailored to the client’s needs. Ability to learn quickly in a self-directed environment with minimal supervision. College degree, technical coursework, or 1+ years in a technical support environment. Customer and team focused attitude. Technology certifications are a plus. An affinity for soft serve ice cream.     ACTIVE Network Perks & Benefits Health, Vision, Dental, Pet Insurance and 401K State-of-the-art office space in Downtown Dallas including an indoor park, tavern, ACTIVE Tech Shop and more! On-site yoga classes, groups runs, Daily Dose workouts/training programs and Morning Milers through our ACTIVEx Corporate Wellness Program Hookups and discounts for races, events, tickets, activity gear, bike purchase program and more! Give back with our ACTIVEx Charity Challenge partnership benefitting Kids in the Game Continue your professional development through our award winning ACTIVEU online courses.    Active Network is an equal opportunity employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. ",Client Application Specialist,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Client-Application-Specialist-Technical-Support-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164211733.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=1,,Customer Support/Client Care,94880092817025458caf7740f6062ae4
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:05:30:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Awesome Couriers Wanted! with Car, SUV, Cargo Van or Truck COMPANY: Zip Delivery Zip Delivery a fast growing Courier Company is expanding. We need five more drivers who can start immediately. We specialize in on demand Hotshot deliveries thru out the Metroplex. I.C.'s are paid weekly on Friday mornings. QualificationsVehicle Type: Car, SUV, Wagon, Truck, Bobtail TrucksInsurance: State MinimumAvailability: M-FWeight: Must be able to lift 50lbsEquipment: Mapsco, Dolly, Tie DownsLicense: Valid Texas LicenseDMV: Good Driving RecordHistory: No FeloniesCompensation: Commission Based  Respond online for more information. Respond online today.​ Location: Dallas, TX Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 5072 Vehicle Type: Any Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Dallas,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX 75220",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Driver-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164969716.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=2,,,6968adfc19a99e907e8a4eb4cf0731cb
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:05:43:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Altegra Health leads the U.S. healthcare industry with business & technology solutions that improve health plan performance by aligning member health status, benefits & accurate reimbursement in the following areas: Risk Adjustment, Reimbursement & Advisory Services, Eligibility & Enrollment Quality Performance In an age where attention to detail counts--providers, health plans & healthcare facilities trust our 1,100+ employees for comprehensive solutions that add value to their bottom line.www.AltegraHealth.com Inpatient/Outpatient Remote Coder with Injection and Infusion Experience:The Inpatient/Outpatient Remote Coder is a temporary, non-exempt position and reports to the Facility Coding Manager of Altegra Health’s Reimbursement & Advisory Services Division. The Inpatient/Outpatient Coding Specialist codes and abstracts Inpatient, Day Surgery Observation, interventional and medical records. Additionally, this position may abstract and code any level of outpatient medical records. Utilizes International Classification of Disease (ICD-9-CM) and Physicians Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) coding systems and other coding references to ensure accurate coding.Responsibilities: Assigns codes for all diagnostic and operative information from the medical record using ICD-9-CM, CPT, HCPCS level 2 coding classification systems.Assigns codes for diagnoses, treatments, and procedures according to the appropriate classification system for outpatient encounters.Selects the DRG for each in-patient case.Reviews DRG discrepancies from the fiscal intermediary to ensure the appropriate per case DRG assignment.Verifies and abstracts all medical data from the record to complete a data abstract on hospital encounters.Corrects data as appropriate. Ensures that all data abstracted and/or coded are consistent with guidelines outlined by JCAHO, OSHPD and CMS, regional and local policy.Reviews appropriate provider documentation to determine principal diagnosis, co-morbidities and complications, secondary conditions and surgical procedures.Assigns present on admission (POA) value for inpatient diagnoses.Utilizes technical coding principals and APC reimbursement expertise to assign appropriate ICD-9-CM diagnoses and ICD-9-CM/CPT-4 procedures.Identifies chargeable items for emergency department visits and enter into billing system.Extracts required information from source documentation and enters into encoder and abstracting system.Reviews daily system-generated error reports to correct or complete missing data elements.Assists in implementing solutions to reduce back-end billing errors.Abides by the Standards of Ethical Coding as set forth by the American Health InformationManagement Association (AHIMA) and adheres to official coding guidelinesQualifications: Certification: CCS, CIRCC, RHIT or RHIACompletion of classes in medical terminology, anatomy and physiology, ICD-9 and CPT coding conventions, and disease process from an accredited program.Must have Associates Degree or EquivalentMust have three years of continuous inpatient hospital experience in coding.Completion of classes in medical terminology, anatomy and physiology, ICD-9 and CPT coding conventions, and disease process from an accredited program.Altegra Health is committed to building a highly diverse, best-in-class workforce at all levels of the organization. We strive to attract and retain exceptional individuals regardless of their sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, marital status, sexual orientation, veteran status or other characteristic unrelated to the skills and abilities required for job performance.",IP / OP (SDS) Coder - Remote Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75235",All,http://jobview.monster.com/IP-OP-SDS-Coder-Remote-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165270492.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3495c0af8d2f8a628fa88f8aa96c1acd
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:05:58:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is currently looking for a Development/LIII Support Unix/Windows Server for a 3-6 months contract in Dallas Texas. Job description: Design, develop, and configure software systems to meet market and/or client requirements either end-to-end from analysis, design, implementation, quality assurance (including testing), to delivery and maintenance of the software product or system or for a specific phase of the lifecycle. Apply knowledge of technologies, applications, methodologies, processes and tools to support a client, project or entity. 1 - Internet Information Server (IIS) Administration 2 - IBM Websphere Administration (Not Assessed) As a member of Windows Server Application Integration team will be responsible for system design and application integration on various platforms. Tech skills: IIS/Windows .Microsoft Windows Clustering technologies,TCP/IP, DNS, and load balancing technologies.Windows and IIS Troubleshooting skills. Knowledge of ITIL process. Windows 2003, Windows 2008, Windows Clustering, SQL Knowledge, IIS 6.0, IIS7.5, IIS Troubleshooting skills. Load Balancers.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Development/LIII Support Unix/Windows Server Job in Highland Park,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Development/LIII Support Unix/Windows Server,"Highland Park, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/Development-LIII-Support-Unix-Windows-Server-Job-Highland-Park-TX-US-165087767.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,affd9ec8eb9698b2715e21c77ee79a47
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:06:26:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking to recruit for a Maintenance Manager to join our client who are a leading Food and Beverage manufacturer.Client DetailsWe are looking to recruit for a Maintenance Manager to join our client who are a leading Food and Beverage manufacturer.DescriptionReporting into the Plant Manager the Maintenance Manager will be responsible for all engineering and maintenance functions in the facility, and ensuring proper preventive maintenance of physical plant and all operating equipment, electrical troubleshooting, minimizing equipment downtime to provide the desired production capacity metrics and compliance with all OSHA regulations.The Maintenance Manager will also be responsible for:Seek to ensure reliability of plant and equipment operation while optimizing maintenance and operation costs and satisfying all safety, environmental etc regulations in the process.Coordinate the installation of new equipment to maximize production efficiency and maintainability.Maintain a knowledge base in the capacity of existing utilities and the current level of utilization.Oversee the maintenance of the equipment and the facility to ensure the company receives maximum utilization of its assets.Ensure that systems are implemented to and adhered to for the maintenance and reliability of the equipment & processes.Leadership role for project initiatives aimed at reducing down time, improving reliability, conserving energy, and upgrading equipment.Improving manufacturing processes in terms of quality and performance measurements, and identifying and eliminating problem areas.ProfileRequirementsBachelor's degree preferred; 10+ years of maintenance and 5yrs. +high speed manufacturing experience.5-7 yrs. of increasing levels of supervisory roles of people & processes required.Experience of maintenance plans in Reliability, Maintenance KPIs and maintenance cost.Understanding of national, state, and local regulatory requirements in the areas of food safety, safety, environment and emergency management.Six Sigma / Lean / CI or TPM Certifications highly desired.Working knowledge of CMMS software, SAP preferredJob OfferExcellent base salary in addition to bonus, strong 401k match and benefits",Maintenance Manager - Food Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Manager-Food-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164746558.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=17,"100,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",,73ff2868b2c7e104e5fe38ed64a0f9c6
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:06:35:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Analyst II The University of Texas System Irving, TXThe University of Texas System is currently recruiting 2 vacancies for the following position in Irving,Texas Business Analyst II- Irving, TX, Posting ID: 2623Monthly Salary: $8,903 To view requirements, salary and apply, go to the UT System Careers Website:www.utsystem.edu/careers The University of Texas System Administration is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Conviction verification conducted on applicant selected. The Dallas Morning News  -  03/27/2016",Business Analyst II Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75202",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Business-Analyst-II-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165324900.aspx?ch=dallasmorning&mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=13,,,341ff8b8cdb1fc03764bb4d29bfa5cf0
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:07:05:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"About CBRE (NYSE: CBG): At CBRE, you are empowered to take your career path into your own hands. Enjoy workplace flexibility in a global organization with tremendous scale. Work in an inclusive and collaborative environment with supportive teammates. Come experience the employee advantage at CBRE. CBRE has a long-standing commitment to providing equal employment opportunity to all qualified applicants regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, veteran status, political belief, or any other basis protected by applicable law. As a Fortune 500 worldwide leader in real estate services, CBRE’s more than 70,000 professionals provide exceptional outcomes for clients in 60+ countries. When it comes to real estate, CBRE sees potential everywhere. We turn scale into strength, expense into performance, and property into prosperity. Visit CBRE.com.JOB SUMMARY Plans, implements, coordinates and manages all mechanical operations, maintenance, communications, energy management, and manpower development programs for a facility, campus or portfolio of buildings. AS Scope: Typically supports a multi-property portfolio with multiple owners. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Manages the building's operational accounts and assists in development of operating and capital budgets. Assists in operations and maintenance issues, troubleshooting and problem solving as required. Recommends and implements improvements for preventive maintenance programs on an on-going basis and develop/maintain effective building-specific maintenance and safety procedure manuals. Coordinates maintenance efforts with outside contractors, tenant finish personnel and technicians. Oversees all building systems including fire/life safety, plumbing, HVAC and electrical issues and must remain current with latest HVAC technology trends. Maintains on-going communication with tenants, clients, owners, facility management team and vendors. May assist in solicitation and acquisition of new management contracts. Coordinates development and maintenance of as-built drawings. Responds to all emergency situations quickly (fire, evacuation, equipment failure etc.) and customer concerns. Implements and administers inventory control programs/purchase parts and supplies. Develops specifications and assists in solicitation and administration of maintenance/repair service contracts. Establishes and monitors programs to ensure compliance with applicable codes, requisitions, government agency and company directives as relates to building operations. Performs other duties as assigned. SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES Provides formal supervision to individual employees within single functional or operational area. Approves subordinate's recommendations for staff recruitment, selection, promotion, advancement, corrective action and termination. Effectively recommends same for direct reports to next level management for review and approval. Plans and monitors appropriate staffing levels and utilization of labor, including overtime. Prepares and delivers performance appraisal for staff. Mentors and coaches team members to further develop competencies. Leads by example and models behaviors that are consistent with the company's values.EDUCATION and EXPERIENCE Bachelor's degree (BA/BS) from four-year college or university and a minimum of four years experience and/or training. Or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge and understanding of all applicable practices and techniques, laws, project controls and environmental regulations to include safety regulations. CERTIFICATES and/or LICENSES Universal CFC certification required. Additional certification in three or more of the following: HVAC, electrical, mechanical, HVAC and refrigeration systems, process controls, mechanical power transmissions, painting, plumbing, carpentry or engine repair. Certifications/licenses as may be required by local or state jurisdictions.COMMUNICATION SKILLS Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Strong organizational and analytical skills. Ability to provide efficient, timely, reliable and courteous service to customers. Ability to effectively present information.Ability to respond effectively to sensitive issues. FINANCIAL KNOWLEDGE Requires advanced knowledge of financial terms and principles. Ability to calculate intermediate figures such as percentages, discounts, and commissions. Conducts advanced financial analysis. REASONING ABILITY Ability to comprehend, analyze, and interpret complex documents. Ability to solve problems involving several options in situations. Requires advanced analytical and quantitative skills. OTHER SKILLS and ABILITIES Physical requirements to include stooping, standing, climbing and frequent lifting of a minimum of 50 lbs. Must have the ability to operate an EMS and CMMS system. Intermediate skills with Microsoft Office Suite. Ability to handle multiple projects and make decisions. SCOPE OF RESPONSIBILITY Decisions made with thorough understanding of procedures, company policies, and business practices to achieve general results and deadlines. Responsible for setting work unit and/or project deadlines. Errors in judgment may cause short-term impact to department.Additional Information:",Chief Building Engineer Supervisor Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Chief-Building-Engineer-Supervisor-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165270260.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=17,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,a55df09acfe51a763a8ce2e37ba4220d
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:07:06:02,No,jobs.monster.com," Metroplex Management GroupMETROPLEX MANAGEMENT GROUP IS LOOKING FOR BOTH ENTRY LEVEL AND EXPERIENCED MARKETING REPRESENTATIVES TO GET STARTED WITH OUR FIRM!Metroplex Management Group is growing and expanding as a successful marketing firm in the area and we are currently going through a nationwide expansion. We are hiring entry level and experienced public relations, marketing, and retail representatives. Our firm provides exceptional customer service and continually develops new marketing campaigns for our high profile Fortune 100 clients that deal with mainly security, electronics & communication industries.We are offering Full-Time positions and we offer Full Paid One on One Training.It is our goal to find entry level candidates that enjoy a fast paced environment and face to face retail interaction so that we can train them to become one of the best! JOB RESPONSIBILITIESGrowing and developing our clients market share through new customer acquisitionSuccessfully implementing & executing sales and marketing strategiesHitting and exceeding promotional sales targets JOB EXPERIENCEExperience is not necessary but any background in the following is a huge plusCandidates who live in the area will be taken under immediate considerationNot sure if you have what it takes, no problem. We will train you from the ground up!College Graduates and Interns are WELCOME to apply!Don’t miss this phenomenal opportunity to begin your career!Compensation: Based on experience and background  We will be reviewing all resumes and the most qualified candidates will be contacted within the next week for a preliminary interview. We look forward to speaking with you soon!Check out our website: www.metroplexmanagementgroup.com",st Time Manager: Entry Level Business Management Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",AllManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/1st-Time-Manager-Entry-Level-Business-Management-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164199535.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,"35,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Business/Strategic Management,dd7918b8995de3d5c0d98b6211b9fa8a
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:07:43:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Legal Assistant Legal Assistant - Dallas, TX (jobs) we are currently looking for an experienced Legal Assistant (Dallas, TX) legal assistant/paralegal for a growing in-house legal department in Dallas, TX.  We are looking for someone with solid litigation experience 1-5 years, exposure to filings and docketing, also looking for great technical expertise/inclination and desire to work learn new systems.  This position will be working with the litigation and litigation support groups within the legal department.   RequirementsLegal Assistant- Dallas, TX  ·       MS Office skills, with an emphasis on Excel, Word and PowerPoint·       Legal Assistant with any exposure to matter management software a real plus·       Overall tech savvy ·       Positive personality excited to learn new systems and grow within the position/department. ·       Associates or higher degree·       1 or more years litigation experience Legal Assistant (Dallas, TX) legal assistant/paralegal for a growing in-house legal department!  If you have 1 or more years of litigation experience with in a law firm or in-house legal department, if you have an associates or higher or a paralegal certificate and you are looking for a great new opportunity that is truly a smart career move then please send your resume to Dallas@specialcounsel.com  or please visit our contact the Special Counsel Dallas office or email your resume to dallas@specialcounsel.com or visit our website at www.specialcounsel.com.   Please also follow us on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/SpecialCounselDallas and Twitter @Discov_Projects!  Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Legal Assistant- Litigation,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Assistant-Litigation-Dallas-TX-jobs-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165300102.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=9,,Legal,388ccbb510655f428a657896f37926ae
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:06:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accountant: Commercial Real Estate/Property Management (Dallas) Commercial Real Estate Firm near the downtown Dallas seeking staff accountant. This position is responsible for cash management and support for property management of several commercial real estate properties. This includes oversight of cash (payables and receivables), financial reporting and analysis, financial and business related projects, and ensuring accounting policies and procedures are followed. This position will interact with all company departments, tenants, vendors and investors. This position requires strong interpersonal, analytical skills as well as a forward thinking mindset. Please provide Salary Requirements: NOTE: Only those candidates providing salary requirements will be considered. Daily Tasks:§ Execute daily banking tasks (i.e. place stop payments, perform transfers and wires, process NSF checks, research and resolve banking issues).§ Post/ manage monthly expenses for each property in designated portfolio. § Cash management on all properties including monitoring of excess funds in accounts. § Review daily banking deposits and monthly banking statements in designated portfolio.§ Post/ maintain and manage property loans balances & payments in designated portfolio.§ Calculate/post tenant charge backs (i.e. insurance, property taxes, cam reconciliation, & vendor charge-back) in designated portfolio.§ Create projection worksheets for properties as needed.§ Perform special projects for the property management department and president of the company as needed.§ Partner with internal departments to research questions and resolve issues.§ Prepare tenant account analysis and reconciliation when tenants dispute charges to their account.§ Research and answer property managers' question regarding tenant statement.§ Ensure that all property and tenant information is up to date and correct through interpretation and cross referencing against other property information.§ Credit & ACH payments (tenants). Monthly/Quarterly Tasks:§ Prepare owner distributions including calculating and creating distributions checks on various properties.§ Reconcile property checking & money market accounts with monthly bank statements.§ Apply monthly late fees to tenants in accounting system.§ Review monthly expenses and compare variance with previous month's activity. § Prepare and manage monthly, quarterly and annual financial statements for accuracy and timeliness.§ Prepare quarterly financial statements to lenders on an as needed basis.§ Interact with other property accountants, banking personnel and asset managers. § Review balance sheet and income statement per property to verify account balances and reasonable revenue and expense amounts.§ Ensure accuracy of all general ledger information.§ Post recurring expenses.§ Review/ print rent rolls. Year End Tasks: § Provide year-end financials to CPAs, post year-end entries per CPA request, produce checks for taxes and mail returns with payment.§ Perform annual cam reconciliation and assemble the necessary detail and back-up for the tenant's use.§ Prepare/ maintain/ post annual insurance premiums charge back to property for monthly payment. § Prepare 1099/1096s. Special Tasks: § Process commercial leases in accounting system.§ Set up amortization schedules.§ Establish and maintain relationships with banks and other financial institutions.§ Set up new properties in the accounting software system.§ Maintain an annual calendar, update regularly and ensure all deadlines are met.§ Other related duties may be assigned as necessary.§ Improve process related to above duties and responsibilities.",Staff Accountant Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75207",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Staff-Accountant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164376348.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=18,"38,000.00 - 42,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),61c41696a1788afe8d85c4e62f69f9d5
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:07:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you searching for an opportunity to be a part of a team? Do you find it important to pay close attention to detail while still being able to meet production goals? If you are a team-oriented person who appreciates quality work and follows procedures then you have found the right position as a Vehicle Service Attendant.If you think you have what it takes then apply with us to be a Hertz Vehicle Service Attendant!Candidate must have a clean driving record and possess a valid US driver's license.  This is an hourly paid position and pay is based on current scale.  Nominal overtime required as needed.As a Hertz VSA...You'll be responsible for vehicle preparation to ensure vehicle is ready for customer pick-up.Drive and park vehicles on-lot as needed.Check for vehicle damage and ensure features of the vehicles are operational.Check vehicle status.  (rentable/non-rentable)Ensure interior of vehicle is clean.  (windows, door jams, trunk, vacuum, etc)Fill gasoline tank and check fill levels of all fluidsClean the exterior of vehicle. (debug and wash)Meet processing and standardization quotas.Perform related tasks as directed by managers.Able to work outdoors in all types of weather conditions.Mandatory Requirements:Must have a valid driver's license and excellent driving recordAbility to drive multiple types of vehiclesEffective verbal communication skills with customers, co-workers and managementMust be able to carry out additional duties and responsibilities as assigned by management due to operational needs.Must be able to work days, nights, weekends and holidays.Must be at least 20 years of age.Must be able to work outside year-round.Applicant must possess all auditory, speaking and communicating capabilities necessary to complete the responsibilities detailed above.  The essential functions of this position include, but are not limited to, the following: sitting, standing, walking, bending and twisting, climbing, driving, pushing and pulling, hearing, writing, lifting, typing, seeing, reading and the ability to use a computer and telephone.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Vehicle Service Attendant (Love Field) Job in Dallas,Full Time / Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Vehicle-Service-Attendant-Love-Field-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165053292.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,1bb0dcd575d993f18d2f195639a6b277
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:11:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking a high energy, strong leader to fill the role of System Engineer for a new opportunity in the Dallas, TX, area. The System Engineer will be responsible for directing, designing, developing, maintaining, and managing projects for all aspects of technology infrastructure for Ministry Brands. To perform this job, the individual must possess a strong understanding of administration of windows servers and must be able to execute each essential duty satisfactorily based on company standards. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or abilities required to perform the job successfully.• Meets goals and objectives outlined by Director of Networking and Systems.• Establishes network specifications by conferring with users; analyzing workflow, access, information, and security requirements; designing router administration, including interface configuration and routing protocols.• Establishes network by evaluating network performance issues including availability, utilization, throughput, goodput, and latency; planning and executing the selection, installation, configuration, and testing of equipment; defining network policies and procedures; establishing connections and firewalls.• Maintains network performance by performing network monitoring and analysis, and performance tuning; troubleshooting network problems; escalating problems to vendor.• Secures network by developing network access, monitoring, control, and evaluation; maintaining documentation.• Prepares users by designing and conducting training programs; providing references and support.• Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations.• Accomplishes organization goals by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.• Performs other job-related tasks, as assigned by Director.Qualifications:• Bachelor’s Degree in related field• 2 to 3 years of experience as a Network AdministratorHardware & Software Knowledge Requirements:• MS Windows Server 2008 R2/2012 R2• MS Active Directory, DNS, DHCP, and IIS services• Hyper-V• VMware ESX, vSphere• Microsoft Windows 8.1/10• MS Office suites• MS SQL Server• MS Terminal Services• MS Exchange• Programming/scripting experience• Experience with firewall configurations, routers, and managed switchesPreferred Skills & Requirements:• Must be able to respond to changing situations in a flexible manner in order to meet the needs of the company.• Must possess excellent customer service, time management and organizational skills.• Must have analytical skills to collect and summarize data, and find solutions.• Must be able to manage multiple projects simultaneously.• Must be able to develop and implement plans and procedures.• Must be willing and able to learn new technologies as needed.• Must be detail oriented and highly self-motivated work ethic.• Must be able to work under pressure to meet inflexible deadlines while maintaining composure.• Must be able to establish and maintain cooperative-working relationships with those contacted in the course of the work assignment.• Must be able to occasionally travel overnight and work nights/weekends to meet deadlines or support customers.",System Engineer/ Network Administrator Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/System-Engineer-Network-Administrator-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165189477.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2655a5c130a73b7013270c24c48171bf
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:14:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION: Systems Engineer – Electro-Optical Imaging and Sensor Systems LOCATION: Texas  COMPANY INFORMATION:  This position will work with a company that develops electro-optical products, including electro-optical sensor systems, digital imaging systems, thermal imaging systems, infrared cameras, digital cameras, …    POSITION BRIEF: Systems Engineer - with very strong experience developing infrared sensor technology – to design and develop infrared imaging systems that incorporate IR focal plane arrays into thermal cameras.  POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES: * This position will perform lead systems engineering roles on projects for the development of imaging sensors and cameras systems. * This position will work on projects end-to-end – from proposal and design, through prototype development and analysis, to product development and manufacturing. * This position will work with a small, multi-disciplined, highly energetic, and technically ambitious team. * This position will develop cutting edge, highly advanced, high-precision electro-optical imaging technology. * This position will perform work on multiple development projects covering the range of the company’s technology and product areas. * This position will assist upper management in all technology and business development activities. * This position will serve as a company technical expert in the following: (a) systems engineering for the development of infrared sensor technology and thermal imaging camera systems; and (b) incorporating IR FPAs into sensors, camera modules, and camera systems.  POSITION REQUIREMENTS:      Candidates for this position must have strong experience in the following:* systems engineering experience developing IR imaging systems;* systems engineering experience working with IR sensors;* systems engineering experience incorporating IR focal plane arrays..     Candidates for this position must have strong experience developing the following end product:* camera systems that are manufactured at a high volume.  Relevant camera product lines include: digital cameras, thermal cameras, and/or infrared cameras.      Candidates for this position must have a BS or MS degree in Engineering, plus strong industry experience is required. --------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------TO APPLY: Please forward a resume (Word version preferred) to: nlasky@photonicsgrp.com  RECRUITER INFORMATION: The Electro-Optics Group is a division of the recruiting firm, The Photonics Group, which recruits engineers nationwide for companies that design and manufacture optical, electro-optic, laser, and imaging systems.  Recruiter contact information is: nlasky@photonicsgrp.com        ",Systems Engineer – Electro-Optical Imaging and Sensor Systems Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Systems-Engineer-%E2%80%93-Electro-Optical-Imaging-Sensor-Systems-Job-Dallas-TX-US-145491785.aspx?mescoid=1700170001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d2542b66946995caeba0867ab3b21317
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:19:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Commercial Energy Agent Reliant Energy- Netpique, LLC authorized rep.Company DescriptionNetpique, LLC is specialized in direct sales and marketing of deregulated energy products and services in the utility markets of North America. Netpique, LLC the number one leader in Energy marketing throughout Texas and has acquired thousands of customers for Reliant Energy since the start of electricity deregulation in Texas.Job DescriptionSales Executive will be responsible for contributing to the expansion of the customer base for Reliant Energy, an NRG company, through client acquisitions, account activation, and customer enrollments in the commercial sector.  While we do not have any preferred experience requirements, our ideal candidate has either some experience in marketing, customer service, professional sales, or is a strong communicator with excellent people skills.Key Responsibilities:Present Reliant Energy offers directly to prospective customers.Utilize lead sheets, pre-qualified customers, to maximize customer acquisition daily.Initiate account activation process for new customers with Reliant Energy.Ability to meet with prospective customer at time of enrollment.Confidence in ability to answer questions and explain our services clearly to potential customers. QualificationsDesired Skills & Expertise:Professionalism - Our Sales Executives play a vital role in promoting our company and assisting in the development of new business.Self-Motivated with the ability to work under own initiative.Career oriented with interest in advancement into our Leadership Training Program.Exceptional communication skills and solid presentation abilities.Brand integrity – must reflect the company core values and uphold our high standard of customer interaction etiquette.  Compensation1.     Salary that starts Day 1 of training.  Salary starts at $21,4002.     Uncapped Commissions for a first year target of $55,0003.     Full Time, W’2d Position Monday-Friday.  No nights or weekends!4.     Full medical benefits, 401K, Paid-time-off, and Holiday Pay  If you feel that you are an ideal candidate and would like to be immediately considered for this opportunity email your resume to smccalla@netpique.com   or speak with a recruiter today by calling 877-434-2978 to schedule an interview.",Energy Sales Executive Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Energy-Sales-Executive-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164796499.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=13,"21,400.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,6cf191c6bca0e76dc7943b26cacb7d68
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:19:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionLOCAL CDL-A YARD HOSTLER CAREER OPPORTUNITIES in DALLAS, TX• $16.50 Per Hour + Benefits & Home Daily• 6 Day Work Week - Day Shift & Night Shift Available• Strapping Required• Dedicated Run - Steady Work - Good EquipmentAPPLY NOW or CALL 817-664-0023 FOR MORE INFORMATIONTransForce Drivers are Respected Professionals. Join the TransForce Team …Thousands of TransForce Drivers - 48 Branch Offices - 24 Years of Service!• We have an excellent reputation with our drivers and our customers.• TransForce shows genuine concern for your career objectives.• Safety is our priority. We comply with DOT and FMCSA.BENEFITS:• Competitive Weekly Pay - Direct Deposit or Debit Card• Medical - Dental - Vision Insurance• Life & Disability Insurance• Paid Time Off• 401KREQUIREMENTS:• 1 year of recent tractor trailer driving experience• No more than 3 moving violations in the previous 3 years• Not cited for a D.O.T. defined accident in the previous 3 years• No serious offenses in the previous 7 years or pattern of unsafe practicesTruck Driver - CDL Driver (Transportation)As a CDL Truck Driver you will be responsible for the safe operation of a commercial vehicle and the reliable delivery of our clients… products.TransForce, Inc. is seeking full time and part time local and regional CDL Truck Drivers at our 48 branch offices located throughout the U.S. We are the nation…s leading transportation staffing company and our drivers are respected professionals; safe, reliable, and profitable. Join TransForce and see why our 3,500 drivers are proud to be on the TransForce team. We offer steady pay, benefits, and good equipment. In addition you…ll enjoy assignment flexibility that you won…t find anywhere else. With TransForce you have the unique ability to consider a change in assignment rather than a change in employment if situations change.Keywords: tractor trailer driver, commercial driver, Class A cdl driver, professional driver CDL-A Driver, CDL A Truck Driver, Class A CDL Driver, Class A CDL Truck Driver, CDL Truck Driver, CDL Commercial Truck Driver.*cb*",TRUCK DRIVER - CDL A Local Yard Driver (Transportation) Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/TRUCK-DRIVER-CDL-A-Local-Yard-Driver-Transportation-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164939100.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,70d4ef269dc470c4b47be019b85a1774
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:19:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"  HomesteadAmerica, a growing Columbus-based property management firm, is seeking a well-qualified candidate to fulfill the duties of a unique Part Time Floating Property Manager position. This position would require working at our Shaker Square property every other Saturday.  This is both a challenging and rewarding position.  The cornerstone of our success is our skilled, close-knit management team where we combine talent, expertise, and professionalism with a positive, pro-active approach to solving management issues.  A well-qualified candidate will demonstrate exceptional customer service, communication, organizational, and multi-tasking skills.  This exciting and fast-paced position requires important responsibilities including (but are not limited to): Essential Duties and Responsibilities·        Manage the day to day operations of an apartment community to maximize the net        operating income.·       Ensure maximum occupancy, rental revenue, collections and prudent expense control.·       Train, Direct, Motivate, and Retain Property Staff to include Assistant Property         Managers, Leasing and Administrative Personnel, and Property Maintenance Personnel        as needed and approved.        ·        Maintain a positive work environment and atmosphere to promote team building         and cultivate HomesteadAmerica pride and mentorship in developing team and vendor        relationships. Record and account for all rental revenue and expenditures per data         entry as required.     ·       Promote and implement effective property management techniques and programs to        achieve a maximum level of NOI through a high level of Customer Service, Occupancy,         Rent Collection, and Prudent Expense Control. ·       Abide by the Policies and Procedures of HomesteadAmerica in the operation of and                 accounting for property operations. ·       Adhere to ongoing action plan with goals and objectives to meet orexceed the budgeted        NOI for the property. ·       Communicate with contractors, suppliers and vendors.A minimum of 2-5 years of experience in the property management field is preferred; however, candidates with a strong sales and management background will also be considered. Experience with Rent Manager is a plus.   The qualified applicant must be able to work every Saturday.   This position guarantees 8 hours a week with the possibility of additional hours depending on the each of our six property’s needs which are all located in the Central Columbus area.  Previously, this position “averaged” 20-25 hours per week (some weeks 40 hours and other weeks 8 hours). The ideal candidate must be available on short notice and have the ability to be flexible with hours.To learn more about our company, please visit our website at www.homestead-america.com.                           ",Part Time Floating Property Manager Job in Columbus,Part Time,"Columbus, OH 43213",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Part-Time-Floating-Property-Manager-Job-Columbus-OH-US-134394312.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=11,12.00 - 13.00 $ /hourPlus Commission,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),fe1085c6a34bcc647c36e3d7076326ac
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:20:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintain and increase market share by satisfying customer needs and meeting management/department objectives. Coordinate customer service with the shipping and operations departments, while meeting customer required delivery dates. Develop a close working relationship with customers, and all coordinating departments.Key Relationships:External Customers Outside salesShipping and ReceivingManufacturer RepresentationSpecialists/Sales/Internal CustomerPurchasing DepartmentEducational Requirements: High School Diploma or equivalentCollege education preferredPreferences-understanding for inventory demands-understanding for quality data entrySoftware Experience-must be able to operate in MS office, Excel, outlook, maintain calendar- prefer candidate with experience of Eclipse Solar or Epicor or profit 21- willingness to learnQualifications : The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required to perform the essential duties and responsibilities of this job. One (1) year experience working in a customer service-driven call center or One (1) year minimum experience in a sales, and/or customer service related position preferred.Working knowledge of MS Office (Word, Excel, Outlook)Detail orientedStrong numeric and alpha-numeric data entry skillsMust be able to work with all levels within the organizationAbility to handle multiple tasksAbility to communicate effectively in English in a positive manner both verbally and in writing.Problem solving skills- utilizing resources to source products that satisfy customer needsA working knowledge and understanding of distribution and warehousing procedures preferred, with aptitude for machining or manufacturingMachine Shop background preferred or tooling distributionHave demonstrated ability to follow through on direction.Specific Responsibilities: Must follow Instructions and be detailed oriented when it comes to customer satisfaction.Be able to handle customer related issues and maintain composure when dealing with an upset customerMaintain and develop assigned customer baseCross-train and foster solid working relationships with other employees- team playerMaintain open and effective communication with Sales and Purchasing to minimize number of deliveries and consistent quality issues.Monitor customer Gross Profit and credit levels of assigned customer base, work with Sales Reps to source new products and develop trust with customer through innovative solutionsInput orders into computer system Epicor or eclipse ERP preferredAdhere to operational proceduresAttend Sales, Inside Sales, Credit and other meetings as scheduled.Work with Sales Team by going on Ride-with to meet and help set up new customers.Maintain Customer contact informationResponsible for creating and maintaining necessary company and customer files.Responsible for managing daily expedite reportsSupport company sales and gross profit projections and goals as needed.Meet phone requirements and daily objectives.Suggestively sell promotional and in-house stocked items.Must be able to work evenings, weekends and holidays.Overtime may be required.Good attendance and adherence to work schedule - respect your team and bring value through commitmentCommitment to our mission statement putting our customer first and treating them with the level of customer service you would desirePhysical Requirements :This position requires the ability to contribute to warehouse functions such as picking inventory, packing boxes when needed and sitting at a desk for extended periods of time on the phone.Job Type: Full-timeRequired experience:Distribution or Sales: 1 yearRequired license or certification:RequiredRequired education:Bachelor's",Inside Sales Representative Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Inside-Sales-Representative-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165188140.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e14265477d9a2403e3e853b1755636f4
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:21:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"ABOUT US:U.S. Security Associates (USA) is one of America's largest security companies, delivering uniformed security services, consulting and investigations and specialized security solutions throughout the United States and around the world. U.S. Security Associates (USA) provides security services for thousands of clients, ranging from Fortune 500 firms to healthcare organizations, schools and universities, government agencies, and a variety of commercial and residential properties. We operate 160 branch offices and have experience and on-the-ground resources in 120 countries. USA employs 46,000 security professionals with diverse expertise and insight, ranging from entry-level security officers to some of the industry's best talent, from law enforcement, military and corporate security backgrounds.Under direct supervision, the unarmed Security Officer is responsible for patrolling assigned area to ensure protection of clients, visitors, property and equipment. The Security Guard controls and monitors access in and out of assigned site and monitors burglar and fire alarm systems as required. While we have entry level position to more seasoned positions, you must possess a Security License. If you are new to the industry, we can guide you in the right direction.Returning Military personnel and Veterans are encouraged to apply, as one of the largest security companies in America, we consider it our duty and our privilege to help provide rewarding careers for veterans in security service — where military service is an asset and advantage.A SAMPLE of JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Watches for irregularities, such as security breaches, facility and safety hazards, and emergency situations; contacts emergency responders, such as police, fire, and/or ambulance personnel as required. Remains alert for the presence of unauthorized persons and/or security code violators; approaches suspicious person and/or notifies police as appropriate; may confront and detain violators, as required, until police arrive. Patrols assigned area on foot, on bicycle, or in motor vehicle, as assigned, to ensure personal, building, and equipment security Examines doors, windows, and gates to ensure security; uses client keys to open and close buildings; monitors closed buildings for unauthorized persons and/or suspicious activities. May provide specialized security in complex operational areas, requiring specific knowledge of the operating environment.REQUIRED COMPETENCIES:Able to effectively communicate with others both orally and in writing. Physically fit, capable of walking extended periods of time and climb stairs. Capacity to work outside in extreme weather conditions. Capable of reacting appropriately in emergency situations. Skilled in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid is a plus!JOB QUALIFICATIONS:High School Diploma or equivalent Entry Level Position to More Seasoned Positions A Security License is required to work for us. Be at least 18 years of age (21 for some positions) A US citizen or an alien lawfully authorized to work in the United States Must pass a background check and drug screen Light Computer Skills is a plus Open Positions for multiple shifts BENEFITS:Our benefits packages are structured with the flexibility to fit every client need and every security services budget. Security officer benefits include the following:Medical insurance options Holiday pay Vacation pay 401k retirement savings plan Tax-free flexible spending plans Pay-positive paycards / Direct Deposit Paid Training Click Apply now to submit your resume for consideration.EOE",Security Officer Job in Irving,Full Time Employee,"Irving, TX 75062",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/Security-Officer-Job-Irving-TX-US-153437990.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=11,,Security/Protective Services,b64cb1491027e68f52a8b94068e47067
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:22:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Retention Marketing Team is seeking a Senior Manager to manage one of the existing customer base segments for the U-verse product. Through the development and execution of strategic marketing plans, including customer segmentation, promotional pricing strategy and offer portfolio management, the position will meet the Broadband product retention business targets for AT&T’s Entertainment and Internet Business. This position will be required to become the customer segment expert, capable of driving action and change through the enterprise. Key skills and attributes required to become a success include; ability to design pricing proposals, interpreting analytical reports, generating insights from customer research, business case development, managing a budget, and a proactive approach to problem solving. Tactics will include working with cross-functional groups including Business Analytics, Finance, Sales Operations, IT, and Customer Service as a result this individual will also need to have the ability to gain consensus among the cross functional teams and drive tactics to market quickly and effectively. Responsibilities: · Manage retention including promotional discounts, video and broadband service upgrades, premium programming trials, sports programming discounts and equipment pricing · Manage and evolve customer segmentation, leveraging customer analytics to identify customer churn events and drivers of retention and loyalty · Utilize multiple inputs, including competitive intelligence and customer data, to monitor effectiveness of KPIs, including commitment renewal and recurring credit treatments · Track, analyze and communicate key retention metrics to senior leadership · Serve as primary interface and subject matter expert for day-to-day interactions with Sales and Service and Digital Teams · Use effective time and project schedule management to consistently meet deadlines and ensure preparedness for program launchMaintain and reconcile a detailed annual expense budget · Bachelor’s Degree and 5-7 years relevant experience (Marketing, Research, Analytics or Pricing) required · Strong presentation skills and experience in effectively communicating to senior management · Proficiency in standard MS Office applications · Occasional travel required (~10%) · Leadership qualities · Demonstrated success managing teams · Demonstrated ability to analyze complex issues · Results-oriented · Ability to accommodate change and adapt accordingly",Senior Marketing Manager Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Marketing-Manager-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165082968.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=4,,,cc57e2e833eac2239af210341b0f1181
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:22:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Maintain a positive attitude and smile and be polite with customers throughout the transaction Greet customers as they approach the cash register Take the customer’s order and prepare the order according to brand specifications and the customer requests Must have knowledge of menu items and recipes to effectively service the customer Effectively and efficiently complete the financial transaction Maintain the balance of the cash drawer at all times Distribute and post marketing materials as required Maintain daily temperature logs Adhere to additional standards set by designated brand Proper use of station machinery and equipment Ability to understand and follow directions given by management Maintain a neat and clean beverage station and a presentable work area Ability to stand for extended periods of time, up to 6 hours Ability to lift up to 25lbs and frequently lift, push, pull, or carry up to 30 lbs Ability to walk or stand for extended time periods, up to 6 hours Involves repetitive motion Involves working with chemicals, heated equipment, steam and at other risk conditions Assist management team with administrative functions and daily food prep during down times Additional Job Functions: Work in other areas and departments as necessary Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Qualifications Required Qualifications: Excellent interpersonal skills and a positive attitude Ability to work independently Posses good time management with daily tasks required by the management team Math skills for counting money and providing correct change Knowledge of running a cash register, and credit card machine transactions Desired Qualifications: Experience in the food service industry as a barista (smoothie) food service worker Great customer service skills Work Environment: Front-of-house barista station. Occasionally requires the ability to work in the kitchen area and possible interaction with hot food items, heated equipment, steam, noise and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-03-28",AM Barista/Cashier Part-Time Regular (Christ for the Nations Institute) Job in Dallas,"Part Time, Employee","Dallas, TX 75224",,http://jobview.monster.com/AM-Barista-Cashier-Part-Time-Regular-Christ-for-the-Nations-Institute-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165182224.aspx?mescoid=3500613001001&jobPosition=16,,Food Services/Hospitality,f812201290d5cfacd4344cfc3a6973b3
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:24:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title C&I Relationship Manager Job Description East West Bank is one of the largest independent banks headquartered in California serving consumers and businesses throughout the U.S. and Greater China. With over 130 locations worldwide including California, Texas, New York, Georgia, Massachusetts, Nevada, Washington, and Greater China – East West Bank is committed to helping their customers’ enterprises succeed. At East West Bank, we build bridges that provide an important financial link, turning opportunities into growth and prosperity.East West Bank is currently seek a Senior Relationship Manager, (RM) ranging from levels 1-4, have increasing levels of banking experience and direct portfolio management responsibility. Various backgrounds in finance supported Bachelor and Master degrees are preferable. Main differentiating factor as seniority increases is the “consultative” approach this RM demonstrates when dealing with their clients. This position handles needs for a wide array of borrowers with different credit structures and depository requirements. The RM will demonstrate strong underwriting and forecasting skills. The candidate will have increasing levels of experience with the Bank’s credit policy and procedures on risk-rating loans/credits. An RM with credit emphasis evaluates both cash-flow and collateral-based loans/credits and help to develop problem loan credit solutions.As an East West Bank employee, you will be part of a growing and stable organization that provides career path development opportunities while serving a growing and profitable market.As a valuable East West Bank team member, your duties (not limited to) will include: · Develop commercial banking relationships with middle market prospects.· Cross sell deposit, trade, treasury management, foreign exchange, private banking, asset management, and other services.· Lead a team of other Relationship Managers to achieve their goals.·   Work with credit analyst to underwrite deals proposing terms, conditions and covenants.Qualifications/Experience:· 15+ years banking experience.· 10+ years C&I commercial banking sales and portfolio management.·   Bachelor’s degree required & MBA preferred.·   Current experience managing a team of RMs with portfolio responsibility·   Diverse underwriting, credit structure and product knowledge skills.East West Bank is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected status. Reasonable accommodations for disability are provided to applicants and employees in accordance with applicable law. Job Family Commercial Banking Auto req ID 5235BR Position Type Full-Time Country United States State Texas City Dallas",C&I Relationship Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/C-I-Relationship-Manager-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165028384.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=6,,Marketing/Product,e40edc3b3a083a8e46bd16e724455780
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:08:57:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of the largest and fastest growing 3PL organizations is seeking a Sr Industrial Engineer to work in the corporate engineering services group to support both Solutions and Operations teams. Position Description Summary: The Senior Industrial Engineer role will be responsible for providing engineering services for the Contract Logistics business unit, for defining and deploying execution standards and product methods across all verticals, for driving Lean practice into operations, and providing mentorship to Services Engineering and Field Quality teams.Principal Accountabilities (The following is intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. It is not an exhaustive list of all expectations.): Technical Industrial Engineering Acumen: data analytics, statistical process control, sensitivity analysis, sampling, simulationProcess Design & Optimization: process design & documentation, slotting, ABC analysis, sequencing, scheduling, capacity planning, IT collaborationEngineered Labor Modeling: time/motion studies, predetermined time systems, fatigue factors, productivity, staffing planFacility Layout & Design: warehouse design standards, storage analysis, storage medium specification, automation-mechanization, WCS-WMS processesMHE Specification: MHE specifications and standards, vendor engagement, specifications, standards, automationLean Six Sigma: DMAIC methodology, A3, value stream mapping, Kaizen eventsManufacturing: forecasting, MRP/DRP, S&OP, inventory management, cell design, takt timesSupply Chain Modeling: Transportation modeling, network optimization, CoG studyThe following minimum requirements are normal guidelines and should not constrain the advancement of otherwise qualified personnel:Bachelor's degree in Industrial EngineeringTravel of 30-50% depending on project requirementsMinimum 1 - 3 years professional experience; Minimum one (1) year work history as an Industrial EngineerExperience in Hi-tech/Electronics, Consumer, Retail, and/or Aerospace Industry VerticalsEffective Communication Skills3PL experience and work history a plusLean certifications a plus. APICS certifications a plus (CPIM, CSCP)______________________________________________________________________________________________We are an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.",Sr Industrial Engineer (Warehouse / Distribution) Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Industrial/Manufacturing EngineeringGeneral/Other: EngineeringSystems/Process Engineering,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Industrial-Engineer-Warehouse-Distribution-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165276714.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=14,,Engineering,2a8bcaf6aa121c27abec66f7290947e6
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:09:18:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Join Our Team: Our People Make the Difference!Auto Plus is a leading distributor in the U.S. for replacement parts, equipment, tools, accessories, paint and related products in the automotive aftermarket industry. Our team is committed to excellence! We proudly serve customers in more than 240 company operated stores and over 22 distribution centers across the country. We are a dynamic organization looking for top performing managers who are passionate about achieving high level sales targets and maximizing operational performance to exceed customer expectations. Our culture is one that encourages teamwork among high energy individuals seeking challenging and rewarding work. We offer a comprehensive benefits package with excellent salary and bonus/commission potential. Currently, Auto Plus has an opening for: General Distribution Team MemberThis position is a key resource in our company and critical to our success. Duties could include: receiving, checking in stock, pulling parts, and ensuring all merchandise is in the proper location. Requirements:·         Warehouse experience is preferred, but not necessary.·         Ability to lift up to 50 lbs. ·         Must be able to multi-task in a fast paced environment. ·         Must be able to work well on a team.·         Highly motivated with attention to detail.·         SAP experience preferred, but not necessary.·         RF scanner experience is preferred, but not necessary.·         Hours for this position will vary due to business needs  We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer",General Distribution Team Member Job in Dallas,Part Time,"Dallas, TX 75237",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Distribution-Team-Member-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165263766.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Entry Level,abe9438b15edd416e217db707f645dea
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:09:25:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manifest Marketing Inc is one of the fastest and most successful marketing and advertising firms in the area and we are currently going through a nationwide expansion. We are hiring entry level and experienced public relations, marketing, and retail representatives. Our firm provides exceptional customer service and continually develops new marketing campaigns for our high profile clients.MANIFEST MARKETING INC HAS OPENED UP 2 NEW OFFICES WITHIN THIS PAST MONTH AND WE ARE LOOKING FOR BOTH ENTRY LEVEL AND EXPERIENCED MARKETING REPRESENTATIVES TO GET STARTED WITH OUR FIRM.We offer Full Time positions and we offer Full Paid, One on One Training.It is our goal to find entry level candidates that enjoy a fast paced environment and face to face retail interaction so that we can train them to become one of the best.Job RequirementsExperience is not necessary but any background in the following is a huge plus:Customer ServiceRetailSalesRestaurantMarketingAdvertisingPublic RelationsManagementShift Lead or Team LeadAPPLY TODAY TO SECURE A ONE ON ONE INTERVIEW***NOT A DOOR TO DOOR, B2B OR TELEMARKETING COMPANY*** POSITIONS ARE LIMITED! **ONLY APPLICANTS IN THE COLUMBUS  AREA WILL BE CONSIDERED!**APPLY TODAY!All resumes will be reviewed and qualified candidates will be contacted within 24 hours via e-mail.Visit OurWEBSITELike us onFACEBOOKFollow us onTWITTERCheck out ourGOOGLE +Connect with us onLINKEDIN Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, entrepreneur, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail,  management, administrative, business development, business, internship, advertising, human resources, entry level, retail, outside sales, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, public relations, salesman, communications, training, media, general, sales manager, sales, general business, project management, hospitality, intern, management trainee, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, trainer, media, professional, trainee, internship, administration, college graduate, sales management, manager, sports, entertainmentApply if you have a degree of experience in: Business Management - Business - Business Administration - Education - Teaching - Coaching - Communications - Psychology - Criminology - Law - Marketing - Advertising - Entrepreneurship - Management - Hospitality Management - Sales - Public Relations - Human Resources - Business Development We are an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to hiring a diverse workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V ",Account Sales Manager - Entry Level Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43219",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Account-Sales-Manager-Entry-Level-Job-Columbus-OH-US-164427740.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=1,"30,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /yearBase Pay + Uncapped Commission / Bonus Structure",Entry Level,97b8ad75f37183c243d65bc06473298c
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:09:26:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Plastic Extrusion Shift Manager – Flexible Packaging -- Direct Hire with benefits and relocation  -- Your information will be held highly confidential – apply with confidence.  Location: East Dallas, TX (not commutable from some of Dallas – we will discuss on the phone) Compensation: Up to $65K + annual bonus + relocation packageSpecial Knowledge needed: Plastic Film Extrusion and/or Film converting & Web handling Shift: some off-shift work will be done.  Not a fully 1st shift position. So consider this nights.  The CompanyYou have a chance to work for a plastic extrusion company that is not too big and not too small, offering benefits of both of those worlds.  This is a growing, medium-large sized flexible packaging company with 20 plants in North America, offering competitive salary, strong bonus program, solid benefits and 401K plan.  While the company is not the size of Bemis or Berry Plastics, it is a major player in the flexible packaging world.   You can enjoy having the stability of working for a profitable, multi-national company that has been around for decades. This plant offers ample salaried and hourly staff support of plastic packaging professionals who have been with the company for 3-20 years – this plant has well a tenured staff!   You will be in charge of a production crew of around 110 employees.   The Job This is a direct hire opening with benefits and annual bonus.  The main objective of this opening is to bring plastic extrusion knowledge, support, and people management skills.  There will be multiple departments under your wing as you run a shift: extrusion, converting, plastics reclaim, etc.  Your main objective will be to provide management and extrusion hands-on expertise to analyze plant performance (KPI's), correct any training issues in multiple departments, and effectively communicate solutions to performance issues down to the operator level. You will need to have a supervision or management background in film or sheet extrusion, and/or plastic film web handling and converting.  The recruiting processWe will have a brief, initial discussion so you can decide if this is worth putting your name in the hat. Then we will roll into a 20 minute discussion about your areas of expertise, accomplishments, and motivations to consider a potential move. After that, I will work to get you an interview with the company.  This company usually conducts a phone interview and two face-to-face interviews.   Requirements of Plastic Extrusion Shift Supervisor3+ years managing / supervising in plastic film, flexible packaging, and / or plastic sheet manufacturing facilities You know how to run equipment, start up, shut down, changeovers - plastic extrusion (although this is not an overly hands-on position). Plastic Extrusion, cast film, sheet extrusion and thermoforming, blown film.Flexible Plastic web handling / converting experience is a bonus",Extrusion Supervisor: Plastic Flexible Packaging Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Plastic Extrusion Shift Manager – Flexible Packaging -- Direct Hire with benefits and relocation  -- Your information will be held highly confidential – apply with confidence.  Location: East Dallas, TX (not commutable from some of Dallas – we will discuss on the phone) Compensation: Up to $65K + annual bonus + relocation packageSpecial Knowledge needed: Plastic Film Extrusion and/or Film converting & Web handling Shift: some off-shift work will be done.  Not a fully 1st shift position. So consider this nights.  The CompanyYou have a chance to work for a plastic extrusion company that is not too big and not too small, offering benefits of both of those worlds.  This is a growing, medium-large sized flexible packaging company with 20 plants in North America, offering competitive salary, strong bonus program, solid benefits and 401K plan.  While the company is not the size of Bemis or Berry Plastics, it is a major player in the flexible packaging world.   You can enjoy having the stability of working for a profitable, multi-national company that has been around for decades. This plant offers ample salaried and hourly staff support of plastic packaging professionals who have been with the company for 3-20 years – this plant has well a tenured staff!   You will be in charge of a production crew of around 110 employees.   The Job This is a direct hire opening with benefits and annual bonus.  The main objective of this opening is to bring plastic extrusion knowledge, support, and people management skills.  There will be multiple departments under your wing as you run a shift: extrusion, converting, plastics reclaim, etc.  Your main objective will be to provide management and extrusion hands-on expertise to analyze plant performance (KPI's), correct any training issues in multiple departments, and effectively communicate solutions to performance issues down to the operator level. You will need to have a supervision or management background in film or sheet extrusion, and/or plastic film web handling and converting.  The recruiting processWe will have a brief, initial discussion so you can decide if this is worth putting your name in the hat. Then we will roll into a 20 minute discussion about your areas of expertise, accomplishments, and motivations to consider a potential move. After that, I will work to get you an interview with the company.  This company usually conducts a phone interview and two face-to-face interviews.   Requirements of Plastic Extrusion Shift Supervisor3+ years managing / supervising in plastic film, flexible packaging, and / or plastic sheet manufacturing facilities You know how to run equipment, start up, shut down, changeovers - plastic extrusion (although this is not an overly hands-on position). Plastic Extrusion, cast film, sheet extrusion and thermoforming, blown film.Flexible Plastic web handling / converting experience is a bonus",,http://jobview.monster.com/Extrusion-Supervisor-Plastic-Flexible-Packaging-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164747677.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,"57,500.00 - 64,500.00 $ /year",Manufacturing/Production/Operations,8c7621aaa0da00c1f0cda3372f9c8941
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:09:31:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lead C# / ASP.NET Developer  DETAILSLocation:Las Colinas, TXPosition Type: Direct-Hire Citizenship Requirements:  US Citizens and those authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply.  No sponsorship is being offered at this time. ABOUT THE POSITIONOur client is seeking qualified candidates *IMMEDIATELY* for this opening. This is your chance to join a team devoted towards development and support for high-visibility applications to be used by tens of thousands of users in the financial sector.  GTN Technical Staffing is seeking a Lead C# / ASP.NET Developer for a Direct-Hire opportunity in Las Colinas, TX. The Lead C# / ASP.NET Developer must have advanced knowledge of web technologies and OOD/OOP best practices. The Lead C# / ASP.NET Developer must be highly proficient with GUI tools such as JavaScript / JQuery, HTML/HTML5 and CSS/CSS3. The .NET Developers / Architects / MVC and WCF will also need to have expert level experience developing, implementing, troubleshooting, and supporting applications with MVC design patterns.  This particular team is a Tier 3 support team which means most issues are code issues.  The Lead C# / ASP.NET Developer will be in the code diagnosing issue and taking them through the SDLC. The Lead C# / ASP.NET Developer will not be developing anything new until they find a good solution to stop something from breaking. TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS5+ years of experience in the following skill sets…C# / ASP.NET Web ApplicationsDesign / Development / ImplementationSupport / TroubleshootingDeep Understanding of OOP / OOD / Deep technical knowledge of OO Best PracticesMVC Design PatternsDesign / Development / ImplementationSupport / TroubleshootingSQL Server 2008 / Server-Side Development          Deep understanding of Stored Procedures / Triggers / Functions GUI Tools – JavaScript / HTML / HTML5 / CSS / CSS32+ years of experience in the following skill sets…Team Lead Experience  PREFERREDWeb Services – Developing / Implementing Apps Consuming Web Services        RESTful Web Services         WCF – Windows Communication Foundation   ",Lead C# / ASP.NET Developer Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 75039",,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-C-ASP-NET-Developer-Job-Irving-TX-US-165359691.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),79c58cca2774f40f0d715b0645f87961
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:09:58:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Job Purpose:Serves clients by developing case information, ordering records and bills, obtaining evidence, and settlement; forwarding file to litigation, under supervision of an attorney.Duties:* Order Medical Records and Bills for Personal Injury Firm. *Proficient in Microsoft Office; Word, etc. *Builds cases by interviewing prospective clients; obtaining case information; reviewing information with an attorney. * Collects case evidence and documentation by contacting people involved in the case; inputting information into file database and case management software (MyCase); logging incoming mail; forwarding information requirements to an investigator. * Keeps clients informed by communicating case progress. * Moves cases forward by verifying outstanding balances; preparing settlement documentation; compiling all medical records and bills; passing case to litigation. * Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading legal publications. * Accomplishes law firm mission by completing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Research Skills, Analyzing Information, Legal Administration Skills, Organization, Planning, Self-Development, Deadline-Oriented, Thoroughness, Verbal Communication, PC Proficiency, Client Relationships",Legal Assistant - Pre-Litigation Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75206",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Assistant-Pre-Litigation-Job-Dallas-TX-US-162519061.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=11,15.00 - 25.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),6718cb77812b321b4855ea5cad70699f
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:04:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Peak Health, PA developed and owned by two Nurse Practitioners has been providing corporate wellness programs since 1986. The staff of highly trained Registered Nurses provides a unique approach to health promotion.  Today’s market demands a high productivity level in order to be competitive.  The health of a company’s employees has a direct impact on productivity.  Rising health care costs continues to challenge employers.  Scientific evaluations of Health Promotion Programs have demonstrated improvements in select health outcomes.  Peak Health’s program is a science based, well implemented and properly evaluated program that can ensure positive outcomes for participants and their respective employer.  Peak Health’s individualized program is administered onsite for a number of companies.  We promote an understanding among participants as to how their lifestyle habits affect their health.  We monitor participant’s progress at short-term intervals to encourage progress over a sustained period.  We increase a participant’s morale, productivity, and quality of life both on and off the job.Peak Health seeks a full time registered nurse based in Dallas, TX.  The RN will: Meet individually with participants Assess current health habits and lifestyle choices Develop a practical easy-to-follow action plan for implementing new health habits Guide individuals through lifestyle changes Promote self-responsibility for lifestyle behaviors.The territory currently includes sites in Dallas, Arlington, Southlake, Plano, Austin and San Antonio.  Additional sites may be added as the territory expands.  The schedule is set by the Peak Health office.  We anticipate an average of 3-4 days per week.  Conference calls will be added to the schedule to conduct wellness appointments with our clients outside the travel territory.  Travel mileage is reimbursed.Successful candidate will be a licensed Registered Nurse in the State of Texas.  Candidate must be willing and able to obtain Nursing licensure in other states as needed to conduct telephonic wellness appointments.  Clinical experience in cardiovascular nursing preferred.  Excellent communication, assessment and motivational skills are required.  Must enjoy patient education and motivating client to attain reachable goals.  Must be willing and able to travel as well as have the ability to lift equipment up to 65 pounds.  Please send resume to:Peak Health, PA P.O. Box 3014, 2303-A Wellington Drive Wilson, NC 27895 Fax:  252-291-0393 Email:  hr@peak-health.net  ",REGISTERED NURSE (RN) Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/REGISTERED-NURSE-RN-Job-Dallas-TX-US-163753180.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=9,,,f2b4b65ad8d54baa2edf59fb6b3adc5e
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:06:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.Here""s to the leader in you. It""s time to do something you love, work with a purpose, and take on a challenge like never before. Meet T-Mobile, America""s Un-carrier, serving 50 million wireless subscribers and growing. When you join our team, you can make an incredible difference to your customers, and your co-workers. We""re looking for boldness, enthusiasm, and a whole lot of passion. In exchange, we offer real career growth opportunities in a place where awesome work is rewarded. This is the big leagues. You""ve got a lot of responsibility and people looking to you for guidance and leadership. Ready to bring it? Good. Here""s a little more on what we""re looking for: You""ve got prior sales and sales management experience with a customer focused retailer This includes previous consultative sales in consumer technology, coupled with a demonstrated record of high achievement You""ve also got experience in operational, financial and performance management, having previously managed site profit and loss You""ve also got a unique ability to lead and coach people to deliver great results People who know you would say you""re an amazing communicator, both with customers and teammates You""ve got solid computer proficiency A high school degree or GED is essential, while a Bachelor""s degree is preferredYou""re ready for this. So let""s talk about all the generous rewards we can offer for your outstanding work. Our compensation includes: Competitive base pay plus unlimited commissions Benefits for part-time and full-time associates Medical, dental and vision benefits Matching 401(k) Generous paid time-off programs Phone service discounts Education reimbursement Serious growth potential for your careerThis is the opportunity to do something special and be a leader with a company revolutionizing the wireless industry. And we couldn""t do it without someone like you. So what do you say? Isn""t it time you explored what could become the career move of a lifetime? We invite you to apply today!You know retail sales inside and out, and you""re ready to make that next move to a leadership role like no other. In this role, you""ll manage talent, inspire your team, and make sure every customer comes away with a great experience. It""s not easy, but it""s the kind of challenge that can make your career. Take a closer look at what the job entails: When it comes to the customer experience at your store, the buck stops with you, as you ensure that each person gets an unforgettable experience and a custom-fit solution to their wireless needs You""ll help your associates to build strong relationships with their customers, make expert recommendations, and help onboard customers like a pro We""ll look to you to hire, train and develop your team, making staff adjustments as needed You""ll also ensure that your store meets or exceeds sales goals, and that means overseeing all store functions, from sales and inventory to the implementation of new store programs and initiatives Along the way, you""ll stay current on all our technology so that you can be an expert for your team, and your customers Finally, you""ll make sure your store always looks its bestWe Take Equal Opportunity Seriously - By Choice T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with our Company values and will not be tolerated. Furthermore, such discrimination or harassment may violate federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",*Retail Store Manager - Dallas Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX 75225",,http://jobview.monster.com/Retail-Store-Manager-Dallas-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164924016.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=15,,,91fb9e30ee20adf0ba92e78cfee59484
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:07:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you interested in the field of Personal Identity Protection and Biometric Identification? Ever wonder WHY we have layers of security in a license or ID card? Looking to hone your skills in the field of Software Engineering while gaining a wide range of knowledge and experience in the development life cycle?At MorphoTrust USA, students will work alongside various teams at different stages of the life cycle of our Identity and Biometrics Products that are used to create your license or ID card. From designing to development to testing to deployment and maintenance, wherever a student's interests or specialties are, there is a place to excel here at MorphoTrust!Here at MorphoTrust, whatever your interest is, there is an opportunity to contribute and learn as well as get exposed to a side of software engineering that you haven't even thought of. You may work on creating, editing, and analyzing specifications and product documentation. You could get hands-on experience in the lab or in the field actually testing out the software and hardware both manually and automatically through scripting. Build out machines, and set up environments for the products to run from as well as troubleshoot issues in both software and hardware applications. Opportunities may include working with Business Analyst, Software Engineering, Integration Engineering, QA, and Solutions Architecture.Essential Job Functions (includes but is not limited to):Must be proficient with Windows as a desktop environmentAbility to utilize Microsoft Office tools as well as Windows system toolsExcellent verbal, written, and presentation skillsExcellent problem solving skillsAbility to read test plans and perform testing on software/hardwareSome programming experience (minimum 1 semester of a programming language)Other Skills Optional:Database knowledge and SQL queriesXML creation and editingFamiliarity with processes and Windows servicesRequired Skills:Intern student should be willing and able to provide his/her engineering expertise while participating in the planning, development, testing, and deployment of complex systemsDesire to be flexible and work with different groups on varying projectsStudent should be able to work with a team and take direction from senior engineers regarding direction and instructionsAbility to multitask and prioritize time accordinglyAbility to interact with people professionally in an office settingAbility to communicate results and grasp the basic technology involved in our products and systemsMust be inquisitive and hardworking, with a true desire to learn and contribute to our systems and productsInterest in new technologiesRequired Experience:Enrolled in BS/BATravel Requirement, Working Conditions and Physical Demands:Travel requirement, such as:Ability to travel to client locations for performing Business Analysis and documenting requirements from the client.Must be able to travel occasional by air as needed to attend training, conferences, and related activities.Working Conditions, such as:General office environment. The work area is adequately lighted, heated, and ventilated.Physical Demands, such as:Office environment where the employee may sit comfortably to do the work. Some walking, standing, bending, reaching, and carrying of light items such as papers, books, small parts; driving an automobile, etc. Requires eye-hand coordination and manual dexterity sufficient to operate a keyboard, photocopier and other basic office equipment.The work requires light physical effort with frequent lifting and/or moving of materials in the 10-30 pound range and occasional lifting up to 50 pounds. Requires manual dexterity and ability to manipulate small objects. May require normal range of hearing and vision to operate machinery.Must be a US Citizen, without dual CitizenshipMorphoTrust is an equal opportunity employer.We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex,sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics",Software Intern (-) Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX","Computer Software, Computer/IT Services",http://jobview.monster.com/Software-Intern-2263-758-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164462116.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,6995220bd986e878c385b4a03568c522
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:07:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"TheCounter Sales Representativeis an essential member of the airport location team and is the brand ambassador, providing the fastest, easiest, and most valued experience to our customers. This sales commissioned team member provides world class customer service and professionally and effectively sells Hertz products and services to meet the customer’s travel needs.The key responsibilities and accountability are:Effectively communicate and offer ancillary products and services to enhance customer’s travel experience.Strong emphasis on selling and revenue maximization on core products such as, but not limited to, options to waive customer’s responsibility of damage, fuel options and vehicle upsells.Achieve personal sales goals while supporting the goals of the team.Work in a fast paced sales environment, providing helpful, quality service and sales, while enhancing the customer’s rental experience.Provide world class customer service by managing the rentals and returns process, in compliance with Hertz’s policies and proceduresQualify and process customer rentals with accuracy and attention to detail.Drive continuous improvement by communicating customer feedback to team and engaging in action planning to improve operational performance and customer satisfaction.Resolve customer issues and concerns professionally using effective customer service techniques.Maintain appearance appropriate for providing best in class customer service in accordance with established guidelines.Educational Background:High School Diploma or equivalentProfessional Experiences:A minimum of one year of sales or customer experience in a high volume or service oriented environmentPassion for customer service and attention to detail – Goes the extra mileProven strong sales and closing skills and the ability to friendly, engaging mannerMotivated to achieve and exceed targeted goalsKnowledge:Strong computer proficiency, including typing skills and the ability to navigate through multiple computer systemsProficiency in EnglishMust be able to:Demonstrate good communication skills both written and oral.  Communicate in English clearly and proficiently. Candidates fluent in other languages are encouraged to apply.Have the competitive drive and confidence to succeed in a commission-based environment.Work in a fast paced environment with a variety of tasks. Excellent organizational and time management skills.Demonstrate sales, professionalism and interpersonal skills.Show a high level of ownership, accountability and initiative.Show proven experience of working well within a team.Work flexible shifts including weekends and holidays; and work overtime as required.Work outdoors during all weather conditions.Stand for long periods of time.Physical Requirements:Applicant must possess all hearing, speaking and communicating capabilities necessary to complete the responsibilities detailed above. The essential functions of this position include, but are not limited to, the following such as sitting, standing, speaking, hearing, writing, typing, filing, seeing, and reading. Knowledge of equipment operation such as computer terminal, telephone, calculator, and fax machine is required.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Counter Sales Representative (DFW) Job in Dallas,Full Time / Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Counter-Sales-Representative-DFW-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165053301.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=16,,Customer Support/Client Care,2e0fb6842be907edf0f0eae8855a2913
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:07:37,No,jobs.monster.com," Job Summary:  Oversee the lease administration and real estate compliance program, including all applicable laws and regulations Stark Law and Federal Anti-Kickback Law, for a large healthcare client account.      Essential Job Duties:  Detailed functional knowledge of Stark Law and Federal Anti-Kickback Statute for healthcare (hospital/MOB) real estate transactions and train others on these laws. Provide guidance and resolution to lease administration team on any potential compliance issues that might arise. Director to discuss more complicated compliance issue with the High Level Compliance Team (NGKF/Client). Maintain and update Compliance Playbook and Compliance Training Slides.Work with Client to organize and conduct compliance training sessions for all new members to the team (NGKF/Client). Provide guidance and compliance training to Lease Administration Team. Work with Client to streamline processes and procedures. Functional knowledge of Fair Market Value Rental opinions as it relates to Stark Law and Federal Anti-Kickback Statute. Oversee the generation of FMV Rent Studies and Appraisals for all real estate transactions with appraisers and/or brokers. Monitor the deadlines for those studies to facilitate. Update FMV guidelines and criteria as warranted to meet “market” definitions. Maintain the FMV database. Interface with local market brokers, transaction managers and account managers to coordinate and compile accurate market rate data and log into tracking systems for review and use by client. Site visits to authenticate and coordinate accuracy of market data. Review all lease documents/contracts (new, renewal, expansion, etc.) prior to execution for business point accuracy.Complete business review checklist for all transactions. Work with lease administration on the transition of lease documents (existing and new) into the lease administration system. Provide bi-weekly progress status for both lease document transition and Mark-to-Market reporting. Work closely with the Client and lease administration team as a director/advisor. Expert knowledge of lease administration abstraction, lease documents (including ground leases and timeshares), best accounting practices, high quality and highly accurate data management, and property management. Must have ability to work independently with minimal oversight to meet rigid deadlines and precise deliverables. Skills, Education and Experience: Bachelor’s degree Must have a minimum of five (5) years functional knowledge of healthcare real estate, property management, data management, lease administration and accounting experience. Minimum of three (3) years of functional knowledge of Stark Law and Federal Anti-Kickback Law as it relates to healthcare real estate. Programs: Harbor Flex Lease Administration software and other property management and lease administration accounting systems (MRI, CTI, Yardi, Skyline, ProLease, etc.), Excel (advance level), Microsoft Word, PowerPoint and generally tech savvy to pick up new applications rapidly and become an expert user. Working Conditions:  Normal working conditions with the absence of disagreeable elements. Note:  The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees, and are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. Newmark Grubb Knight Frank is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V   Req. Code : 3740 % of Travel Required : 0-10%",Research Compliance Director Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75205",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Research-Compliance-Director-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164482676.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=2,,Other,5ec3e081d64262efd4b2782cfb4a8810
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:31:29,No,jobs.monster.com,Minimum 5 years’ experience in the following areas.  Boundary SolvingAlta/ As Built Survey’s . Travel required .   Self-starter with ability to manage multiple projects.  *Only project deadline and customer sensitive Surveyors apply*Contact ussurveyor@aol.com,Boundary Surveyor Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Boundary-Surveyor-Job-Dallas-TX-US-163178664.aspx?mescoid=1700160001001&jobPosition=16,,,f52cd96ca2eceda66c96564a446b34f1
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:32:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"CPR HeartPlace has an excellent employment opportunity for a Front Office FLOAT to work at its HeartPlace clinics located throughout the Greater DFW area.  This is a full time position with benefits, requiring the successful candidate to be available to work at any of our current HeartPlace facilities as needs dictate.  Prior working experience in a Front Office capacity is required. GENERAL SUMMARYResponsible for front office clinic duties, up to and including, check in, check out, phone reception, scheduling and any other general office duties required. KEY RESPONSIBILITIES1.     Maintains full-time presence at the front desk.2.     Registers all new patients at time of check-in and enters data in computer system.3.     Insures all established patients have updated and accurate demographic information.4.     Updates and maintains computer system with all patient information changes.5.     Requests co-pay and coinsurance from patients at time of arrival.6.     Provide support for all in-coming calls to the clinic.7.     Communicates the arrival of patients to the clinical area.8.     Prepares charts/paperwork for next day’s patients.9.     Supports the check out process of the clinic. Calculates and totals charge amount; collects co-pays and           deductibles, informs patient of the charge for         services.10.   Supports the scheduling process of the clinic.11.    Performs other duties as required. KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES1.     High school diploma or equivalent.2.     At least one year of clinical experience in a front office role.3.     Fluently speak, read, and write English.4.     Understanding of OSHA requirements in a clinical setting5.     Understanding of HIPAA requirements.6.     Excellent verbal and written communication skills.7.     Ability to meet physical demands of the job which include, but are not limited to: standing, bending,             pushing, pulling, lifting, transporting supplies or equipment, walking for extended periods of time, and         occasionally lifting and carrying items which may weigh up to 50 pounds.8.    Vision and hearing must be within or correctable to within normal range.  We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V.  We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.",FRONT OFFICE FLOAT Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/FRONT-OFFICE-FLOAT-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164742930.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=18,,,60b7c8dd8e6898d2e12d0e1bfcb4ad45
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:33:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality Control Inspector American Leather Operations Dallas, TX American Leather Operations seeks a Quality Control Inspector with a GED or equivalent & two years progressive experience. Will also accept any suitable combination of education, training or experience. Monitor or observe operations and furniture-related product purchased from vendors to ensure that they meet production standards. Recommend adjustments to the process or assembly. Inspect, test, or measure materials or products being produced to ensure products meet standards of quality and safety. Excellent verbal and written skills. Send resumes to JW 4501 Mountain Creek Parkway Dallas, TX 75236. The Dallas Morning News  -  03/06/2016",Quality Control Inspector Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75236",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Quality-Control-Inspector-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164500659.aspx?ch=dallasmorning&mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=7,,,0ac3a409c325e3877b7ab998861a3224
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:10:38:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Security Engineer, Dallas, HealthcareReal Healthcare IT has an excellent contract opportunity for a Senior Security Engineer at a well renowned institution in the greater Dallas area.Due to expansion of this institution this high profile information security team are seeking a consultant with in depth experience in various IT Security safeguard technologies. You will be responsible for supporting the architecture, design and assurance of information security mechanisms and services throughout the enterprise.Requirement:Bachelor's degreeEight years' experience in information securityExtensive knowledge of security tools including Trend Micro Antivirus, Firemon, SteathWatch, NexposeExtensive knowledge of AIX, Linux, UNIX, Microsoft, NovellExperience in healthcare system preferredStrong communication and interpersonal skillsReal was established in 1998 and currently has 250 specialist recruiters globally covering Healthcare IT, Pharmaceuticals, Biotechnology and Medical Devices. In the US, we have regional offices in Houston, San Francisco, San Diego, Chicago, New York and Boston.Our approach is simple, we focus on recognizing talent, valuing relationships and delivering expertise and offer the same level of service to both client partners and the talent we represent. Globally, Real places a specialist every 45 minutes.",Senior Security Engineer,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Security-Engineer-Dallas-Healthcare-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164332975.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=18,,,de8bcc4ddfa206eb18b8bc56b3d3aef9
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:11:31:50,No,jobs.monster.com," Clinic Administrator / CoordinatorROT: Administrator / Coordinator for Clinical Office ROT in MS: Clinic Administrator / Coordinator in Tyler, TX                   Administrator / Coordinator for Clinical Office in Tyler, TX Are you looking for an amazing career opportunity in the healthcare field? Check out this Clinic Administrator/Coordinator opening. This exciting opportunity is Full Time Salaried and located in Tyler, TX. This physician’s practice has multiple locations in Texas. Besides a competitive salary, they offer an extensive benefits package including Holidays, PTO, EXI, Health/Dental/Vision Insurance, Life Insurance, 401K, Continuing Education & more! This position will allow you to utilize your healthcare business operations experience, as well your leadership skills.LOCATION Tyler/Smith County is strategically positioned just 90 miles east of Dallas Ft. Worth and 90 miles west of Shreveport. Tyler enjoys a diversified economy and is the home of two colleges, and one major university. Income producers to our economy include manufacturing firms, healthcare facilities, educational and retail centers and the agricultural industry. Tyler is also the world's largest grower of commercially produced rose bushes, and is known as the ""Rose Capital of America"". Tyler offers a uniquely stress-free getaway far removed from the hustle and bustle of overpopulated cities.Relocation Assistance available.Day to Day Responsibilities: ·        Responsible to oversee the business, legal and clinical functions of the practice, including financial management, managed care negotiation, group and employee development and recruitment.·        Help develop strategic alliances, strategic planning and quality assurance.·        Coordinate with clinics, administrative leadership, team leaders and key departments to assure productive and positive relationships.·        Develop and maintain relationships with key hospital management, referring physicians and employers.·        Work closely with Business Office Manager to ensure proper billing, collection and day to day operations.·        Work closely with HR to coordinate and manage employee benefits program.  Desired Skills: ·        Bachelor’s Degree; Master’s Degree preferred.·        Previous team & leadership experience in healthcare business operations.·        Proficiency with MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint & Outlook)·        Excellent communication skills   Apply to this exciting Clinic Administrator/Coordinator opportunity by simply clicking the APPLY button below. Contact:Thor Group Inc.                                877-846-7477 / 310-727-1777www.thorgroup.com  Admin - Administrator - Administrative - Secretary - Coordinator - Microsoft - word - SharePoint - Office - Excel - Admin - Administrator - Administrative - Secretary - Coordinator - Microsoft - word - SharePoint - Office - Excel - Admin - Administrator - Administrative - Secretary - Coordinator - Microsoft - word - SharePoint - Office - Excel - Admin - Administrator - Administrative - Secretary - Coordinator - Microsoft - word - SharePoint - Office - Excel - Admin - Administrator - Administrative - Secretary - Coordinator - Microsoft - word -  ",Clinic Administrator / Coordinator Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinic-Administrator-Coordinator-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165372430.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),71f92974c4b0f6931d69857d91386176
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:11:33:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a hazmat tanker driver. Mostly Monday through Friday, but may occasionally work on weekends. Qualifications and requirements:Class A or B CDL with hazmat and tanker endorsements.Pass road test, MVR, drug and alcohol screen...Need at least 1 year verifiable experience",CDL Driver with X endorsement Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75220",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/CDL-Driver-with-X-endorsement-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164860177.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f944c44e061b5728462702a2d4dd5cad
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:11:36:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"ResponsibilitiesResponsible for collecting accurate and complete blood specimens from all patient populations. Perform registrations in laboratory information system and other computer application functions.Under the general supervision of the laboratory supervisor, process and handle specimens for testing in the Clinical laboratory. RequirementsEducation: High school graduate or equivalent.Experience: Basic knowledge of medical terminology, specimen processing and data entry.Excellent verbal, written, computer and clerical skills. Licensures & Certifications: Phlebotomist Certification is plus.",Lab assistant/Phlebotomist/Accessioner Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Lab-assistant-Phlebotomist-Accessioner-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164535272.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1a5695aae37ffe79893b77c1dbee1249
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:11:36:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Dallas Client is looking to hire multiple Mobile Developers on a contract to hire basis for an established company. Requirements:·         8+ years overall development experience in OOP (.NET, C or JAVA)·         3+ years mobile development experience in native iOS or native Android ·         Web development experience (HTML5) is considered a plus. ·         Xamarin development experience is considered a plus. About The InSource Group:The InSource Group supplies select information technology specialists to some of the area's most prominent companies. We are looking for candidates who can make an immediate, positive impact when placed with our clients. The InSource Group's proven recruiting process ensures you are well matched with potential employers. Our account managers and recruiters have a depth of industry experience that enables us to place you in the optimal setting for your skill set and job requirements. We match candidates and clients so successfully, our client satisfaction on placements is greater than 99 percent.",Mobile Developer Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Mobile-Developer-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164662871.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,9e2d45743c4941e2b33a5c52ae74fc01
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:11:54:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Parker + Lynch has a Senior Fund Accountant job in Dallas, TX. The client is looking for someone with a Bachelor Degree in Accounting or Finance and a minimum of two years’ experience in partnership accounting, investment Company accounting, and/or real estate accounting. Responsibilities for the Senior Fund Accountant job: • Preparation of month, quarter, and year-end US GAAP financial statements• Maintenance of underlying accounting records • Preparation of journal entries which allocate income/loss from investments • Analysis of daily cash transactions and flows of funds • Prepare debt reconciliations and roll forwards for several facilities• Resolve investment accounting issues involving complex investment structures• Assist manager in resolving problems/issues in a timely manner• Internal and external reporting functions, including audit, tax, and third party reporting• Special projects and analyses Qualifications: • Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting or Finance• CPA or CPA candidate is a plus• Minimum of two years of professional accounting experience required; preferably in partnership accounting, investment Company accounting, and/or real estate accounting• Public accounting experience combined with industry experience is a plus• Experience in general ledger, inter-company reconciliations, and account analyses• Prefer experience in preparation of external audit and internal tax schedules  If you are interested in this Senior Fund Accountant job or other Accounting and Finance career opportunities from Parker + Lynch please email Rami Muhanna at rami.muhanna@parkerlynch.com or visit our website at www.parkerlynch.com  ",Senior Fund Accountant job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Fund-Accountant-job-in-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165320637.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=20,"75,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,64ff983ed4ccce959c4390b15ff219e2
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:11:54:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"The company, based in Irving, TX, is a national provider of comprehensive Employee Assistance, Wellness and Condition Care Management programs. A forward-thinking and leading-edge approach delivers best-in-class EAP, Behavioral Health and Wellness services to over 2 million people.  General Description:The Licensed Behavioral Clinician will provide phone consultation and assessment services to clients in a confidential call center environment. The clinician will also establish positive relationships with the provider network, maintain comprehensive case documentation, and provide case management as well as supervisor/manager consultation.   Primary Responsibilities: ●      Conduct primarily phone-based clinical work for Employee Assistance Program, Wellness Program and Condition Care Management Program.●      Provide outreach and support to individuals in developing the skills they need to manage their health and navigate through the healthcare system successfully and confidently.●      Conduct intake assessments for clients calling in for support and services.●      Provide clinical assessment, support, and/or case management services to clients as deemed appropriate.●      Provide phone based counseling services to clients.●      Record management including documenting demographic, clinical assessment and case management information in a thorough and timely manner.●      Provide risk management for at-risk clients; develop emergency response plans following the company’s procedure for critical situations.●      Research and provide resources, links and referrals to Affiliates, providers and facilities.●      Participate in Call Center projects and other assigned duties during non-peak periods.●      Attend individual and/or group clinical supervision.●      Attend individual, team and company meetings. Qualifications and Requirements:●      Must have professional level fluency in Spanish and English●      Masters or Ph.D. in Behavioral Science ●      Independently Licensed Therapist in Texas (LCSW, LPC or LMFT)●      5 years of post-license experience in behavioral healthcare●      Strong clinical skills; experienced in EAP work●      Must have proficient computer skills and be comfortable with electronic record keeping●      Must be comfortable conducting primarily phone-based clinical work Competitive Compensation",Bilingual (Spanish) Licensed Behavioral Clinician -Call Center Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 75062",,http://jobview.monster.com/Bilingual-Spanish-Licensed-Behavioral-Clinician-Call-Center-Job-Irving-TX-US-164184715.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8d857bce5469871bf6d8fa42570f7e1a
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:04:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"works to enrich children with a learning environment and varied experiences appropriate to the age, stage of development and cultural backgrounds, which will help them develop socially, intellectually, physically and emotionally.              Qualifications:   High School Diploma or GED and three months prior child care experience Completion of the CDA Certificate within two years of employment (English/Spanish) capabilities a plus",Teacher III Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75237",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Teacher-III-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165314486.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=17,,Student (High School),fd226ba6dad0a7f851f72902a1d10680
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:05:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Growing office furniture dealer in Dallas has an immediate opening for an office furniture salesperson with a minimum of two years experience selling office furniture. A large database of happy customers from the service side of the business is available to any motivated outgoing furniture salesperson to mine, along with a regular stream of qualified leads that will be handed to you.If you meet the minimum requirements, please reply to this posting with your resume.The ideal candidate would also have:Experience working with local office furniture dealers and vendors.A good understanding of space planning and cubicles.This position starts with a salary (based on experience) and eventually transitions to commission based.",Office Furniture Salesperson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75220",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Office-Furniture-Salesperson-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164371048.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=9,Commission,Experienced (Non-Manager),5fc642a3f9399ba4c54a13db0a8545bb
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:29:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Driver - Independent Contractor Needed for Route Delivery - Part Time or Full Time COMPANY: Metro 1 Courier, Inc. WE ARE METRO 1 COURIER. WE’RE A DELIVERY & LOGISTICSCOMPANY WITH DAILY ROUTES IN HOUSTON & DALLAS, FOUNDED IN 1991. YOU CANVISIT OUR WEBSITE WWW.METRO1COURIER.COMOR OUR FACEBOOK PAGE https://www.facebook.com/metro1courier TO LEARNABOUT US. WE’RE CONTRACTING WITH QUALIFIED MEN & WOMEN THAT WANTTO DELIVER SMALL ENVELOPES MONDAY THRU FRIDAY. YOU CAN MANAGE YOUR ROUTE OR WORK WITH US WITH MULITPLE ROUTES AND HIREYOUR DRIVERS. WE’RE LOOKING FOR PEOPLE THAT WORK WITHOUT SUPERVISION AND WANTTO BE THEIR OWN BOSS. WE WANT TO TALK TO YOU THIS WEEK. SET YOUR OWN HOURS& DAYS YOU WORK, WE OFFER FLEXIBILITY. CHOOSE TO WORK A COUPLE DAYS PERMONTH TO SUPPLEMENT YOUR INCOME OR EARN A FULLTIME INCOME. THIS IS WEEKLY PAY, DELIVERY OF LIGHT WEIGHT ENVELOPES UNDER1 POUND, AND WE HAVE 22 ROUTES WITH 2 OPENINGS IN THE DALLAS-FT WORTH METROPLEX.GOOD FOR RETIRED PEOPLE.  IF YOU ARE A SELF STARTER WORKING PT YOU CAN  EARN $75-$150+/DAY OR  $500 FOR about 30 HOURS AND IF YOU NEED  FULLTIME WORK AND HAVE A CARGO VAN YOU CANEARN MUCH MORE.THE QUALIFIED APPLICANT WILL SUPPLY A COMPACT CAR, MINI VANOR PICKUP TRUCK, A SMART PHONE, OR A TABLET AND HAVE A GOOD KNOWLEDGE OF THEDELIVERY AREA. WE DO HAVE AN AFFORDABLE RENTAL PLAN FOR SMART PHONES, TABLETSAND A SCANNER. Respond online for more information.  Respond online today.​ Location: Dallas, TX Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21573a Vehicle Type: Car, Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Delivery Driver Job in Dallas,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX 75207",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Delivery-Driver-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165189829.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=19,,,ef8c37db754eaa9156c6b6b5ea845fea
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:30:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Incident Manager in Columbus, Ohio (OH).Responsibilities Coordinate the resolution of critical P1 incidents utilizing technical and business resources in 24x7x365 enterprise organization Schedule is Wednesday - Saturday. 10 hr shifts plus 1 hr for lunch per day. Be a focal and escalation point for P1 issues requiring more detailed and in depth investigations Instigate and chair large technical bridges and hold senior management conference calls to advise LOBs of a major incident occurring in the environment Partner with the P1M peers to assist in coordination and identification of Provide -Air Traffic Control- across the various technical estates to send executive style communications to a global audience giving details of the incident and impacts to the business Provide a command and control presence on technical bridges driving work streams and engaging resolvers Authoritatively and confidently guide P1 incidents to resolution; may be called upon to make decisions on behalf of GTI in the heat of the moment that may have production impacting implications Attend and represent GTI on situation reviews where possible Establish and maintain relationships within the firm being able to fully support any critical incident as required during high-profile events Participate in major command centers and critical site tests coverage Review the Incident management tool for lower severity issues and ensure that the appropriate focus is being given by the assigned technical team in an effort to reduce P1 incidentsREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years professional experience in incident management, practices and skills or in IT operations in a financial institution Strong working knowledge of a global financial institution in terms of technology / infrastructure and their dependencies and requirements Strong working knowledge of tools such as HP Service Manager, Alarmpoint, CMDB, Remedy and collaboration tools such as SharePoint Broad technology understanding across Mainframe, Midrange, Distributed Systems, Storage and Networks Committed to results in a highly stressful environment Must possess decisive leadership, and the ability to exercise sound judgment and decision making skills in the heat of the moment Strong oral and written communication skills Strong analytical and problem solving skills Able to build relationships both from a customer and technical point of view including with the problem and change management teams Foundation Certification or strong knowledge of ITIL concepts is advantageous Strong typing and multitasking skills are highly desired Must be able to work unconventional shifts which will include weekends",Incident Manager Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Columbus, OH 43219",,http://jobview.monster.com/Incident-Manager-Job-Columbus-OH-US-164937602.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),504add4f63d434024e7f8944014e3c92
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:30:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Truck-Driver-%E2%80%93-Entry-Level-CDL-Not-Required-Transportation-%E2%80%93-Full-Time-Training-Provided-Job-Dallas-TX-US-159971967.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=5,,Logistics/Transportation,e1ae5ba4b5fa073f409be193ef10f9e7
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:30:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARYThe Senior HR Generalist will be responsible for taking ownership of specific HR initiatives that support the effectiveness of operations by developing, delivering and/or promoting HR programs.   ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESPrepares job descriptions, and engages in recruitment related activities including: reviewing resumes, screening candidates, scheduling interviews, conducting New Hire Onboarding, and coordinating any temporary staffing needs. Participates in company-wide programs and initiatives including but not limited to salary review, workforce planning, organizational change, on-boarding, job analysis, new hire and exit processes, selection, performance, diversity and leadership initiativesWorks closely with management in the implementation of corporate policies related to human resources and employee development. Recommends employee relations practices necessary to establish a positive employer-employee relationship and promote a high level of employee morale and motivation. Recommends new approaches, corrective actions, and updates to policies and procedures to effect continual improvements in efficiency of department and services performed. Assists with the administration and implementation of the same. HRIS input and reporting monthly, quarterly and ad hoc metrics and reports.Coordinates and conducts internal training programs and evaluates effectiveness. Assists with the development of new programs and initiatives. Participates in and/or leads employee activities and sponsored events. Participates in and/or leads special group projects as required. Assists with Affirmative Action Planning and all required updates, reporting and documentation and ensuring all federal and state requirements are met.  QUALIFICATIONS / REQUIREMENTS Bachelor's Degree in Business Management or Human Resources 7-10+ years related experience preferably in a manufacturing environment Minimum 7 years of related experience in a generalist role Strong interpersonal, verbal and written communications skills are essential Ability to interact professionally with all levels within and outside the Company Must model the highest degree of moral and ethical behavior Proactive and takes ownership for producing positive results Possess high energy, process orientation and superior multitasking High level of organization skills, time management, analysis and implementation, facilitation and process development Must possess strong computer skills with demonstrated proficiency in Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint and other Microsoft Office applications",Senior HR Generalist Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75202",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-HR-Generalist-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164606662.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=12,,Human Resources,125723245a3f455c1099117ef5195afb
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:47:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Salesforce Administrator.  ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES-Supports the streamlined application life cycle (analyze, build, test, implement, train and support) of the company’s Salesforce system. -Monitors end-user usage of systems and performs daily administrative tasks -Participate in ongoing system maintenance and data cleansing, including de-duping, system cleanup and data quality review -Analyze and implement requested changes to existing Salesforce configuration -Responsibility for monitoring Salesforce application permissions to ensure auditable data transactions, and separation of duty audit controls -Creates training and documentation supporting processes related to Salesforce. -Provides training and support to end-users. -Responsibility for logging, reporting, and resolution of Salesforce application issues with Salesforce.com and third party system integrators -Monitors, reviews and identifies areas within application that can be enhanced to increase sales efficiency and productivity. -Provides statistical data and trending analysis to increase sales efficiency -Completes technical service requests and provides business application support -Helps research transactional and reporting issues, identifying root causes, and driving resolutions to prevent repeat occurrences -Other business analyst and workflow development duties with systems comparable to Salesforce. EXPERIENCE -2-4 years’ financial services experience as a Salesforce Administrator, or similar preferred -Knowledge of and experience in creating workflows, dashboards, and analytic reports; analyzing, interpreting, and presenting data to improve analytics, key performance indicators, and revenue flows -Strong customer-focused and leadership skills, to positively interact with various end-user skill sets and management styles -Innovative thinker who is both technologically sound and has a good business operations perspective -Excellent organizational and problem-solving skills with the ability to handle fast-paced, dynamic environment while working on multiple project at the same time -Excellent spoken and written communication as well as receptive listening skills, with ability to present complex ideas in a clear, concise fashion to technical and non-technical audiences. -Demonstrated commitment to company core values SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED -Bachelor's degree (or equivalent experience) -Salesforce Administrator Certification required -Other Salesforce certifications a plus SALARY AND EMPLOYMENT -Pay range dependent on skill level -Company benefits including Medical, Vision, Dental, 401K -Standard 40 hour M-F 8-5pm or as determined by Manager ",Salesforce Administrator Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Salesforce-Administrator-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165339455.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,247932c1f8c010fa47c8a3baabd0466c
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:47:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Anthem, Inc. is the nation's leading health benefits company serving the needs of approximately 28 million medical members nationwide.   Your Talent. Our Vision. At Amerigroup, a proud member of the Anthem, Inc. family of companies focused on serving Medicaid, Medicare and uninsured individuals, it’s a powerful combination.  It’s the foundation upon which we’re creating greater care for our members, greater value for our customers and greater health for our communities. Join us and together we will drive the future of health care.   This is an exceptional opportunity to do innovative work that means more to you and those we serve.        This is a field position supporting our LTSS (Long Term Services and Supports) members in the Dallas/Fort Worth, Texas area. You must live in this area where you will be working from home or in the field, coming into the office as needed.  Training will be held in the office for the first 3-4 weeks. We need also need associates in surrounding counties including  Commerce,  Greenville, Terrell, Corsicana, Ennis, Waxahachie, and McKinney.                       As a Service Coordinator, you will be responsible for overall management of member's case within the scope of  licensure for members with complex and chronic care needs by assessing, developing, implementing, coordinating, monitoring, and evaluating care plans designed to optimize member health care across the care continuum serving members enrolled in the health plan; provides supervision and direction to non-RN clinicians participating in the member's case in accordance with applicable state law and contract.     Conducts assessments to identify individual needs and a specific care management plan to address objectives and goals as identified during assessment. Implements care plan by facilitating authorizations/referrals as appropriate within benefits structure or through extra-contractual arrangements. Coordinates internal and external resources to meet identified needs. Monitors and evaluates effectiveness of the care management plan and modifies as necessary. Responsible for performing telephonic and face-to-face clinical assessments for the identification, evaluation, coordination and management of member's needs, including physical health, behavioral health, social services and long term services and supports. Identifies members for high risk complications and coordinates care in conjunction with the member and the health care team. Manages members with chronic illnesses, co-morbidities, and/or disabilities, to insure cost effective and efficient utilization of health benefits. Obtains a thorough and accurate member history to develop an individual care plan. Establishes short and long term goals in collaboration with the member, caregivers, family, natural supports, physicians; identifies members that would benefit from an alternative level of care or other waiver programs. The RN has overall responsibility to develop the care plan for services for the member and ensures the member's access to those services. Assists with the implementation of member care plans by facilitating authorizations/referrals for utilization of services, as appropriate, within benefits structure or through extra-contractual arrangements, as permissible. Interfaces with Medical Directors, Physician Advisors and/or Inter-Disciplinary Teams on the development of care management treatment plans. May also assist in problem solving with providers, claims or service issues.   Requirements: 3-4 years of experience in working with individuals with chronic illnesses, co-morbidities, and/or disabilities in a Service Coordinator, Case Management, or similar role; or any combination of education and experience, which would provide an equivalent background. Current, unrestricted RN license in Texas required. Travel required within assigned territory. Computer literate: MS Word, Outlook, Excel   Preferred: Masters in Health/Nursing preferred. Previous pediatric experience Behavioral health experience Previous managed care experience Self Direction Experience strongly preferred.       Anthem, Inc. is ranked as one of America’s Most Admired Companies among health insurers by Fortune magazine and is a 2015 DiversityInc magazine Top 50 Company for Diversity. To learn more about our company and apply, please visit us at antheminc.com/careers. EOE. M/F/Disability/Veteran.   Additional Information:",LTSS Service Coordinator RN Clinician (RN Field Nurse ) - Dallas/Fort Worth,Full Time Employee,Location:,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/LTSS-Service-Coordinator-RN-Clinician-RN-Field-Nurse-Dallas-Fort-Worth-Texas-surrounding-a-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164424813.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,4cdbaede623260fd2c0897dbf9b38431
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:12:47:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"General Distribution Team MemberAuto Plus is one of the largest distributors of replacement parts, equipment, tools and accessories for motor vehicles in North America.  We are a dynamic organization that strives for maximum customer service and satisfaction and are looking for employees who are passionate about providing this level of customer service.  We provide a company-wide culture that encourages teamwork among highly-trained, highly motivated people.  We offer excellent benefits, training and competitive wages.  Auto Plus has an opening for:General Distribution Team MemberWarehouse Personnel are a key resource in our company and critical to our success. Duties could include: receiving, checking in stock, pulling parts, and ensuring all merchandise is in the proper location.Requirements:·        Warehouse experience is preferred, but not necessary.·        Ability to lift up to 50 lbs.·        Must be able to multi-task in a fast paced environment.·        Must be able to work well on a team.·        Highly motivated with attention to detail.·        SAP experience preferred, but not necessary.·        RF scanner experience is preferred, but not necessary.·        Hours for this position will vary due to business needs.Candidates must successfully complete the background check and drug screening process.We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer***",General Distribution Team Member Job in Dallas,Part Time,"Dallas, TX 75237",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Distribution-Team-Member-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164704817.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5b6ff5287ffc70a9b4e8798e53a83482
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:03:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"There’s something in the air… Respect. Ambition. Pride. There are a lot of qualities we’re proud of here at Save-A-Lot. We’re a close-knit, down-to-earth group that thrives in a fast-paced environment. We need people who can grow along with us, who are ready to step up and be a leader. Will you be one of them? ..........................................................................................................Leaders Made Daily What gets you up in the morning? People? Community? Success? At Save-A-Lot, it’s all of the above. Our passion is building an affordable alternative to traditional grocery stores, where customer, communities and associates are empowered.   Get your foot in 1300+ doors. Our growth is your opportunity….make that opportunities – we have a lot of them! Save-A-Lot operates over 1,300 stores and we are growing every day.   What can you expect as a member of store management at Save-A-Lot? We have an informal culture without a lot of red tape, so you can make decisions fast. You’ll drive sales through bar-setting merchandising, pricing strategy and customer service. We’re always refining our business model with new ideas and approaches, so we’ll keep you up to speed with hands-on training. If you prove you have exceptional dedication and initiative along with drive and commitment you’ll find even more doors opening—we believe in promoting from our own team.   What do we expect from our store management teams at Save-A-Lot? We look for ambitious leaders who aren’t afraid to try an innovative approach to retail grocery. We need you to communicate well, treat others with respect and think fast in an environment that never slows down. Do you have: •High school diploma/GED •2 or more years experience within a retail, restaurant or similar industry, including supervisory responsibility for the operations of a minimum staff of 10 •Proven leadership qualities and exceptional customer service skills •Working knowledge of scheduling, merchandising, budgeting and expense control •Ability to work a flexible schedule including days, evenings, weekends and holidays •Ability to travel within 50 miles/1 hour to work   Life is about more than just work, right? It’s about family, health and time off to rejuvenate. We get it – that’s why our benefits package has you covered. Save-A-Lot offers medical, dental, vision and disability insurance, 401(k) and profit sharing packages with investment options, vacations and holidays and tuition reimbursement, just to name a few.   Nationwide resources, neighborhood values. That’s how we do business – and its working! The more we succeed, the more opportunities we can offer retail managers and assistant managers.   If you are ready for the challenges and growth opportunities that come from joining an industry leader, we encourage you to apply now! Save-A-Lot is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does require successful completion of criminal background check/drug screen as condition of employment",STORE MANAGEMENT - Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/STORE-MANAGEMENT-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165086073.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=5,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),c7b9106afc764e5b74f4796ee3605aae
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:15:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Currently has an exciting and challenging opportunity for a Software Engineer (Claims & Interfaces) located in our Houston, TX office. This enthusiastic, self-motivated individual will be part of a team-oriented environment in the Information Technology Department. Position Overview: Reporting directly to the Manager of Application Development with ultimate responsibility to the Business leaders, this position will support the organizations current and future development efforts using the most current technologies.Responsibilities:Must provide technical leadership on complex projects and act as expert in business or functional areas.Will design core business/data layer components utilizing industry accepted object-oriented analysis and design standards.Development with custom applications including, package interfaces, complex reports, trouble shooting and testing. This includes designing and implementing critical and complex system interfaces with other company business units and external entities.Must be able to take ownership and manage the entire development life cycle.Must be self motivated and have the ability to effectively operate in a dynamically changing matrix environmentMust have experience executing all size projects and multi-projects (portfolio) of different types.Must be able to manage and develop career paths for direct reports.Ability to articulate the technology at all levels as well as non-technical end usersAbility to effectively communicate with senior management on business / strategic goalsAbility to build trust relationships with senior management, business stakeholders and project teamsExperience working with local and remote departmental and cross-functional teamsExperience working with offshore resources a plus.Strong written, verbal and presentation skills required.10 % travel occasionally to other US locationsQualifications:Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or equivalent work experience.Previous Insurance experience Required7+ Years of experience in application development or similar technical aspect of IT, claims systems experience is desired.Must define and collaborate with other leaders to set the direction and establish a common practice for development and architectural goals within the organization.Must be able to work independently designing and developing new systems or major enhancements to existing systems from business requirements.Must act as highest level technical expert, addressing problems of systems design, integration, compatibility, and implementationMust be familiar with standard Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC).Must be expert in the following:, SQL Server, C#, .NET 2/3.5/4, ASP.NET, XML, JavaScript, and, CSS,",Software Engineer Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Software-Engineer-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165265541.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),535a78e25d2dfc2109c865a6e2574ebf
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:15:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Education Corporation of America owns and operates private accredited colleges across the United States as well as Online from our corporate headquarters near Birmingham, Alabama. Our schools serve the needs of thousands of students while giving employers an educated and skilled workforce in the markets where we are located.We provide educational opportunities in business, administrative, management, medical, technical and professional programs that are designed to prepare students for direct entry into the job market in the career areas of their choice. It is our goal to specialize in those areas for which the job growth potential is expected to be the highest. Our hallmark is personalized, practical, real-world instruction that best prepares the student for his or her future while meeting the needs of employers. And we pledge to accomplish that in an encouraging, resourceful and enabling atmosphere.To learn more about our company, please click here:www.ecacolleges.com.You have a general positive sense of the future, and you like to see positives in other people and most situations! You’re a pleasant person to be around and you can solve problems fairly quickly. You love working with people and can stay focused on your primary objectives. If these behaviors sound like you then we can provide an opportunity for you to exercise your unique skill sets and make a major impact in your community as a Medical Assistant Instructor.A good instructor loves to make a difference in the lives of students.  Its hard work.  You must be an innovator, researcher, encourager, motivator, and sometimes counselor.  You must have compassion, patience, diligence, and a thick skin all for the inner satisfaction of having helped shape someone’s future.  In other words, you have to love teaching to be an instructor.As the Medical Assistant Instructor you will work with students, the Dean and Program Director. You should possess good interpersonal skills in relating to students, and other faculty members, Career Services and Enrollment Specialists.TO BE SUCCESSFUL IN THIS ROLE, YOU MUST:·Possess the knowledge and skill set of each class taught.·Maintain classroom control and enforce rules outlined in the student hand-book.·Teach to all learning styles and find ways to catch the confused.·Encourage, support and reinforce all students to develop self-esteem and professionalism.·Develop syllabi based on ACICS and Corporate standards.·Assign out-of-class homework that support the curriculum.·Post grades, attendance and complete mid-term progress reports in a timely manner, and communicate concerns to allow students the opportunity to improve.·Engage the students and find ways to teach skills and curriculum using fresh and new ideas.·Schedule field trips and guest speakers that reinforce curriculum topics.·Encourage students to attend, participate and demonstrate professionalism at all times.·Communicate with PD, Dean and students concerning grades, attendance and other concerns.The duties and responsibilities above are intended to describe the general requirements of this position and are not intended to be an exhaustive statement of duties.Your time will be spent participating in the following activities:·70% - Student/Classroom Interaction·20% - Grading/Preparing and Portal Activities·5% - Communication·5% - Required In-service/meetings/Continuing EducationMINIMUM EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:·Diploma, Certificate, Associates, Bachelors, Masters, or Doctoral Degree·Must have one of the following acceptable certifications (not required if ADN or higher):oCMA, RMA, or CCMA·Must have:oTwo years of occupational experience in the subject field, OR;oA minimum of three years of job-related training and experience in the subject field for those candidates who are not graduates from an accredited program in the subject field.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES REQUIRED:·Knowledge of principles and methods for curriculum and training design, teaching and instruction for individuals and groups, and the measurement of training effects·Selecting and using training/instructional methods and procedures appropriate for the situation when learning or teaching new things·The ability to communicate information and ideas, written and verbal, so others will understand·Analyzing information and evaluating results to choose the best solution and solve problems",Instructor - Adjunct - Medical Assistant Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Instructor-Adjunct-Medical-Assistant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164209714.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=15,,Education/Training,b7297a18a22576242024e0a8676f7788
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:32:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"HIM Technician For more than 40 years, CompDrug has offered comprehensive services in prevention, intervention and treatment to those seeking help for their addictions and mental health issues. It is now the largest opioid treatment program in Ohio, offering medication-assisted treatment using FDA-approved medications. CompDrug’s more than 100  full-time employees provide drug testing, outpatient counseling for men and women, six therapeutic communities located within the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation and Corrections, and numerous prevention programs for youths and adults. Programs include: Anger Management services, and others. Prevention Services include: Youth to Youth International, Pregnant Moms, Senior Sense, HIV Early Intervention and Business Against Substance Abuse (BASA). Those services combined reach thousands of people every day and are instrumental in saving lives, preventing problems, and proving that treatment works. CompDrug has met the standard for high quality treatment and prevention services, winning several awards and gaining National Accreditation for its Opioid Treatment Program through CARF (Commission for Accreditation for Rehabilitation Facilities), beginning in 2002. Today, all of CompDrug's programs have achieved the highest level of accreditation awarded by CARF. CompDrug provides its employees with a collaborative, flexible and supportive environment where ideas and contributions are recognized and valued.  Employees are encouraged to develop and grow their skills through training, on the job learning experiences and problem solving.  CompDrug provides a comprehensive benefit package, including medical, dental and vision coverage, life insurance, disability, 403b as well as vacation and sick leave. CompDrug is seeking a conscientious Health Information Management Technician who will serve as records custodian for the agency and provide guidance to staff in the confidentiality of patient information.  The successful candidate will be responsible for:·         Assistant to HIM Manager·         Subject matter expert on Privacy and Security compliance of PHI.·         Scanning and archival of medical records·         Process information requests within the context of agency policies.·         Confidential faxing and electronic submission of patient data and records.·         Health Information System data entry.·         Provides reception support for all agency locations, including answering the main switchboard and processing of internal and external mail. Position requirements include:·         Must have high school diploma or GED and a minimum of 1 year experience as an electronic medical records technician: a viable combination of education, training and experience will be considered.·         Must have very high organizational skills, excellent typing and data entry skills.·         Attention to detail is key and confidentially, vital.·         Must have strong customer service skills·         Must effectively, accurately, clearly and confidentially communicate in oral and written form, while dealing with staff and clients with compassion and empathy and outside agencies.·         Must have knowledge and experience with Health Information Management Systems and or electronic medical records systems.·         Must be proficient in using computers and other office equipment as needed.·         Must have excellent human relations skills and the ability to handle different personalities and situations; must develop and maintain a positive working relationship with staff and clients.·         Must be knowledgeable of applicable laws and regulations governing treatment facilities including, but not limited to, HIPAA and Title 42, Part 2. Qualified individuals may apply online by visiting compdrug.org/about us and clicking on careers. CompDrug is a drug free workplace.  We are an equal opportunity employer. ",HIM Technician Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43211",,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/HIM-Technician-Job-Columbus-OH-US-165015077.aspx?ch=newscold&mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=11,,,75a9277fa1a6862c725fa52d38d060ed
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:44:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Evaluates and manages new strategic business opportunities, initiatives, mergers, acquisitions, partnerships, alliances and/or joint ventures. Conducts complex market analysis, monitors competitive activity, and identifies customer needs. Receives assignments in the form of objectives and determines how to use resources to meet schedules and goals. Provides leadership in the planning, designing, due diligence, and implementing of strategic business objectives and potential and/or executed transactions. Works on issues of diverse scope where analysis of situation or data requires evaluation of a variety of factors, including an understanding of current business trends. Follows processes and operational policies in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions. Develops and maintains relationships between AT&T and partners, regulatory officials and government officials. Coordinates acquisition support functions for national and international transactions. Analyzes market conditions, regulatory environment, competitive conditions, strategic and business plans, and existing business and technical operations. Supports legal, accounting and business inspection of acquisition or joint venture. Creates financial models to assess the economic value of potential transaction. Provides demand forecasts and key operating projections for the valuation of target transactions. Participates in the negotiations of principal terms and conditions of transactions. Creates presentation materials for internal approval from Officers/Executives of AT&T and affiliates. Supervision: Manages, perhaps through subordinate supervisors, the coordination of the activities of a section or department.Principal Functional Skills / Competencies associated with this Title: Master's degree in Business Administration Business Acumen Business Markets Business Orientation Financial Risk Management Global Perspective Industry Knowledge Institutional Finance Knowledge of Organization Mergers and Acquisitions (MandA) Operations Management Operational Functions Planning: Tactical, Strategic Products and Services Note: Additional skills / competencies may be added to this specific requisition. During the application process, you will be asked to provide your proficiency and experience with all the skills / competencies associated with the requisition.",Lead Business Development Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-Business-Development-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164622750.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=12,,,375f66112e0466f6a3cba78e7f9fee90
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:45:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"What The Job Is AboutSales Support Representative position with a company that gives back. Hands-on training, competitive compensation, performance awards and incentives.The Person We’re Looking ForEntry level and senior level applicant as well one who is service-minded and wants to help others, gain experience and earn they money they’re worth.Responsibilities- Support the needs of families in the community- Managing relationships with new and existing customers- Customer service and communicationWhat Qualifies You- High school diploma or equivalent- People-person that likes to help others- Excellent communication skills- Independent-minded & flexibleWho Is American Income?We are American Income Life Insurance Company. We are a significant provider of supplemental insurance and have been helping labor unions, credit unions and associations with their insurance coverage needs. We strive to make a difference in lives of people across the United States, Canada and New Zealand.Apply NowApply here and see success testimonials at www.ailcareers.com",Apply Now – Customer Service Job in Dallas,Part Time/ Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Apply-Now-%E2%80%93-Customer-Service-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164811152.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,51a21b3be48cf902a9bb3f85cfa3c305
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:45:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in the North Dallas area is seeking an experienced Staff Accountant for a temp to perm opportunity for their growing office.Duties and responsibilities:Prepare vendor invoices for services renderedJournal entries - prepare, adjust and postPrepare multiple account reconciliationsFull cycle month and year end close for multiple entities including preparation and analysis of P&L, Income Statement and Balance SheetMulti-entity inter-company accountingGreat Plains experience is a plusFind Us on Facebook!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile: Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Staff Accountant Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,DallasTX,Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Staff-Accountant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164419106.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=19,"45,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e5c979d86980d15510d6361ccff4a731
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:13:57:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"GAINSCO Auto Insurance markets non-standard private passenger automobile products through retail agencies, in Texas, New Mexico, Arizona, Oklahoma, Florida, Georgia, South Carolina, and Virginia. GAINSCO Auto Insurance has fully integrated insurance capabilities, including marketing, underwriting, customer service and claims handling. Our operations are bilingual (English/Spanish)    Job Purpose:  To supervise the daily activities of the Claims Adjusters within the assigned region in order to ensure quality service, high productivity and compliance with industry guidelines and regulations.     Responsibilities:     Directly supervise 4-6 Bodily Injury Adjusters Accomplish staff (Adjuster) job results by coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees Provide daily and monthly reports Conduct unit meetings Review and Audit Claims  Maintain quality service by assuring prompt and accurate handling of claims Address escalated complaints Ensures all files are consistent and are in adherence to Company and State policies and  procedures Maintain relationships with vendors Maintain positive team morale Job Requirements: Bachelors Degree Minimum 3 years bodily injury claims (Non-Attorney and/or Attorney Represented) adjusting experience in the auto insurance industry Minimum 2 years in a claims leadership role Full understanding of auto claims investigations and claims processing Effective leadership skills a must Excellent verbal and written communication skills Excellent time management and organizational skills Effective negotiating skills Knowledge of Texas laws regulating the automobile insurance industry Computer proficient: MS Office, MS Word, MS Excel, MS Outlook Bilingual (English/Spanish) preferred Establish Tenure preferred  Compensation: Competitive Salary based on experience. Excellent benefits package: medical, dental, vision insurance, life insurance, short term and long term disability insurance, 401K, Paid Vacation and Holidays. All offers are contingent upon a background investigation (including employment, education, criminal and DMV verification- when applicable) and a pre-employment drug test with results satisfactory to GAINSCO. GAINSCO is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer  Click Here To Applyhttps://gainsco.hua.hrsmart.com/pm_module/cgi-bin/click.cgi?job_id=1336&site_id=35",Bodily Injury Claims Team Leader Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75219",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Bodily-Injury-Claims-Team-Leader-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164641506.aspx?mescoid=4300755001001&jobPosition=16,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e6d520a1fb9575760c2d2251014a94b1
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:14:44:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"  City:  Dallas State:  Texas Postal/Zip Code: 75220   Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope, a division of Oldcastle, is the leading supplier of products specified to close the building envelope. They include: custom-engineered curtain wall and window wall, architectural windows, storefront systems, doors, skylights and architectural glass.     Requirements: Individual should have a understanding of general warehouse and light manufacturing environment. Individual should be safety minded, familiar with JSA, SOP, MSDS a plus but not requirement. (On job training available) Able to read and write the English language Able to read a tape measure to a 1/32"" Familiar with basic use of computers Mechanical inclined a plus, but not a requirement. (On job training available) Use of light industrial equipment a plus, but not a requirement(On job training available) Experience with use of small hand tools, but not a requirement.(On job training available) Able to read schematics templates a plus, but not a requirement.(On job training available)     What Oldcastle Offers You   Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion   About Oldcastle   Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise.   Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family!   Join our Talent Community to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn!   Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link.  Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.  ",Shipping Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Shipping-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164565137.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,,b250db28ef6a224a3bc098de45f16a8d
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:14:44:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",General Manager,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Manager-Sales-Manager-Sales-Owner-Operator-Job-Dallas-TX-US-151144882.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,c8515dc4b731958d793355f96bd3604c
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:15:24:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Commission Only - Independent Rep AssignmentResponsible for selling medical products and services to hospitals, clinics, doctors' offices, and healthcare professionals. Sells products such as medical devices for the aesthetic medical market including to medical spas, weight loss clinic, plastic surgeons and dermatologists.Primary responsibilitiesTravel to defined geographies to sell medical equipment.Contact potential customers at hospitals, clinics, doctors' offices, rehab facilities, and nursing homes to sell medical products and equipment.Arrange appointments with doctors, medical spas and wellness centersCold-call or go door-to-door.Deliver presentations to doctors, medical spas and wellness centersBuild relationships with medical staff.Provide competitive information such as bid situations, pricing data, or bundling arrangements in order to establish negotiated pricing contracts for assigned products.Perform product demonstrations, installations, and application support.Improve product knowledge and sales techniques.Travel throughout assigned territory to call on regular and prospective customers to solicit orders or talks with customers on sales floor or by phone.Research competitors.Gathers, analyzes and delivers information from the field to allow the company to develop strategies and products appropriated for he market.Coordinate all issues with key clients between sales, service, support, customer services, marketing and finance.Take orders and train clients on medical devicesHelp in the installation and set-up of equipment.Stay informed about the activities of health services in a particular area.Independent Rep/Manager Position - Commission Only Pay Plan - At plan $200K+",Medical Device Area Sales Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Device-Area-Sales-Manager-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165277767.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a92f4257de0a4b8d81dfd470c946778f
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:15:24:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Auto Parts Delivery Drivers / Couriers Needed with Large SUV, Minivan or Covered Pickup Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theFarmers Branch area for same daydeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business.Partsfleet II is technology drivento help best manage your business from services provided to reliable invoicepayment.  ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle: Large SUV, Minivan, orCovered Pickup*Contract(s) available in the Farmers Brancharea.*Routes available beginning and ending in FarmersBranch. Routes available Monday through Saturday beginning at 9 AM and endingbetween 5 and 6. Routes run approximately 160-230 miles per day.      *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer.  Respond online for more information.  Respond online today.​ Location: Farmers Branch, TX Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21539a Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV, Covered Pickup Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Delivery Driver Job in Farmers Branch,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Farmers Branch, TX 75229",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Delivery-Driver-Job-Farmers-Branch-TX-US-164703937.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=7,,,0d053d84af60ebd53f1f9337749e6762
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:15:47:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionAdheres to established Software Development Lifecycle methodsResearches and analyzes system problems and recommend solutionsDevelops and executes test plans to verify system continuity, integration functionality and efficiencyPerforms manual testingCreates, executes and maintains automated test scripts to verify application GUI and functionalityDevelops test plans, test scenarios, data and test scriptsPerforms Functional, System, Regression and database testsFull time physical attendance is an essential function of the jobRequired SkillsStrength is in Quality Assurance (client/server and web apps development)3+ years minimum experience of QA practices and related works3+ years of experience performing QA testing functionsNeedJob DescriptionAdheres to established Software Development Lifecycle methodsResearches and analyzes system problems and recommend solutionsDevelops and executes test plans to verify system continuity, integration functionality and efficiencyPerforms manual testingCreates, executes and maintains automated test scripts to verify application GUI and functionalityDevelops test plans, test scenarios, data and test scriptsPerforms Functional, System, Regression and database testsFull time physical attendance is an essential function of the jobRequired SkillsStrength is in Quality Assurance (client/server and web apps development)3+ years minimum experience of QA practices and related works3+ years of experience performing QA testing functionsNeeds to have experience providing QA testing for large application initiativesData management experience as well as experience in the testing of databasesVery strong SQL skillsMust have experience presenting findings to a large audience (versus just one on one)Experience on analyzing, designing, and developing overall test plans (System, Integration and UAT testing) to perform repeatable testing procedures and processes.Providing assistance to other testers, experience on defect trackingManual testing experience is a mustStrong on writing test cases, executing test cases and tracing the results.Solid sills in MS Excel and MS Word (needs to be able to write clearly, concisely, and be grammatically correct).Experience supporting web related and client/server development projectsStrong interpersonal and communication skills (verbal, written and listening)Strong analytical skills with the ability to organize tasks and interact with development teamSelf-starting with a deadline orientationStrong time management skills and a high respect for timeliness and meeting commitmentsAbility to produce written documents with clearly organized thoughts using proper English construction, punctuation and grammar.Flexible to work evenings and weekends when needed (this will not happen a lot, but there will be some occasions where after hours support may be neededs to have experience providing QA testing for large application initiativesData management experience as well as experience in the testing of databasesVery strong SQL skillsMust have experience presenting findings to a large audience (versus just one on one)Experience on analyzing, designing, and developing overall test plans (System, Integration and UAT testing) to perform repeatable testing procedures and processes.Providing assistance to other testers, experience on defect trackingManual testing experience is a mustStrong on writing test cases, executing test cases and tracing the results.Solid sills in MS Excel and MS Word (needs to be able to write clearly, concisely, and be grammatically correct).Experience supporting web related and client/server development projectsStrong interpersonal and communication skills (verbal, written and listening)Strong analytical skills with the ability to organize tasks and interact with development teamSelf-starting with a deadline orientationStrong time management skills and a high respect for timeliness and meeting commitmentsAbility to produce written documents with clearly organized thoughts using proper English construction, punctuation and grammar.Flexible to work evenings and weekends when needed (this will not happen a lot, but there will be some occasions where after hours support may be needed",Quality Assurance Engineer Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Engineer-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165175003.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e332a84dd6b5528c0404452c65316446
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:15:54:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a large law firm with offices in Houston, is in need of a recruiting manager to join the firm immediately. The person in this position will manage and coordinate the legal recruiting activities in the Houston office and specifically coordinate attorney recruiting, the summer associate program and related event planning. The person in this position will be responsible for the financial aspects of recruiting and will provide financial reporting to the firm administrator, prepare interview schedules and follow up as needed with candidates, organize and retain data from candidate interviews, manage resume routing and process, and maintain and update firm website related to recruiting in addition to other recruiting related responsibilities. Qualified candidates must have a bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university, a minimum of 3 years’ experience in a related field, and proficiency in MS Office Suite. Our client prefers candidates with law firm recruiting experience and at least 1 year of supervisory experience. Interested candidates please send email with resume in Word format to Julee Prentice at Julee.Prentice@dtiglobal.com",Recruiting manager Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Recruiting-manager-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165303075.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=20,,,23f866fa72dfaae826acaa08b24c52e4
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:15:54:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Teller (30 HRS): 3535 Forest Lane - Dallas, TXJob ID Number: 5193835Schedule Type: Reg-TimeWork Hours: 30Location: Dallas,TXQualifications: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. Tellers are the face of our company and represent Wells Fargo in the community. A Teller position with our team offers an opportunity to be part of one of America s greatest companies. You'll have exposure to a variety of responsibilities, people and experiences in a professional work environment - that's part of the fun! Our Expectation of our Tellers: Tellers introduce customers to new products and services, and generate leads for other members of the sales team to close. Every teller has her/his own scorecard with goals. Our best tellers constantly go the extra mile to greet customers, make them feel welcome and also engage customers to learn about their financial needs. An excellent teller processes between 20-25 customer transactions each hour with no mistakes through patience, attention to detail, and the ability to follow procedures. Every teller is responsible for maintaining and balancing a cash drawer. Under direct supervision, processes customer transactions within established guidelines. Identifies and makes sales referrals, recommends alternate channels, cross-sells bank services and products for Wells Fargo partners, provides excellent customer service. Duties may include safe deposit, merchant/vault, ATM processing, bonds and coupons, foreign currency and night drop. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others without being asked and want team members who are committed to the success of the team. Tellers will develop and improve their skills through training programs and regular feedback discussions with supervisors, which will help further their professional experience and improve their chances for even greater roles in the future. A teller position is the start of something really big. With an organization the size of Wells Fargo, there is no limit to what a truly motivated person can become with a little dedication and time. Wells Fargo believes in developing people! Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsCustomer service focus with the ability to stay positive in interactions with customers and team membersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience achieving individual and team goalsCash handling experienceExperience selling products and servicesExperience working in a fast-paced environmentAbility to adhere to established attendance policiesBilingual speaking proficiency in Spanish/English Job Expectations Ability to stand for extended periods of timeAbility to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduled Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Teller ( HRS)  Forest Lane Dallas TX Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Teller-30-HRS-3535-Forest-Lane-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164620860.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b27e18486810a5989444107bd52c555e
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:16:29:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Explore taking your career further with one of the world's most respected brands and one of the top automotive companies in North America! Toyota is growing and leading the way through innovations designed to enhance lives through forward-thinking mobility solutions. We are looking for diverse, highly-motivated team members who want to come grow and lead the change with us. Toyota Accounting & Finance Department is looking for a highly motivated and qualified Senior Cost Accounting Analyst. The primary responsibility of this role is to: Gather, analyze, & report North American manufacturing product costs with focus on bill of materials and direct material costs. Reporting to the Manager-Product Cost Analysis, the person in this role will support the A&F department's objective to confirm accuracy of North American Manufacturing Companies (NAMC) result through detailed review & analysis. KEY RESPONSIBILITIES Coordinate all activities related to establishing standard part cost annually and standard bills of materials (BOM) for several plantsCoordinate all activities related to analyzing & journalizing BOM variance monthly for several plantsPerform detailed analysis of direct material costSupport review & analysis of NAMC submissions and support preparation of vehicle pricing sheets & executive reportsCalculate, analyze, and report all local & foreign content for: American Automobile Labeling Act (AALA), North America Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), Corporate Average Fuel Economy (CAFE), and other Free Trade Agreements (FTA's)Utilize change management skills to negotiate standardized processes across NAMC'sCoordinate annually on behalf of several plants to ensure accurate reporting of vehicle and unit plants' cost budgeted & actuals in accordance with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP) and compliance with the Sarbanes Oxley act (SOX)Coordinate monthly on behalf of several plants to ensure accurate recording of BOM usage variance in accordance with GAAP and compliance with SOXManage one or more vehicle, engine, and/or transmission's direct material cost analysis through product life cycleManage project to prepare profit/loss statement by productSupport monthly, quarterly, semi-annual & annual reporting such as: sales less direct material, contribution margin, operating profit/loss by product, price study, etc.Prepare the assumptions, scope, schedule for each job and kickoff with impacted divisions & affiliatesProvide training, guidance, and support to NAMC's ensuring adherence to standard methodologiesUtilize Kaizen (continuous improvement) processes & tools to improve quality & efficiencyPrepare timely and accurate direct material analysis sheets and reconciliations for assigned models & NAMC'sIdentify necessary conditions and work with data owner(s) to implement countermeasures to improve qualityCollaborate with automotive decision support, cost planning, purchasing, design, etc. to drive cost/profit optimization activities based on direct material analysis QualificationsA successful candidate will have:Bachelor's Degree or higherManufacturing/Cost experience with emphasis in analyzing complex Bills of Material (BOM)Experience developing detailed activity schedules and leading cross-functional teamsProficiency in MS Excel, MS Access, & MS PowerPointAbility to travel extensively for training in Erlanger, KY. A successful candidate may have:MBA, CPA, or CMAAutomotive Industry experienceExperience with mainframe & custom costing applicationsExperience qualifying light duty manufactured goods under NAFTAExperience qualifying light duty manufactured goods under one of the following methods: Net Cost, Build Up, Build Down, or Tariff ShiftExperience preparing & presenting reports to various levels of managementExperience working within a large scale international organization Benefits Information: Comprehensive health care & wellness plansPaid holidays and paid time offVehicle Purchase and Lease Programs for positions that qualifyRelocation assistance for qualified movesTuition assistance and professional development programsRetirement Plans: 401(k), Pension, Post-retirement medical options Toyota is proud to be an equal opportunity employer that celebrates the diversity of the communities where we live and do business. Applicants for our positions are considered without regard to race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, religion, military or veteran status, or any other characteristics protected by law.",Senior Cost Accounting Analyst-AF--ER Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Cost-Accounting-Analyst-AF16-127762-ER-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164659185.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=3,,,523d61e373678436a92163a7b37075c1
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:16:33:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"About CBRE (NYSE: CBG): At CBRE, you are empowered to take your career path into your own hands. Enjoy workplace flexibility in a global organization with tremendous scale. Work in an inclusive and collaborative environment with supportive teammates. Come experience the employee advantage at CBRE. CBRE has a long-standing commitment to providing equal employment opportunity to all qualified applicants regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, veteran status, political belief, or any other basis protected by applicable law. As a Fortune 500 worldwide leader in real estate services, CBRE’s more than 70,000 professionals provide exceptional outcomes for clients in 60+ countries. When it comes to real estate, CBRE sees potential everywhere. We turn scale into strength, expense into performance, and property into prosperity. Visit CBRE.com.   Produces a variety of high quality geographic and demographic materials for marketing purposes. Uses Geographic Information Systems (GIS) fundamental concepts, practices and procedures proficiently to accomplish analytical work. Supports education, communication, and marketing of capabilities; as well as providing analytical support to both internal and external clients. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Consults with sales professionals to define project requirements, investigating various approaches to attain end results. Develops advanced specialized maps, utilizing geographic and demographic information using programming, database, and graphics skills. Assists with Mapping Center quality control processes while adhering to company policy on quality assurance. Mentors the activities of GIS Technicians, including support for analytical mapping jobs for production. Provides support and assistance for extra workload as needed. Fulfills Team Lead responsibilities in the absence of GIS Team Lead. Assists Mapping Center GIS Manager, Specialist, and GIS Team Leads with training and communications efforts for both the team and internal clients. Educates internal and external clients about GIS capabilities and resources. Seeks end-user/customer input regarding additional geographic services and enhancements to existing services and processes. Consults with and advises sales professionals and management on geographic information available, analytical projects, and higher end products. Extracts demographic information from various databases for use in maps or reports. Maintains library of previously designed material for future use. Logs and prioritizes work assignments using the Mapping Order System. Assists with analysis, research, design, and implementation of all mapping tools, templates, standards, and software as well as creates a knowledge base of standard templates and techniques. Obtains and maintains accurate market data (e.g., existing and proposed locations of office buildings, malls, shopping centers, retailers) for their assigned offices. Proactively searches for new and different data and sources of data, integrating this data in real estate applicable mapping uses. Proactively searches for new and different data and sources of data, integrating this data in real estate applicable mapping uses. Performs other duties as assigned.   Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  Bachelor’s degree from four-year college or university with a major or minor in Geography or related field. Requires 1 - 3 years of experience. Retail industry experience preferred. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Strong organizational and analytical skills. Ability to provide efficient, timely, reliable and courteous service to customers. Ability to effectively present information. Requires knowledge of financial terms and principles. Ability to calculate intermediate figures such as percentages, discounts, and/or commissions. Conducts basic financial analysis. Ability to comprehend, analyze, and interpret documents. Ability to solve problems involving several options in situations. Requires intermediate analytical and quantitative skills. Ability to work with mathematical concepts and apply operations such as fractions, percentages, ratios and proportions to practical situations. Advanced proficiency in MapInfo Professional (or similar application), word processing, spreadsheet and presentation applications required. Knowledge of GIS terms and definitions, real estate terms and definitions, real estate analytical methods required. Proficiency in MapInfo or Atlas GIS and GIS-related technologies required. Knowledge of Company information systems preferred. Decisions made with understanding of procedures and company policies to achieve set results and deadlines. Responsible for setting own project deadlines. Errors in judgment may cause short-term impact to co-workers and supervisor.    Additional Information:",Retail GIS Analyst Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Retail-GIS-Analyst-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164725082.aspx?mescoid=1500140001001&jobPosition=14,,Engineering,6864b1059bc464cdea4a47677d49ad9b
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:16:33:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position OverviewUnder general supervision, coordinate projects and manage grant and fundraising processes on behalf of the Development Department.  Support the Executive team on various administrative tasks as needed. Essential Job FunctionsCoordinate between senior management, colleagues and outside third parties to facilitate work and accomplish objectives in a collaborative effort.Responsible for keeping projects on track including tracking project plans and following up on outstanding issues and progress.Prepare and respond to letters and correspondence of a routine nature. Review and summarize miscellaneous reports and documents; prepare background documents and outgoing mail as necessary.Responsible for initial grant preparation and tracking for government, foundation and corporate grants.  Prepare content of written communications with regard to strategic initiatives, action item lists, memoranda, etc.Prospect and research new grant opportunities.Manage and track stewardship actions and required communication to foundations and donors.Manage, maintain, and input information into donor database, Orange Leap.Coordinate and provide support for internal and external Mary Crowley events including recruiting volunteers and solicitation of sponsorships.Coordinate annual campaigns and direct mail solicitations.Other duties not specifically defined above, at the request of the Vice President of Development. Education and/or Experience·         Minimum of a Bachelor’s Degree in a business related discipline and a minimum of 2 years experience in a   business or development position.  An equivalent combination of education and experience, which provides proficiency in the areas of responsibility, may be substituted for the education and experience requirements.·         Knowledge of medical / research terminology preferred.·         Proficient in Microsoft Office including MS Word, Excel, Access and PowerPoint; MS Outlook and Internet Explorer. Other Skills and Abilities·         Must possess strong interpersonal skills and ability to work with individuals across all levels of organization.·         Ability to be self-directed and work independently.·         Must possess excellent oral and written communication skills.·         Must possess proficient planning and organizational skills.·         Must possess effective analytical, technical, and problem solving skills.·         Ability to set priorities, meet deadlines and manage multiple projects in a fast paced environment. ·         Can be trusted to handle extremely confidential and sensitive information. ",Development Coordinator Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75251",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Development-Coordinator-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164807720.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a03367176f39b4a078eb9df09d6711dc
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:16:33:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field Sales Representative - Dallas, TX-POS_75045394-1DescriptionAre you looking for a field sales position that is both satisfying and highly rewards you for performance? Then Merial may be just the company you’re seeking to join. We are a dynamic and fast-paced market leader in companion animal veterinary parasiticides, pharmaceuticals, and vaccines. Our category leading brands such as NEXGARD®, FRONTLINE® and HEARTGARD®, IMRAB® and PUREVAX® give our representatives broad access to veterinary practices where the focus is to drive sales and market share growth of Merial’s entire portfolio of companion animal products. Skilled sales professionals that can influence veterinarians and their staff to join together in driving growth use the comprehensive training and industry leading in-clinic resources and programs provided to exceed objectives. Our top performers view their territories as their business franchise. Merial Companion Animal Sales Representatives participate in an outstanding pay for performance compensation plan. The compensation plan is uncapped and includes salary, commissions and bonuses. Additionally, Merial offers outstanding employee benefits and career growth opportunities. The Sales Representative (SR) is expected to perform his/her responsibilities in generating sales, market share and profitability results for the assigned territory, with appropriate direction. Accomplishment of sales objectives, to support attainment of district and regional/ business unit performance objectives is the key measurement for this position. Development of market, customer, and industry knowledge along with further development of technical product knowledge is imperative. Effective utilization and management of internal and external resources is expected. Perform customer/consumer training meetings and support convention and professional association business building opportunities.Major responsibilities1. Responsible for sales of specified products in territory assigned, within the framework of Merial policies.2. Contacts face to face or via meetings all A & B customers/consumers and potential customers/consumers as needed to build/maintain necessary rapport to achieve leading dose and dollar volume shares of Merial products.3. Completes all territory objectives including achieving sales Plan while operating within specified expense budget.4. Provides key leadership role and guidance for Sales Agent Representatives in the territory. 5. Keeps current territory records concerning activities; communicates timely, accurately and meaningfully with District Manager and others as required utilizing computer, voice mail, written and phone communications resources effectively.6. Regularly updates current product information to maintain a knowledgeable and accurate level as needed for position fulfillment.7. Responsible for knowing available territory markets, market potentials, and keeping current on changes that are taking place in these markets. 8. Demonstrates awareness of importance of building a strong image for self, products and Company. 9. Conducts self in manner befitting this awareness by maintaining trade and professional relations consistent with the strategic objectives of Merial. 10. Acts as key liaison with local veterinary medical associations and other business and professional associations in the territory.Qualifications•Bachelor’s degree /equivalent required and related experience a plus. •Must demonstrate an aptitude and desire to sell, gain market and service knowledge and demonstrate the ability to learn technical product knowledge. •Key competencies include interpersonal skills, drive, resilience, teamwork, organization skills and strong verbal and written communication skills. •Credible persuasive skills are of paramount importance to initiate and close sales. •Strong presentation abilities and computer skills essential.Merial is a world-leading, innovation-driven animal health company, providing a comprehensive range of products to enhance the health and well-being of a wide range of animals. Merial employs 6,600 people and operates in more than 150 countries worldwide with over €2 billion of sales in 2014. Merial has three main business areas: pets, farm animals, and veterinary public health. Our pharmaceuticals and vaccines focus on disease prevention and overall health and wellness in animals, and target more than 200 diseases and conditions across a variety of species. Merial is a Sanofi company. For more information, please see www.merial.com; @Merial Merial Limited and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.#LI-MUSJob:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Texas-DallasJob Posting:Feb 29, 2016, 4:22:26 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Field Sales Representative - Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Sales-Representative-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164618001.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,General/Other: Medical/Health,d3afd80faa6b4b1308f6e82d21783e28
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:16:52:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are proud to announce that Dallas Texas Consultants received an award for Best Places to Work in the Dallas Business Journal!Dallas Texas Consultants is now offering positions at the entry level for sales and marketing. We are a sales, marketing, and management firm specializing in business development for our clients. Our firm has a very high success rate of developing sports minded individuals into top performers in the sales and marketing industry.   We are seeking entry level professionals that are looking to take their winning mindset and apply it to lucrative business career in marketing, sales, and business management. Dallas Texas Consultants, Inc. Offers:•             Comprehensive Training •             In office comprehensive training•             Practical training•             Leadership training•             A Management Development Program•             Fast track career growth•             Company travel opportunities  Entry Level Business Sales & Marketing Account RepresentativeDTC offers comprehensive marketing and sales training for our entry level Account Representatives to work on direct sales and marketing campaigns. This job involves in-person sales to business owners. Main responsibilities in the entry level:Learn the campaign product knowledgeMaster the marketing and sales modelsUnderstand territory management. Entry level Account Representatives will meet with business owners and office managers to market the profile of our clients as well as acquire and maintain accounts. Entry Level Account Representatives will gain invaluable skills essential in any business environment. These skills include:Public speaking Time managementWork ethic Face-to-face marketing and sales presentationsWe believe in:Integrity and honesty alwaysExcellence in everything we doBeing students of great leadersLeading others by our own exampleDeveloping entrepreneurial spiritsThe only way to fail is to quitHolding ourselves accountableTaking initiative and following throughTeamwork through great relationships inside & outside of the officeHelping others achieve their goalsTO JOIN OUR TEAM click on APPLYwww.DallasTexasConsultants.com www.facebook.com/dallastexasconsultants   THANK YOU FOR YOUR INTEREST AND WE LOOK FORWARD TO REVIEWING YOUR RESUME!",Training and Recruiting for Sports Minded Athletes- Join our Business Sales & Marketing Team! Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Advertising and PR ServicesSports and Physical RecreationBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Training-Recruiting-for-Sports-Minded-Athletes-Join-our-Business-Sales-Marketing-Team!-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164506617.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,6ee509fbab0f3b13c5691045647a8f05
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:17:16:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Infrastructure Release Project Manager Job #:  643587Market Job Title: Infrastructure Release Project ManagerDescription/Comment: Searching for a Project Manager, also referred to as an Infrastructure Release Managers (IRMs), lead teams of System Admins, DBAs, Web Masters, and Messaging techs performing project driven build integration activities. IRM will also be managing a portfolio of project which changes with project demands from time to time.Additional Job Details: Responsibilities are focused on ensuring the on time, on budget, quality delivery of GCG CIS project responsibilities. Infrastructure release manger will be responsible for: - Driving all aspects of project management activity, including collaborating and coordinating across various teams and stakeholders. - Managing Changes that affect scope, schedule and resources are identified, managed and controlled with an integrated and cohesive plan. Ensuring risks and issues are proactively identified and manage d. -High quality planned and delivered on the project, meeting all agreed upon requirements and ensuring high customer satisfaction through the management of the overall customer experience. -Communications planning and execution during the project to ensure stakeholders are involved, expectations are accurately set, managed, and key stakeholders receive adequate communications throughout the project lifecycle. -Defining work plan, resource needs, timeline and budget for global programs. -Managing resources (i.e., capital requirements and human capital, etc.) to complete the program objectives on time, within scope, and on budget -Partnering with project managers to plan, estimate, and deliver projectsStart Date: 3/1/16End Date: 8/31/16# of Positions: 1What are the travel requirements (Include locations, duration, and frequency)? Will the travel costs be included in the Bill Rate: Limited travel may be requiredIs it possible for the resource to be based anywhere other than the identified work location: NoWhat are the three to five primary responsibilities of the position:Excellent Communication and presentation skillsSound knowledge of Web servers, Tibco, ServiceNow (or other service management tool) and related infrastructureAbility to navigate through multiple stakeholders, complex and matrix organizationProject Delivery/Management, specifically as related to the provisioning and deployment of distributed servers, databases, web servers, and messaging platforms.Leadership of technical resources in a matrix organization.Influence skills, frequently across organizational boundaries.Ability to deliver in high pressure, high visibility, sometimes tense situationsWhat is the typical work schedule required? Weekends, overtime, on-call? Is the work schedule flexible? Does the resource need to be on-site for a specified number of days: Some OT may be requiredIf interested, please email an updated word document of your resume to Anna (amorrow@apexsystemsinc.com)Learn More",Infrastructure Release Project Manager Job in Irving,Full Time Employee,"Irving, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Infrastructure-Release-Project-Manager-Job-Irving-TX-US-164182841.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),774a3aa314a97d89f1c4d88ace5d0dd0
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:17:17:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Details:Looking for a hot job with lot's of sizzle?Welcome to the crossroads of style and comfort, culture and creativity, historic ties and modern touches – all in the heart of Dallas. The first hotel in Hilton’s Curio Collection, The Highland is ideally located between the upscale Park Cities and vibrant Lakewood neighborhoods.Nestled inside the hotel, you’ll find Knife – a Modern steakhouse by Celebrity Chef John Tesar.Two-time James Beard “Best Southwest Chef” semifinalist and “Top Chef” contestant Chef John Tesar is known for his stylish, modern American cuisine prepared with classic European techniques.Committed to using the finest quality ingredients with true Texas roots, Knife has garnered numerous accolades including:Hottest New Restaurants 2014 – ZagatRestaurant of the Year 2014 – Eater DallasBest New Restaurants in America 2014 – EsquireBest Steakhouse 2015 – D MagazineGayot’s 2015 Top Ten Best Steakhouses in the USKnife’s menu features American classics with a distinctively modern twist.Knife is seeking experienced candidates for our Broiler Cook position. Must have 2 or more years of progressive hands-on experience in fine dining steakhouse environment.",Broiler Cook - The Highland Dallas Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75206",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/Broiler-Cook-The-Highland-Dallas-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164642961.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=15,$13.50 to $14.00 depending upon experien,Experienced (Non-Manager),9b49676327196382fd58569af54f2b3a
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:18:18:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hybrid Cloud Technical Writer and UI developer(could extend longer or turn into future LTE or FTE role)80-90% will be remote or virtual work but there may be some travel required for in person meetings (1-2 meetings per quarter as an estimate) Travel expenses to be billed as actual if requiredResponsibilities - Work with development teams to obtain in depth understanding of product and services for document requirements- Analyze existing and potential content, focusing on reuse and single-sourcing opportunities- Creation and maintenance of technical documentation, architecture diagrams- Produce high-quality documentation that meets applicable standards and is appropriate for its intended audience- Understanding of UX and UI concepts and ability to adapt best practices for documentation and development purposes- Web front end developmentRequirements - Software and technical documentation- Service documentation- Web Development- UI development- Ability to adapt to agile software development processes- Microsoft Office or alternatives for word processing and diagramming- HTML 5- CSS 3- JavaScript- Web UI Development Frameworks- Web Development IDE- Good to have - Web package management technologies- OOP and AOP concepts- Git source control- Web package management- Web UX and testingResponsibilities: Provide technology consulting to external customers and internal project teams. Responsible for providing technical support and/or leadership in the creation and delivery of technology solutions designed to meet customers business needs and, consequently, for understanding customers businesses. As trusted advisor create and maintain effective customer relationships so as to insure customer satisfaction. Maintain knowledge of leading edge technologies and industry/market domain knowledge. Actively contribute to HPs solutions portfolio by providing information ranging from technical knowledge to methodologies based on experience gained from customer projects. Shape technical direction and technical strategies within the organization and for external customers. Accountable for consistent and significant chargeability levels (or expense relief for internal project teams) and for assisting in meeting or exceeding revenue and customer satisfaction goals. Contribute to organizations profitability by generating and cultivating new business opportunities and by providing technical support for deal proposal development. Specialist: Applies developed subject matter knowledge to solve common and complex business issues within established guidelines and recommends appropriate alternatives. Works on problems/projects of diverse complexity and scope. Exercises independent judgment within generally defined policies and practices to identify and select a solution. May act as a team or project leader providing direction to team activities and facilitates information validation and team decision-making process.5+ years of professional experience and a Bachelor of Arts/Science or equivalent degree in computer science or related area of study; without a degree, three additional years of relevant professional experience (8+ years in total). Demonstrate strong knowledge in at least three major technology areas. Technical expertise is sought after and provided to several projects/accounts. Demonstrate in-depth knowledge of assigned technology and discipline area. Demonstrate in-depth knowledge of corporate organization and policies. Advanced level business, technical, or functional knowledge. Skillsets may include but not exclusive of the following:AISExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",US-TS Tech Con III Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,US-TS Tech Con III,"Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/US-TS-Tech-Con-III-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165313424.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=13,,IT/Software Development,d0617f9394317df20e364bd1b9e5d0c5
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:18:19:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Audit & Tax Senior or Manager 60k to 109,5k Immediate OpeningsWe are actively seeking both a Tax and Audit Senior or Manager ($60k to $109,5k) for 4 excellent, full-service CPA firms that are growing in the area. Not For Profit, Manufacturing, Distribution experience would be a plus. I have another that would like some SEC experience. I also have a need in Fla,  Texas, Ga, Colorado & Kansas for an Audit & Tas Manager level. Our clients are top ranked accounting firms in the industry. They offer generous compensation salaries & benefits, flexible hours and possible relocation benefits. These positions can offer you the professional challenge you thrive on as well as the realistic chance to advance along with a real work life balance schedule. If this sounds like a great career move for you, please don't miss this opportunity hearing about it-I know this is busy season but they are fine starting someone after that. Let’s consider a phone screen to determine chemistry and potential fit. Let's talk today!4 to 10 yr. experience with recent Public Accounting firm experience in the last 3 yrs. Call Dennis Piller at The Performers Network 813 967 7127 We work nationally. If you are looking for just the right position, potentially, out of the area. Let's talk. Contact and Submit Resume in Word Format to: Dennis 813 967 7127 Dennis@ThePerformersNetwork.com",Audit and Tax Senior - Audit and Tax Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75221",,http://jobview.monster.com/Audit-Tax-Senior-Audit-Tax-Manager-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164773459.aspx?mescoid=1300116001001&jobPosition=17,"60,000.00 - 109,500.00 $ /yearBonus",Experienced (Non-Manager),51a589e3bf8269e8918ef5e3c73868b0
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:19:00:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Account Receivable – Billing Accountant for South Dallas Manufacturer CompanyResponsibilities to include but not limited to:-          Billing Commercial-Construction jobs based on percentage of completion -          Responsible for all paperwork for submission with contract projects to GC o   Pay application AIA documentation; Lien Waiverso   Familiar with SOV-Schedule of Values, Certified Payroll-          Contracts (understand scope and content)-          Billing Hospitality projects within accounting system-          AR collection (maintain aging, review and call customers)-          AR post deposits and payments from invoicing to accounting system-          Process customer returns within the accounting system-          Assist Director of Accounting and Human Resources with projectsRequirements:-          Associate Degree required or 3 years’ experience in Accounting-          Experience in AR / Billing / Collections-          General Ledger and reconciliation experience-          MS Office (Word, Excel, Outlook)-          Experience in a manufacturing environment-          Knowledge of GAAP-          Positive, professional attitude and appearance-          Ability to organize, multi-task, and communicate well with others-          Attention to detail and self motivated-          Sage MAS500 (not required)Compensation: Depending on experienceResponsibilities and requirements are not all inclusive",Accounts Receivable Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75216",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Accounts-Receivable-Job-Dallas-TX-US-163590812.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0dd99c347c261666047e9e9e50b00724
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:19:22:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"We connect highly qualified applicants with schools/districts.Applicants can expect one email update (maximum) per week.Please provide a resume and let us know if you are looking for a certain area/job category.We presently have connections with systems in California, Nevada, Georgia, Florida Texas, and Missouri (other states are being added weekly!). We assist districts NATIONWIDE.PLEASE be sure to submit your resume that includes your current contact information.Note - some positions are full-time, some are part-time and some are contract (meaning - some have benefits... some do not). Positions matching range from teacher assistants to central office ...and all in between - even outside company contract positions.Thank you for taking time to read our posting.",Teacher for Adult learners,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Teacher-for-Adult-learners-teacher-for-students-Trainer-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165165509.aspx?mescoid=2500400001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),eaea9834e087d0b03e149f9286a9a505
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:19:56:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Client Technical Analyst. Responsible for learning client relations, technical or operational aspects of client products to service client base and handling client calls and servicing client base.This job will have the following responsibilities:Reinforces value, develops relationships and looks for opportunities. Answers inquiries from clients promptly and accurately, researching and escalating to other departments if needed. Observes and assists other internal employees including salesmen, development team and management to gain working knowledge of product, department procedure and dealership knowledgeInitiates and submits any critical client needs, program bugs, special program requests and product change requests to management for review. Modifies/ updates tasks in a queue based environment and coordinates implementation of appropriate customer support procedures. Maintains and provides support for other staff functions on special projects as needed. Responsible for the set up and follow through of many individual tasks. Qualifications & Requirements:Experience working with or inside the service or parts department of a car dealership is a plus. Excellent working knowledge of CRM tools, email programs, Office Products a must. Must have experience in a client facing role that encompasses professional phone skills, multiple computer tools, multi-tasking and thinking in your feet. Candidate should have a positive attitude and be able to stay on task within guidelines assigned to them. Willing to learn, must be able to pick up on concepts quickly, completes personal and departmental assigned goals. Successful candidates will be internally driven to succeed while able to learn and be coached on new processes. Must be open to fast pace and change in an emerging and technical business.",Client Technical Analyst Job in Hilliard,"Full Time, Employee","Hilliard, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Client-Technical-Analyst-Job-Hilliard-OH-US-164906197.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,b86d7db4d6bf55c7f61acb9a9a699978
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:20:13:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"C&Y Global Inc. is one of the fastest growing scrap-metal recycling companies in Texas, with warehouses in Houston, Dallas, Chicago, and San Francisco. From the establishment in 2004, our revenue has increased steadily. We are looking for high potential candidates who can grow with us.Position: Logistics - Shipping/Receiving and InventoryLocation: Dallas, TX 75207Responsibilities:1. Receiving• Verifies items received by comparing the purchase order and the packing list/invoice,• inspects condition of items and resolve the discrepancy (in weight, quality or unit price),• update data in the system and prepare label for the received items.2. Supervise Shipping & loading3. Logistic plan and driver dispatch4. Prepare and send invoice and packing list to customer5. Inventory management, Process improvement6. Other supporting task from managerRequirement:•  At least 3 years’ warehouse experience, bachelor degree•  Be proficient in data entry with minimal errors, and detail-oriented•  Can work under high time pressure, and keep high work quality under minimum supervision•  Well-organized, initiative, strong sense of responsibilityWe provide a competitive compensation package and good career development opportunity. Please send resume to resume@cyglobalusa.com  or fax to 713-472-3725.",Logistics - Shipping/Receiving Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75207",Wholesale Trade/Import-Export,http://jobview.monster.com/Logistics-Shipping-Receiving-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165312526.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=14,,,d2b0cdf117a231923432675a88f02560
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:20:29:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Emergency Department / Emergency RoomRegistered Nurse – RN Staff Dallas, TX Here's an incredible opportunity for a motivated and experienced Emergency Room Staff nurse to work at a highly respected hospital in the area with an exceptional local and national reputation.   OUR SERVICES ARE ALWAYS FREE!  ·          ALL Shifts Available, including 7a – 7p. 12p – 12a, 1p – 1a and 7p – 7a! ·          Top pay in the area with an excellent benefits packages·          Fast paced, high volume emergency department·          Interviewing immediately   PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE!  1-800-995-2672 1329 Caitlin GreenePlacement Counselor, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group1-800-995-2673 x1329cgreene@coremedicalgroup.com  All applicants must be a Registered Nurse. The ideal candidate will have recent experience working as an Emergency Department Staff RN.  PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2672 1329 Caitlin GreenePlacement Counselor, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group1-800-995-2673 x1329cgreene@coremedicalgroup.com Keywords: PCU, progressive care, tele, critical care, intensive care, telemetry, stepdown, step-down, step down, medical surgical, med/surg, medical/surgical, med surg, intensive care, critical care, coronary care, ccu, icu, ortho, rehab,  RNFA, First Assistant, Surgical Assistant, Charge Nurse, neuro, neurology, neurovascular, emt, neurosciences, epilepsy, stroke, brain, trauma, Neuroanatomy, traumatic brain injury, Certified Neuroscience Registered Nurse (CNRN), vascular, neuro/trauma, director, manager, nurse manager, rn, registered nurse, r.n., service line director, msn, bsn, telemetry, surgical, med/surg, stepdown, pcu, med/surg, medical surgical, tele, nurse manager, director, msn, cardiac, cardiacvascular, emergency room, emergency department, ER, ED",Emergency Room Staff – RN – Nurse – Emergency Department Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Emergency-Room-Staff-%E2%80%93-RN-%E2%80%93-Nurse-%E2%80%93-Emergency-Department-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164374009.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,ee0c082633481c4840cc9f02ad802fdc
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:20:29:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ericsson is a world-leading provider of telecommunications equipment and related services to mobile and fixed network operators globally. Over 1,000 networks in more than 175 countries utilize our network equipment and 40 percent of all mobile calls are made through our systems. We are one of the few companies worldwide that can offer end-to-end solutions for all major mobile communication standards.Telecom Tower Technician IResponsibilities:Climb ladders and towers and safely and efficiently complete various job duties at elevated heights with little or no supervisionAnalyze and resolve network issues associated with equipment installations and removalsInterpret and follow detailed method of procedures (MOPS) and engineering documents / diagramsReview for accuracy project specifications to validate equipment placement, and cable assignmentsAccurately follow instructions and complete assigned course of action in accordance with scope of workObserve possible compound/equipment defects or hazards that would require additional scope of workAccurately and timely document job costs, including labor hours and materialComplete and pass all tower trainingUnderstand and strictly adhere to safety practices and guidelinesUnderstand and strictly adhere to established Ericsson and customer quality requirements without deviationEnsure that Job Hazard Assessment (JHA) requirements are identified, documented and followedOther duties as assigned by managementPosition Requirements Qualifications:Valid driver licenseMust successfully complete DOT certification within 90 days of employmentMust take and pass a drug test and adhere to random drug testing policyMust successfully complete and pass a background check, including criminal history check, employment history check, and education verification, among other thingsMust successfully complete Ericsson’s tower training program at required levelAbility to learn and retain new knowledgeWorking knowledge of telecommunication constructionPrevious experience ensuring Job Hazard Assessment (JHA) requirements are identified, documented and followed Must be able to travel outside home market up to 25% of timeMust be willing to serve in an on-call rotationMust be able to work outside of normal business hours (i.e., shift work), to include nights and weekends, if neededSelf-starter with desire and ability to learn and retain knowledgeMust be a team player and have excellent interpersonal communication skillsExcellent organizational and administrative skills Effective written and oral communication skills in English language for safety reasonsAbility to exercise flexibility in challenging and/or perplexing situationsAbility to multi-task and maintain composure in stressful and demanding work environmentMust have high level of computer proficiency, including a working knowledge of all Microsoft Office suite productsPrevious experience conducting safety meetings/briefings a plusKnowledge of networking principals, Ethernet standards, power systems, and cable testing is a plusPhysical RequirementsMust take and pass a pre-employment fitness-for-duty examination, and periodic fitness-for-duty examinations during employmentMust be in good physical condition with the ability to bend, twist, squat, and lift and carry up to 70 lbs and pull own body weight plus equipment weight up a vertical tower repeatedly for long periods of timeAbility to climb ladders and steep staircasesAbility to climb tall structures (100 feet or more) with 50 lb. load and to work at altitudes of 300+ feetWeight must not exceed 250 lbs.in order to meet weight limits specified by safety equipment manufacturers’ standardsWaist circumference must not exceed 60 inches measured at the navel as specified by the manufacturer of safety equipmentAbility to clearly identify specific color schemesAbility to work in remote and challenging locations including, but not limited to: rooftops, confined spaces, and all types of geographic locationsAbility to work outdoors in all types of weather conditionsAbility to drive long distances on and off roadMechanical RequirementsUnderstanding of basic mechanical terms and toolsAbility to learn and retain physical and mechanical installation specificationsAbility to connect and disconnect various sizes and types of electronic connectorsClick Here to Apply!*This job description is intended to describe the general nature and level of work to be performed by employees assigned to the position; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of employees assigned to the position.We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Tower Tech I Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Tower-Tech-I-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164465701.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=10,,,7c7dc9cfe9841691951b555eb0fb00d9
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:23:47:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Duties: • Supports a company-wide collaborative approach to business through closely working with the Retail Sales and On-Premise teams and fulfilling their needs to sell, market and execute.  • Enters routing information into routing system to create delivery routes that meet customer needs and fleet capabilities while maximizing customer service and minimizing delivery costs.   • Manages and maintains routing and ordering systems; ensures functionality and reliability of databases.   • Assigns appropriate drivers, equipment and regions to delivery routes in the routing system to ensure optimal routing.   • Communicates with other employees regarding requests for information; supervisor and management team regarding any problems or issues.   • Analyzes existing routes and determines future plans to increase efficiency and meet customer needs.   • Works closely with warehouse employees to provide accurate, detailed, timely paperwork and reports for daily loading.   • Provides assistance to drivers, managers and other employees regarding procedures, order parameters, expectations, and database technical support.   • Completes time-off requests, daily reports and other required paperwork according to established standards.   • Maintains confidentiality of financial information, budget, driver information and other sensitive information.   • Adheres to all company policies, standards and procedures (e.g. OSHA and safety requirements, Federal/State/Local laws).   • Works assigned schedule, exhibits regular and predictable attendance and works overtime as needed to meet workload demands. Performs other related duties as required.",Delivery Logistics Coordinator Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43219",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Delivery-Logistics-Coordinator-Job-Columbus-OH-US-164652669.aspx?mescoid=1100026001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f9bfcd7a1a3ee188b2f13d1ca4dba6dd
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:20:30:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Dallas, Texas (TX) that is seeking Medical AR Representatives needed as soon as possible (quick hire).Essential Functions: Responsible for maintaining industry standards for the A/R they are assigned to for all carriers in regards to aging, collection rates, and DSO Post contractual and courtesy adjustments as needed Responsible for the follow up on all outstanding insurance and patient claims Work the aging reports as directed by the A/R Manager, be responsible for lowering the aging insurance A/R to acceptable standards, and help in the preparation of spreadsheets and aging analysis for meetings with insurance carriers and the resubmission of claimsREQUIREMENTS: At least 2+ years Medical Collections experience Experience with EOBs Experience with Workers Compensation a plus",Medical Accounts Receivable Representatives Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX 75243",,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Accounts-Receivable-Representatives-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164970375.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2d340aa6e66c857b343b0e83ca558e28
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:03:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Parker+Lynch is looking to fill a Staff Accountant job in Dallas, TX.  This company recently relocated to the area and is expanding. This position will report directly to the Accounting Manager with a dotted line to the Controller.   The Staff Accountant job duties include:-Ensure assigned accounts and roll-forwards are timely reconciled and all balances appropriately stated-Pull invoices and research issues for the various companies-Prepare account reconciliations as assigned-Maintain accounting issues and follow up logs-Assist in preparing financial reports for management -Record receivables and apply cash receipts for all entities, as well as, monitor receivables to ensure that payments are current-Assist with the month-end close process, ensuring accuracy and timeliness of financial statements. Qualifications: -Bachelor’s degree or higher required, CPA or CPA eligible preferred-New grads to one year of experience will be considered If you are interested in this Staff Accountant job or other Accounting and Finance career opportunities from Parker + Lynch please email Rami Muhanna at rami.muhanna@parkerlynch.com or visit our website at www.parkerlynch.com    ",Staff Accountant job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Staff-Accountant-job-in-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164769340.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=4,"55,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,581d84c4bd25727d1e3e1f2df55b1512
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:05:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Since 1906, Hussmann International, Inc. has been helping retailers preserve and display fresh foods. Today, Hussmann is a world leader in manufacturing, selling, installing and servicing merchandising equipment and refrigeration systems to customers throughout the world. Hussmann serves a wide variety of customers involved in the global cold chain. These include supermarkets, mass merchants, warehouse clubs, convenience stores, drug stores, and foodservice establishments. The Refrigeration Service Technician is responsible for the maintenance, diagnosis and repair of refrigeration systems commonly installed in supermarkets and convenient stores. Perform prescribed, routine maintenance procedures on supermarket refrigeration systems and self-contained temperature controlled merchandisers. Working knowledge of energy management systems.Diagnose refrigeration systems and perform necessary repairs resulting in 100% customer satisfaction.Ability to locate and repair leaks on racks or single-unitsDemonstrate an understanding and adherence to all work safety policies and procedures.Develop and maintain excellent customer relations. BenefitsCompany vehicleIncentive PlansPaid TrainingPaid Vacation and HolidaysMedical, dental, vision and prescription coverageMatching 401KTuition Reimbursement - industry related Hussmann International, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity EmployerRequired Skills:5+ years in commercial REFRIGERATION. Supermarket experienced PREFERRED. Strong HVAC.Knowledge of refrigeration, electrical and microprocessor control systemsKnowledge of single systems, parallel racks systems, display cases and walk-in boxesStrong mechanical aptitude skillsHigh School/Equivalent or Vocational School required. EPA requiredDriver's license appropriate to local requirements and a safe driving record.Physically able to climb ladders and to lift objects up to fifty pounds.",Dallas- Service Technician (P-) Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureConstruction - Residential & Commercial/OfficeEngineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Dallas-Service-Technician-P-12006459-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164555074.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,015cc27e4fbb76cbd13702599a7718f8
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:07:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Open the door to your future career…and a few windows too at Renewal by AndersenCompany OverviewRenewal by Andersen® is the leading source for top of the line replacement windows and patio doors. Our windows are the highest quality replacement windows on the market. Through our strong partnership with the national Renewal by Andersen® brand, we offer homeowners a wide selection of beautifully crafted, expertly designed windows that will truly transform any home. Events Marketing AssociateKey Duties and ResponsibilitiesOur Event Specialist work to generate leads for our Sales Consultants at festivals, in store events, and home shows around the Dallas area by having the opportunity to speak with potential customers.Renewal by Andersen is the top name in custom windows for high-end customers, and our marketing team is the tip of the spear. We want to hire the right people who want the opportunity to advance their careers to the next level. By contacting clients face to face you help instantly build a need and interest in our products, which are second to none. A positive attitude and exceptional customer service are the backbone of our company, and we want individuals who share those attributes.Informing potential customers about our product.Informing potential customers about current promotions.Generating leads by setting appointments with potential customers to receive a free in-home consultation.QualificationsMust be 18 years or olderUpbeat, high energy attitudePositive, fun, focused, confident, self-motivatedEnthusiastic, articulate, willingness to learnAbility to quickly build relationshipsSome sales/promotional experience is a plusMust be able to work weekends, some weekday and evenings.What We Offer:Base pay with attractive bonusesOpportunities for Growth  Paid Training For full-time employees:Medical, dental and vision coverage after 30 daysA 401(k) retirement savings plan Paid Time Off, Vacation TimeInternal training and developmentOpportunities for growth and promotion at our five locations - Austin-Atlanta-Dallas-Tulsa-Oklahoma CityGreat work-life balanceA friendly and supportive work environment About Us: Renewal by Andersen® is the leading source for top of the line replacement windows and patio doors. Our windows are the highest quality replacement windows on the market. Through our strong partnership with the national Renewal by Andersen® brand, we offer homeowners a wide selection of beautifully crafted, expertly designed windows that will truly transform any home. For more than 100 years, Andersen has improved the outlook for people as the world’s largest and most trusted window and door replacement. Renewal by Andersen® careers offer unrivaled opportunity! Our employees bring to life our key core values: integrity, alignment, achievement, balance and commitment. If these values are important to you too, we want you on our team! Renewal by Andersen is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Events Specialist - Dallas,Part Time,"Dallas, TX 75202",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Events-Specialist-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164416145.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=9,,Student (High School),1d339b718d0d91b0687227286e1ff486
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:07:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pine Creek Medical Center is searching for a part-time licensed Physical Therapist that is patient-focused and compassionate. Pine Creek Medical Center is a private, physician-owned and operated acute care hospital.One of the only hospitals that is fully digital, fully integrated and completely wireless, we house a digital OR where patients undergo leading-edge surgery and procedures in the areas of the spine, orthopedics, bariatric, urology and other specialties.  The hospital is accredited by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Health Organizations. The PT is responsible for therehab plan of care for inpatient orthopedics, outpatient orthopedics, and post-operative unit patients. Work Hours:  Monday-Friday (minimum 25 hours/week), varying hours to meet the needs of the surgery schedule.Qualifications:Current license to practice Physical Therapy in the State of Texas and in good standing.BLS is current and up to date.Experience in prior acute care setting with focus on orthopedics strongly preferred.In-depth or advanced knowledge of orthopedic injuries (e.g., TKA, THA, and spine) preferred.Must be able to move, adjust and position patients or equipment which involves bending, stooping freely to the floor, reaching overhead, lifting, pulling or guiding a weight of 200-250 pounds.Please visit us at www.pinecreekmedicalcenter.com for more information about our facility and careers.Pine Creek Medical Center is an equal opportunity employer.",Physical Therapist Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75235",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physical-Therapist-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164609070.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),588131471bd8b039e1c9fd05a4777a07
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:45:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Driver - Independent Contractor Needed for Route Delivery - Part Time or Full Time COMPANY: Metro 1 Courier, Inc. WE ARE METRO 1 COURIER. WE’RE A DELIVERY & LOGISTICSCOMPANY WITH DAILY ROUTES IN HOUSTON & DALLAS, FOUNDED IN 1991. YOU CANVISIT OUR WEBSITE WWW.METRO1COURIER.COMOR OUR FACEBOOK PAGE https://www.facebook.com/metro1courier TO LEARNABOUT US. WE’RE CONTRACTING WITH QUALIFIED MEN & WOMEN THAT WANTTO DELIVER SMALL ENVELOPES MONDAY THRU FRIDAY. YOU CAN MANAGE YOUR ROUTE OR WORK WITH US WITH MULITPLE ROUTES AND HIREYOUR DRIVERS. WE’RE LOOKING FOR PEOPLE THAT WORK WITHOUT SUPERVISION AND WANTTO BE THEIR OWN BOSS. WE WANT TO TALK TO YOU THIS WEEK. SET YOUR OWN HOURS& DAYS YOU WORK, WE OFFER FLEXIBILITY. CHOOSE TO WORK A COUPLE DAYS PERMONTH TO SUPPLEMENT YOUR INCOME OR EARN A FULLTIME INCOME. THIS IS WEEKLY PAY, DELIVERY OF LIGHT WEIGHT ENVELOPES UNDER1 POUND, AND WE HAVE 22 ROUTES WITH 2 OPENINGS IN THE DALLAS-FT WORTH METROPLEX.GOOD FOR RETIRED PEOPLE.  IF YOU ARE A SELF STARTER WORKING PT YOU CAN  EARN $75-$150+/DAY OR  $500 FOR about 30 HOURS AND IF YOU NEED  FULLTIME WORK AND HAVE A CARGO VAN YOU CANEARN MUCH MORE.THE QUALIFIED APPLICANT WILL SUPPLY A COMPACT CAR, MINI VANOR PICKUP TRUCK, A SMART PHONE, OR A TABLET AND HAVE A GOOD KNOWLEDGE OF THEDELIVERY AREA. WE DO HAVE AN AFFORDABLE RENTAL PLAN FOR SMART PHONES, TABLETSAND A SCANNER. Respond online for more information.  Respond online today.​ Location: Dallas, TX Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21573 Vehicle Type: Car, Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Dallas,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX 75207",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Driver-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165188606.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=20,,,3b45305b1b353eb87b75095e8e15a17c
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:45:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking an ATG & Endeca Developer for a contract opportunity in Irving, TX! Responsibilities / Required Skills: Assists the lead developer and or developers in composing the load testing plan, directly writes scripts to implement the plan. Assists the project management office and testers in the creation of the test plan and test scenarios whose scope includes new code or changes in existing code. Provide input to technical lead and architect on development solutions. Monitors and supports high volume batch file and web service integrations. Design cutting-edge websites and web based applications. Concept and create wireframes, graphical templates, and other graphical elements for various web based projects. Ensure site design integrity and quality control consistency throughout a projects lifecycle. Communicate with the project team throughout all stages of design. Manage time effectively, and work on multiple project timelines simultaneously in a demanding deadline driven environment BFA Graphic Design or related field preferred. Portfolio of work required. 10+ years experience in web application development, design, unit testing and implementation. Proficiency in ATG eCommerce Framework and Endeca Search Engine is a must. Proficiency and implementation skills on ATG based application is required with large scale implementation a plus. Proficiency in JAVA, JEE, build tools such as ant, maven, SCM tools, Enterprise class Web Application. Development using Java / JEE frameworks is a must. Experience and hands-on on one of the following products: Oracle ATG, Commerce, Commerce Service Center (CSC), Endeca Experience Manager or Page Builder. Development experience on an Oracle ATG platform is a major plus although experience in developing in any major, Java platform is also highly desirable. Experience developing in Java and working with HTML. Knowledge of XML / XSL / XSD. Knowledge of Java thread and memory dumps and when to use them. Good understanding of Web Services (SOAP, WSDL, RESTful). Understanding of build processes and tools (ANT, Maven, automated builds, continuous builds). Source control processes & tools (Perforce, Subversion, code branching) is a plus. Experience working on system integrations (particularly third-party systems such as OMS, search, ERP, payment). Knowledge of system architecture, system sizing and/or J2EE components. Experience developing applications, templates, and components for Adobe CQ5 product (WCM, DAM, CQSE, CRX); ExtJS, Web Content Management system development experience. Hands on CQ Development experience. Strong experience in CMS (Content Management System). Either front-end (Jquery, HTML5, CSS, JSON) or backend (Core Java) development skills (ideally, experience in both). Possess problem solving and analytical skills, including the ability to create sophisticated design solutions to complex problems.",ATG & Endeca Developer/ Sr. Developer Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/ATG-Endeca-Developer-Sr-Developer-Job-Irving-TX-US-165325341.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,4ed4f53f4c322305ffe99ad14ed4ad0f
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:57:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY:Assists in the processing of loan department activity by performing the following duties and clerical functions: ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.  Other duties may be assigned. •           Primarily responsible for the filing of lien instruments on motor vehicles pledged as collateral security.  Duties include the initiation of the filing process, maintaining records of filings, disbursing checks to Department of Motor Vehicles in appropriate jurisdictions, and attending to the renewal or release of filings.  •            Pay dealer drafts daily •           Work Regular Exchange (GL) account and update Excel Spreadsheet daily as well as maintain drafts payable spreadsheet. •           Send contacts to Accounting for reconciliation of taxes and title fees charged. •           Work Title contacts daily, as well as release of liens upon request. •           Work closed loan report including but not limited to releasing titles to members, dealers and other financial institutions for all closed auto loans. •           Work FDI reports including maintain, change, and/or correct any errors. •           Maintain direct and indirect title reports. •           Process title state changes in the event a member moves to a different state. •           Assist associates and members with any and all questions concerning titles daily. •           Perform any other related duties as assigned by management. •           Commitment to living by the Core Values of City CU. •           Volunteers as a representative of the credit union at least once a year. •           Performs all applicable job functions in accordance with established Credit Union BSA/AML/OFAC/ policies and procedures and completes required training on an annual basis.  PERFORMANCE STANDARDS:Thorough knowledge of Title Lien Filing regulations and requirements.  Performs all job functions in an accurate and timely manner.  Professional in appearance and attitude. Utilizes interpersonal skills effectively in a team environment. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.  The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:High school diploma or general education degree (GED); plus six months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. OTHER SKILLS and ABILITIES:Ability to operate general office equipment and programs such as: photocopier, fax machine, word, excel, Microsoft Outlook, and printers. PHYSICAL DEMANDS:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls.  The employee frequently is required to walk, reach with hands and arms, and talk or hear.  The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance; and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. MENTAL DEMANDS:The mental characteristics necessary to competently perform this job include, but are not limited to; the frequent need to be patient and creative.",Title Clerk Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75228",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Title-Clerk-Job-Dallas-TX-US-162246026.aspx?mescoid=2300334001001&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,1551ef1f67c5beacc1090d95fe04ceac
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:21:57:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales Development Manager - Chain ProductsMust have experience with chain products for agriculture and industrial applications. Precision roller chain, screw conveyor auger flighting, engineered class chain.  This is a work from home opportunity.  BA in Mechanical Engineering or equivalent experience 5 to 7 years of managing distribution and calling on OEMs. Competitive pay, profit sharing, and an excellent benefits package that includes 401(k) match, Medical, Prescription, Dental, Life, Short-term/Long-term Disability, Paid Vacations/Holidays, and EAP Services.Westport One consistently ranks as one of the top 10 offices within the MRI Network system, which consists of more than 700 offices worldwide. Our search consultants are Engineering/Manufacturing ""industry insiders"" working specifically with salespeople, sales engineers, and technical engineering positions such as civil, structural, mechanical, electrical, industrial, and environmental. Any inquiries relating to this ad will be kept confidential. To learn more about our organization please visit us at www.westportone.com.To apply for this position, submit your resume by choosing one or more of the following:1.)    ***CLICKING “APPLY NOW” ON THIS PAGE*** (PREFERRED) 2.)   Email your resume in WORD format to kim@westportone.com.  Please refer to job reference code CS/DevelopChain in the subject line. 3.)   Fax resume with cover letter to:  314-991-9586.  Attention:  Kim Carlson.  Please refer to job reference code CS/DevelopChain  NO CALLS PLEASE",Sales Development Manager - Chain Products Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Development-Manager-Chain-Products-Job-Dallas-TX-US-163934512.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,b611739f4934e58e5fafcc74143061cb
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:22:14:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description  A rapidly growing Columbus-based property management firm, is seeking a well-qualified candidate to fulfill the duties of Community Manager at one of our smaller 120 unit Columbus locations.  We are seeking someone with a dynamic personality who is energetic, fun and well organized. The ideal candidate will have prior management experience and can work independently.  This is both a challenging and rewarding position for the candidate who is looking for an opportunity for advancement and long-term growth with our company. The cornerstone of our success is our skilled, close-knit management team where we combine talent, expertise, and professionalism with a positive, pro-active approach to solving management issues.  A well-qualified candidate will demonstrate exceptional customer service, communication, organizational, and multi-tasking skills. This exciting and fast-paced position requires important responsibilities including (but are not limited to):Essential Duties and Responsibilities·        Manage the day to day operations of an apartment community to maximize the net operating income.·        Hire, train, direct, motivate, and retain property staff to include Assistant Community Managers, leasing and administrative personnel, and property maintenance personnel as needed and approved.·        Create & maintain a positive work environment and atmosphere to promote team building and cultivate the company pride and mentorship in developing team and vendor relationships. ·        Record and account for all rental revenue and expenditures per data entry as required·        Promote and implement effective community management techniques and programs to achieve a maximum level of NOI through a high level of customer service, occupancy, rent collection, and prudent expense control. ·        Implement the Policies and Procedures of the company in the operation of and accounting for property operations. ·        Ensure maximum occupancy, rental revenue, collections and prudent expense control.·        Generate and implement an ongoing action plan with goals and objectives to meet or exceed the budgeted NOI for the property.·        Report, recommend and/or initiate improvements to the physical assets of the property as established by approval levels and budgets. ·        Analyze and report changes and trends within the marketplace to ensure appropriate market rental rates. ·        Prepare, review, and analyze property operating budgets monthly. Audit and analyze property income and expense documents and reports to ensure proper and effective operations. ·        Communicate and negotiate with contractors, suppliers and vendors.A minimum of 2-5 years of experience in the property management field is preferred; however, candidates with a strong sales background will also be considered.We have an excellent benefits package which includes 401K with employer match, health, dental and vision insurance, commissions, PTO and holidays. Salary Career Level Required Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff) Experience Required 2+ to 5 Years Education Required High School or equivalent Job Type Employee Job Status Full Time Hours/Shifts    ",Community Manager Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43214",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Community-Manager-Job-Columbus-OH-US-164318723.aspx?mescoid=1100053001001&jobPosition=5,16.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),3d16cbabd7ecf4941ae42b65cfc64cfd
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:22:16:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Open the door to your future career…and a few windows too at Renewal by AndersenCompany OverviewRenewal by Andersen® is the leading source for top of the line replacement windows and patio doors. Our windows are the highest quality replacement windows on the market. Through our strong partnership with the national Renewal by Andersen® brand, we offer homeowners a wide selection of beautifully crafted, expertly designed windows that will truly transform any home. Sales RepresentativeKey Duties and ResponsibilitiesRenewal by Andersen, the most recognized name in the window replacement industry, has an exciting opportunity for a Sales Representative. We need sharp sales representatives to serve our customers and run pre-qualified leads!You must be an energetic self-starter who can manage your time efficiently. Ideal candidates will have a minimum of two years sales experience with prior earnings of up to $100,000. Previous home improvement & in-home sales experience is preferred.Minimum of $1200 per week commission guaranteed for the first 30 daysCompany driven lead generation -- no cold calling - We'll give you the leads, you close the deal Successful sales consultants earn a six figure income to maximize online lead sourcesQualifications2+ years Business to Customer or In-Home sales experience A proven track record of closing sales A strong focus on exceeding customer expectations Schedule availability to visit homeowner appointments on evenings and weekendsStrong written and verbal communication skills Self-motivation and results orientation Time and work process management skills with the ability to work independentlyValid driver's license with a clean driving recordBachelor's degree or an equivalent combination of education and experience Must be willing to consent to a criminal background check.What We Offer:Opportunities for Growth  Paid Training For full-time employees:Medical, dental and vision coverage after 30 daysA 401(k) retirement savings plan Paid Time Off, Vacation TimeInternal training and developmentOpportunities for growth and promotion at our five locations - Austin-Atlanta-Dallas-Tulsa-Oklahoma CityGreat work-life balanceA friendly and supportive work environmentAbout Us: Renewal by Andersen® is the leading source for top of the line replacement windows and patio doors. Our windows are the highest quality replacement windows on the market. Through our strong partnership with the national Renewal by Andersen® brand, we offer homeowners a wide selection of beautifully crafted, expertly designed windows that will truly transform any home. For more than 100 years, Andersen has improved the outlook for people as the world’s largest and most trusted window and door replacement. Renewal by Andersen® careers offer unrivaled opportunity! Our employees bring to life our key core values: integrity, alignment, achievement, balance and commitment. If these values are important to you too, we want you on our team! Renewal by Andersen is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Sales Representative - Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75202",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Representative-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164416139.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e4bc468342b692abd26d4fd72316f567
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:22:17:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Customer Service & Client Relations Associate - Entry Level The Job Window has an exciting opportunity available for a personable and upbeat candidate looking to boost their experience in customer service & client relations as an associate or start their entry level career in the marketing & sales fields! This immediate full time opening for an Entry Level Customer Service & Client Relations Associate, being made available by our client (a trendy and progressive local marketing boutique focused on customer acquisition & customer support) is the perfect opportunity for an individual who possesses a big-picture mentality and is able to help with the expansion of new locations.​  The Entry Level Customer Service & Client Relations Associate must demonstrate unmatched interpersonal skills and be able to become the “face"" of the company for the client.​  Restaurant, Retail, and Hospitality professionals particularly excel in this position as they are able to apply a personal touch to all consumer interactions.​  This local firm has developed a reputation for attracting exceptional individuals who are passionate about customer service & client care and who excel in a performance driven environment.​  Those individuals who demonstrate leadership ability in this entry level Customer Service & Client Relations Associate role will also be considered for higher level management positions after an initial evaluation in the first few months.​ We do not expect you to be an expert on day one, but through extensive training, there will be many opportunities to demonstrate your management ability.​ Required Tasks of the Customer Service & Client Relations Associate: Engage with the targeted audience in a professional and welcoming manner and determine qualification statusAlign customer needs with product and service offeringsCreate lead generations for high profile clientsPromote client and service awareness in the fieldProvide exceptional customer support & client care What Makes Our Client Different?​ Our client’s tailored marketing and sales experiences allow them to use a more personal approach to the development and growth of the company.​ This firm’s philosophy emphasizes the importance of leading by example and having a comprehensive understanding of the entire business model.​ Their training program provides exposure to all facets of the campaigns as well as an opportunity for entry level roles to grow into leadership and management positions.​  Finally, the progressive management culture is unlike any other firm, where the development of team members is as important as the customer support services rendered.​  Job Requirements:Our client’s management team search is focused on individuals who are dedicated to consistently driving high standards and achieving customer service, client relations and client care excellence.​ Those who enjoy a small-company-feel, are adept at building relationships, and have a single-minded focus on delivering quality should apply.​ Although limited related experience is required with this entry level position, the following critical attributes are preferred: Above average people & communication skillsExcellent leadership qualities and winning attitude/​great work ethic/​ambition to succeed Some benefits of the Customer Service & Client Relations Associate Position: Comprehensive Paid Training by a National Manager; National and International Travel for Company Events; Opportunity for Community and Charity Involvement; Flexible Scheduling; Numerous Advancement Opportunities  Qualifications of an Customer Service & Client Relations Associate: Experience in customer service, client relations, customer support, client care or retail/​restaurant/​hospitality related fields dealing with the general public is an assetAbility to adapt to a variety of people; Winning attitude and dedication to ensuring customer & client satisfactionAbility to work well within a team environmentTravel to on-site campaign areas will be a role requirement.​ Access to reliable transportation or your own vehicle is recommended  Key Words: Customer Service, Entry Level Customer Service, Entry Level, Entry Level Retail Marketing, Entry Level Marketing, Customer Acquisition, Customer Retention, Customer Service Associate, Customer Service Representative, Customer Support, Client Support, Customer Relations, Client Relations, Marketing, Marketing & Sales Support, In-store marketing, Front Line, Front Line Client Associate, Entry Level Sales, Sales Account Management, Customer Relationship Management, CRM, Customer Service Sales, Full Time Customer Service, Hospitality, Customer Satisfaction, Customer Retention, New Clients, Customer Service Mangement, Retail Customer Service, Entry Level Retail Jobs, Retail Sales, Retail Sales Assistant, Marketing Assistant, Retail Customer Service Support.​",Customer Service & Client Relations Associate - Entry Level Job in Irving,Full Time Employee,"Irving, TX",AllAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Service-Client-Relations-Associate-Entry-Level-Job-Irving-TX-US-165328053.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,Customer Support/Client Care,4927e85f3e863b339742214e2bf1a132
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:22:20:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"""Waiting in the queue?"" If you're in New Business or Client service, licensed and used to the phones; We may have a solution for you out of the call center. Rather than taking calls for Agents/Clients - You can be on Maximize your earning potential.Seeking to hire and train Field Agents in Strategic Areas in the US - We can go on about what we are looking for in a candidate yet that can be boiled down to two characteristics: Coach-ability and Work ethic. That simple.We have a sales system you will need to understand and be comfortable leaning on the direction of management for correct Product placement and client needs strategies. Agents schedule is returning home daily working 2-3 days/wk. They average protecting 6-8 families per week. If you can be consistent and do that 48wks/yr, that'll give you $1,800-2,500/wk. Commission with most carriers paid daily.This is for an Insurance agent position. Non-captive producing agent - contacting and working with direct mail customers. This in NOT a cold calling position or friends/family or Business to Business cold calling. Customers have responded to a form that specifically requests to proceed for exactly what we offer. Individual protection from life changing events like Death or Disabling event of Sickness or Injury. If the candidates don't die, they get back their premiums. This is not not bait and switch.Real disclosure here - What we have seen presented as big hurdles for some candidates who are hired:Problem - Lack of drive: Employee mentality of ""working enough to keep from being fired"".Change: If you have Vision of tremendous positive impact for those you care about and even those you've not yet met. We can helpProblem - Lack of Humility: ""We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used when we created them."" -Albert Einstein; Some maintain a stance that they have nothing learn from our systems or coaching.Change: We have weekly published results. Proof is in the results and for the humble of heart they too can have a part.We hope to add value to you.If you reply to our ad: HR will give you a call (or answer your incoming call), chat with you a bit and if they schedule you for a phone interview will send out an 'Interviewee Email' with company and Position specifics. We interview in several phases: 1st HR screening, 2nd Hiring coordinator review and 3rd In person interview.This is a Performance based position - Commission only; So this is the reason we want those who are comfortable with their ability to follow through and remain teachable. Until you realize success, we don't realize it either so we will be equally committed to getting you there. If we work with you, we have a streamlined process in getting you Licensed as an Insurance Producer - 7-10 day process.",ATTN: Carrier Call Center Employees - Tired of waiting 'in the queue'? Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/ATTN-Carrier-Call-Center-Employees-Tired-of-waiting-'in-the-queue'-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165189507.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),272a8e2303c130588668182e79f0681c
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:23:12:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Responsibilities: Provide accounting and clerical support to the accounting department.Record charges and refunds.Assist with accounts payable,  posting payments, processing expense reports, general accounting reports, and all other general office dutiesReconciles bank statements by comparing statements with general ledger.Maintain and balance Intercompany accounts by verifying, allocating, posting, reconciling transactions; resolving discrepancies.Prepare monthly account reconciliations Assist with month-end close activities, including the preparation and posting of journalMake certain all financial reporting deadlines are met.Other projects as assigned. Job RequirementsEducation / Experience:1-2 Year of Accounting college classes2 years of experience in a similar or related field. Technical Knowledge/Skills:Good understanding of Accounting as matching principle, debits, credits, accruals and recognition.1-2 years of experience with QuickBooks or other accounting softwareIntermediate level of Microsoft Excel.Advanced analytic and organizational skills.Ability to work cooperatively and collaboratively with all levels of employees, management, and external agencies to maximize performance, creativity, problem solving, and results.Proactive and independent.Flexible towards change. The company is in a growing stage and is changing (improving) accounting procedures in a fast pace.Bilingual in Spanish (minimum 70% of Spanish at least conversational)         Compensation:$14 - $15 hour (depending on experience and knowledge) Please do not apply if you don’t meet the Job Requirements as only candidates with those requirements will be considered.",Accounting Clerk (Bilingual in Spanish) Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75228","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Accounting-Clerk-Bilingual-in-Spanish-Job-Dallas-TX-US-163181452.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=12,14.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,094b28d95d9f42493ae4ac797509d1ec
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:23:26:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Capgemini With more than 140,000 people in over 40 countries, Capgemini is one of the world's foremost providers of consulting, technology and outsourcing services. The Group reported 2014 global revenues of EUR 10.5 billion. Together with its clients, Capgemini creates and delivers business and technology solutions that fit their needs and drive the results they want. A deeply multicultural organization, Capgemini has developed its own way of working, the Collaborative Business ExperienceTM, and draws on Rightshore®, its worldwide delivery model.  Learn more about us at www.capgemini.com.                                                                                            Rightshore® is a trademark belonging to Capgemini   Capgemini is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law. This is a general description of the Duties, Responsibilities and Qualifications required for this position. Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed. Whenever necessary to provide individuals with disabilities an equal employment opportunity, Capgemini will consider reasonable accommodations that might involve varying job requirements and/or changing the way this job is performed, provided that such accommodations do not pose an undue hardship.       Capgemini's robust Outsourcing offerings include: Applications Management, Infrastructure Management and Business Process Management. We combine these services with our deep industry knowledge and experience to provide the change agent to accelerate business growth. We generate quality and speed through our proven tools, methods and global centers. These capabilities, coupled with our program management expertise are tailored to fit the most challenging business needs. Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law Solution Architect Lead – MuleSoft Architect Mulesoft Architect to help design and build integration between multiple on premises and/or cloud hosted systems. Architect must be capable of understanding business requirements, working with Business/Technology leaders, Enterprise Architects and End Users to develop a proposed solution and work with the technical team to develop and deploy the solution. This position requires experience with middleware applications, including expert level knowledge with Mulesoft, as well as experience in detailed requirements analysis, software design, testing, and deployment. Requirements: Collaborate with enterprise architects and IT program managers to enhance existing business applications and facilitate solutions to meet business requirements Assist in architecting technical solutions for enterprise systems using the MuleSoft product suite to drive the value equation and adapt to a rapidly changing business environment Knowledge of SOA Design patterns for building middleware systems ground up using Message Routing, Content Enrichment, Message Filtering, Message Transformation, Guaranteed delivery, Message sequencing, Batch message processing, error handling and reconciliation mechanisms. Knowledge of Web Services Interoperability, WS-* standards and ability to suggest, criticize and formulate solutions in a multi-vendor and architecture committee meetings. Identify, analyze and design integration flows using Mule ESB Anypoint Studio and technically own and manage the process of ensuring on time and on budget build and integration of the various elements of the solution Good understanding of integration design patterns & best practices In depth experience using Agile, Scrum and iterative development practices Assist on technical POC's to prove out technology and ultimately leading into selection Qualifications: 3+ years of experience working as an Integration Solution Architect and 1+ with Mulesoft product Suite. 5+ years of software development experience. Experience with large Full Life Cycle (FLC) project implementations, with hands on delivery. Experience with all aspects of the system implementation process of system design, configuration, customization, integration, testing and support. Experience with design, development and deployment of SOA based architecture for a large organization leveraging multiple COTS Business applications is preferred Experience with Tomcat, XML, JMS, XSLT, WS-*, SOA/Integration, and API Management technologies and standards Experience with using a JAVA IDE (Eclipse, Intelli J, Netbeans) Designed and developed Service Oriented Architecture (SOA) concepts including REST-ful and SOAP-based services Designed and developed enterprise services using RAML and REST based APIs Experienced in both Agile and waterfall methodologies Have excellent interpersonal, verbal and written skills and the ability to interact with all level of stakeholders, support personnel, and clients Strong documentation, analytical and problem-solving skills Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or any related field and a minimum of 5 years relevant experience providing IT enablement solutions Mule certification highly preferred  ",Solution Architect Lead - Mulesoft Architect Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Solution-Architect-Lead-Mulesoft-Architect-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164222839.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),13df833e99c5a2154854d94c99e43e18
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:23:28:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Role: Senior Web Developer and Cloud Automation Expert (Remote Work) 80-90% will be remote or virtual work but there may be some travel required for in person meetings (1-2 meetings per quarter as an estimate) Travel expenses to be billed as actual if required Must Have Expert level web development skills and experience on the following technologies -HTML 5 -CSS 3 -JavaScript -PHP 5 Expert level web development using the following frameworks and tools -Semantic UI -D3JS -PHP/Laravel -JQuery, Angular.js and Node.js -Advanced PHP 5.3+ (with OOP and AOP skills) -PHP/Composer Databases -Expert level MySQL -Expert level MongoDB Automation tooling -Vagrant -Ansible / Salt Operating Systems -Linux Ubuntu/ CoreOS/ RedHat Source Control -Git (We use Bitbucket) Good to Have Cloud Technologies -Docker and Docker Cloud -Amazon Web Services -Open StackExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Senior Web Developer and Cloud Automation Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Senior Web Developer and Cloud Automation,"Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Web-Developer-Cloud-Automation-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165313357.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,4cbdb03ef9cda06c7e98f98850efb844
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:23:47:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Parker+Lynch is looking to fill a Staff Accountant job in Dallas, TX with a well-known healthcare organization in Dallas, TX.    The Staff Accountant job duties include: -Prepares monthly journal entries-Provides accurate and timely information for financial statement production-Assures internal control compliance-Assists Director of Finance/Assistant Controller as needed-Works on special projects-Provides management with information vital to the decision-making process.-Recommends methods for improving procedures and systems to the Director of Finance-Protects confidentiality of all accounting information. Qualifications:   -Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting or Finance-At least 3 years of relevant experience-Healthcare experience is a plus-Strong written and oral communication skills-Proficient in Excel, Word and Outlook   If you are interested in this Staff Accountant job or other Accounting and Finance career opportunities from Parker + Lynch please email Rami Muhanna at rami.muhanna@parkerlynch.com or visit our website at www.parkerlynch.com       ",Staff Accountant job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Staff-Accountant-job-in-Dallas-TX-healthcare-organization-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164769325.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=6,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,fd8f6b15f11e3478c139926b8130092a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:28:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Under the direction of the Associate Director/Director of Clinical Operations, the Clinical Trial Manager (CTM) provides guidance and support for clinical operations for assigned studies including project planning, budget, resource management and contract research organization management (as applicable) to ensure that clinical trials are conducted in a timely fashion and in a manner compliant with SOPs, ICH/GCP/regulatory guidelines and company goals.  The CTM will utilize his/her strategic and management skills to lead the clinical team members to ensure trial deliverables and data quality are met within timelines and budgets. In addition, develops and evaluates personnel to ensure the efficient operation of the function.    Tasks and responsibilities: Provide comprehensive support of all operational aspects of clinical trials for which he/she is responsible for, including the review and approval of protocols and study-related documents (e.g., Regulatory Binder, Work Instructions, CRF Completion Guidelines, etc.) Effectively lead the operational clinical team for assigned studies and delegate appropriate tasks, assignments, and responsibilities to subordinates. Develop and administer budgets, schedules and performance requirements for assigned studies. Oversee the successful and efficient execution of assigned studies from study start up to study close out. Ensure clinical operational study team members are aligned with the project objectives. Identify, communicate, and find resolutions for all issues within the clinical operations study team. Oversee the monitoring, implementation and corrective actions for study progress using available study management tools. Identify and develop risk management and contingency plans. Review and provide input into the creation and coordination of clinical study documents. Provide appropriate training for team members to ensure consistent execution of all study related activities. Drive the cross-functional team members to ensure timely creation of protocols and study deliverables. Participate in CRO/vendor selection process for outsourced activities as applicable. Manage Clinical Research Organization (CRO) interactions, including sponsor oversight of relevant functional activities (e.g., study management, monitoring, site management, project master files, and data management) as applicable.  Collaborate with the Legal Department to develop study contract templates across the trial and specifically for each study site. Monitor all study progress. Ensure compliance with relevant regulations, guidelines, protocols and work instructions by maintaining regular interaction with assigned CRAs and study sites.   Review monitoring reports and periodic review of data quality.  Identify potential study issues and recommend/implement solutions. Work with Clinical Data Management to ensure database availability, CRF design, collection of CRFs and queries (CRF and Query Locks), and other database lock activities according to previously approved timelines Travel is expected to be a minimum of 30%. Travel to sites for study initiation, training and assessment of research study team activities. If remote, travel to Alere San Diego or elsewhere for pertinent team meetings, etc. Organize and manage internal study team meetings, investigator meetings and other trial-specific meetings. Responsible for the overall quality of all clinical operations activities for all assigned studies. Share and promote the best practices within the teams to enhance performance. Manages performance of staff towards department and Company goals, including feedback on performance, appraisals, recommendations for merit increases or necessary disciplinary actions, communication to employees on performance, etc. Carries out duties in compliance with established business policies. Demonstrates commitment to the development, implementation and effectiveness of Alere Quality Management System per ISO, FDA, and other regulatory agencies. Responsible for exhibiting professional behavior with both internal/external business associates that reflects positively on the company and is consistent with the company’s policies and practices. Understands and is aware of the quality consequences which may occur from the improper performance of their specific job. Has awareness of device defects that may occur in their area of responsibility, including product design, verification and validation, manufacturing and testing activities. Perform other duties & projects as assigned. Preferred educational background:BS/BA degree in science or similar area with experience.  Preferred experiential background:     At least one year of Clinical Trial Management experience with demonstrated capabilities to manage complex clinical studies. Prior experience managing clinical trials for or within the biotech or device industry, including CRO management, clinical site monitoring, and knowledge of the basic data management processes. In-depth knowledge of clinical research operations, including interpretation and implementation of FDA regulations/ICH guidelines.  Strong management skills with proven team building skills. Excellent oral and written communications.  Strong computer skills including knowledge of Microsoft Excel, Word, and Outlook. Ability to work within established timelines, in a fast paced environment. Excellent organizational and priority management skills. Good interpersonal skills and ability to interact at all levels with sensitivity and tact. Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",Clinical Trials Manager Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92101",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsManufacturing - OtherMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/clinical-trials-manager-job-san-diego-ca-us-168130125.aspx?mescoid=1100049001001&jobPosition=17,,Biotech/R&D/Science,23dbb63aba1720b034f47486fbd385a2
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:17:01:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Retail Marketing SpecialistAbout Us:We are seeking a Retail Marketing Specialist for one of the most rapidly growing marketing and advertising teams in the nation. Local startups and national brands alike call on us to launch new products and services, acquire new customers, and help with existing customer retention through our innovative marketing and advertising campaigns. We are dedicated to delivering excellence for our clients, this means that we are looking for the next additions to our team that can help take us to the next level.  Our Client: A retail marketing powerhouse in San Diego that specializes in helping brands build, market and manage their local retail market presence, while expanding their vision to deepen customer engagement. From platform selection, in-store programs and loyalty based marketing incentives, our client offers both consulting and implementation solutions that help enhance any customers retail experience! The Role: The Retail Marketing Specialist plays an integral support role at our client’s retail marketing firm. They understand that profitability enables the firm to share the benefits of many local brands products & services which help keep the economy thriving in their own community. Full training is provided for this entry level positions and they provide many great benefit to their employees as they aspire to grow as one of the most recognized and respected retail marketing firm in the industry. All Retail Marketing Specialists are trainers, sales leads and customer service specialists. The Retail Marketing Specialist values people and believes in a team building environment. They support the Marketing & Sales Manager and work closely with the on-site retail marketing team to train and develop Team Leaders while managing the success of marketing initiatives in each retail store and reporting team progress.Retail Marketing Specialist Key Responsibilities:  Assist in the development of each brands retail marketing strategy to achieve defined business objectives and leverage global brand positioning and solidify the company's superiority through our customers Partner with Sales/Retailer buying/marketing team to deliver compelling in-store POP, promotional and marketing programs that build brands and drives salesWork closely with Brand Team, Market Managers, and Sales to develop Go To Market Strategy for existing and new product initiatives to drive sales Responsible for management and monitoring of marketing budget and initiatives execution and metrics Create and Align all customer facing Brand communication, presentations, and collateral. Train and educate Sales Team on how to deploy to Retailers and/or join in customer presentations. Proactively create selling opportunities based on Retailer Marketing Calendar  RequirementsRetail Marketing Specialist Position Requirements: If you are an outside the box thinker with a proven track record for developing innovative retail-specific marketing programs or are a recent graduate (preferably in marketing or business) who possesses a natural gift to communicate and you’re willing to learn from the ground up, then we want to hear from you!  Full Paid Training is provided for the position and is considered entry level and part of a larger management training program for the development of Branch Managers. Qualifications:  1-2 years of experience in marketing / retail / sales customer serviceExcellent interpersonal and communication skillsCan work effectively as a team and independentlyFlexible work scheduleAbility for some light travelDesire to become immersed in the marketing industry and grow with a company      Keywords: Retail, Marketing, Sales, Entry Level, Communications, Training, Management, Advertising, Promotions, Marketing Campaigns",Retail Marketing Specialist Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92123",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-marketing-specialist-job-san-diego-ca-us-167686284.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,21e05e4ce2020e59e04f85e19cccdc49
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:17:23:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"HIRING - PART TIME ALTERATIONS SPECIALISTA Career That’s Meant to BeAt David’s Bridal, we empower our customers and our employees to stay true to their dreams and find the one, whether that means the wedding dress that matches her personal style—or the career that’s a perfect fit.We’re looking for people with diverse backgrounds and fresh ideas to help create a uniquely personal retail experience.Now Accepting Applications for our busy Season in March for Part TimeAlterations SpecialistThe Alteration’s Specialist is responsible for completing all alteration fittings and sewing services necessary to meet our customers’ needs. The Alterations Specialist suggests product options to our customers to help each one complete the overall look of her event.Our most successful Alterations Specialist are self-motivated individuals with outgoing personalities, and excellent technical sewing and fitting skills. They love special occasion fashion and have expertise on how to tailor a garment to ensure the best fit possible. Through the Alterations Specialist skills, vision, and informed recommendations, they will give our customers the confidence they need to choose the “one”, her dress.If you would like to be part of a dynamic team, help our customers dress for the most important days of their lives, and earn a competitive income, we would love to discuss your future at David’s Bridal.Our store will host interviews over the next two weeks.Alterations SpecialistResponsibilities:Perform all necessary customer garment fittings to David’s Bridal standardsPerform all types of alterations on bridal gowns, bridesmaid dresses, flower girl dresses, special occasion dressesPress, steam, and spot clean garments/merchandise as necessaryFollow quality control guidelines and inspect all garments to verify pristine condition before final delivery to customerSchedule alterations appointments in person or by telephone as neededFill out alterations tickets accurately and completely, ensuring correct fees and pricingResolve alterations customer service issues or complaints and refer any unresolved matter to floor managerAssist in closing sales by partnering with stylists to validate garment fit and suggest product additionsCommunicate supply needs to the Alterations Manager to ensure all supplies are available at all timesEnsure preventative maintenance of equipment and report any damage or broken equipment immediatelyFlexibility to work retail schedules such as weekends, evenings, and holidaysManual dexterity to perform non-selling responsibilities, such as use of POS (Point of Sale) terminals, counting money, accessing computers and initiating and receiving telephone callsManual dexterity to sew and perform fittingsAbility to move throughout the store, lift up to 10 pounds, stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, stand, and reach with armsPart Time AvailableProfessional EnvironmentGenerous Employee Discount After First Pay PeriodIf you are interested in working in our stores, please note that the online application process will take approximately 30 minutes.Now that we’ve popped the question, please say “I do”.<br />#CJT_jobBodyContent p {<br /> margin: 10px !important;<br /> min-height: 13px !important;<br />}<br />",Alterations Specialist [Part-Time] Job in Lamesa,Full Time Employee,"Lamesa, CA 91942",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/alterations-specialist-part-time-job-lamesa-ca-us-168271692.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=2,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,5564100184ceeed892f2607fed2cc603
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:18:51:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Apply now. Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Retail Sales Consultant Bilingual Tagalog Required Job in El Cajon,,"El Cajon, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-bilingual-tagalog-required-job-el-cajon-ca-us-168322739.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=7,,,545c3dd191bd6b386382458aab170383
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:19:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />",Field Service Foreman CBPP Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/field-service-foreman-cbpp-job-san-antonio-tx-us-168407147.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ec8bb670cdd0662093191f62be66fa0a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:26:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Windows/Linux Systems Administrator/Network Support Tech 2 (clearable to Secret)Requisition ID:16011673Location:United States-California-San DiegoUS Citizenship Required for this Position:YesShift:1st ShiftTravel:Yes, 25 % of the TimeDescriptionNorthrop Grumman Mission Systems Sector's Mission Services and Advanced GEOINT Systems Operating Unit is searching for a junior/mid-level Systems Administrator/Network Support Tech with experience providing technical support for computers and associated networks. Working with senior systems administrators and team leads, the incumbent installs, troubleshoots, services, maintains, and repairs workstations, network equipment such as servers, modems, multiplexers, and related PC software, cables, and connectors, and determines storage solutions and enterprise management solutions in support of business processing requirements. Connects workstations to existing data networks, and maintains network diagrams and configurations. Maintains trouble logs. Instructs users in the use of personal computers and networks. Investigates information, network, and communications needs of users, and makes recommendations regarding software and hardware purchases. Performs basic PC, PBX, and network software programming. Familiarity with Windows/Linux operating systems is desired, along with knowledge of developer tools such as XML Spy, ACE, Beyond Compare, ClearCase, ClearQuest, ClearTeam, Hex Workshop, MS Office, Visual Studio 2010, OpenFire, Spark, Maven, and/or others. Strong oral, written, and presentation communication skills are a must, as the incumbent may interact with internal and external customers. The Systems Administrator/Network Support Tech will work under supervision to monitor and tune systems to achieve optimum performance levels, and to ensure data/media recoverability by implementing a schedule of system backups and database archive operations. The position is located in Rancho Bernardo, CA.QualificationsBasic Qualifications:• Associate’s Degree or other 2-year technical degree in a related discipline and 1 year of related experience (2 additional years of related technical experience can be substituted in lieu of an Associate’s Degree)• Must be clearable to and be able to maintain DoD Secret clearance• Experience with Windows systems• Exposure to UNIX and/or LINUX systems.• Ability to troubleshoot system issues• Ability to work independently with minimal oversight• Ability to take and follow technical direction to provide prompt and accurate results• Superior oral, written, and presentation communications skills to provide customer support• Ability to respond to crises objectively and with composure• Experience resolving routine situations for operational mission critical systems• Familiarity with agile software development• US Citizenship requiredPreferred Qualifications:• Knowledge of systems administration in a mixed platform environment• Knowledge of Aviation Logistics and Aviation maintenance schedules and flight operations• Experience with Intelligence, Surveillance, and Reconnaissance systems• Experience with 3-Tiered Architecture• Experience working with subcontractors and US Government customersNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.#jobBodyContent h2, #jobBodyContent h1 { display:inline !important; }",Windows/Linux Systems Administrator/Network Support Tech  (clearable to Secret) Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"Windows/Linux Systems Administrator/Network Support Tech 2 (clearable to Secret)Requisition ID:16011673Location:United States-California-San DiegoUS Citizenship Required for this Position:YesShift:1st ShiftTravel:Yes, 25 % of the TimeDescriptionNorthrop Grumman Mission Systems Sector's Mission Services and Advanced GEOINT Systems Operating Unit is searching for a junior/mid-level Systems Administrator/Network Support Tech with experience providing technical support for computers and associated networks. Working with senior systems administrators and team leads, the incumbent installs, troubleshoots, services, maintains, and repairs workstations, network equipment such as servers, modems, multiplexers, and related PC software, cables, and connectors, and determines storage solutions and enterprise management solutions in support of business processing requirements. Connects workstations to existing data networks, and maintains network diagrams and configurations. Maintains trouble logs. Instructs users in the use of personal computers and networks. Investigates information, network, and communications needs of users, and makes recommendations regarding software and hardware purchases. Performs basic PC, PBX, and network software programming. Familiarity with Windows/Linux operating systems is desired, along with knowledge of developer tools such as XML Spy, ACE, Beyond Compare, ClearCase, ClearQuest, ClearTeam, Hex Workshop, MS Office, Visual Studio 2010, OpenFire, Spark, Maven, and/or others. Strong oral, written, and presentation communication skills are a must, as the incumbent may interact with internal and external customers. The Systems Administrator/Network Support Tech will work under supervision to monitor and tune systems to achieve optimum performance levels, and to ensure data/media recoverability by implementing a schedule of system backups and database archive operations. The position is located in Rancho Bernardo, CA.QualificationsBasic Qualifications:• Associate’s Degree or other 2-year technical degree in a related discipline and 1 year of related experience (2 additional years of related technical experience can be substituted in lieu of an Associate’s Degree)• Must be clearable to and be able to maintain DoD Secret clearance• Experience with Windows systems• Exposure to UNIX and/or LINUX systems.• Ability to troubleshoot system issues• Ability to work independently with minimal oversight• Ability to take and follow technical direction to provide prompt and accurate results• Superior oral, written, and presentation communications skills to provide customer support• Ability to respond to crises objectively and with composure• Experience resolving routine situations for operational mission critical systems• Familiarity with agile software development• US Citizenship requiredPreferred Qualifications:• Knowledge of systems administration in a mixed platform environment• Knowledge of Aviation Logistics and Aviation maintenance schedules and flight operations• Experience with Intelligence, Surveillance, and Reconnaissance systems• Experience with 3-Tiered Architecture• Experience working with subcontractors and US Government customersNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.#jobBodyContent h2, #jobBodyContent h1 { display:inline !important; }",,http://jobview.monster.com/windows-linux-systems-administrator-network-support-tech-2-clearable-to-secret-job-san-diego-ca-us-167726935.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=15,,IT/Software Development,dd11670e350fadeca969a32a1d89cf5c
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:27:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Advertising Sales Account Executive Our Advertising & Marketing Account Executive sales position offers:$35k base, commissions, car allowance, gas paid, & health benefits. LogoNation, the leader in community oriented advertising, is rapidly expanding our outside sales team. We are seeking self-motivated and dynamic Sales and Marketing Account Executives (Community Account Manager) for our increasing sales opportunities selling advertising on The Original CommuniTee—our unique community promotion t-shirt. As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, your territory includes 25-30 small towns within a radius up to 120 miles, your daily commute is typically around 45 minutes to an hour with no overnight travel involved. You will meet with town organizations and local business owners to learn about each town and develop a CommuniTee representing and promoting what is unique and special about each town. Job Responsibilities As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, you will establish donation points at local organizations for free CommuniTees donated by LogoNation. You will conduct in person business to business sales presentations to highlight the benefits of the CommuniTee, close sales of CommuniTee ad space to local businesses, and deliver free T-shirts back to each participating business.  Additional responsibilities for our outside sales position include:· Building and maintaining good customer relationships· Meeting sales quotas· Submitting regular reports and communicating with your manager· Daily commute into local towns Job Requirements · Bachelor’s degree, specialization in marketing, communications or    business preferred· Experience in outside sales or experience with the public- however, entry    level job seekers with a track record of success are encouraged to apply· Reliable transportation  Additionally, self-motivated, and competitive individuals who have the drive to overcome obstacles and stay positive despite the inevitable challenges that come with sales typically do the best. Some of those challenges are handling rejection, working independently, and dealing with weather.  Advertising Sales Account Executive Pay and Benefits: ·        Salary $35,000·        Excellent Training (In-field and Home Office) ·        Fast Career Advancement (with our Career Growth Program) ·        Monthly car allowance ·        Monthly cell phone allowance·        Group Health Insurance·        Outstanding commission plan (uncapped commissions)·        Monthly and weekly fun incentive programs·        In-field (in-territory) training·        100% gas reimbursement from day 1·        Fuel card after 6 months·        Free AAA Membership (offering roadside assistance) ·        Paid holidays·        Accrued time off program·        401(K) retirement plan (with company match)·        Excellent communication and in field management support As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation you will have significant income potential and will also gain valuable outside sales training and experience that will propel your career forward. First year total compensation for our Sales and Marketing Account Executives averages $40,000 - $100,000! For more information and to apply, please visit our website!",Advertising Sales/Account Executive/Sales & Marketing Representative Job in Louisville,"Full Time, Employee","Louisville, KY 40201",,http://jobview.monster.com/advertising-sales-account-executive-sales-marketing-representative-job-louisville-ky-us-168576589.aspx?mescoid=4100672001001&jobPosition=6,"40,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,fd79ebfee7daf482aee84d4c508b4a3a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:28:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionWeichert, Realtors® has grown from a single sales office into one of the nation's leading providers of homeownership services by putting its customers first. A family of full-service real estate and financial services companies, Weichert® offers today’s real estate customer a complete menu of services that includes helping customers buy and sell both residential and commercial real estate, and streamlining the delivery of mortgages as well as home and title insurance.If you would like to be part of a company who values their sales people as their most important competitive edge, consider a real estate sales career with Weichert!Job DescriptionOur Real Estate Sales Associates are passionate about their work and love what they do because it is rewarding.  They build lifelong relationships with people in their local community and help them through the process of making the most important purchase of their lives.  Our sales associates also find the unique aspects of this job to be very appealing.  A career in real estate sales offers several perks that a regular corporate position cannot, such as:Flexibility in schedule and setting your own hours; you can choose to work full-time or part-timeControl over your income and ability to set goals for what you want to earnAbility to work independently and be your own boss, but with the benefit of a strong and successful sales organization supporting your effortsAn opportunity to become an entrepreneur without having to make a large investment in order to get startedThere are also several options for how to get started in real estate.  Some people are able to jump in headfirst and start out as full-time sales associates, while others are looking to transition into real estate from another industry and would prefer to start out part-time.  At Weichert, we offer a way for anyone who is interested in starting a real estate sales career to join our company.Specific Responsibilities IncludeAt Weichert, we take real estate sales and training seriously. Our standards and expectations are high, and our real estate sales associates are committed to the highest standards in the industry. Here is what we expect from our real estate sales associate team:Attend our award winning sales training program that consists of in-class and online courses designed to get you closing business quicklyBuild a client base through various marketing and networking activitiesTake advantage of our Weichert tools and sales programs that will help you build your business such as our Open House program and our advanced lead generation systemParticipate in weekly sales meetings and other office activities to stay connected and up-to-date on available properties and new potential clients in your local areaProvide a high level of customer service to all clients and maintain solid relationships with past clients to generate additional referral businessRequirementsWillingness and ability to obtain a real estate salesperson licenseDesire to work independently and have control over your professional growthComfortable meeting new people and networking to develop a client baseEntrepreneurial mind set and a high degree of self-disciplineComputer savvy – MS Office, Internet, Social Networking sites such as Facebook, LinkedIn, and TwitterStrong work ethic and desire to be successfulExcellent communication skills, both written and verbalProfessional and personable demeanorPrior experience in sales and/or customer service is a plusBenefitsFlexibility:  The ability to control your schedule allows you to create a positive work-life balance where you can choose to work full-time or part-timeAdvancement Opportunities:  You set your own goals and have control of your income as well as your future growth within the real estate industrySales Training:  Weichert offers one of the most comprehensive and effective real estate sales training programs in the industry.Tools and Programs:  Weichert’s many tools and programs are designed with one purpose in mind – to help you succeed.  They can be customized and tailored to meet your specific needs.Rewarding and Fun:  Our sales associates enjoy what they do and have fun doing it because they take pride in helping people make one of the most important decisions of their lives.  Each WEICHERT® franchised office is independently owned and operated.",Real Estate Sales Associate / Sales Representative Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/real-estate-sales-associate-sales-representative-job-san-antonio-tx-us-164206794.aspx?mescoid=4100687001001&jobPosition=4,,,5ed3198556e4bc779b3d6958c1f6c01b
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:28:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"In this role, you'll develop and maintain an effective marketing plan and procedures to improve the success of the branch. This Managerial role is a combination of Customer Service, Operations and Business to Business sales. Responsibilities: Direct and organize all reservations and pick-ups, complete sales calls with Management Trainees in order to further their developmentConduct face-to-face sales calls and presentations in order to obtain new businessHandle or assist in the resolution of customer service issues if Management Trainees cannotEnsure a high level of customer service is at or above the locations goal all employees of the branchBe active in attending/hosting outside sales meetings or events to promote the company and branch locationContinue to increase the market penetration of the branch and increase revenueActively participate in the training, coaching, and mentoring of the Management Trainees and Sales and Service AssociatesComplete performance reviews on Management Trainees and Sales and Service Associates and hold a meeting with the individual to discuss strengths and weaknessesHold monthly staff meetings to keep employees motivated and informed of business operationsFor more information, please visit: https://usjobs-hertz.icims.com/jobs/114773/branch-manager-trainee/job?mode=view",Branch Manager Trainee Job in National City,Full Time / Employee,"National City, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/branch-manager-trainee-job-national-city-ca-us-168123068.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,a468cde917d5bf24f5b8c003086f7ba6
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:28:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sally Beauty Holdings (NYSE: SBH) is the world's largest wholesale and retail distributor of beauty supplies.  Our world headquarters is conveniently located just 5 minutes north of Lake Lewisville off of I35E in Denton, TX.    We are currently searching for an Advertising and Promotion Specialist.  This position supports the advertising and promotions function to ensure the effective and efficient implementation of marketing campaigns across channels.   Manages advertising and promotions projects (as assigned by the Advertising and Promotions Director, Advertising and Promotions Manager) by creating flowcharts, managing timelines, managing workflow, tracking budgets, etc.  These projects will include digital projects across the website, digital display, social and mobile, print projects like direct mail and print and in-store projects like signage and collateral. Performs general accounts payable duties include initial estimating and processing and tracking of invoices through the approval process and payment. Be the go-to knowledge base of all advertising and promotional campaigns. Tracks programs and maintain accessibility to all advertising materials. Maintains project files and requisite supplies for all marketing programs for easy access to all within the department. Bachelor's degree, preferrably in Marketing or Advertising 2+ years of experience in a corporation or at an agency, digital experience required Organized and detail oriented with the ability to manage multiple projects and quickly react to changing business needs while meeting firm deadlines Customer centric, brand steward  Strong communicator  Collaborative and flexible We offer a competitive salary, outstanding benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision. Life insurance, paid vacation and sick days, paid holidays, merchandise discounts, tuition reimbursement, profit sharing, and 401(k) with company match.   Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, or disability.   MONPOST    ",Advertising and Promotion Specialist Job in Denton,"Full Time, Employee","Denton, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/advertising-promotion-specialist-job-denton-tx-us-167730366.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=5,,"Bachelor's degree, preferrably in Marketing or Advertising 2+ years of experience in a corporation or at an agency, digital experience required Organized and detail oriented with the ability to manage multiple projects and quickly react to changing business needs while meeting firm deadlines Customer centric, brand steward  Strong communicator  Collaborative and flexible We offer a competitive salary, outstanding benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision. Life insurance, paid vacation and sick days, paid holidays, merchandise discounts, tuition reimbursement, profit sharing, and 401(k) with company match.   Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, or disability.   MONPOST    ",001c008403da40a8c3424be526e8c1bb
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:28:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Strategic Business Systems (SBS) is looking for a data center admin with skills in HP 3PAR storage, HP blade technologies and VMware to provide admin services in a Windows environment. Top Secret clearance is required. Position Requirements1. 3PAR Storage Consultant will provide ongoing consultative, liaison support best practices and knowledge transfer relative to the following:·         Expertise on HP StoreServ (3PAR) storage·         Adaptive Optimization ·         Dynamic Optimization·         Remote Copy·         System Reporter·         Create and Maintain tracking documentation for entire 3PAR·         Provide best practices and templates for environment operations·         Configure new storage·         Create scripts for 3PAR environment·         Provide User Training·         Create and Maintain tracking documentation for backup environment·         Design and implement operation activities as per HP best practices2. Provide admin for HP blade environment.3. Expertise with VmWare in an MS windows server environment.About SBSSBS encourages a flexible work environment that is focused on work-life balance. Additionally, SBS provides personal opportunity for growth through vendor led training, access to technical conferences and workshops, big vendor shadowing as well as a tuition reimbursement program. All of our positions are full time permanent positions. We have a comprehensive benefits program, Medical, Dental, Vision, 401k, Life Insurance, etc. SBS provides the opportunity to work with the best in the industry on a wide range of cutting edge enterprise technologies in a fast moving culture that rewards leadership and creative thinkers.If interested in learning more about this opportunity, please send your resume to jrock@sbsplanet.com or sowens@sbsplanet.com",Data Center/Storage Administrator - Top Secret Cleared Job in San Diego,"Full Time, Employee","San Diego, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-center-storage-administrator-top-secret-cleared-job-san-diego-ca-us-166888964.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,81aa4f77a3fb23ddefea4750112e6b95
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:28:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is seeking a User Experience (UX) Researcher for mobile and desktop web-based projects for a large insurance client in Madison, Wisconsin (WI). A portfolio of work is required, which includes examples of personas, heuristic evaluations, competitive reviews and usability testing facilitator guides and reports. The ideal candidates have 3+ years planning and testing complex web sites and mobile experiences, is knowledgeable in usability best practices, information architecture, interaction design and user research methodologies, strong in user flows, user journey maps, personas, heuristic evaluations and other standard user research deliverables.REQUIREMENTS: Planning, and developing user research studies for complex websites and mobile experiences Expert in usability testing, user interviews, focus groups etc. Expert knowledge and experience with cardsorting, site map testing, etc. Expert knowledge and experience with heuristic and competitive assessments Knowledge and experience developing user flows, journey maps, mental models Expert at incorporating/recommending changes to designs best practices, standards etc. Knowledge and experience in information architecture. Knowledge and experience with accessibility guidelines Knowledge and experience with interaction design concepts and principles Comfortable creating clickable wireframes/low-fi prototypes in Axure or InVision Has worked in an Agile-based user experience environment Knowledge and experience with Responsive Design techniques Knowledge and experience in AB/Multi-variate testing tools and processes Experience creating and training usability standards and principles Experience analyzing and providing recommendations from disperse information sources Ability to translate knowledge and ideas well across a variety of in-person conversations and through written communications Ability to respond resourcefully to new demands, priorities and challenges Ability to manage multiple tasks in a dynamic, fast-paced environment Works with others to build upon ideas and execute ideas Desired Skills: Brand and visual/graphic web design experience Knowledge and experience developing wireframes and mockups Understands latest design and development trends and when it is appropriate to apply them -to a project Knowledge of content strategy and writing for the web Knowledge and experience with enterprise level systems (e.g. Content Management Systems, Site Indexing and Search Engines, etc. Knowledge and experience in process design and change management Leading brainstorming/ideation sessions",User Experience Researcher / UX Design Job in Madison,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Madison, WI 53719",,http://jobview.monster.com/user-experience-researcher-ux-design-job-madison-wi-us-170225286.aspx?mescoid=1700179001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),49d0140b64355c865fb078227e0e72ac
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:28:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"KinderCare Education is the nation’s leader in early childhood education. We nourish curiosity through purposeful experiences to create a future full of lifelong learners. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to create a world of learning, joy and adventure for more than 161,000 children ages six-weeks through 12 years every day.   Our Teachers bring warmth, patience, and understanding to the classroom every day, encouraging children to learn and grow. They inspire children to be lifelong learners using our nationally recognized curriculum that promotes social, physical, verbal, and cognitive development. Our Teachers are committed to making their center successful and know that creating meaningful relationships with children, families, and their team play a crucial role in that success. When you join our team as a Lead Teacher you will: Lead, coach and mentor less experienced teachers in your classroom; model behaviors and provide feedback. Implement KCE’s curriculum in a way that is consistent with the unique needs of each child. Create a safe, nurturing environment where children can play and learn. Partner and communicate with parents, with a shared desire to provide the best care and education for their children.   Support your center’s success; partner with center staff and leadership to achieve goals around enrollment, accreditation, and engagement. Cultivate positive relationships with families, teachers, state licensing authorities, community contacts and corporate partners. Required Skills and Experience: A love for children and a strong desire to make a difference every day.  Ability to build relationships with families and coworkers and create a dynamic environment where play and learning happens. Outstanding customer service skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to multi-task and manage multiple situations effectively Must possess active Child Development Associate (CDA) Credential or meet NAEYC candidacy requirements Approved state trainer (preferred) 2-3 years Early Childhood Education Experience(preferred) Bachelor’s degree in Early Childhood Education (preferred) CPR and First Aid Certification or willingness to obtain Must meet state specific guidelines for the role Must be physically able to use a computer with basic proficiency, lift a minimum of 40 pounds, and work indoors or outdoors.  Must be able to assume postures in low levels to allow physical and visual contact with children, see and hear well enough to keep children safe, and engage in physical activity with children. Ability to speak, read, and write English.   The benefits our career professionals enjoy: In addition to a rewarding career where you help shape children's futures, KinderCare Education provides a competitive compensation package. Benefits include:   Medical, dental and vision Discounted child care Generous paid time off Education assistance and reimbursement Medical expense reimbursement/ Life insurance/Disability benefits/ Health and wellness programs 401(k) savings and investment plan with employer match   KinderCare Education employs more than 32,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our devoted family of education providers leads the nation in accreditation and includes KinderCare® Learning Centers, CCLC®, Champions® Before- and After-School Programs, Cambridge Schools™, Knowledge Beginnings® and The Grove School®.   KinderCare Education is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.",Lead Teacher Job in Madison,Full Time Employee,"Madison, WI 53719",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-teacher-job-madison-wi-us-170251937.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=16,,Education/Training,1eae31c20d80c538f0f3078382b54e66
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:41:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"BARTENDER/Grill Cook Part time. Mon. night and alternating Sat day or night. 6-2:30am and 11am-6pm. Occasional Sun. shifts. Float shifts when avail. $7/hr + tips to start. Apply in person: The Keg, 6295 Portage Rd., DeForest (Token Creek). madison.com 324678",Bartender/Grill Cook Job in  function wrap(EL,,53532,All,http://jobview.monster.com/bartender-grill-cook-job-de-forest-wi-us-170200753.aspx?mescoid=3500610001001&jobPosition=19,,,46397effe8bc00e5a5316bf391efe5c0
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:41:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"CUSTOMER SUPPORT TECHNICIANCONSOLIDATED COURTAUTOMATION PROGRAMSThe Consolidated Court Automation Programs (CCAP) is seeking qualified candidates for a full-time Customer Support Technician. The CCAP Customer Support department is responsible for supporting an efficient computing infrastructure throughout the Wisconsin Court System, which includes computers, peripherals, and networking equipment for over 2800 users in 80 remote locations. LOCATION: Madison, WI with about 25% statewide travel required.SALARY: Competitive salary with a State of Wisconsin benefits package. RESPONSIBILITIES: (1) Provides technical phone support to all employees of the Wisconsin Court System (75%); (2) Installs, configures and troubleshoots computer hardware and software in courthouses and other court system offices throughout Wisconsin (20%); (3) Reacts to technical emergencies and takes appropriate action (5%).QUALIFICATIONS: Required: (1) Experience providing phone-based customer support; (2) Training or experience in computer hardware and software support and maintenance; (3) Experience installing, configuring, upgrading and troubleshooting computers, scanners, printers, and other peripherals; (4) Ability to lift heavy objects; (5) Valid Wisconsin driver's license; Preferred: Experience supporting (1) Active Directory/group policies; (2) Windows Server; (3) Remote Desktop Services, and (4) Wide Area Networking.TO APPLY: Please go to our website http://www.wicourts.gov/courts/employment/apply.htm and submit a cover letter and resume (please combine your cover letter and resume to one document) clearly indicating your qualifications and the position title Technical Support Engineer (Customer Support Technician) (#17-1441). If you are unable to apply online please send application materials to human.resources@wicourts.gov or send to: Human Resources, 110 East Main Street Suite 430, Madison, WI 53703-3356, (608) 266-3501 or FAX (608) 261-8293. Failure to follow these procedures may result in your disqualification.DEADLINE: The application deadline is 11:59 p.m. on Tuesday August 16, 2016. The Wisconsin Court System will provide reasonable accommodations to qualified applicants when requested. For additional information on the court system visit our website at www.wicourts.gov Equal Employment Opportunity madison.com 324840",Customer Support Technician PROJECT MANAGER Customer Support Technician Job in  function wrap(EL,,53703,All,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-support-technician-project-manager-customer-support-technician-job-madison-wi-us-170342853.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,,c76ff31e91bae5c642f92a72fda68b0f
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:42:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as part-time Package Handlers. This is a physical, fast-paced position that involves continual lifting, lowering and sliding packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. Part-time employees usually work 3 ½ - 4 hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays.Package Handlers receive a competitive hourly rate and also an attractive benefits package. Please note that these opportunities are part-time only working approximately 17 1/2 – 20 hours per week.UPS provides an excellent employment opportunity for students. Through the UPS Earn and Learn program, our student employees receive all the paid benefits of a great part-time job with UPS, plus outstanding education assistance of up to $2,625 per semester / $5,250 per year with a maximum lifetime benefit of $25,000. This assistance can be used for tuition, books and fees as long as you are attending an approved college, university, trade or technical school. You will be eligible for the Earn and Learn program on your first day of work.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Package Handler - Part-Time - Entry Level Warehouse Support Job in Middleton,,"Middleton, WI 53562",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-package-handler-part-time-entry-level-warehouse-support-job-middleton-wi-us-169909101.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,4090c0c30923703490dced9804585ea2
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:19:43:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"A local hotel management service is looking to hire a Chief Maintenance Engineer to join their team. This would be a first shift, direct hire opportunity that offers competitive pay and benefits available upon hire.Responsibilities:Performs all specific and general repairs unless an outside contractor is authorized by general managerInstitutes and utilizes preventative maintenance programs for all the property equipment, guestrooms, mechanical and common areasUnderstands and applies all required safety and security procedures to maintain a safe and secure environment for employees and guestsMaintains outdoor appearance including lawn, landscaping, and parking lotEnsures the compliance of health and safety standardsAvailable as primary maintenance person on call unless arrangements with general manager have been madeMaintains inventory of maintenance equipment, tools, and supplies in order to perform dutiesProvides assistance to all other departments and employees to contribute to the smooth and efficient operation of the hotelPerforms additional duties as assignedQaulifications:4 + years of hotel, apartment or building maintenanceExperience in maintenance and repairs of mechanical/electrical equipmentProven experience with HVAC, refrigeration, plumbing, pool/whirlpool fire equipment and sprinkler systemsExperience with hand and power toolsAbility to become certified pool operator within 90 days of employment.Ability to bend, crawl, crouch and/or kneelAbility to stand for extended periods of timeAbility to frequently lift up to 50 lbs and occasionally weights of 100 lbs.Ability to use hands to feel and grasp",Chief Maintenance Engineer Job in Middleton,"Full Time, Employee","Middleton, WI",Hotels and LodgingRestaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/chief-maintenance-engineer-job-middleton-wi-us-170626094.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=10,,Engineering,505a6e97814b650aa1cb8fac0033ede2
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:20:33:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Take pride in why you drive and start your career at Swift! Truck driving jobs include; Flatbed, Regional, Dedicated, Intermodal, and Over-the-Road opportunities. Take advantage of the many truck driving career opportunities available at Swift. At Swift Transportation, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! No experience needed here! The Swift Driving Academy will teach you the knowledge you need to gain your Class A Commercial Driver's License ( CDL ) and get your career moving.Scholarships for U.S. Veterans, National Guard and ReservesNew Academy Classes Weekly No Money Down or Credit Check Certified Mentors Ready and Available Paid (While Training With Mentor) Regional and Dedicated Opportunities Great Career PathExcellent Benefits PackageIf you are ready to start your career in the world of trucking,Click Apply to be connected to a Recruiter.Swift Transportation began operations in 1966 transporting imported steel through the ports of Los Angeles to Arizona and Arizona cotton for export back through to Southern California. Swift’s terminal network has grown to over forty full service facilities in both the continental United States and Mexico. Swift owns 100% of Trans-Mex, a Nuevo Laredo, Mexico based carrier. Swift offers border crossing services at all major Mexican border crossings. Swift maintains a presence in every Canadian province each day. Today, Swift generates over $4 billion in revenue and operates nearly 18,000 trucks and is unquestionably the largest full-truckload motor carrier in North America.",Truck Driver Trainee - Consider a Full Time Transportation Career as an Entry Level Truck Driver Job in State College,,"State College, PA 16804",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-trainee-consider-a-full-time-transportation-career-as-an-entry-level-truck-driver-job-state-college-pa-us-162954589.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=15,,,1e6d6df896c3df2b7746688856b17dcd
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:20:35:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experience the Gordon All Around Pay Package Difference!$6,000 Bonus for Team Drivers!  Gordon Trucking is considered to be one of the safest and most reliable truckload carriers in North America. We offer home weekly options in many regions, safe reliable equipment, and All Around Pay so you’re paid for all of the work you do. It’s what we've done best for over 65 years! Call us to see how a Better Career starts with a Better Carrier! Expect More with Gordon’s All Around Pay •              Up to $0.45 CPM Starting Base Pay + Yearly raises•              Real bonuses we want you to earn•              Practical Miles•              Detention Paid After ONLY 1 Hour•              APU’s + 1800 Watt Power-inverters•              Drive Newer Freightliner Tractors with Elogs•              In Cab 5th Wheel Release•              Comprehensive Benefits + Matching 401K + Up to 4 weeks Paid Vacation Opportunities for qualified individuals include:•              National OTR–- Regional & Dedicated•              Company Drivers - Owner Operators•              Solos & Teams•              Dry Van or Refrigerated Requirements: •              Valid Class A CDL in state of residence •              Minimum 6 months truck driving experience or recent truck driving school graduate  Call Us Today!! 866-240-5715Gordon Trucking is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Class A CDL Truck Driver Job in West Valley City,Full Time Employee,"West Valley City, UT",,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-truck-driver-job-west-valley-city-ut-us-120629510.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=7,,,47876a91791f640cbcf86569876d9590
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:14:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"City: Fremont State:California Postal/Zip Code: 94538 Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope®, a division of Oldcastle, is the leading supplier of products specified to close the building envelope. They include: custom-engineered curtain wall and window wall, architectural windows, storefront systems, doors, skylights and architectural glass. Job Summary Be a part of somethingBIG: We are an industry leader, with over 70 locations, and 6,500 employees. Our products are parts of major construction projects including the Paris Hotel, Carnegie Mellon University, the Dallas Cowboys Stadium and, most recently, the Miami Dolphins Sun Life Stadium. Safety, innovation, and quality are central to all of our business. Sound interesting? Join us! We are currently looking for afull-time Shipping and Receiving Clerk forour Fremont, CA location. The clerkverifies merchandise and organizes its distribution. They also preparerelated documents and maintain the""will call"" area.The position starts at 6AM and goes until the job is complete (usually 10-12 hours).These positions may have daily or weekend overtime as dictated by the production schedule.The starting rate is $14.00/ hour. Essential Duties and Responsibilities Examine shipment contents and compare with records such as manifests, invoices, or orders to verify accuracy Record shipment data, such as weight, charges, space availability, damages, or discrepancies for reporting, accounting, or recordkeeping purposes Prepare documents, such as work orders, bills of lading, or shipping orders, to route materials. Confer or correspond with establishment representatives to rectify problems, such as damages, shortages, or nonconformance to specifications. Pack, seal, label, or affix postage to prepare materials for shipping, using hand tools, power tools, and/or postage meter. Provide customer service at the will call area Regular and predictable attendance, safely perform tasks and adherence to all safety policies and procedures are essential functions of your job Requirements Ability to read, understand, and communicate paperwork and labels. Ability to read and interpret basic mathematical measurements and effectively use a tapemeasure Basic computer familiarity Attention to detail Able to use power tools, such as chop saw, hammer, and air gun Able to operate a forklift All production workers are expected to be available to work in all areas of production Flexible work availability (typically Monday through Friday with occasional weekends) High School Diploma or GED, preferred One year of previous work experience in a warehouse, manufacturing or production facility, preferred Physical Requirements Ability to lift, bend, twist, walk, and reach frequently Must have the ability to lift and/or move up to 75lbs.regularly Ability to work in varied temperatures consistent with same climate conditions of the region (Heat, humidity, etc.) Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skills and/or abilities required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable qualified individuals with disabilities to perform the essential duties of the job. Additional Information Only online applications will be accepted When applying, please provide full employment history Pre-employment background screening will be conducted on qualified applicants after acceptance of job offer What Oldcastle Offers You Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join ourTalent Communityto receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers onFacebook,Twitter,Instagram,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. #OBE",Shipping and Receiving Clerk - Fremont,Full Time Employee,"Fremont, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-clerk-fremont-ca-job-fremont-ca-us-168882285.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=12,,,ad5f1240b9c237d9b338be9fcd9c56cf
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:15:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY OR PURPOSE: The purpose of this position is the safe and efficient transport and delivery of freight by operating (driving) tractor-trailer combinations. ESSENTIAL JOB DUTIES: 1.      Hook and unhook trailers from the tractor itself or from converter dollies, including pushing and or pulling dollies into place and cranking lever to raise and lower landing gear on semi-trailers and/or the front support of converter dollies. 2.      Load and unload trailers, either individually or with the assistance of dock workers, with or without mechanical freight-handling equipment. 3.      Perform lifting, pulling, pushing and carrying of freight. 4.      Inspect tractor, trailer and equipment for defects and safe operating condition before and after trips, when stopped during your work day, and submit a written report on the conditions at the end of each trip or tour of duty. 5.      Check shipping papers to determine the nature of load and to check the manner that cargo has been loaded in the trailer.  Check to see if additional blocking or load locks are required. 6.      Install and remove tire chains as required by weather conditions. 7.      Drive truck to destination in accordance with Federal and State regulations, normally in periods of up to 10 hours for interstate driving and 12 hours for California intrastate driving, followed by an off-duty period of at least 8 consecutive hours. 8.      Apply knowledge of commercial driving and skill in maneuvering vehicle at varying speed in difficult situations, such as heavy traffic, inclement weather, or in tight loading dock areas. 9.      Ensure that all shipping documentation (e.g. bills of lading, freight bills, weight tickets etc.) required to move with shipments is available for inspection, that appropriate paperwork accompanies shipments when delivered, and that signed bills of lading for proof of delivery are turned into dispatch daily, or at first return to terminal from tour of duty.  For timely billing, you may be instructed to Fax documentation to dispatch. 10.  Maintain records required for compliance with State and Federal regulations including driver’s logs, records of fuel purchases, mileage records, and other records required by law;or by the instructions of Biagi Bros. Safety & Compliance Manager, or your local Transportation Manager, Dispatcher or Warehouse Manager. 11.  Perform all duties in accordance with company policies and procedures, and comply with all Federal, State and local regulations for the safe operation of a commercial motor vehicle. 12.  Report all accidents involving driver or company equipment. 13.  Report highway safety hazards noted en route via two-way phone to dispatch. 14.  Promptly report any delays due to breakdown, weather or traffic conditions or other emergencies.  Also report if there is more than a one hour delay in getting unloaded or loaded, or in the event of irregularities relating to pickup or delivery of cargo.  Eligibility Requirements: ·         Must possess a valid Commercial Driver’s License. ·         Must have two years previous tractor-trailer driving experience with 48’ to 57’ dry vans or be accepted for a training position. ·         Must have the ability to read and write in English, and to perform simple mathematical calculations with mental ability to handle receipts, read maps, road signs, maintain logs and recap hours of service etc. ·         Must have working knowledge of vehicle safety and control systems. ·         Must have knowledge of DOT and State regulations governing safe driving, hours of service inspection and maintenance and transportation of hazardous materials. ·         Must be available for around-the-clock trips to accommodate freight movements and must be able to be away from home for extended periods of time if dispatched for line driving. ·         Must meet and maintain the medical standards of the U.S. Dept. of Transportation. ·         Must satisfactorily pass a drug test, and if hired, be subject to random alcohol and drug testing.   1 ",Truck Driver - Local Job in American Canyon,"Full Time, Employee","American Canyon, CA 94503",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-local-job-american-canyon-ca-us-168881130.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=17,$19.09+ /hour,Logistics/Transportation,236794b6c4dcc039f66496afb866a29c
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:18:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-TimeBrookdale Mt. Hood 25200 SE Stark St Gresham, OR 97030 Job #: 061223Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Ready to make a difference? As a resident care provider you'll make a real difference by building relationships with residents at our senior living community. You won't just be serving meals or helping residents bath, get dressed and look their best.  You'll deliver compassion, a sense of respect, and emotional support. Extra effort gets rewarded in our community and the opportunity for advancement in one of the fastest growing industries is within reach. We'll help you achieve a balance between work and family.Answer your calling for a more fulfilling career.Preferred skills and qualifications: * High school diploma or GED * One year related experience preferred* Must be able to pass a drug screen and background check * Positive attitude and contagious energy If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Part-time associates enjoy:* retirement savings plan (401k) with company matching* covered transportation and parking costs (where eligible)* Brookdale Perks - savings on restaurants, movie tickets, cell phones, cars and othe products* participation in the Good People referral program which awards bonuses * discounted senior living costs for you and your family members",Resident Care Provider Job in Gresham,Part Time Employee,"Gresham, OR 97030",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/resident-care-provider-job-gresham-or-us-168567941.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,5a6345798751ca59e82470992c80e8f2
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:18:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Enterprise Rent-A-Car is the largest and fastest growing privately owned automotive rental and leasing company in the U.S. With over 7,000 branch offices worldwide, Enterprise ranks #1 in the Insurance Replacement Market with yearly revenues of over $10 billion. The Service Agent cleans vehicles inside and out (vehicles may be cleaned by hand or by operating washing equipment). The Service Agent also performs regular maintenance (non-mechanical services), moves vehicles, and performs other duties assigned by the manager, all completed in a safe and timely manner. Our part-time positions require a minimum of 20-25 hours worked. The Service Agent is responsible for the care and maintenance of the cars on the lot. This includes vacuuming and prepping the cars, shuttling cars to and from car washes and dealerships for servicing, car transports to and from offices, checking fluid levels, and changing tires.Clean vehicle exterior by hand, brush or by operating washing equipmentPolish, dry and clean vehicle windshields, windows, lights, mats and exterior body, by handVacuum, shampoo, add air freshener and clean vehicle interior (some stain removal may be required)Determine need for and add windshield fluid, gas, oil, water and antifreezePerform basic maintenance check: antenna, under the hood, inside the vehicle, inside the trunk, and outside vehicleVerify appropriate stickers are attached to vehicle (registration, plates, etc.)May be responsible for maintaining an inventory of cleaning suppliesMay assist with local automobile deliveriesPerform miscellaneous job-related duties as assigned Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/DisabledMust be at least 18 years oldMust have a valid driver's license with no more than 2 moving violations and/or at-fault accidents on driving record in the past 3 yearsNo drug or alcohol related conviction on driving record in the past 5 yearsMust be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the future.Must be able to work for the set pay of $9.00/hour.Apart from religious observations, m ust be able to work the following schedule: NOT TO EXCEED 25 HOURS/WEEK",Part Time Service Agent (Car Detailer)- Moore Job in Oklahoma City,,"Oklahoma City, OK",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-service-agent-car-detailer-moore-job-oklahoma-city-ok-us-168763727.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=15,,Student (Undergraduate/Graduate),f470a972c73aa558846bc5ff52c2073a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:18:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""Position OverviewProvides service to residential or commercial customers by making timely lawn/landscape applications, diagnosing and correcting lawn/landscaping problems through service calls and other customer communications, and selling/up-selling services to new and/or existing customers, resulting in growth of the customer base.Responsibilities1. Applies fertilizers and pesticides to lawns according to schedule, safety procedures, and label instructions.2. Drives company vehicle to customer location.3. Responds on a timely basis to customer requests for telephone and in-person service calls.4. Completes required production forms and customer instructions.5. Assists in sales to current customers through contact on route and telemarketing.6. Measures the lawn of potential customers to provide them with an accurate cost of TruGreen’s lawn care service.7. Performs a daily three-minute, 360 degree inspection of truck and equipment before taking the vehicle out on the road and upon return.8. Completes production reports, new sales forms, customer invoice forms, daily vehicle inspection report, and cancel/skip notices as required daily.9. Maintains vehicle and equipment through cleanliness, safety, and general maintenance.10. Assists in maintaining cleanliness of facility.Education and Experience Requirements• High school diploma/GED or 6 months to 1 year related experience and/or training in horticulture and/or customer service or equivalent combination of education and experience required• License and/or certification as required by federal, state or local government• Requires extensive local travel. Valid, permanent driver’s license from state of residence and a clean driving record per company standards are required. Current liability auto insurance required. Must be 21 years of age by date of hire.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities• Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instruction, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence.• Mathematical skills to calculate figures and amounts such as discounts, interest, commissions, proportions, percentages, area, circumference, and volume.• Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.• Attention to detail• Verbal and written communication skills• Time management and organizational skills, including punctuality for on-time attendancePhysical Demands & Working ConditionsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. An associate that is physically active, works indoors/outdoors, interacts with customers, and may be exposed to foreign substances (e.g., chemicals).Physical DemandsRegularly required to:• Sit or stand• Walk on uneven surfaces or climb stairs for an extended period of time• Use hands and arms to handle, feel or reach• Speak and hear• Use vision abilities for close, distance, color, peripheral, depth and focus• Lift up to 50 lbs independently• Push and pull equipmentOccasionally required to:• Stoop, kneel, crouch or crawlWorking ConditionsNoise level• Moderate to loudAdverse Conditions• Subject to outdoor weather conditions which may include extreme cold, extreme heat or wet conditions• Subject to exposure to animals and insects• Regularly exposed to chemicals using appropriate safety equipment• Occasionally work near mechanical or moving partsTruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesTo learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdf TruGreen performs pre-employment testing.DisclaimerThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",Residential Lawn Specialist Job in Sacramento,Full Time Employee,"Sacramento, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/residential-lawn-specialist-job-sacramento-ca-us-168919596.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c529a34ef723d8ef7104da65e86cbf8b
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:28:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"CDL - A COMPANY PORT TRUCK DRIVERS Since the beginning, Knight has known that CDL – A truck drivers are the foundation of the business. That’s why we make sure truck driving associates like you receive the respect and benefits you deserve.Earn Up to $200+ Per LoadMedical, Dental, Vision, Life InsuranceHome Daily or WeekendsCompany Match Premium 401KDrive Within 400 Miles of TerminalState-of-the-Art Trucks and Logging SystemUP TO $50,000 + Per YearCall a Recruiter TODAY! 888-449-0430REQUIREMENTSClass A CDL truck driver with at least 3 months of recent over the road (OTR) experiencePort and Rail Truck Driving Associates play an important role at Knight. We will depend on you to fill store shelves with imported goods from around the globe. Join the elite port and rail carrier in the nation and take pride in what you do. We will also assist in obtaining your TWIC card, which is required to work in the ports. Call a recruiter today to get behind the wheel!Call a Recruiter TODAY! 888-449-0430  ",Regional Truck Driver - CDL - A COMPANY PORT TRUCK DRIVER POSITIONS Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-truck-driver-cdl-a-company-port-truck-driver-positions-job-san-jose-ca-us-160799983.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=1,,,ba9bd3f6a2cc86b0f1abaa15dca5e2b3
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:54:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"This Lead Production Technician will be responsible for leading a team of 3 Production Technicians in the manufacturing of remote healthcare monitoring devices. The Lead will run Manufacturing Router for work orders to determine the production schedule for the day as well as the production time length to give accurate assessments to all other Business Units. The Lead will determine the work cell order for the day. The Production Technician Lead will track production and inventory in an MRP system (Materials Resource Planning) to give all Business Units accurate assessments of where the products are in the manufacturing process (i.e. what products are in pre-production vs. WIP vs. finished good/ready to ship). The Lead will maintain a SLAs for the business, specifically 100% on time production. The Lead will complete hands on assembly of products and help expedite assembly when needed based off demand. Previous experience running a production floor. Previous experience utilizing MRP system (NetSuite, IQMS, JD Edwards, SAP MM, etc...) Hands on experience with manufacturing of medical devices, healthcare monitoring devices, or small component devices. Solid understanding of Manufacturing Router, Work Cells, and production scheduling based on inventory, WIP (Work in Progress) and demand. Experience utilizing NetSuite MRP system Soldering experience",Lead Production Tech Job in Saint Paul,Full Time,Location:,Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-production-tech-job-saint-paul-mn-us-168693874.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,02a21ab3d95fc3535c2118a6f481e31d
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:21:55:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Truck Driver - CDL - A Company Truck Driver AssociateClass A Company Driver Benefits:Join the carrier that puts truck drivers first. Since the beginning, Knight has known that Class A CDL truck drivers are the foundation of the business. That’s why we make sure truck driving associates like you receive the respect you deserve.EXCELLENT PAYPAY CHOICES (DAILY OR WEEKLY)FLEXIBLE HOMETIMEPTO AFTER 90 DAYSCONSISTENT MILESLATE MODEL EQUIPMENTMEDICAL, DENTAL, VISION, AND LIFE INSURANCECOMPANY MATCH PREMIUM 401KREQUIREMENTS21 YEARS OF AGE OR ABOVEMINIMUM 3 MONTHS CURRENT OTR EXPERIENCEDOT PHYSICAL AND FUNCTIONAL CAPACITY TESTINGIT'S NOT A JOB, IT'S A CALLINGCall a Recruiter TODAY! 888-449-0430Company Truck Drivers Needed Near You!Rooted in the humble, yet strong beginnings of a working American family, Knight Transportation has stayed true to one common value – our truck driving associates come first and foremost.TOGETHER WE ARE KNIGHTKnight was founded on the principle of providing a better quality of life for drivers by providing innovative route solutions and better benefits than our competitors. Now that Knight has grown to over 4,500 trucks, we are still here for you. As the elite carrier in the nation, Knight Transportation offers truck driving associates a chance to thrive in their career.We believe in continuously supporting our drivers. That’s why we’ve increased driver pay consistently year-over-year resulting in a 14% pay increase over the last 18 months.Call a Recruiter TODAY! 888-449-0430",Truck Driver - CDL - A Regional Company Truck Driver Associate Job in Little Rock,Full Time,"Little Rock, AR",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-regional-company-truck-driver-associate-job-little-rock-ar-us-162099020.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=8,Bonus Opportunities,,ac8b44b2f4b2b128be88345545abdbad
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:22:51:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experience the Gordon All Around Pay Package Difference!$6,000 Bonus for Team Drivers!  Gordon Trucking is considered to be one of the safest and most reliable truckload carriers in North America. We offer home weekly options in many regions, safe reliable equipment, and All Around Pay so you’re paid for all of the work you do. It’s what we've done best for over 65 years! Call us to see how a Better Career starts with a Better Carrier! Expect More with Gordon’s All Around Pay •              Up to $0.45 CPM Starting Base Pay + Yearly raises•              Real bonuses we want you to earn•              Practical Miles•              Detention Paid After ONLY 1 Hour•              APU’s + 1800 Watt Power-inverters•              Drive Newer Freightliner Tractors with Elogs•              In Cab 5th Wheel Release•              Comprehensive Benefits + Matching 401K + Up to 4 weeks Paid Vacation Opportunities for qualified individuals include:•              National OTR–- Regional & Dedicated•              Company Drivers - Owner Operators•              Solos & Teams•              Dry Van or Refrigerated Requirements: •              Valid Class A CDL in state of residence •              Minimum 6 months truck driving experience or recent truck driving school graduate  Call Us Today!! 866-240-5715Gordon Trucking is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Class-A CDL Truck Driver Job in Sandusky,Full Time Employee,"Sandusky, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-truck-driver-job-sandusky-oh-us-118387832.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=19,,,9a6e71390b1c58e00237ec8cb578b4ec
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:23:17:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""Position OverviewProvides service to residential or commercial customers by making timely lawn/landscape applications, diagnosing and correcting lawn/landscaping problems through service calls and other customer communications, and selling/up-selling services to new and/or existing customers, resulting in growth of the customer base.Responsibilities1. Applies fertilizers and pesticides to lawns according to schedule, safety procedures, and label instructions.2. Drives company vehicle to customer location.3. Responds on a timely basis to customer requests for telephone and in-person service calls.4. Completes required production forms and customer instructions.5. Assists in sales to current customers through contact on route and telemarketing.6. Measures the lawn of potential customers to provide them with an accurate cost of TruGreen’s lawn care service.7. Performs a daily three-minute, 360 degree inspection of truck and equipment before taking the vehicle out on the road and upon return.8. Completes production reports, new sales forms, customer invoice forms, daily vehicle inspection report, and cancel/skip notices as required daily.9. Maintains vehicle and equipment through cleanliness, safety, and general maintenance.10. Assists in maintaining cleanliness of facility.Education and Experience Requirements• High school diploma/GED or 6 months to 1 year related experience and/or training in horticulture and/or customer service or equivalent combination of education and experience required• License and/or certification as required by federal, state or local government• Requires extensive local travel. Valid, permanent driver’s license from state of residence and a clean driving record per company standards are required. Current liability auto insurance required. Must be 21 years of age by date of hire.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities• Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instruction, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence.• Mathematical skills to calculate figures and amounts such as discounts, interest, commissions, proportions, percentages, area, circumference, and volume.• Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.• Attention to detail• Verbal and written communication skills• Time management and organizational skills, including punctuality for on-time attendancePhysical Demands & Working ConditionsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. An associate that is physically active, works indoors/outdoors, interacts with customers, and may be exposed to foreign substances (e.g., chemicals).Physical DemandsRegularly required to:• Sit or stand• Walk on uneven surfaces or climb stairs for an extended period of time• Use hands and arms to handle, feel or reach• Speak and hear• Use vision abilities for close, distance, color, peripheral, depth and focus• Lift up to 50 lbs independently• Push and pull equipmentOccasionally required to:• Stoop, kneel, crouch or crawlWorking ConditionsNoise level• Moderate to loudAdverse Conditions• Subject to outdoor weather conditions which may include extreme cold, extreme heat or wet conditions• Subject to exposure to animals and insects• Regularly exposed to chemicals using appropriate safety equipment• Occasionally work near mechanical or moving partsTruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesTo learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdf TruGreen performs pre-employment testing.DisclaimerThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",Residential Lawn Specialist Job in Milpitas,Full Time Employee,"Milpitas, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/residential-lawn-specialist-job-milpitas-ca-us-168917896.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=18,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,725645a5ce9cccbb382363a42c5dab3f
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:23:25:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experience the Gordon All Around Pay Package Difference!$6,000 Bonus for Team Drivers!  Gordon Trucking is considered to be one of the safest and most reliable truckload carriers in North America. We offer home weekly options in many regions, safe reliable equipment, and All Around Pay so you’re paid for all of the work you do. It’s what we've done best for over 65 years! Call us to see how a Better Career starts with a Better Carrier! Expect More with Gordon’s All Around Pay •              Up to $0.45 CPM Starting Base Pay + Yearly raises•              Real bonuses we want you to earn•              Practical Miles•              Detention Paid After ONLY 1 Hour•              APU’s + 1800 Watt Power-inverters•              Drive Newer Freightliner Tractors with Elogs•              In Cab 5th Wheel Release•              Comprehensive Benefits + Matching 401K + Up to 4 weeks Paid Vacation Opportunities for qualified individuals include:•              National OTR–- Regional & Dedicated•              Company Drivers - Owner Operators•              Solos & Teams•              Dry Van or Refrigerated Requirements: •              Valid Class A CDL in state of residence •              Minimum 6 months truck driving experience or recent truck driving school graduate  Call Us Today!! 866-240-5715Gordon Trucking is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Class A CDL Truck Driver Job in Waterloo,Full Time Employee,"Waterloo, IA",,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-truck-driver-job-waterloo-ia-us-118377365.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=9,,,ad9302905907ffee2dc76f6223b62b11
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:23:27:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Supply Chain Solutions is currently seeking a Part-Time Operations Supervisor (MI) for its Mail Innovations department. The PT Operations Supervisor will be responsible for supervising operations related to mail receiving, processing, sorting and shipping operations, as well as coordinating with facility administrative activities.The Part-Time Operations Supervisor responsibilities may include, but are no limited to the following:• Supervise the activities of staff in mail receiving, processing, sorting and shipping operations in a timely, cost effective manner, consistent with established operations procedures and USPS.• Meet or exceed productivity goals established for mail operations functions.• Ensure accuracy of direct mail processing and preparation operations in accordance with USPS requirements, customer requests, and established procedures.• Train assigned on-site staff and follow-up to ensure work is accurate and complete. • Maintain confidentiality of all internal systems, procedures, and customer data and personnel information.• Establish and maintain positive relationships as needed with customer operational staff, applicable USPS staff and vendors. • Plan and recommend appropriate staff levels consistent with workload demands.• Assure that operational supplies are on-hand and available at all times.• Maintain a clean and orderly environment in all operations areas of the Regional Processing Facility.Education and Experience:• 1+ year of management/supervisory experience in a production/processing environment required. The successful candidate will have prior experience in both operations and customer service. Candidate must have a High School diploma or equivalent degree.Required Skills:• Candidate must possess excellent verbal and written communications skills • Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic work environment • Must be detailed oriented and have strong customer service skills• Must have the ability to make quick decisions within tight timelines • Must be able to be provide supervision, training, and/or development of facility operations employees and contract staff• Must be able to solve problems involving multiple functional areas of mail operations and logistics UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS PT Operations Supervisor Job in San Leandro,,"San Leandro, CA 94577",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-pt-operations-supervisor-job-san-leandro-ca-us-168763401.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,4065d679e01db89597a1f5fc2542cedb
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:23:52:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"DRIVERS - CDL A Home most nights & wkends. Regional or OTR. Good pay. Call Brad 614-445-6062. This listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Drivers Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43215","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/drivers-job-columbus-oh-us-168208492.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,da9d0b1a963974638bbf441f4bb8a70d
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:23:33:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cardiovascular Sales Representative - Houston S, TX/Sugarland, TX - V155115S-POS_75018265-1DescriptionSanofi, a global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme.At Sanofi US, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Headquartered in Bridgewater, NJ, Sanofi US is part of a leading global healthcare company dedicated to discovering, developing and distributing therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme. Sanofi US employs approximately 17,000 people across the country all dedicated to protecting health, enhancing life and responding to the hopes and potential healthcare needs of seven billion people around the world.Commitment is our Strength. Ready to grow together?Sanofi US endeavors to make our career center accessible to any and all users. If you are experiencing difficulty and need assistance applying online, please call 1-800-207-8049 Option 7, then Option 3.Cardiovascular Sales Representative:This position is responsible for identifying key players and decision makers in their territory. CV Sales Representatives are expected to possess a high level of product, competitive, customer and territory knowledge, as well as an entrepreneurial drive and spirit to expand, grow and own their business. They will deliver sales calls that consist of pre-call planning, driving “brand” messaging, and closing, with the use of visual aids and/or reprints. They are responsible for planning, implementing and taking ownership of their territory plans to enhance key relationships and drive territory results. Sales Representatives are also expected to attend all company, regional and divisional meetings as well as company sponsored promotional programs which can occur during evening hours and/or weekends. Various administrative duties are also required, after regular field based time, which includes entering all calls into the company computer with relevant post call notes, sample activity, etc. Candidates are responsible for passing all product and market assessments. Candidates must complete all fleet safety training and must maintain an acceptable driving record regarding accidents and incidents. Key Responsibilities and Accountabilities:Engage cardiovascular customers within assigned geographical territory and deliver clinically focused message to grow brand-share and revenue, and to consistently deliver on product goals.Develop and maintain strong working relationships, through collaboration with colleagues, as well as internal and external contacts.Provide site level in-service training as required by account.Demonstrate initiative and drive.Develop strategy and execute tactics within key accounts to establish, generate, and expand market share.Develop and maintain strong working relationships with local cardiovascular experts, nurses, other identified important healthcare personnel, and key patient advocacy groups in assigned geographic territories. Effectively develop and execute short and long term strategic plans.Maximize budget allocated to the geographic territory assigned to support execution of strategies and tactics developed to generate and grow the business.Drive results by identifying key opportunities and developing strategic plans to enhance and grow territory business.Own business opportunities within respective geographic area, which includes coordination and calling upon large group practices and other key targets to drive overall product results.Establish and maintain relationships with thought leaders in assigned territory. Primary objective is to drive industry leading customer value. Lead cross-functional teams in the implementation of Sanofi US programs and brand specific strategies in assigned geography.Qualifications· Consistent track record of quantifiable/documented sales accomplishments· Solid business acumen including excellent and persuasive business communication · Demonstrated ability to plan, analyze and act upon sales data within an assigned geography· Demonstrated ability to learn and apply technical and scientific product-related information · Demonstrated ability to manage territory budget· Demonstrated ability to work in a matrix environment · Driving a company car in a safe manner to daily meetings and appointments is required· Responsible for operating the motor vehicle using safe driving practices, knowledge of and compliance with all company policies, and obeying all traffic laws.· Demonstrated ability to work independently and exercise good business judgment and discretion and to analyze and address territory opportunities by building key customer relationships· Experience selling biologics/injectable products preferred· Specialty pharmacy experience preferred· Business to business sales experience preferredSanofi US Services, Inc. and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.Job:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Texas-HoustonJob Posting:Jul 7, 2016, 8:43:43 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regularp.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal, p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast,font{font-size: 12px !important;font-family: Verdana,Arial,Helvetica,sans-serif !important;}",Cardiovascular Sales Representative - Houston S,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/cardiovascular-sales-representative-houston-s-tx-sugarland-tx-v155115s-job-houston-tx-us-169512374.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,General/Other: Sales/Business Development,07e8438c4bba8335d0d584445866f28d
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:23:31:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:In collaboration with Nursing Leadership, the Shift Supervisor oversees the operations of Patient Care Services evenings, nights, and weekends. Visits all the patient care units daily to evaluate patient care issues and assists Resource Nurse/Clinical Nurse with patient care and managerial issues. Facilitates the resolution of customer service issues and inter and intra-departmental problems concerning utilization of supplies and equipment. Authorized to act in the absence of the Chief Nursing Officer, during duty hours (evenings, nights, weekends, and holidays). The House Supervisor on duty administers the disaster plan until relieved by the Administrator on Call or designated member of the Hospital Administration. Participates in Performance Improvement teams, projects or committees as directed. Manages bed placement. MINIMUM KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED:Work Experience:Two or more years of clinical nursing experience in an acute care facility during which managerial and teaching abilities have been demonstrated.License/Registration/Certification: Current RN licensure issued by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of Texas. Current BCLS-HCP certification.Education & Training: Graduate of an accredited school of nursing.  Bachelor's Degree in Nursing preferred.  Management courses are preferred.Skills: Strong interpersonal skills in order to effectively communicate with physicians, health team members, patients and families. Computer skills - word processing - electronic mail Able to communicate effectively in writing. EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER MINORITIES / WOMEN / VETERANS / DISABLED",RN House Supervisor; PRN; Days & Nights Available Job in Houston,Per Diem Employee,"Houston, TX 77001",,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-house-supervisor-prn-days-nights-available-job-houston-tx-us-169517989.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,9d47dd7f5523a651da6ceaa16661ec28
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:23:29:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  671391Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsParticipate with team of technical staff and business managers or practitioners in the business unit to determine systems requirements and functionalities needed in large/complex development project.Assess and develop high level design requirements for project and communicate in writing or in meetings with development team. Assess detailed specifications against design requirements.Review coding done to advance application upgrade, extension, or other development. Analyze application for data integrity issues.Develop test protocols or plan for testing revised application and review test results.Serve as project lead or lead technical staff in course of application development projectMay mentor less experienced technical staff; may use high end development tools to assist or facilitate development process.QualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Hadoop Developer Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  671391Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsParticipate with team of technical staff and business managers or practitioners in the business unit to determine systems requirements and functionalities needed in large/complex development project.Assess and develop high level design requirements for project and communicate in writing or in meetings with development team. Assess detailed specifications against design requirements.Review coding done to advance application upgrade, extension, or other development. Analyze application for data integrity issues.Develop test protocols or plan for testing revised application and review test results.Serve as project lead or lead technical staff in course of application development projectMay mentor less experienced technical staff; may use high end development tools to assist or facilitate development process.QualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hadoop-developer-job-houston-tx-us-169894024.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),eeee9e89d7449770738127c9718fc961
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:23:29:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  677198Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsHadoop AdminExperience with Hadoop (Hortonworks) Cloudera and MapR is ok.Core troubleshooting skills within hadoop environmentAbility to configure, monitor, deploy nodesArchitecture and Troubleshooting Experience.Excellent Linux ExperienceQualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Hadoop Administrator Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  677198Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsHadoop AdminExperience with Hadoop (Hortonworks) Cloudera and MapR is ok.Core troubleshooting skills within hadoop environmentAbility to configure, monitor, deploy nodesArchitecture and Troubleshooting Experience.Excellent Linux ExperienceQualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hadoop-administrator-job-houston-tx-us-169796650.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),68f885866abc75a66fa7bcfc50507f01
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:23:29:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Reynolds and Reynolds is looking for experienced sales professionals for our Telecommunication Solutions sales team. Our superior software solutions, our award-winning sales, service, and support have made us one of the most recognized and respected companies in the automotive industry.As a Territory Sales Account Manager, your primary focus will be to promote the sale of Reynolds’ telecommunication products to automotive dealerships within your territory. As the subject matter expert on our Reynolds Integrated Telephone System (RITS), you will work with the local Account Manager to demo and close the sale. RITS is a part of the Retail Management System (RMS) which allows the dealerships to integrate their dealer management system (DMS) to their phone system to help manage the communications between customers and staff. In this role, you are eligible to receive a company car for both business and personal use. In addition, you will be provided with an iPad, iPhone, laptop and home office equipment. If you have a desire to excel and succeed in technical sales within a reputable company this is the job for you!Our training consists of time with experienced representatives in the field, online courses completed in your home office, and classroom instruction at Reynolds University, our award-winning internal learning institution in Dayton, Ohio. Topics covered will include training on sales techniques, negotiations, dealership operations, and in-depth product training.REQUIREMENTS: ·         Bachelor’s degree or equivalent ·         3+ years experience in sales ·         Strong presentation skills ·         Persuasiveness and sales-closing abilities ·         Technical Knowledge as it applies to networking systems and/or telephony systems ·         Ability to travel 40-50% of the time BENEFITS:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: ·         Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance ·         401(k) with up to 6% matching ·         Company car for business and personal use ·         Working remotely with an iPad, iPhone, laptop, and other provided home office equipment ·         Professional development and training ·         Promotion from within ·         Paid vacation and sick days ·         Eight paid holidays ·         Referral bonuses ·         Associate discounts for cell phones, cars, computers, entertainment, and much more   Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Territory Sales Account Manager – Outside Sales Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",AllTelecommunications ServicesAutomotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/territory-sales-account-manager-%E2%80%93-outside-sales-job-houston-tx-us-169632940.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ece09f811909e6822a5569916b9958b1
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:23:27:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"OR Circulator - Orthopedics This position is with one of the top Surgical Hospitals in the metroplex.  They work with some nationally renown surgeons and are extremely highly regarded.  The facility specializes in Orthopedic surgeries, Back and Spinal, ENT, Plastic, Foot and Ankle, Urological surgical care and sports medicine.  Currently this hospital is in need of OR Circulators.  This position is in Dallas, TX. SCOPE/INFO 9 ORs HCAHP and Outpatient Satisfaction scores in the 97th-99th percentiles Quarterly bonuses for circulators!$200 bonus for off shift staffing!$1/minute for overtime!  Requirements Circulator experience in Orthopedics RN  Follow us on Twitter to hear about new jobs: http://twitter.com/hireneXus_hc  WHAT CANDIDATES SAY ABOUT THIS RECRUITER:Just talking to Bud Harrison on the phone made me feel very comfortable about the position. He has good knowledge of the group and gave me good info to help with my interview. He made follow up calls to me to see if I needed anything before my face to face with the physicians….I liked working with him.Joseph, Practice Administrator in Florida  ",RN OR Circulator - Surgical Hospital Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-or-circulator-surgical-hospital-job-houston-tx-us-167690454.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=18,"35,000.00 - 43,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),ec02bee7d9afe0233cf591d7edb2f269
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:22:46:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Position responsible for serving as a clinical expert in the delivery and management of comprehensive patient care, utilizing research and evidence-based practice as necessary; for expertly caring for patients from multiple services/specialties, and for more complex diagnosis.Full Time Neuro IMU (High Acuity Step-down)RN 7p - 7a MHSWRN in the state of Texas with 1-2 years Neuro and/or IMCU/IMU experience preferred.ACLS, BLS requiredNeuro Certification or PCCN preferred but not required.Will consider high acuity Med Surg / Tele experience.Strong communication skills required.Education: Graduate of an accredited School of Professional Nursing.Experience: One or more years of nursing experience in area of intended practice.Licenses/Certification: Current State of Texas license/permit to practice professional nursing.Certified in Basic Life Support;Additional certifications will be required based on discipline and/or nursing unit requirements.Demonstrates commitment to the Partners-in-Caring process by integrating our culture in all internal and external customer interactions; delivers on our brand promise of “we advance health” through innovation, accountability, empowerment, collaboration, compassion and results while ensuring one Memorial Hermann.Principle Accountabilities:Delivers appropriate care to patients, at a competent level, according to the RN skills inventory and the age and needs of the patient/population served.Coordinates the planning for delivery of nursing care with a multidisciplinary team and administers appropriate clinical decisions in the delivery of patient care.Collaborates and directs healthcare team in attainment of positive outcomes based on data, research, evidence and professional standards of care. Meets treatment goals; develops/implements discharge and/or transfer plans; evaluates the quality of patient care and contributes to the revision of standards of care.Participates in a systemic, interdisciplinary, and ongoing evaluation of programs, process improvement, and desired client-centered outcomes.Ensures safe care to patients, staff and visitors; adheres to all Memorial Hermann policies, procedures, and standards within budgetary specifications including time management, supply management, productivity and quality of service.Promotes individual professional growth and development by meeting requirements for mandatory/continuing education and skills competency; supports department-based goals which contribute to the success of the organization; serves as preceptor, mentor and resource to less experienced staff.Other duties as assigned.MNTRAM",RN Neuro IMU Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-neuro-imu-job-houston-tx-us-169098115.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),857c9820b6ebb4baf8d1baa7a9b96d04
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:22:42:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Licensed Practical-Vocational Nurse Full Time - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279578 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Summary: Under direct supervision of Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN job provides nursing care within the scope of licensure for assigned patients according to established nursing standards and hospital policies and procedures. ·         Under direct supervision of a Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication, performs treatments and patient care responsibilities as prescribed. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN consults with and keeps Registered Nurse informed of activities, symptoms, reactions, and changes in the patient's condition with regard to assigned patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN provides appropriate pain management techniques and educates the patient and family regarding pain management. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication following the five rights of medication administration within scope of practice. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with the rehabilitation and treatment of patients in accordance with the medical plan of care, updates, and revises plan of care under the supervision of Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists physicians with examinations, treatments and special procedures and performs services requiring technical and manual skills as directed by the Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN treats patients and their families with respect and dignity.  Identifies and addresses psychosocial, cultural, ethnic and religious/spiritual needs of patients and their families. ·        The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN interacts professionally with patient/family and involves patient/family in the formation of the plan of care. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with admitting, discharging and transferring of patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN identifies and addresses psychosocial needs of patients and family; communicates with Social Services/Discharge Planner regarding both in-hospital and post discharge needs. Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse, LPN, LVN, Nurse, Practical Nurse, Vocational Nurse, Hospital, Clinical Nurse, Medical, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduate of an accredited program for Licensed Vocational/Practical Nurses. Licenses/Certification: Licensed Practical/Vocational Nurse License. BCLS Certification. Intravenous Blood Certification preferred. Experience: Minimum six months prior experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : LPN/LVN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Licensed Practical-Vocational Nurse Full Time - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Licensed Practical-Vocational Nurse Full Time - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279578 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Summary: Under direct supervision of Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN job provides nursing care within the scope of licensure for assigned patients according to established nursing standards and hospital policies and procedures. ·         Under direct supervision of a Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication, performs treatments and patient care responsibilities as prescribed. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN consults with and keeps Registered Nurse informed of activities, symptoms, reactions, and changes in the patient's condition with regard to assigned patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN provides appropriate pain management techniques and educates the patient and family regarding pain management. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication following the five rights of medication administration within scope of practice. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with the rehabilitation and treatment of patients in accordance with the medical plan of care, updates, and revises plan of care under the supervision of Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists physicians with examinations, treatments and special procedures and performs services requiring technical and manual skills as directed by the Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN treats patients and their families with respect and dignity.  Identifies and addresses psychosocial, cultural, ethnic and religious/spiritual needs of patients and their families. ·        The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN interacts professionally with patient/family and involves patient/family in the formation of the plan of care. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with admitting, discharging and transferring of patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN identifies and addresses psychosocial needs of patients and family; communicates with Social Services/Discharge Planner regarding both in-hospital and post discharge needs. Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse, LPN, LVN, Nurse, Practical Nurse, Vocational Nurse, Hospital, Clinical Nurse, Medical, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduate of an accredited program for Licensed Vocational/Practical Nurses. Licenses/Certification: Licensed Practical/Vocational Nurse License. BCLS Certification. Intravenous Blood Certification preferred. Experience: Minimum six months prior experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : LPN/LVN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-vocational-nurse-full-time-kindred-hospital-sugar-land-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913391.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,c44468fa3194ab4d8e4642c1146aca68
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:22:42:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Anixter offers the industry’s most extensive portfolio of products, services and solutions for the Public Power, Investor-owned Utilities, Construction and Industrial markets. We offer value-added solutions — including industry leading technology, inventory management and after-hours emergency and storm supply — all designed to make our customers more successful. Our continued growth has created a need for a full time Branch Operations Manager position. If you want to become a part of our winning team, we want to hear from you.Position Purpose:Lead the operation of a small volume distribution center in support of company goals. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, strategic and operations planning for the DC, including financial management, operational performance and analysis, planning and execution, distribution, fleet management, inventory management, vendor management, and leadership, including performance management. Provides input and feedback on all operations, processes and results to the Regional Operations Manager.Responsibilities include:- Develops a strategy that outlines the capacity planning requirements, including facilities, equipment, and staff, to meet the current and anticipated growth goals of the company. Maintains documented procedures for work processes.- Provides clear expectations on metrics and goals to all site associates. Manages performance of DC management and associates and recognizes, trains, coaches, counsels, and takes corrective action when warranted.- Manages dedicated delivery processes and carrier services. Partners with support staff to ensure compliance with all DOT regulations.- Understands and uses financial indicators/metrics and profits and losses to measure the performance of business.- Maintains compliance with all safety and Hazmat rules and regulations, legal regulations, and human resource policies.- Manages fleet resources to meet daily customer service delivery requirements.- Manages slotting and storage layout for optimum efficiency.- Ensures safety and security of associates, facility, equipment, and inventory. Ensures compliance with processes and procedures to maintain accurate inventory levels and prevent shrinkage.We are looking for candidates with:- 5-10 years experience preferred, specifically in distribution center facilities- Knowledge of Microsoft applications (e.g. Excel)- Experience managing a group or team of individual contributors and/or indirectly supervises support staffEnvironmental requirements:- Typically in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors such as temperature extremes, moving machinery, loud noises, and fumes, which may cause noticeable discomfort or a moderate risk of accident or illness.- Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles.- Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time.We offer an excellent pay and benefits that includes:- Excellent medical, dental, life and disability insurances- 401(k) with company match and a pension plan- Tuition assistance- Paid holidays and vacationAnixter is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer; Minority / Female / Disabled / Veteran. We require all of our employees to perform work in an ethical manner and uphold a culture of honesty and ethics at all times.",Branch Operations Manager Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/branch-operations-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169758230.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=6,,,faa96e52d6fac7e8aff1fd6a16061f24
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:22:24:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chevron is one of the world's leading energy companies, with approximately 60,000 employees working in countries around the world. We explore, produce and transport crude oil and natural gas; refine, market and distribute fuels and other energy products; manufacture and sell petrochemical products; generate power; and develop future energy resources, including biofuels and geothermal energy.   Chevron is accepting online applications for the position of Cyber Threat Intelligence Analyst located in Houston, Texas through July 22, 2016 at 11:59 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time).      Responsibilities for this position may include but are not limited to:     The Cyber Threat Intelligence Analyst is responsible for producing integrated threat and technical intelligence products in a timely, accurate, and actionable manner regarding cyber threats of relevance to Chevron. Will execute an intelligence life cycle, including requirements gathering, intelligence collection, analysis, targeted distribution, and feedback to produce relevant, timely, accurate, and actionable intelligence providing the “who, what, when, where, why, how, and importance” of cyber threats including those associated with espionage, hacktivism, cybercrime, malicious software, social engineering, and emerging threats. Coordinate with business units and provide concrete recommendations for mitigating sophisticated cyber threats.   Required Qualifications:   4-10 years’ experience in cyber security operations  and intelligence analysis and reporting  for an entity with a global footprint. Should possess previous experience as a cyber threat intelligence analyst and demonstrate the competencies associated with this role. Requires demonstrated excellent written and oral communication skills and the ability to effectively interact with persons from a range of backgrounds and positions, including those in executive level positions, in structured and unstructured situations. Possess analytical skills, specifically in the area of intelligence analysis methodologies as it applies to cyber threats, critical thinking, research, and report production. Ability Assess threats, use analysis tools and methods, perform research and distill raw data into timely, relevant, and actionable intelligence. Evaluate nation-state, hacktivist, and criminal activity. Monitor world events. Identify new information sources Prepare, present, and defend analysis of cyber threat patterns and trends relevant to Chevron through reports and briefings, Communicate with C-level executives through technical engineers and analysts. Extensive use of Microsoft Office tools. Maintain contacts in the security community. Collaborate to provide methods, indications, warnings, and predictive analysis of malicious activity. Collaborate with internal partners to provide intelligence and reporting which meets business needs.     Relocation Options: Relocation may be considered within Chevron parameters.   International Considerations: Expatriate assignments will not be considered. Chevron regrets that it is unable to sponsor employment Visas or consider individuals on time-limited Visa status for this position.   Regulatory Disclosure for US Positions: Chevron is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or other status protected by law or regulation.   Chevron participates in E-Verify in certain locations as required by law.  ",Cyber Threat Intelligence Analyst Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/cyber-threat-intelligence-analyst-job-houston-tx-us-169735971.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),93e121e2e5f73e15c54f4bda458bb371
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:57:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Occupational Health/Urgent Care Center Medical Director needed for a permanent opportunity with Yoh's client located in Deer Park, TX. Top Skills You Should Possess: - Physician License in State of Texas (Active and in Good Standing) - Minimum of five (5) years of directly applicable experience preferred - Certified in BLS and ACLS preferred - Ability to work well in a very fast paced environment What You'll Be Doing: - Manage your day-to-day through the holistic integration of business leadership within a clinical setting - Work with sales and operations team on new business development and center financials - Facilitate efficient and effective center operations by balancing the dynamics of patient care and leadership within a clinical environment - Leadership that focuses on people development, specifically mentoring, training, and developing clinical staff and colleagues to increase performance and retention - Execute daily effective and optimal patient care management - Ensure optimal execution of clinical model playbook as well as identify indicators for clinical improvement while also confirming accurate records/billing - Create appropriate treatment environment throughout the center that is compliant with State Practice Act/Rules and Regulations/WC Regulations - Primarily clinical (see patients every day) but also will have additional responsibilities in terms of helping manage the clinics, budget analysis/financial review, and training/development of new colleagues What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Board Certification in Primary Care or Emergency Medicine - Medical degree from accredited university - Work overtime as required - Occupational Medicine experience preferred What's In It For You? - Competitive salary based on experience - Training provided with a World-Class Occupational Medicine Process Management Model - Minimal travel - Medical Malpractice Coverage - 401(k) with Employer Match - Medical/Vision/Prescription/Dental Plans - Life Insurance/Disability - Paid Time Off/Holidays What are you waiting for? Apply Now! Recruiter: Hana Brown Telephone: 818.587.4475 Email: Hana.Brown@yoh.com Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: HC MONJOB CB1 J2WBRHOURef: 1074701SFSF: HCCB1Nearest Major Market: HoustonJob Segment:Medical, Manager, Urgent Care, Business Development, Patient Care, Healthcare, Management, Sales#TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Occupational Health/Urgent Care Medical Center Director Job Job in Deer Park,Full Time Employee,"Deer Park, TX",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/occupational-health-urgent-care-medical-center-director-job-job-deer-park-tx-us-169969170.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,6d0b7f7db356b856514e9d129af01a76
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:56:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client, a specialty chemicals producer, has an immediate opening for a Maintenance Reliability Engineer at one of its sites in the Houston area. Job DescriptionWill be a technical resource that provides and shares expertise of equipment, options to improve maintenance and operating practices, and opportunities to advance use of technology. Will work with operations and/or maintenance personnel to troubleshoot day-to-day mechanical problems, provide plant engineering with technical support on reliability issues, perform Root Cause Failure Analysis and Reliability Maintenance studies to assist in Preventative Maintenance, assist maintenance team with scope of repair and turnaround guidance, and providing subject matter expert support for precision maintenance and maintenance procedures, perform work in a manner consistent with company values, principles, and policies and supporting environmental, health, and safety compliance, define and optimize predictive and preventive maintenance strategies. Support the reliability efforts in assigned areas of responsibility by providing technical assistance in troubleshooting, resolving equipment design, operation, and maintenance problems; Continue to improve the reliability tools and methods utilized in increasing plant reliability. Provide necessary information in the troubleshooting and investigation of failures, Participate as requested in incident investigation including equipment failures and difficulties to diagnose faulty operation, and to make recommendations to maintenance crew, Provide support for the predictive maintenance work for the facility, analyze and create preventive maintenance procedures and/or practices to ensure validity, efficiency and maximum production equipment uptime, identify potential for cost reduction through improvement of equipment reliability, extended parts life, reduced labor cost, and other reliability-related improvement techniques, Understand process related issues affecting reliability and work with technology and production members to develop mutual improvements in production and reliability, Support capital investment projects in the Mechanical discipline. Serve as leader for the plant’s mechanical integrity program and systems with the plant inspector as a direct report. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities/Requirements BS in Mechanical Engineering from an accredited program,Experience in a chemical or petrochemical manufacturing plant,Strong experience with rotating equipment such as pumps, pump seals, fans, and blowers, as well as piping systems, demonstrated experience in programs such as preventive maintenance, vibration analysis, etc., Good interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills. Additional skills required to be successful are analytical thinking, ability to learn, thoroughness, logical reasoning, concern for standards, efficiency orientation, initiative, interpersonal awareness, strong ability to be an effective team player and leader, critical thinking and analytical skills. Our Client offers competitive compensation, relocation assistance, and strong bonus program and much more. Please send your resume in Word.doc format to Reed Rogers at reed@parkwoodintl.com and refer to Job No. 10716.",Maintenance Reliability Engineer Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-reliability-engineer-job-houston-tx-us-164642178.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=6,,Engineering,9e89b7f98e28aa03396040acc46eb992
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:44:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sasol (USA) Corporation is expanding its existing Louisiana Chemical Operations with the development of a world-scale ethane cracker that will produce 1.5 million tons of ethylene and other downstream derivatives per year.  The ethane cracker will enable Sasol to expand its differentiated ethylene derivatives business, while helping to strengthen U.S. manufacturing, boost exports and spur economic growth.Due to our tremendous growth we are recruiting for a Product Safety Specialist, reporting to the Manager of Product Safety Regulatory Affairs. This position can be staffed in Houston, Texas or Lake Charles, LA.  Sasol offers a comprehensive total rewards package with market-related compensation and benefits that are consistent across our sites in the USA.  The total rewards package is competitive within our industry and is designed to attract and retain our most valuable assets - our employees.  Come be a part of our Growing Team!!!     Position Responsibilities:   Monitor state and federal regulatory developments, trends, and assess impacts on requirements for Sasol products manufactured domestically or imported into the US. Expertise in EPA TSCA compliance, FDA food contact applications, and OSHA hazard communication. Provide regulatory support and guidance for North America Operations and applicable Businesses in the marketing and safe use of Sasol products.  Respond to internal and external customer request for regulatory and product related information and documentation. Responsible for coordinating, preparing and submitting new chemical notifications and registrations to ensure products are approved domestically and internationally. Develop Product Safety systems and procedures for new or modified product requirements and/or assist manufacturing in regulatory reporting mandates.  Develop safety bulletins and other specialized literature pertaining to product safety and compliance. Supervise contractors/consultants to accomplish tasks for regulatory and other corporate activities involving Sasol products. Conduct hazard assessments and classifications for global chemical control laws and initiatives related to Product Stewardship and ensure consistency where appropriate. Select, lead and/or participate on teams developing internal standards and priority projects to manage complex product safety issues and problems.  Work directly with toxicologist, Eco-toxicologist, and other specialized professional fields. Liaison with business leaders within R&D, Market Development, Sales & Marketing, Planning & Optimization and other regulatory staff in the product development process. Represent Sasol to customers, regulatory agencies, trade associations, and industry on matters of product safety and compliance. Lead or participate in corporate ISO audits and other company audit initiatives, as needed.   Experience and/or Educational Requirements:   Bachelor’s Degree in Sciences, Chemical or Chemistry  6-8 years of regulatory affairs, product safety or product stewardship related experience in the Chemical industry Expert knowledge of US regulations and standards (EPA TSCA, OSHA, and FDA); Canada, EU and Asia-Pacific product laws Excellent leadership and project management; Multi-tasker Polymer and/or Wax regulatory knowledge Communicates effectively both orally and written; detail oriented Good interpersonal skills cross-culturally SAP, EPA CDX, and Microsoft proficient     Aerial View of Construction on Sasol's US Mega Project - YouTube https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-K_b5I-Eb_o   Location: Houston, Texas   Sasol treats work-authorized job applicants equally in recruiting and hiring without regard to their citizenship status or national origin unless required by law, regulation, executive order, government contract, or determination by the Attorney General. Please note Sasol will not sponsor, obtain, and/or petition for temporary visa status (for example, E, F-1, H-1, H-2, L, B, J, or TN) for candidates for this position and/or personnel hired for this position.   We are not accepting unsolicited resumes from 3rd party recruitment agencies, therefore we will not pay a fee for resumes submitted.",Product Safety Specialist () Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/product-safety-specialist-12301-job-houston-tx-us-169802427.aspx?mescoid=1700177001001&jobPosition=4,,Engineering,dfe0fd1f6bcb228e49ca48f3f7a165d8
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:38:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tired of your work and ideas not being recognized? Come work with us – we will empower you to make decisions, ask you to focus on continuous improvement and implement your innovative ideas. Come work where you are not just a number! At Actuant your contributions are visible and opportunities for expanding your knowledge are unlimited. Grow, Improve and EngageActuant’s guiding values and vision can only be achieved by hiring top talent. Come join a global company that has a motivated, customer-orientated, and continuous improvement focused workforce.In return for your contributions to achieving our vision – you will be rewarded for your performance, have access to virtual and hands on learning and development opportunities and have the potential for career growth.To learn more about the exciting reasons to work at Actuant click on the links below:Company VideoOur Leadership TeamFact SheetCommunity OutreachWhat makes this role exiting in this field, industry and/or compared to other companies? Cortland is a global designer and manufacturer of engineered synthetic ropes, heavy lift slings, electro-optical-mechanical cables, and umbilicals. We have, throughout all of our facilities, the broadest collection of rope and cable processing capabilities available anywhere. With a history of entrepreneurialism and a broad experience in custom-built applications, we deliver world-class solutions that maximize performance, safety, and efficiency for our clients in the oil and gas, heavy marine, subsea, ROV, seismic, defense and aerospace markets. From our strategically placed sales, engineering, and service centers, we support global customers at a local level. We are proud of our commitment to drive performance and provide continuous improvements for our clients.Objectives and Expected Accomplishments A successful candidate will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact. First and foremost goal is to increase revenue. We are looking to develop our regular accounts and grow them to a significant order value of $100,000 and up.Day in the Life The primary focus of this position will be selling electro-, optical, and mechanical cables. You will have daily engagement with manufacturing facilities based in New York, USA and the United Kingdom. These production actions may be related to your ongoing customer activities.You will have the freedom to arrange continuous customer facing opportunities through mid-morning to afternoon appointments.A third component will be to oversee full-cycle quotation management including inputs from internal, cross-functional, stakeholders to validate pricing proposals.   Team DynamicsJoin an experienced Sales team where you will have the freedom to ""map your own destiny""; create business by planning your sales calls, driving your own accounts, and proving your sales capability. All while having the support of management and peer Account Managers when needed.We are looking for a talented Sales professional who has a keen technical aptitude and a strong desire to ""hunt"" for new business, increase existing market share and reinvigorate previous customer relationships.The position requires an individual that is technically savvy, has the ability to make sound decisions in a fluid environment and is able to work in a strong team environment to drive results.Required Skills:Skills & ExperienceRequired: 2-5 years of proven success in selling technical products/systems. Demonstrated success in applying the fundamentals and application of ""Time and Territory Management"" techniques and ""Key Account"" management.Relentless drive for results. Curious and self-motivated with the ability to achieve sales quotas and goals.Demonstrated sales results, creative ability and good business and engineering decision making skills. Able to demonstrate competitive product analysis. Develop and deliver customer-centered solutions, providing exceptional services to meet and exceed customer requirements.Collaborative with outstanding influencing skills. Needs to work well in a team environment, willing to step up in difficult situations and take leadership role – irrespective of reporting relationships – to solve problems.Proficient organizational, written presentation/oral presentation skills and “professional image” as a representative of the company required. Able to communicate between individual contributor levels to executive leadership within internal stakeholders and external client businesses.Preferred: Cable and Umbilical sales experience. Fully capable of driving full cycle client management including engagement with customers, able to take on new approaches (cold calling, prospect management, bid management and closing a sale).",Technical Sales Representative Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Technical Sales Representative Job in Houston, Texas US",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-sales-representative-job-houston-tx-us-170042030.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ce0b3d0d4d3c58c02369ff0f79f418bb
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-houston-tx-us-169873057.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d225560e0f5585e43e176c02543790f8
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Assistant Construction Manager / Superintendent Location: Houston, Texas Join the 2014 Builder of the Year!Toll Brothers, Inc., America’s leading builder of luxury homes, seeks an experienced Assistant Construction Manager / Superintendent for one of our new home communities in Houston, Texas.The Assistant Construction Manager will assist in the supervision of all on-site construction, including the scheduling of sub-contractors on the job, resolving day-to-day problems on the job site, and inspecting all work during construction to ensure compliance with plans and specifications. Some construction experience is required. Essential responsibilities of an Assistant Construction Manager include obtaining all permits necessary to construct houses, ordering all materials required to construct houses, and working with the Construction Manager and Project Manager to set up and monitor the construction schedule. This is an excellent opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!2016 WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6)in Quality of Products/Services Offered- Fortune(after Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)Qualifications:We seek an Assistant Construction Manager with experience in residential construction management, strong organizational and people skills, and sound knowledge of production homebuilding. If you meet these requirements, and you enjoy working in a fast-paced, team-oriented environment, this may be the opportunity for you! This position offers an excellent compensation and benefits package, including comprehensive medical/dental, 401(k) with a company match, discounted stock purchase, discounts on mortgages, homes, appliances, and much more!Come see why Toll Brothers has been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry! APPLY ONLINE TODAY!  As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",ASSISTANT CONSTRUCTION MANAGER / SUPERINTENDENT Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Assistant Construction Manager / Superintendent Location: Houston, Texas Join the 2014 Builder of the Year!Toll Brothers, Inc., America’s leading builder of luxury homes, seeks an experienced Assistant Construction Manager / Superintendent for one of our new home communities in Houston, Texas.The Assistant Construction Manager will assist in the supervision of all on-site construction, including the scheduling of sub-contractors on the job, resolving day-to-day problems on the job site, and inspecting all work during construction to ensure compliance with plans and specifications. Some construction experience is required. Essential responsibilities of an Assistant Construction Manager include obtaining all permits necessary to construct houses, ordering all materials required to construct houses, and working with the Construction Manager and Project Manager to set up and monitor the construction schedule. This is an excellent opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!2016 WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6)in Quality of Products/Services Offered- Fortune(after Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)Qualifications:We seek an Assistant Construction Manager with experience in residential construction management, strong organizational and people skills, and sound knowledge of production homebuilding. If you meet these requirements, and you enjoy working in a fast-paced, team-oriented environment, this may be the opportunity for you! This position offers an excellent compensation and benefits package, including comprehensive medical/dental, 401(k) with a company match, discounted stock purchase, discounts on mortgages, homes, appliances, and much more!Come see why Toll Brothers has been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry! APPLY ONLINE TODAY!  As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",AllReal Estate/Property ManagementConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-construction-manager-superintendent-job-houston-tx-us-169776486.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=19,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,dfee219314926a3d2a2a52b96f0341bc
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Baker Botts, a full-service, leading international law firm recognized for our understanding of the industries we serve, is seeking an individual to lead the business development and marketing initiatives for the Litigation practice. The Litigation practice at Baker Botts is frequently recognized as a leader in the field, and with more than 200 lawyers, our clients trust us with their complex business issues and critical litigation. We draw upon our global resources to help clients resolve legal problems and minimize risk in virtually any venue in the world. During the first 12 weeks of 2015, the firm won 18 significant trial and other litigation matters for clients. This is a full time, Firmwide, exempt position which will be resident in our Houston office.Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Plan, develop and execute projects and programs that support the Litigation Department strategic plan; track success ratio. Support client engagement initiatives, including client feedback/satisfaction debriefs and referral/advocacy initiatives, training for enhanced client service strategies, contact origination and relationship development, and education/thought leadership initiatives. Provide direction and manage production of proposals, PowerPoint presentations and RFP responses for the department’s practices; track success ratio. Provide direction and manage execution of practice conference sponsorships, client presentations and seminars, client dinners and other events related to the promotion of the department. Drive awareness/recognition and enhance quality and brand perception of the department’s lawyers, practices and experience. Manage submissions for major awards, comprehensive survey response campaigns (e.g. Chambers), and other PR-related initiatives to further the awareness and positioning of the department's practices and lawyers. Develop and manage the annual department budget. Coordinate with lawyers and others in Client Relations to develop and distribute legal updates; maintain quality of distribution lists for the same. Contribute to the coaching, mentoring and development of Client Relations staff members in support of department initiatives. Firmwide projects as assigned.Qualifications: Bachelor's degree required; advanced degree a plus. Five or more years of professional services industry experience; two or more years of business development or management experience preferred. Experience in developing marketing, business development and public relations strategies for litigation market. Able to work well with a variety levels within an organization and possess diplomacy, enthusiasm, perseverance and a sense of humor; experience working on decentralized teams a plus. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Strong organizational ability, and project management skills. Should possess solid business acumen and experience in researching and interpreting company data; strong understanding of Litigation concepts and language a plus. Strong skills in MS Office software, particularly PowerPoint. Experience with InterAction a plus; knowledge of web-based legal and/or other database systems a plus, particularly Docket Navigator, PACER and MonitorSuite. Some overtime and travel is required.Application Requirements: Cover Letter Resume Writing Sample Baker Botts L.L.P. is a Federal contractor and an Equal Opportunity Employer. Baker Botts is subject to Executive Order 11246 and is required to take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities. Baker Botts considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, gender, sex, age, religion, creed, national origin, citizenship, marital status, sexual orientation, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, gender identity or expression, genetic information or any other basis protected by federal, state or local.",Business Development Manager - Litigation Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77002",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-manager-litigation-job-houston-tx-us-169895977.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=13,,Legal,d6c30f4b587523535a67f3f9e4240c85
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Position is responsible for scheduling patient appointments, ensuring medical necessity compliance, verifying eligibility, and posting payments.Position is responsible for scheduling patient appointments, ensuring medical necessity compliance, verifying eligibility, and posting payments.Minimum Qualifications:High school graduate. Two years of experience in a hospital or customer service setting. Ability to multi-task. Proficient typing/keyboarding skills. Demonstrates commitment to the Partners-in-Caring process by integrating our culture in all internal and external customer interactions; delivers on our brand promise of “we advance health” through innovation, accountability, empowerment, collaboration, compassion and results while ensuring one Memorial Hermann.Principle Accountabilities:Schedules patient appointments and enters required information in the computer system in an accurate and timely manner. Obtains demographic, insurance and financial information from patient or guarantor. Enters information in computer system with a high degree of accuracy. Explains all required forms to the patient or guarantor and obtains the necessary signatures. Ensures medical necessity compliance by obtaining necessary data, reviewing Compliance System, communicating information to patient or guarantor and obtaining necessary signatures. Protects the financial integrity of the facility by collecting patient liability, establishing payment arrangements, discussing payment options and screening for eligibility. Verifies insurance eligibility and benefits and ensures all notifications and authorizations are completed within the required timeframes. Posts payments in the computer system and generates the appropriate patient receipts. Monitors, reviews and resolves patient account issues on assigned reports. Communicates in an effective and professional manner with Physicians, ancillary departments, nursing units, physicians’ office staff, insurance companies, as well as patients and their families (all Patient Access customers). Completes thorough and accurate documentation. Ensures safe care to patients, staff and visitors; adheres to all Memorial Hermann policies, procedures, and standards, within budgetary specifications, including time management, supply management, productivity, and quality of service. Promotes individual professional growth and development by meeting requirements for mandatory/continuing education, skills competency, supports department-based goals which contribute to the success of the organization; serves as preceptor, mentor, and resource to less experienced staff. Other duties as assigned.MNTRJJ",CCC Patient Access Rep II - Cypress Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ccc-patient-access-rep-ii-cypress-job-houston-tx-us-169098127.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),127bef44dab7d5a87ecd9d819361c8d2
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company: Evoqua Water Technologies LLC (US)Division: IP & S - High Purity SolutionsLocation: TX - HoustonReq ID: 131448Position Title: Strategic Account Manager - Houston - High Purity SolutionsExperience Level: Mid LevelEducation Required: Bachelors Degree or equivalent experienceTravel Required: YesCompany Description:Evoqua Water Technologies is the global leader in helping municipalities and industrial customers protect and improve the world’s water. Evoqua has a more than 100-year heritage of transforming water and wastewater through innovation and industry firsts, market-leading expertise, and unmatched customer service. Its treatment systems and services enable regulatory and environmental compliance, ensure uninterrupted quantity and quality of water, increase efficiency through water reuse, and prepare customers for next-generation demands. For more information, visit www.evoqua.com Job Description:Evoqua Water Technologies is searching for a Strategic Account Manager representing the High Purity Solutions Business Segment. This position will report to the Director of Strategic Accounts and can be located anywhere in the United States. The primary responsibility is to identify and secure long term agreements and partnership with select Strategic Accounts to deliver transformation growth to Evoqua Water Technologies. Additional responsibilities:*Grow all revenue and relationship streams in the specified target accounts.*Present Evoqua Water Technologies to select strategic customers to gain partnerships and commitment for significant bookings and revenue growth.*Development of new accounts that meet the needs of the market and customer base.*Maintain customer contact with major customers and provides and maintains positive direction for strategic accounts and prospects.Qualifications the ideal candidate will have:• Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Marketing, or Business Administration,although a combination of education and experience will also be considered• At least 8+ years directly related experience in sales or marketing watertreatment systems and services• Must have a valid Driver’s License and clean driving record (must meeteligibility requirements to drive a Siemens company vehicle)• Successful and proven experience in revenue growth and partneringrelationships with external and internal customers• Excellent communication and presentation skills#LI-AP1Equal Employment Opportunity StatementEvoqua Water Technologies is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran or military status. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. .Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 40%",Strategic Account Manager - Houston - High Purity Solutions Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Company: Evoqua Water Technologies LLC (US)Division: IP & S - High Purity SolutionsLocation: TX - HoustonReq ID: 131448Position Title: Strategic Account Manager - Houston - High Purity SolutionsExperience Level: Mid LevelEducation Required: Bachelors Degree or equivalent experienceTravel Required: YesCompany Description:Evoqua Water Technologies is the global leader in helping municipalities and industrial customers protect and improve the world’s water. Evoqua has a more than 100-year heritage of transforming water and wastewater through innovation and industry firsts, market-leading expertise, and unmatched customer service. Its treatment systems and services enable regulatory and environmental compliance, ensure uninterrupted quantity and quality of water, increase efficiency through water reuse, and prepare customers for next-generation demands. For more information, visit www.evoqua.com Job Description:Evoqua Water Technologies is searching for a Strategic Account Manager representing the High Purity Solutions Business Segment. This position will report to the Director of Strategic Accounts and can be located anywhere in the United States. The primary responsibility is to identify and secure long term agreements and partnership with select Strategic Accounts to deliver transformation growth to Evoqua Water Technologies. Additional responsibilities:*Grow all revenue and relationship streams in the specified target accounts.*Present Evoqua Water Technologies to select strategic customers to gain partnerships and commitment for significant bookings and revenue growth.*Development of new accounts that meet the needs of the market and customer base.*Maintain customer contact with major customers and provides and maintains positive direction for strategic accounts and prospects.Qualifications the ideal candidate will have:• Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Marketing, or Business Administration,although a combination of education and experience will also be considered• At least 8+ years directly related experience in sales or marketing watertreatment systems and services• Must have a valid Driver’s License and clean driving record (must meeteligibility requirements to drive a Siemens company vehicle)• Successful and proven experience in revenue growth and partneringrelationships with external and internal customers• Excellent communication and presentation skills#LI-AP1Equal Employment Opportunity StatementEvoqua Water Technologies is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran or military status. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. .Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 40%",Chemicals/Petro-ChemicalsManufacturing - OtherEngineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/strategic-account-manager-houston-high-purity-solutions-job-houston-tx-us-169863528.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,3bbff6ea50f2bc065da87e991a5212e4
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pharmaceutical Medical Field Sales Representative or Clinical Nurse Educator to drive sales of human growth hormone product. We are looking for smart, highly motivated professionals, who will be responsible for developing ongoing relationships with pediatric endocrinology offices by providing service excellence, including the introduction and familiarization of educational materials, patient resources and rationale for prescribing.  Extremely competitive pay with large bonus potential. Pharmaceutical Field Sales Representative / Clinical Nurse Educator Core Job ResponsibilitiesRepresent our client’s values and mission to patients and caregivers with strict observation of corporate policies concerning appropriate use and approved regulatory claims in support of their Human Growth Hormone launch.Drive sales of human growth hormone product in manner consistent with client philosophy, leadership principles and company policies.Responsible for developing ""whole staff"" relationships with pediatric endocrinology offices by providing service excellence, including the introduction and familiarization of educational materials, patient resources and rationale for prescribing.Responsible for developing relationships with specialty pharmacies within geographical areas of responsibility.Facilitate peer level understanding and adoption of patient and caregiver tools with the goal of expanding human growth hormone product prescribing.Develop client’s ongoing business interests among a targeted audience of highly specialized pediatric endocrinologists to expand appropriate use of product in line with business objectives.Possess excellent communication skills, including expertise with both one-on-one and group educational instruction.Work well independently and as part of a team structure within a matrix organization.Effectively deliver product’s value proposition and translate client’s service offerings into differentiated patient benefits.Position Qualifications:Bachelor degree required (nursing degree a plus)Advanced training certification and/or credentials in pediatric nursing and/or endocrinology (a plus)At least 2 years field sales experienceStrong business acumen including account management, report analysis and managed care understandingPrior sales experience in healthcare a plusStrong desire to explore the commercial side of healthcare deliveryDemonstrated ability to perform and achieve stated goals (big plus)Engaging personality and comfortable developing professional relationshipsDesire for professional growth in a challenging new roleSmart, Curious, AmbitiousTerritory distance of 320 miles - Houston, San Antonio, Austin, Baton Rouge, New Orleans, LafayetteSome overnight travel requiredValid driver’s licenseExcellent benefits, car allowance and expense reimbursementCare for customers and patients, share your knowledge with customers and your teammates, dare to challenge yourself to achieve stated goalsThe above is intended to describe the essential job functions and requirements for the performance of this job. It is not construed to be an exhaustive statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements. ",Pharmaceutical Field Sales Rep-Nurse Educator Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare ServicesMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/pharmaceutical-field-sales-rep-nurse-educator-job-houston-tx-us-169736423.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,80353b14b09ef9e46da638ccccb67955
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"You’re looking for an opportunity to do something incredible, right? As an industry leader we’re dedicated to connecting the world in groundbreaking and entertaining ways. And that’s when our Technology team members can really shine, combining your passion for innovation and drive towards the future. From mobile apps to products and services, here’s your chance to create and develop life-changing innovations. As a Senior Sourcing Specialist you will be in an individual contributor role and you’ll have responsibility for: Developing and administering contract administration policies, systems, procedures and methods. Providing interpretation of terms and conditions of contractual obligations and may negotiate contract modifications, follow-up quotations, revisions, terms and conditions with vendors. Reviewing and administrating long-term and/or blanket purchase contracts Commercial contract issues, negotiations and/or administration of licensing agreements including renewal, new business, invoicing, credit holds, receivable issues and consolidations. This position may be responsible for contributing to AT&T's compliance with environmental laws and regulations as applicable to its job function. This may include, but is not limited to, work related to fuel tanks, emergency and stand-by generators, boilers, hazardous waste, hazardous materials, batteries, manholes and vaults, water wells, linear and other construction projects, water discharge, or air emissions. Additional Responsibilities: Administering contracts in accordance with company and customer policies and procedures, provide interpretation and analysis of contract documents and reviews and evaluation of customer requests for changes in or revisions of contracts that involve technical specifications, cost, or schedule impact on the company Use skills as a seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of industry practices and company policies and procedures including resolving a wide range of issues You’ll earn an amazing benefits package including: Employee discounts and perks Paid time off Learning and development opportunities to help you along your career path Tuition aid 401(k) savings plan Medical, dental, and vision coverage and MORE AT&T is leading the way to the future - for customers, businesses and the industry. We're developing new technologies to make it easier for our customers to stay connected to their world. With a network that covers 225 countries, including more than 120 million customers, we’d say we’re well on our way. Together, we’ve built a premier integrated communications company and an amazing place to work and grow. Team up with industry innovators every time you walk into work, building the world you always imagined. So what do you say? Let’s do great things together. Our employees say it best, watch here! Apply now and in case your email filter doesn’t recognize us, please keep an eye on SPAM and junk folders so you don’t miss a message. We’ll Require: Strong verbal and written communication skills Strong organization and project management skills Strong experience with Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access) Ability to gather quantitative data from a variety of systems Strong knowledge of Outside Plant Engineering and Construction processes Ability to analyze complex data from a variety of sources and make appropriate recommendations Commitment to teamwork and quality The most successful new hires have had: Four year degree in Business Administration or Procurement Two or more years experience in the construction industry Working knowledge of time reporting systems and procedures Strong cost/efficiency focus and knowledge of the competitive environment",Senior Sourcing Specialist Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-sourcing-specialist-job-houston-tx-us-169992814.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=5,,,7e65a7ad6eca86ac18fb30758777db03
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Account Representative  Colonial Life, an established leader in the corporate benefits industry that’s been in business for more than 77 years, has an immediate opening for a sales representative to join its market-leading team in northHouston, TX. The person in this position is responsible for building and maintaining relationships with business owners and employees by offering financial protection benefits at the worksite. The ideal candidate for this position is an enthusiastic, career-minded, self-motivated individual with a proven record of professionalism and success in fast-paced environments. The individual selected will receive comprehensive sales training along with dependable home office support to grow his/her own business and realize the unlimited growth potential unique to the employee benefits industry and to Colonial Life as a leader in the national market. This position provides:·         Competitive compensation·         Residual and renewal income opportunities for life·         Incentives such as world-class travel experiences offered annually to top performers·         Unparalleled training and support including classroom training, hands-on, field training and a dedicated instructor. Desired skills and experience:·         Energetic, self-starter attitude·         Previous sales experience preferred·         Life and Health Insurance License is required, but can be attained during the onboarding process Learn more about Colonial Life and the specific responsibilities of this position at http://www.coloniallife.com/career-seekers/join-our-sales-team.  Interested candidate should submit resume for consideration to Lora Watson at lora.watson@coloniallife.com",Account Representative Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Houston, TX 77073",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/account-representative-job-houston-tx-us-169657140.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,dcc678a029106b9e7a54e0c6d4a7056e
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-houston-tx-us-169290660.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8cead2a8b645fdcc2cb0c06917853b52
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:29:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse Full Time Days - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279629 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Registered Nurse Full Time Days - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse Full Time Days - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279629 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-full-time-days-kindred-hospital-sugar-land-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913331.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,bcaa30887f4b740f95eb4400c70e8934
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:28:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:   Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties.   Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands.",Utility Worker / FTE Custodial Service Worker - CHI St. Luke's Baylor Med Center - EVS FTE,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77025",,http://jobview.monster.com/utility-worker-fte-custodial-service-worker-chi-st-luke's-baylor-med-center-evs-fte-wknds-job-houston-tx-us-169993171.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=17,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,1ee04a5cf94e0e378d5dace5941dfd71
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:15:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Staff Development Manager DescriptionSummaryEnsures facility is in compliance with regulatory requirements relating to staff credentialing and education. Provides services associated with ongoing professional development of staff at the facility.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesConducts new employee orientation and coordinates competency completion.Ensures for or delivers annual mandatory and continuous education for staff using internal or external resources according to state and federal regulations and company policy.Teaches certain in-house courses, such as the NA training program, special care unit training, etc.Coordinates employee health program (immunizations, flu shots, physical exams, etc.)Monitors and ensures current licensure and certifications of facility staff.Maintains employee education, training and health files.May assist in the screening and hiring of nursing staff.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Performs other duties as assigned. Staff Development Manager RequirementsQualificationsOne to three (1-3) years experience in health care field, teaching, or training and development.May be filled by Registered Nurse, LPN, or a non-nursing individual who otherwise qualifies by way of experience or education.Physical Demands & EnvironmentEmployee is frequently required to stand, walk, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, talk and hear. Employee will occasionally lift objects weighing up to 50 lbs. Employee may occasionally be exposed to blood or other body fluids. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Staff Development Manager RN - Jacinto Nursing Home Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-development-manager-rn-jacinto-nursing-home-job-houston-tx-us-169959558.aspx?mescoid=1100029001001&jobPosition=5,,,46412acc265867832e7179afc1c3e21b
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:14:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, one of the most extensive health leaders in the Texas Medical Center and U.S. Gulf Coast region, is seeking a Clinical Systems Developer/Administrator to assist with the building and maintenance of interfaces.Essential skillsAt least 5 + years' experience within HealthcareAt least 1 year Rhapsody experience1-2 years with other interfacing enginesBuild and programming experience - Java and JavaScriptHL7 experienceStrong verbal and written communication skillsContact Yvonne Humphries, Lead Recruiter, for more information!512-501-5798",Clinical Systems Developer/Admin Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/clinical-systems-developer-admin-job-houston-tx-us-169898434.aspx?mescoid=1700164001001&jobPosition=11,,,184ed6984d4aafe70b7767357ef74f9b
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:21:04:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior .Net DeveloperSenior .Net Developer Responsibilities:- Modern Agile development methodology experience Work on Enterprise level    Applications - Develop clean, modular code and use best coding practices- Mentor other developers within the organization- Work cross-functionally to evaluate the relative importance/need for product initiatives- Make accomplishments that have tangible impact on the organization- Understands challenges to the organization and develops solutions- Tackle tough engineering and product problems- A sense of urgency and the ability to take full ownership of projects from design to implementation and deployment  Senior .Net Developer Requirements:- Extensive experience with object-oriented design and development techniques- Knowledge of design patterns, DRY, SOLID, Clean code and other core principles- Comfortable in both .Net and client side JavaScript and HTML with emphasis on    the .Net side- Enterprise level design and development experience- Experience with Entity Frameworks- C#, ASP.net,  MVC- Agile experience  Scrum / Kanban- Positive work attitude, self motivator, quick learner, and team player- Good verbal and written communication skills- Strong ability to troubleshoot software problems- Fluency with front-end and back-end technologies- Comfortable with full-stack projects- Intellectually curious, inventive and passionate  Senior .Net Developer Keywords:Software Engineer, Software architect, .Net developer, C#, MVC, ASP.Net, JavaScript, HTML5, Azure, No-SQL, My-SQL, Redis, Node.js, Python, Perl, PHP, LAMP,  Agile, Scrum, Software Engineer, SQL, Entity Frameworks, GIT, LINQ,",Senior .Net Developer Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-net-developer-job-knoxville-tn-us-167405087.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,"75,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",IT/Software Development,47390784b9466a2b4a9ef785c582b0b6
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:20:40:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"KinderCare Education is the nation’s leader in early childhood education. We nourish curiosity through purposeful experiences to create a future full of lifelong learners. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to create a world of learning, joy and adventure for more than 161,000 children ages six-weeks through 12 years every day.   Our Teachers bring warmth, patience, and understanding to the classroom every day, encouraging children to learn and grow. They inspire children to be lifelong learners using our nationally recognized curriculum that promotes social, physical, verbal, and cognitive development. Our Teachers are committed to making their center successful and know that creating meaningful relationships with children, families, and their team play a crucial role in that success. When you join our team as a Teacher you will: Implement KCE’s curriculum in a way that is consistent with the unique needs of each child Create a safe, nurturing environment where children can play and learn. Partner and communicate with parents, with a shared desire to provide the best care and education for their children.   Support your center’s success; partner with center staff and leadership to achieve goals around enrollment, accreditation, and engagement. Cultivate positive relationships with families, teachers, state licensing authorities, community contacts and corporate partners. Required Skills and Experience: A love for children and a strong desire to make a difference every day.  Ability to build relationships with families and coworkers and create a dynamic environment where play and learning happens. Outstanding customer service skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to multi-task and manage multiple situations effectively Must possess active Child Development Associate (CDA) Credential and meet NAEYC candidacy requirements (or willing to obtain) CPR and First Aid Certification or willingness to obtain 1+ year Early Childhood Education Experience (preferred) Must meet state specific guidelines for the role Must be physically able to use a computer with basic proficiency, lift a minimum of 40 pounds, and work indoors or outdoors.  Must be able to assume postures in low levels to allow physical and visual contact with children, see and hear well enough to keep children safe, and engage in physical activity with children. Ability to speak, read, and write English.   The benefits our career professionals enjoy: In addition to a rewarding career where you help shape children's futures, KinderCare Education provides a competitive compensation package. Benefits include:   Medical, dental and vision Discounted child care Generous paid time off Education assistance and reimbursement Medical expense reimbursement/ Life insurance/Disability benefits/ Health and wellness programs 401(k) savings and investment plan with employer match   KinderCare Education employs more than 32,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our devoted family of education providers leads the nation in accreditation and includes KinderCare® Learning Centers, CCLC®, Champions® Before- and After-School Programs, Cambridge Schools™, Knowledge Beginnings® and The Grove School®.   KinderCare Education is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.",Teacher Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77084",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/teacher-job-houston-tx-us-169474073.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=9,,Education/Training,8146f2f54581ee9af972ebe2f18c31d2
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:20:40:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Chart/Date Abstraction Nurse in the Knoxville, TN area!Responsibilities include:  •Retrieval, review, and abstraction of medical record data, required for multiple HEDIS hybrid measures  •Entering data into a HEDIS software system  •Collaborate with clinical and non-clinical staff regarding provider scheduling and on-site medical record retrieval.  •Perform duties in a professional manner, utilizing time and resources efficiently Qualifications & Requirements: •Active and unrestricted RN or LPN license in the state of Tennessee or compact state RN or LPN license. •Knowledge and experience of HEDIS data abstraction methods •Experience in medical record review •Valid Driver’s license - Some travel involved •Professional appearance as will be visiting physician offices•Must be able to work independently and have excellent organizational skills •Excellent telephone and communication skills required •Working knowledge of Windows and Microsoft Office, specifically Excel, is required •Must successfully complete the training program offered, and meet & maintain acceptable performance goalsIf interested, please send your most UP TO DATE resume to Samantha at Sadames@judge.com or contact my direct line at 610-617-1483.Thank You!Samantha Adames",Chart/Data Abstraction Nurse Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/chart-data-abstraction-nurse-job-knoxville-tn-us-169611958.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,98fcb782fcdf45e42aba3a69bb9516b3
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:20:31:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Termite Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-termite treatments as outlined in job orders. This will often require that you enter crawl spaces, attics, and other confined spaces to ensure complete coverage. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Applies company products to residential structures according to work orders and as needed based on service requests; completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Responsibilities • Prepares job sites for termiticide treatment. • Applies termiticides to residential structures according to work order specifications, safety procedures, and label instructions. • Verifies that job specifications are appropriate for work orders. • Drives company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. • Maintains vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. • Completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write simple correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintain licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. • Maintain valid driver’s license. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Termite Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/termite-control-technician-%E2%80%93-field-service-rep-entry-level-job-houston-tx-us-169572839.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,38809ed7eee1e2d81687d9ab05a9c957
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:20:29:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"RPS Klotz Associates is hiring a Project Engineering in our Houston, Texas Municipal Services practice. Job Requirements:BS or MS Degree in Civil Engineering. Must have 3-4 years of experience in a wide variety of municipal engineering projects including water, sanitary sewer, drainage and roadways. Must have experience in AutoCAD, PS&E preparation and coordination with governmental agencies, preparing preliminary engineering reports, bid item quantities and construction estimates. Excellent technical writing skills.  Local experience in the consulting industry a  plus. ",Project Engineer Municipal Services Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77079",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-municipal-services-job-houston-tx-us-169839370.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=2,,Engineering,8c2929c2b73cab96e64fc35932ff2464
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:19:31:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"KinderCare Education is the nation’s leader in early childhood education. We nourish curiosity through purposeful experiences to create a future full of lifelong learners. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to create a world of learning, joy and adventure for more than 161,000 children ages six-weeks through 12 years every day.   Our Teachers bring warmth, patience, and understanding to the classroom every day, encouraging children to learn and grow. They inspire children to be lifelong learners using our nationally recognized curriculum that promotes social, physical, verbal, and cognitive development. Our Teachers are committed to making their center successful and know that creating meaningful relationships with children, families, and their team play a crucial role in that success. When you join our team as a Teacher you will: Implement KCE’s curriculum in a way that is consistent with the unique needs of each child Create a safe, nurturing environment where children can play and learn. Partner and communicate with parents, with a shared desire to provide the best care and education for their children.   Support your center’s success; partner with center staff and leadership to achieve goals around enrollment, accreditation, and engagement. Cultivate positive relationships with families, teachers, state licensing authorities, community contacts and corporate partners. Required Skills and Experience: A love for children and a strong desire to make a difference every day.  Ability to build relationships with families and coworkers and create a dynamic environment where play and learning happens. Outstanding customer service skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to multi-task and manage multiple situations effectively Must possess active Child Development Associate (CDA) Credential and meet NAEYC candidacy requirements (or willing to obtain) CPR and First Aid Certification or willingness to obtain 1+ year Early Childhood Education Experience (preferred) Must meet state specific guidelines for the role Must be physically able to use a computer with basic proficiency, lift a minimum of 40 pounds, and work indoors or outdoors.  Must be able to assume postures in low levels to allow physical and visual contact with children, see and hear well enough to keep children safe, and engage in physical activity with children. Ability to speak, read, and write English.   The benefits our career professionals enjoy: In addition to a rewarding career where you help shape children's futures, KinderCare Education provides a competitive compensation package. Benefits include:   Medical, dental and vision Discounted child care Generous paid time off Education assistance and reimbursement Medical expense reimbursement/ Life insurance/Disability benefits/ Health and wellness programs 401(k) savings and investment plan with employer match   KinderCare Education employs more than 32,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our devoted family of education providers leads the nation in accreditation and includes KinderCare® Learning Centers, CCLC®, Champions® Before- and After-School Programs, Cambridge Schools™, Knowledge Beginnings® and The Grove School®.   KinderCare Education is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.",Afterschool STEM Teacher Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77083",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/afterschool-stem-teacher-job-houston-tx-us-169910250.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=13,,Education/Training,3dda46b1bf364a121e8fab765c631da3
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:19:29:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279631 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Night",Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279631 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Night",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-full-time-nights-kindred-hospital-sugar-land-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913329.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,a30d431cd6895ae28fcac8b8d31a81cc
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:19:25:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Houston W, TX YBWBD08S-POS_75063112-1DescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families.Sanofi Genzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on specialty areas including: immunology, oncology and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Sanofi Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Sanofi Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.At Sanofi Genzyme, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Dupilumab Area Business ManagerThe Area Business Manager (ABM) is responsible for engaging Dermatologists and other key customers within an assigned geography and presenting clinically focused selling message to create and grow revenue and to consistently deliver product goals. The ABM will demonstrate initiative, drive, and independence, and take ownership for meeting and exceeding individual business goals. This will be accomplished by driving performance and delivering results in a compliant manner with a high degree of integrity strictly following all Sanofi Genzyme US policies and in compliance with all policies and procedures governing the promotion of pharmaceutical/biological products in the US. Engage Dermatology customers within assigned geographical territory and deliver clinically focused message to introduce, launch, grow brand-share and revenue, and to consistently deliver on product goals.Partner with multiple collaboration stakeholders: Regeneron Sales Professional counterpart, Reimbursement and Access Specialists, and Clinical brand and corporate objectives in assigned territory Develop strategy and execute tactics within key accounts in the Dermatology therapeutic area to generate product utilization.Develop strong working relationships with Atopic Dermatitis experts and all additional Dermatology specialists in assigned geography as well as nurses, office staff and other important health care personnel and key patient advocacy support groups as directed. Coordinate with other Dermatology field specialists such as Regional Science Liaisons, Field Account Specialists, Account Management and Nurse Educators in their territory to ensure optimal account success. Coordinate and communicate with other field-based and home office personnel teams to proactively address customer needs, market dynamics and trends and develop strategies which support brand and corporate objectives within their assigned geography. Participate and help lead initiatives to support sales success as assigned (e.g. participate in industry related congresses, local and regional meetings and medical conferences).Provide site level in-service training as required by account.Plan, organize, and sponsor local promotional speakers programs and activities.Effectively executes short and long term strategic plans.Maximize budget allocated to the geographic territory assigned to support execution of strategies and tactics developed to generate and grow the business.Drive results by identifying key opportunities and developing strategic plans to enhance and grow territory business.Own business opportunities within respective geographic area, which includes coordination and calling upon large group practices and other key targets to drive overall product results.Establish relationship with thought leaders in assigned territory. Primary objective is to drive industry leading customer value. Lead cross-functional teams in the implementation of Sanofi US programs and brand specific strategies in assigned geography.Allocate resources in accordance with business opportunities.QualificationsBasic QualificationsBachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university5+ years of healthcare sales experience (pharmaceutical, biotech or medical device), with 2+ years Dermatology experience strongly preferredDemonstrated ability to learn and apply technical and scientific product-related informationAbility to travel to meetings/trainings/programs as necessary - additional travel may be required within the assigned territoryProven success and positive track record of consistent sales performance in complex markets with diverse customer segments operating with a high degree of integrity within compliance guidelines Ability to operate as a “team player” in cooperation with collaboration partners and internal colleagues to reach common goalsValid Driver’s LicensePreferred Qualifications2 years selling sub-cutaneous self-injectable (or office administered IV) biologics 2 years of selling experience for Atopic Dermatitis, or other Immunology disorders such as, Psoriasis, Multiple Sclerosis, Crohn’s Disease or Ulcerative Colitis and others strongly preferred.Demonstrate advanced clinically-based selling skills Results oriented with a proven track record of success with product launchesExperience with in-servicing and training office staff, nurses and office managersDemonstrate a passion and learning aptitude for science and is proactive in strengthening knowledge related to disease-state, treatment options and healthcare trends #LI-GZJob:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Texas-HoustonJob Posting:Jul 13, 2016, 11:55:49 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Houston W,,"Houston, TX",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/dermatology-dupilumab-area-business-manager-houston-w-tx-ybwbd08s-job-houston-tx-us-169746071.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,4f0ccbc6c1c23ba2a23e9f445c4f85cf
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:19:22:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Civil Assistant with Civil Earthworks/Underground Utilities experience needed to join growing team in Houston Your new company Civil assistant Superintendent needed to join the growing team in Houston. With offices in Texas and also around the country, this Civil Construction Company works on Earthworks, Site Preparation, Underground Utilities and site Excavation . Our client prides themselves on quality construction, this is how they have become a leader in the industry and will continue for years to come. Your new role With an impressive portfolio of concrete and highway projects completed, this Civil contractor has a pipeline of work in place. What you'll need to succeed You must have a minimum of one year experience as a civil construction supervisor either working as a superintendent or an assistant superintendent and a proven background within the Earthworks, Site Preparation, Underground Utilities and site Excavation or similar is a must to be considered for this great job opportunity. As an Underground Utilities expert you will have strong experience in the Estimating, Preconstruction, Value Engineering and delivery of challenging projects in the utilities sector. What you'll get in return Your success in this role will require you to be an experienced civil assistant superintendent, 1+ years' experience within the civil construction industry. Along with the ability to communicate well, as an assistant superintendent, you'll be leading a team on the ground and making sure that contractors are keeping to schedule and costs, you will be liaising with the entire team to complete another successful and safe project. What you need to do now In exchange for your experience and hard work, you will have the opportunity to work with contractor with a rich history, strong reputation, and solid pipeline.",Civil Assistant Superintendent Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/civil-assistant-superintendent-job-houston-tx-us-169652264.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=3,"50,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,d2ae1356af6760684a84aa090714a2dd
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:19:08:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Houston E, TX YBWBD07S-POS_75063102-1DescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families.Sanofi Genzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on specialty areas including: immunology, oncology and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Sanofi Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Sanofi Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.At Sanofi Genzyme, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Dupilumab Area Business ManagerThe Area Business Manager (ABM) is responsible for engaging Dermatologists and other key customers within an assigned geography and presenting clinically focused selling message to create and grow revenue and to consistently deliver product goals. The ABM will demonstrate initiative, drive, and independence, and take ownership for meeting and exceeding individual business goals. This will be accomplished by driving performance and delivering results in a compliant manner with a high degree of integrity strictly following all Sanofi Genzyme US policies and in compliance with all policies and procedures governing the promotion of pharmaceutical/biological products in the US. Engage Dermatology customers within assigned geographical territory and deliver clinically focused message to introduce, launch, grow brand-share and revenue, and to consistently deliver on product goals.Partner with multiple collaboration stakeholders: Regeneron Sales Professional counterpart, Reimbursement and Access Specialists, and Clinical brand and corporate objectives in assigned territory Develop strategy and execute tactics within key accounts in the Dermatology therapeutic area to generate product utilization.Develop strong working relationships with Atopic Dermatitis experts and all additional Dermatology specialists in assigned geography as well as nurses, office staff and other important health care personnel and key patient advocacy support groups as directed. Coordinate with other Dermatology field specialists such as Regional Science Liaisons, Field Account Specialists, Account Management and Nurse Educators in their territory to ensure optimal account success. Coordinate and communicate with other field-based and home office personnel teams to proactively address customer needs, market dynamics and trends and develop strategies which support brand and corporate objectives within their assigned geography. Participate and help lead initiatives to support sales success as assigned (e.g. participate in industry related congresses, local and regional meetings and medical conferences).Provide site level in-service training as required by account.Plan, organize, and sponsor local promotional speakers programs and activities.Effectively executes short and long term strategic plans.Maximize budget allocated to the geographic territory assigned to support execution of strategies and tactics developed to generate and grow the business.Drive results by identifying key opportunities and developing strategic plans to enhance and grow territory business.Own business opportunities within respective geographic area, which includes coordination and calling upon large group practices and other key targets to drive overall product results.Establish relationship with thought leaders in assigned territory. Primary objective is to drive industry leading customer value. Lead cross-functional teams in the implementation of Sanofi US programs and brand specific strategies in assigned geography.Allocate resources in accordance with business opportunities.QualificationsBasic QualificationsBachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university5+ years of healthcare sales experience (pharmaceutical, biotech or medical device), with 2+ years Dermatology experience strongly preferredDemonstrated ability to learn and apply technical and scientific product-related informationAbility to travel to meetings/trainings/programs as necessary - additional travel may be required within the assigned territoryProven success and positive track record of consistent sales performance in complex markets with diverse customer segments operating with a high degree of integrity within compliance guidelines Ability to operate as a “team player” in cooperation with collaboration partners and internal colleagues to reach common goalsValid Driver’s LicensePreferred Qualifications2 years selling sub-cutaneous self-injectable (or office administered IV) biologics 2 years of selling experience for Atopic Dermatitis, or other Immunology disorders such as, Psoriasis, Multiple Sclerosis, Crohn’s Disease or Ulcerative Colitis and others strongly preferred.Demonstrate advanced clinically-based selling skills Results oriented with a proven track record of success with product launchesExperience with in-servicing and training office staff, nurses and office managersDemonstrate a passion and learning aptitude for science and is proactive in strengthening knowledge related to disease-state, treatment options and healthcare trends #LI-GZJob:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Texas-HoustonJob Posting:Jul 13, 2016, 11:52:55 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Houston E,,"Houston, TX",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/dermatology-dupilumab-area-business-manager-houston-e-tx-ybwbd07s-job-houston-tx-us-169746068.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,caa45e27b6d62792883bcdd27de486c8
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:19:06:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Bariatric /DHC Coordinator - Licensed health care professional - nurse/dietitianBariatric Coordinator - Full-time DaysThe Nurse Navigator facilitates access to medical care for patients. Helps the patient/families navigate through possible barriers to care and ensures the patient is able to get medical access and referral resources in an efficient and expedited manner. Communicate effectively with patients, their families and their health care providers while offering medical guidance, education, support and advocating for patients to ensure proper coordination of care. The Nurse Navigator integrates education, research, management, leadership and consultation into their roles to achieve quality outcomes and to retain patient care within the Memorial Hermann Health System.Minimum Qualifications:Education: Graduate of an accredited School of Professional Nursing with a Bachelor’s of Science Nursing degree required.Experience: Three (3) years of nursing experience in intended practice.Licenses/Certifications:Registered Nurse, current license and in good standing in the state of TexasBasic Life Support certificateMust have excellent interpersonal communication skills and have the ability to teach, analyze and problem solve with relative ease. Must have good decision making skills.Performs duties in a manner to promote quality patient care and customer service/satisfaction, while promoting safety, cost efficiency, and a commitment to the CQI process.Demonstrates commitment to the Partners-in-Caring process by integrating our culture in all internal and external customer interactions; delivers on our brand promise of “we advance health” through innovation, accountability, empowerment, collaboration, compassion and results while ensuring one Memorial Hermann.Principle Accountabilities:Works closely with physicians in all specialty areas to coordinate patient’s care plan communication; works with multidisciplinary team to maintain and implement up-to-date coordinated care plan; communicates with all members of the healthcare team on behalf of the patientUses clinical protocols to refer patients to appropriate specialist for diagnosis or treatment and assists patients and their families in obtaining referrals to needed specialists. Streamlines care path transitions and logistical issues. Provides support and counseling, as appropriate to the clinical situation. Triages patients’ clinical issues. Offers psychosocial/emotional support to patients/SO. Facilitates access to support networks and psychosocial assistance. Performs patient follow up post procedure/treatment. Educates patients/significant other (SO) on disease specifics and treatment options to enable patient-led treatment decisions. Provides disease specific material to patients. Facilitates patient/SO introduction to clinical trials.Builds relationships with referring physicians and potential referring physicians through education of physicians, office staff, attendance at departmental meetings, and through marketing calls. Coordinates services for physicians’ patients as requested by physicians. Serves as liaison between clinical specialists and family physicians. Documents physician contact where appropriate.Works with Nursing Leadership to create a work environment that facilitates and encourages nursing staff to demonstrate accountability for their own practice, an environment that empowers registered nurses at all levels of the organization to utilize critical thinking skills and to participate in decision making that affects their nursing practice. Participates in organizational and community initiatives to improve the professional practice of nursing and quality of patient outcomes/care.Responds to in-hospital consultations requested by nurses and documents accordingly in the medical record.Builds public awareness through presentation of lectures at meetings, participation in health fairs, and assistance with WEB site development.Practices in accordance with hospital policies and procedures, Texas Nurse Practice Act, ONS Professional Standards, Code of Ethics for Nursing and the institution’s nursing philosophy, professional practice model, and patient care delivery model and nursing strategic plan.Attends national/regional/local conferences pertinent to intended practice.Maintains knowledge of professional and industry trends.Reports monthly statistics.Ensures safe care to patients adhering to policies, procedures, and standards, within budgetary specifications, including time management, supply management, productivity, and accuracy of practice.Promotes individual professional growth and development by meeting requirements for mandatory/continuing education, skills competency, supports department-based goals which contribute to the success of the organization; serves as preceptor, mentor, and resource to less experienced staff.Ensures safe care to patients, staff and visitors; adheres to all Memorial Hermann policies, procedures, and standards within budgetary specifications including time management, supply management, productivity and quality of service.Promotes individual professional growth and development by meeting requirements for mandatory/continuing education and skills competency; supports department-based goals which contribute to the success of the organization; serves as preceptor, mentor and resource to less experienced staff.Other duties as assigned.MNTR",Bariatric Coordinator - Full-time Days Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/bariatric-coordinator-full-time-days-job-houston-tx-us-169098124.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),90c096c1d8f3331742b008c5d5cf75b4
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:18:16:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: TellerJob ID Number: 5257633-1Location: Houston,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionThis 38 hour full time position is located at our Westheimer and Lazy Hollow store. At Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. Tellers are the face of our company and represent Wells Fargo in the community. A Teller position with our team offers an opportunity to be part of one of America s greatest companies. You'll have exposure to a variety of responsibilities, people and experiences in a professional work environment - that's part of the fun! We value what’s right for our customers in everything we do. Everything we do, we do to protect the customer and the bank. Our teller’s role is to warmly welcome customers to our store, efficiently process the customer’s request, and build trust that Wells Fargo can help them with all of their financial needs. We want them to know about all of our innovative services, financial education information, as well as take advantage of the relationships we provide as Wells Fargo team members. Every teller is part of a team that is rated first, and most importantly, on the customers’ experience with the teams’ service. Every teller has her/his own scorecard with performance goals. Our best tellers constantly go the extra mile to greet customers and provide exceptional customer service, make them feel welcome and also engage them to learn about their financial goals. Reliable attendance is essential for success in this role. Your exciting role includes: Going the extra mile to greet customers, show them that we care, and make them feel welcome Asking questions to learn about their financial needs and, when the customer sees the value, introducing them to other Wells Fargo team members. Setting performance goals and working with your manager to increase your customer advocacy effectiveness through feedback and coaching Processing between 20-25 customer transactions each hour with no mistakes through patience, attention to detail, and the ability to follow procedures. Accurately maintaining and balancing a cash drawer. Delivering upon customer needs for products such as safe deposit boxes, merchant/vault, ATM processing, bonds and coupons, foreign currency and night drop. A happy, satisfied customer starts with you! At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others without being asked. We want team members who are committed to the success of the team. Tellers develop and improve their skills through training programs and regular feedback discussions with supervisors, to help them improve in their current role and further their professional development. Many of our managers and senior leaders started their career as a teller. With an organization the size of Wells Fargo, there are multiple opportunities to learn and grow and explore career options over time. Our vision and values supports developing and engaging our team members. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsCustomer service focus with the ability to stay positive in interactions with customers and team membersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience achieving individual and team goalsCash handling experienceExperience selling products and servicesExperience working in a fast-paced environment Job Expectations Ability to stand for extended periods of timeAbility to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduled Street Address TX-Houston: 8607 Westheimer Rd - Houston, TXDisclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Teller Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/teller-job-houston-tx-us-169933285.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b8ed648e9859a258dfb16fba3a68a580
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:18:16:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imperial Guard Servicehas an immediate need for ArmedSecurity Officersin the Houston, TX area                       $11-$14 an hour                           Plus OvertimeWe Will Train All Shifts Full and Part TimeUniforms Provided at no costHealth InsuranceDental and Vision InsuranceWeekly Pay Rapid AdvancementImperial Guard Service                       866-840-2066 or                   ""apply"" to send resumeLIC #C12202",Houston Armed Security Officers Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",All,http://jobview.monster.com/houston-armed-security-officers-job-houston-tx-us-169611246.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=2,,Security/Protective Services,1d5219898e34ee212c8abf1fe866a630
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:18:15:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chevron is one of the world's leading energy companies, with approximately 60,000 employees working in countries around the world. We explore, produce and transport crude oil and natural gas; refine, market and distribute fuels and other energy products; manufacture and sell petrochemical products; generate power; and develop future energy resources, including biofuels and geothermal energy.     Chevron is accepting online applications for the position of Threat Analyst  located in Houston, Texas, through July 23, 2016 at 11:59 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time).   Overview: Global Security is charged with providing high-quality, cost-competitive and reliable services with operational excellence. The organization is committed to supporting its diverse customers and achieving their respective business objectives through the delivery of programs designed to protect Chevron's people and assets, thus creating superior value for Chevron shareholders, customers, partners, employees and the countries in which we operate. Outstanding individual and collective performance of the Global Security organization will help the Corporation achieve its vision—to be the global energy company most admired for its people, partnerships and performance.   Responsibilities for this position may include but are not limited to: Responsible for providing strategic analysis of security and geopolitical developments that could affect the security of the company’s personnel, assets, business interests, and operations. Work with key stakeholders within Global Security and throughout the enterprise to identify key issues and potential risks. Provide timely, effective analytic products designed to support a variety of internal clients and help inform business decisions. Responsible for closely monitoring evolving threats, risks, and potential crises, which may require working outside of normal business hours.   Required Qualifications: Master's degree in a relevant field (such as international relations, regional studies, history, economics, political science). A minimum of 7 years of experience as a federal government or private sector analyst. Extensive subject matter expertise pertaining to geopolitics and regional security issues in Latin America. Spanish fluency. Must be flexible and willing also to function as a generalist, tracking issues and providing analytic assessments of other security-related risks, when needed. Must have previous experience communicating effectively and concisely (both verbally and in writing), and briefing senior officials or business executives. Must have strong interpersonal skills, be able to build successful relationships, and interface credibly with employees and executives alike. Must be able to work independently but also collaborate effectively with other team members to support business needs. Candidates must be able to adapt quickly and easily to changing priorities, meet tight deadlines, and manage multiple tasks at once. Domestic and international travel will be required to meet these responsibilities. Must be able to obtain a US government security clearance.   Preferred Qualifications: Familiarity with or previous experience in the energy industry. The ability to identify and develop new sources of information to be utilized in support of strategic objectives.·  Previous experience living or working overseas.     Regulatory Disclosure for US Positions: Chevron is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or other status protected by law or regulation.   Chevron participates in E-Verify in certain locations as required by law.    ",Threat Analyst Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/threat-analyst-job-houston-tx-us-169735972.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2909b32de41f6b7ce7a1d96c7eaecfaa
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:18:13:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is seeking a Construction Coordinator with in depth experience with Excel and supporting project managers, for our client in the Houston, TX area. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Construction Coordinator ILocation: Houston, TX 77046Work Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US; ability to pass a drug and background screeningCompensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableResponsibilities / Expectations:Support Project Manager by meticulously maintaining detailed document control and tracking project activities within project timelines through database management across all functional groups.Will support construction schedules as directed by the Construction Project Manager.Provide Job in Progress and QC/QADesired Experience:At least 2 years relevant experience required.Must possess good communication skills and be able to multi task while maintaining and organized and structured approach.Experience with PO creation and tracking/handling is desired.Strong background with Excel and the functions within Excel.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Construction Coordinator I Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Experis is seeking a Construction Coordinator with in depth experience with Excel and supporting project managers, for our client in the Houston, TX area. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Construction Coordinator ILocation: Houston, TX 77046Work Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US; ability to pass a drug and background screeningCompensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableResponsibilities / Expectations:Support Project Manager by meticulously maintaining detailed document control and tracking project activities within project timelines through database management across all functional groups.Will support construction schedules as directed by the Construction Project Manager.Provide Job in Progress and QC/QADesired Experience:At least 2 years relevant experience required.Must possess good communication skills and be able to multi task while maintaining and organized and structured approach.Experience with PO creation and tracking/handling is desired.Strong background with Excel and the functions within Excel.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Houston, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/construction-coordinator-i-job-houston-tx-us-169702202.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=6,,Engineering,253895253f9755ed4ae04ec22e169104
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:16:55:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Position Responsibilities: Understands the Mission Statement of North Central Surgical Center and carries out that Mission Determines data collection based on the patient''s condition or needs as related to the proposed interventions Addresses the physiological, psychological, socio-cultural and spirital needs/responses of the patient. Demonstrates ability to prioritize tasks and fexibility as job priorities change. Demonstrates a positive can do attitude Work is accurate and complete Demonstrates knowledge and follows AORN standards Functions as a team member Completes intital and annual competencies as required. Maiintains licenses and certifications. Adheres to dress code, attemdamce punctuality, meal break and rest periods Demonstrates the ability to communicate clearly and concisley Attends required department and hospital meetings. Assumes responsibilit for continuing education requrements Required Skills Qualifications - Graduate of accredited school or professional nursing. - Three (1) years experience in surgery. - Current Texas RN License - BLS, ACLS and PALS required - CNOR preferred - Critical thinking skills. - Excellent communication skills with staff, physicians, patients and families. Knowledgeable of hospital policies and procedures specific to the operating room. Clinically proficient in OR nursing skills, demonstrating knowledge of the developmental needs of the pediatric, adolescent, adult and geriatric patients.",Registered Nurse PRN - Operating Room Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Sugar Land, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-prn-operating-room-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169662670.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,a432171499696aec07b40c44b989bb2e
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:16:35:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Technologies has an immediate need for a Network Engineer in Houston, TX. This position will work on Superior Energy Networks that are heavily Nexxus. Skill sets:Strong Cisco Network EngineerNexus Data Center Fabric (Nexus 6000, 5500, 2200 switches, and fabric path) 5 data centersMust have strong experience/exposure within the Nexus Data Center space.Route/Switch (EIGRP, BRG, OSPF, MPLS, Metro fiber)Security, IPsec Tunneling (100 sites on Cisco ASA 5500 series firewalls)Cisco Voice experience a plusTeam player, Works well with other.",Network Engineer Job in Houston,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/network-engineer-job-houston-tx-us-169911595.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=8,,,315a390e842f89b8145951cf88ce7e43
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:16:12:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Estimator Construction- Commercial and High End ResidentialLocation: I-10 West companyHours: Flex hours and work week 35-40 hour a week. Can work 4 days a week.Salary: D.O.E.negotiable / No insurance (probably around 90K, maybe more for someone who has the right experience and attitude)Family owned business. The President is a hard worker, self-driven he say it as it is. No-nonsense type. He will give this person freedom once he feels the person can handle it. He wants a seasoned/mature person. Will consider someone who has retired and wants to work or someone who has been laid off. He/ she must have construction background estimating the cost of the job. .Company is busy and growing so this is an addition to staff. 80% repeat business. Successful candidate will have strong experience and leads too. He or She should be a self-starter, great follow-up skills, local, do not want anyone to change anything do it their way.  Owner of company is  very involved in the day to day business. Successful candidates will have experience in most of the following areas:1.) Interior & Exterior Residential and Commercial Demolition2) Pool Demolition & Backfilling3) Lot clearing & Tree Removal Stump Grinding & Complete Extraction and Removal of the stump and root ball4) Building pad installation5) Yard & Storm Drainage Installation Projects6) Job site clean ups. Rough grades and final grades7) Crushed gravel driveway and parking lot installation8) Crushed Concrete, 3”x5” bull rock, Rip Rap, Crushed Brick & Crushed Asphalt9) Competitive trucking rates for delivery and hauling material10) Dumpster Service Available Estimator Construction Job Responsibilities:Projects and controls construction costs by collecting and studying information; controlling construction costs.Estimator Construction Job Duties:•Prepares work to be accomplished by gathering information and requirements; setting priorities.•Prepares construction budget by studying plans; updating specifications; identifying and projecting costs for each elevation.•Evaluates offers to purchase by costing changes, additions, and site requirements.•Obtains bids from vendors and subcontractors by specifying materials; identifying qualified subcontractors; negotiating price.•Maintains cost keys and price masters by updating information.•Resolves cost discrepancies by collecting and analyzing information.•Prepares special reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends.•Maintains quality service by following organization standards.Job Duties•Consult with owner to discuss estimates and resolve issues •Identify and quantify cost factors, such as production time and raw material, equipment, and labor expenses •Travel to job sites to gather information on materials needed, labor requirements, and other factors •Read blueprints and technical documents to prepare estimates •Collaborate with engineers, architects, owners, and contractors on estimates  •Evaluate a product’s cost effectiveness or profitability •Recommend ways to make a product more cost effective or profitable •Prepare estimates for clients and other business managers •Develop project plans for the duration of the project Accurately predicting the cost, size, and duration of future construction projects is vital to the survival of businesses. Cost estimators’ calculations give managers or investors this information.When making calculations, estimators analyze many inputs in order to determine how much time, money, and labor a project needs and how profitable it will be. These estimates have to take many factors into account, including allowances for wasted material, bad weather, shipping delays, and other factors that can increase costs and lower profitability.General contractors usually hire cost estimators for specific parts of a large construction project, such as the excavation phase. In such cases, the estimator calculates the cost of the construction phase for which the contractor is responsible, rather than calculating the cost of the entire project. Construction companies will hire cost estimators that calculate the total project cost by analyzing the bids that the subcontractors’ cost estimators prepared.. Estimator Construction Skills and Qualifications: Analyzing Information, Developing Budgets, Vendor Relationships, Reporting Skills, Estimating, Decision Making, Teamwork, Documentation Skills, Quality Focus.",Senior Estimator-Commercial & High End Residential Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77024",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-estimator-commercial-high-end-residential-job-houston-tx-us-170037452.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),633b5a180e7f3f749049477e381a4c19
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:15:58:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field Sales RepresentativeDirect Hire opportunity for a Field Sales Representative located in Houston, TX.Company Profile:Company that specializes in Anticorrosion solutions for the Oil & Gas IndustryInternational Company that is establishing its’ North American presenceHas been in business for 20 yearsFeatures and Benefits:This is an opportunity to be the first US employeeBenefit package will be offeredCommission/Bonus opportunityYour Role:Present and sell company products and services to current and potential clients.Prepare action plans and schedules to identify specific targets and to project the number of contacts to be made.Follow up on new leads and referrals resulting from field activity.Identify sales prospects and contact these and other accounts as assigned.Prepare presentations, proposals and sales contracts.Develop and maintain sales materials and current product knowledge.Establish and maintain current client and potential client relationships.Prepare paperwork to activate and maintain contract services.Manage account services through quality checks and other follow-up.Identify and resolve client concerns.Prepare a variety of status reports, including activity, closings, follow-up, and adherence to goals.Communicate new product and service opportunities, special developments, information, or feedback gathered through field activity to appropriate company staff.Coordinate company staff to accomplish the work required to close sales.Background Profile:Bachelor’s degree2 to 5 years of experience and a proven track record and expertise in sales and business development gained within the oilfield services or oilfield equipment supply segments. Attuned to operating in the North America cultural environment, familiar with the dynamics and challenges of doing business across the region with broad exposure to the complexity of delivering high sales performance within an oilfield services business of scale. Will be in a position to demonstrate strong, current and relevant networks in the North American exploration and production communities and must be prepared to embrace extensive regional travel and some international travel when needed. Excellent communication and interpersonal skills. Will demonstrate a natural flair for influencing people at all levels, internal and external, to achieve common purpose and collective success.Commercially-astute.Must display high business ethics.Ambitious and career orientated.Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/customer-service.html Improve your job search reach with www.sumry.me/?afmc=ftl and let potential employers see you beyond just your resume.  It’s a smart way to invest in your search and the hottest trend in making a successful job transition. Frontline Source Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/houston-galleria.html  ",Field Sales Representative Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/field-sales-representative-job-houston-tx-us-169201815.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,4e3c9cad84226204aa9b6328ec6fbf44
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:15:58:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our manufacturing client has a confidential need for a new Controller. The qualified Controller candidate MUST have SAGE 100 experience, be CPA eligible, and manufacturing experience. The qualified Controller candidate will have strong supervisory experience with a ""hands on"" approach with an ability keep up with the pace of company growth. This role will handle all the financial accounting for 4 entities within the parent company. No consolidations.Responsibilities include: journal entries, reconciliations, analysis, budget/forecast, close, financial statement preparation, assisting with bank loan review and lines of credit, and more. Ability to create/update and implement policy and procedure as needed.If you are looking for a debt-free, stable, but growing company then this is the one for you!Success depends on your ability to be attentive to detail, sensitive to deadlines, ""hands on"", and able to multi-task and change gears as needed.Great salary, discretionary bonus, benefits, friendly and collaborative environment, and more! Requirements: Bachelor's Degree in Accounting or CPA eligible8 - 15 years total work experience (as indicated above) in financial accounting including manufacturing/cost4+ years in Supervisory position of at least 4 people""Hands on"" approachAttentive to detail and sensitive to deadlinesPositive leadership and development of subordinatesAbility to create or update and implement policy and procedure changes as neededAble to multi-task and change gears as needed  For consideration please send your RELEVANT and updated WORD format resume to christine.barnard@parkerlynch.com. For other Accounting/Finance jobs please visit www.parkerlynch.com for more information.   ",Controller SW Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77031",,http://jobview.monster.com/controller-sw-houston-texas-manufacturing-cpa-eligible-sage-100-job-houston-tx-us-169845952.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=17,"100,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,d63e4f6882691b556fdfee4a5eb8e3d9
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:15:30:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Position Summary: Responsible for the maintenance mechanics and electricians, reporting on, and performing maintenance activities, supervising and troubleshooting repairing Facility equipment failures, supervising and Instructing correct repairs on failed equipment. Understand and direct mechanical electric and electronic controls troubleshooting and repairs. To this end, must possess a solid background in repair disciplines and preventative maintenance activities.  The Maintenance Manager will be responsible for: All maintenance and custodial operations on a variety of shifts for Minute Maid Park. This professional must have knowledge of a wide variety of facilities, experience in managing, motivating and training hourly employees This Manager will have a working and technical expertise in asset management, cleaning processes, cleaning equipment and extensive safety facility programs This person will be expected to meet operating and financial goals, client objectives, and customer needs Other responsibilities possibly include staffing, scheduling, training and development of hourly staff. Safety First: Directly assists the Division Manager of Concessions in his or her responsibility for insuring the facility safety plan is implemented, understood and enforced. Practices safe behavior and attitude to ensure all employees understand this must come first every day. Responsible for the control of execution of work and follow up for quality assurance Proper, safe, and efficient execution of maintenance work plans Job quality, duration, and cost of completed work. Make daily assignments for mechanics and make adjustments for break in and emergency work to maintain schedule and KPIs Fosters motivation and engagement of  technicians by encouraging participation in proactive problem solving and defect elimination S/he must be able to schedule and perform the repairs, and organize the efficient completion of work orders in a timely fashion from the CMMS work plan. Qualifications Qualifications: Ideal candidates will possess: 2-5 years of experience as a Maintenance Manager or Facility Manager Experience in a Certified Skilled Trade such as Electrician, HVAC, Pipe Fitter is preferred Certification from IFMA or AFE as a certified Maintenance Manager or Facility manager preferred Maintenance and mechanical expertise Ability to manage a staff that will be responsible for maintenance, grounds and custodial Prior experience with CMMS is a plus Experience directing skilled, semi-skilled and non-skilled trade personnel is required Custodial and grounds knowledge is preferred Must be able to manage a diverse work staff with a focus on client and customer services is essential to succeed in this role",Maintenance Associate Manager - Minute Maid Park - Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77002",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-associate-manager-minute-maid-park-houston-tx-job-houston-tx-us-169728472.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=3,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,e8b7d4200c320a982cc54f9f0d7834ce
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:15:10:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Technical Documentation Specialist, you will work as part of a team in the Documentation department developing hardcopy manuals and online reference materials for software products offered by The Reynolds and Reynolds Company and its affiliates.In this position you can expect to conduct product testing before documenting new changes and have the opportunity to suggest improvements to existing Reynolds and Reynolds software.  You will contribute topics for monthly publications covering new features released to customers and have contact with some customers to gather information when a request has been made for a product or service we do not currently offer. In addition to your primary responsibilities, you will also be in charge of keeping ‘help messages’ up to date within the software for the customers to use. You will be expected to write the instructions within the help messages and test the instructions to verify the results are correct.              For an inside look and to learn more about this position, check out this link:http://life.reyrey.com/2016/01/26/an-interview-with-ozzie-technical-writer/Requirements:Bachelor’s degree required Houston, TX based position with no travel involved Basic computer knowledge required Good spelling, proofreading, grammar, and editing skills Detail-oriented, deadline-driven, and organizedBilingual in Spanish is a plus but not required Benefits: We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including:Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance401(k) – 100% matching up to 6% of compensationPaid holidays, vacation and sick daysMedical clinic staffed by a Nurse PractitionerProfessional development and training through Reynolds UniversityDiscounted membership to local area fitness centersGourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine optionsCompany-sponsored events and sports leagues including the company picnic, cook-off, softball, volleyball, bowling and many more!Credit union membershipReferral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hireOpportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunitiesReynolds and Reynolds promotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment.Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Technical Documentation Specialist Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77040",AllComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-documentation-specialist-job-houston-tx-us-169948292.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=16,,Editorial/Writing,f8fdaefaeb416bec822ed0740da509de
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:14:58:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"                     Major Manufacturer  - Territory Sales PositionLeading marketer and manufacturer of consumer food and beverage productsFortune 1000 Manufacturer- A Major Player in the Food Service Industry,  is seeking an outside sales person to call on distributors and end users in this area. You would be  Managing a 6 million dollar territory, calling on schools, colleges, hospitals, restaurants and similar end user accounts. You would be responsible for the development of a sales territory selling value added products to these types of end user accounts and thru distributors in the market.   This corporation has financially sound, has low turnover, and is led by quality leadership. They are looking for an outside business to business sales person who is interested in working for a long term opportunity corporation.The Company is an industry leader, innovative, and debt free corporation. ​ They have talented, tenured leadership in place and has recognizable products that are used around the world.  ​ In this company, you can personally excel and work with peers to build and service the industry's most innovative products and solutions.​ You would report to an experienced District Sales Manager and work out of your home office. This corporation offers excellent product training and support, along with and experience sales management team. Company Offers Base salary (commensurate with experience), Bonus, Company Car, full expenses, full benefit program including retirement, Profit Sharing, Requirements:·      4 year degree Current business to business outside sales experience . (Business products, Business services, Consumer Products, Medical or Industrial sales could qualify)experience selling thru distributors, dealers or wholesalers a plus living in or near the area listed aboveLocation:Based:             Greater Houston AreaTerritory:        Greater Houston AreaOvernight Travel:    up to 2 nights a month---------------------------------------------------------------------If you are interested, please e-mail your resume to:Doug Cain - President/ Senior Recruiting Managercain@salesrecruitingnetwork.comSales Recruiting Network       344 Mason Road                                                                724-226-9900   Phone Visit our Web Site at:  www.salesrecruitingnetwork.com -----------------------",Monster,,"                     Major Manufacturer  - Territory Sales PositionLeading marketer and manufacturer of consumer food and beverage productsFortune 1000 Manufacturer- A Major Player in the Food Service Industry,  is seeking an outside sales person to call on distributors and end users in this area. You would be  Managing a 6 million dollar territory, calling on schools, colleges, hospitals, restaurants and similar end user accounts. You would be responsible for the development of a sales territory selling value added products to these types of end user accounts and thru distributors in the market.   This corporation has financially sound, has low turnover, and is led by quality leadership. They are looking for an outside business to business sales person who is interested in working for a long term opportunity corporation.The Company is an industry leader, innovative, and debt free corporation. ​ They have talented, tenured leadership in place and has recognizable products that are used around the world.  ​ In this company, you can personally excel and work with peers to build and service the industry's most innovative products and solutions.​ You would report to an experienced District Sales Manager and work out of your home office. This corporation offers excellent product training and support, along with and experience sales management team. Company Offers Base salary (commensurate with experience), Bonus, Company Car, full expenses, full benefit program including retirement, Profit Sharing, Requirements:·      4 year degree Current business to business outside sales experience . (Business products, Business services, Consumer Products, Medical or Industrial sales could qualify)experience selling thru distributors, dealers or wholesalers a plus living in or near the area listed aboveLocation:Based:             Greater Houston AreaTerritory:        Greater Houston AreaOvernight Travel:    up to 2 nights a month---------------------------------------------------------------------If you are interested, please e-mail your resume to:Doug Cain - President/ Senior Recruiting Managercain@salesrecruitingnetwork.comSales Recruiting Network       344 Mason Road                                                                724-226-9900   Phone Visit our Web Site at:  www.salesrecruitingnetwork.com -----------------------",,http://jobview.monster.com/territory-sales-manager-food-beverage-products-job-houston-tx-us-167842780.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=3,,,126ff534713006f9dcd6f9091cbeddcd
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:14:58:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"""HOUSTON'S FIRST""A New Era in the Life of a Houston LandmarkSt. Joseph Medical Center has provided quality healthcare to the ever-expanding Houston community for 125 years. Our Trauma Center, Center for Behavioral Health, a dedicated Women's Medical Center and the full-service acute care hospital are supported by the specialty inpatient and outpatient services that you'd expect from the Houston's first teaching hospital. Our mission matches your expectations - to delivery compassionate healthcare to the communities we serve. With 792 beds, St. Joseph physicians and staff are ready to care for you at any hour.St. Joseph Medical Center in the Heights opened as an extension of Houston's first hospital - St. Joseph Medical Center in downtown Houston. RN TRAVELER ASSIGNMENTS ARE AVAILABLE IN: Behavioral Medicine Case Management ICU/CCU Emergency Room Medical/Surgical Surgical Services Telemetry Women's ServicesAssignments are up to 12 weeksAvailable shifts: 7a-7p; 7p-7a rotating weekendsHousing availableDual campus:  1401 St. Joseph Parkway, Houston, Texas 77002 1917 Ashland, Houston, Texas 77008NO AGENCIES! MINIMUM KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED:  Work Experience:3-5 years in area of specialty; acute care hospital experience License/Registration/Certification: Current RN licensure issued by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of Texas to practice professional nursing. Current American Heart Association Healthcare Provider certification required in the following areas:BLS Behavioral Medicine; Medical/SurgicalBLS, ACLS, PALS Emergency RoomBLS, ACLS ICU/CCUBLS, ACLS Surgical Services; TelemetryBLS, NRP Women's ServicesEducation & Training:Completion of an accredited school of nursing program resulting in an Associate Degree, Diploma or Baccalaureate degree in nursing.Skills: Technical, clerical, critical thinking and interpersonal skills relevant to total patient care/area in order to safely and efficiently treat patients. Good verbal and written communication skills necessary in order to be clearly and easily understood by patients, families and members of the Health Care team. Writes/prints legibly in order to document accurately and understandably, and to provide direction to support staff and others. Demonstrates a pleasant, helpful and caring demeanor in order to be an effective patient advocate.EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER MINORITIES / WOMEN / VETERANS / DISABLED",Registered Nurse (RN) - ICU Traveler -  to  Weeks Assignment,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77001",,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-icu-traveler-8-to-13-weeks-assignment-day-shift-job-houston-tx-us-169639823.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,f279b3df1917c568b0497dbb63bc2a43
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:14:35:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Case Manager LCSW- LMSW Kindred Hospital Sugarland, TX 77479 ( Job Number: 271455 ) Description Summary: Coordinates management of care for a specified patient population in a single hospital; follows patients throughout the continuum of care and ensures optimum utilization of resources, service delivery and compliance with external review agencies. Provides ongoing support and expertise through comprehensive assessment, care planning, plan implementation and overall evaluation of individual patient needs. Enhances the quality of patient management and satisfaction, to promote continuity of care and cost effectiveness through the integration of functions of case management, utilization review and management and discharge planning. Case Manager, Case Management, CM, Utilization Review, CCMC, RN, Registered Nurse, Hospital,  Healthcare, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Qualifications: Education:  Appropriate minimum degree for preferred licensure or certification or commensurate experience in a related healthcare field. Licenses/Certification:  Healthcare professional licensure preferred as Registered Nurse, Respiratory Therapist, Physical Therapist, Occupational Therapist or Social Worker.  Appropriate certification in Case Management preferred for example, Commission for Case Manager Certification (CCMC) Association of Rehabilitation Nurses (ARN) certification. Experience:  Three years clinical experience. Prefer experience in Case Management, Quality Management, Utilization Review, or discharge planning. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Case Mgmt/MDS Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Case Manager LCSW- LMSW Kindred Hospital Sugarland,"Full Time, Employee","Case Manager LCSW- LMSW Kindred Hospital Sugarland, TX 77479 ( Job Number: 271455 ) Description Summary: Coordinates management of care for a specified patient population in a single hospital; follows patients throughout the continuum of care and ensures optimum utilization of resources, service delivery and compliance with external review agencies. Provides ongoing support and expertise through comprehensive assessment, care planning, plan implementation and overall evaluation of individual patient needs. Enhances the quality of patient management and satisfaction, to promote continuity of care and cost effectiveness through the integration of functions of case management, utilization review and management and discharge planning. Case Manager, Case Management, CM, Utilization Review, CCMC, RN, Registered Nurse, Hospital,  Healthcare, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Qualifications: Education:  Appropriate minimum degree for preferred licensure or certification or commensurate experience in a related healthcare field. Licenses/Certification:  Healthcare professional licensure preferred as Registered Nurse, Respiratory Therapist, Physical Therapist, Occupational Therapist or Social Worker.  Appropriate certification in Case Management preferred for example, Commission for Case Manager Certification (CCMC) Association of Rehabilitation Nurses (ARN) certification. Experience:  Three years clinical experience. Prefer experience in Case Management, Quality Management, Utilization Review, or discharge planning. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Case Mgmt/MDS Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/case-manager-lcsw-lmsw-kindred-hospital-sugarland-tx-77479-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913644.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,945dbf56f10c482282650388b488344a
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:14:28:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"I have been engaged by a client based in Houston to identify a Senior Financial Analyst.The position will include a wide variety of accounting tasks which include;Account reconciliationFinancial AnalysisMonth-end closeMultiple location reportingClient DetailsThe organization I am working with have a number of diverse market sectors primarily focused around steel manufacture. The company are based in the US but supply major international projects. The position exists as the company have experienced steady growth over the past 10 years and need to bolster their ranks to support this.DescriptionThe main responsibilities of this role are as follows:Create and present monthly journal entries for the business in the US.Prepare reconciliations on a monthly basis of the balance sheet accounts, review and subsequently approve other reconciliations.Actively identify, research and resolve reconciliation items.Review and document trends and variables in account balances between time periods when compared against budget.Prepare schedules required for external and internal reports on a GAAP, statutory and management reporting scenario.Fixed Asset tracking, control and reporting.Assist with projects as and when.ProfileIn order to be considered for the role the candidate will have the following:Bachelors Degree in Accounting or Finance5 years experience with ExcelExcellent verbal and written communicationSolid experience of GAAPJob OfferMy client are offering a long term career path, great salary, bonus and a great benefits package.",Senior Financial Analyst Job in Houston,"Full Time , Employee","Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-financial-analyst-job-houston-tx-us-169688438.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=13,,,8d0dfaf44c77e02519b9d3b809fcf535
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:14:28:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you’re looking for a management opportunity where you can add a touch of magic to everything you do, and you have 2-4+ years of current full service restaurant management experience, we would like to hear from you!As a Manager at Red Robin, you’ll enjoy: • Amazing Culture and Support Structure • Quality of Life Career Programs • Large Array of Benefits • “No Ceiling"" Bonus Potential. • Career Opportunities through Restaurant Expansion - We’re Continually Growing, Opening More Locations Nationwide!Equal Opportunity & E-Verify EmployerRed Robin | RedRobin | RRGB | Red Robin Gourmet Burgers | Red Robin Burgers and Brews | Casual Dining | Great Opportunity | Growth | Growing | GM | AGM | General Manager | OP | Operating Partner | RM | Operator | Operations Manager | Restaurant Leader| Restaurant Management | Management | Manager | Restaurant Management | Management | RM | AGM | Assistant General Manager | Restaurant | restaurant manager | manager | restaurant job | restaurant employment | restaurant careers | restaurant management jobs | restaurant manager jobs | Restaurant manager careers | restaurant management job | restaurant management jobs | restaurant managers | FOH manager | restaurant management | restaurant management careers | restaurant management | manager | assistant manager | restaurants | dining | management | Service Manager | Server Manager | Assistant Restaurant Manager | KM | EKM | Executive Kitchen Manager | Chef Manager | Culinary Manager | Culinary Management | Sous Chef | Chef de Cuisine | Kitchen Operator | Kitchen Partner |Chef Partner | kitchen manager | Restaurant | restaurant manager | manager | restaurant job | restaurant employment | restaurant careers | restaurant management jobs | restaurant manager jobs | careers |",Restaurant Assistant General Manager Job in Houston,,"If you’re looking for a management opportunity where you can add a touch of magic to everything you do, and you have 2-4+ years of current full service restaurant management experience, we would like to hear from you!As a Manager at Red Robin, you’ll enjoy: • Amazing Culture and Support Structure • Quality of Life Career Programs • Large Array of Benefits • “No Ceiling"" Bonus Potential. • Career Opportunities through Restaurant Expansion - We’re Continually Growing, Opening More Locations Nationwide!Equal Opportunity & E-Verify EmployerRed Robin | RedRobin | RRGB | Red Robin Gourmet Burgers | Red Robin Burgers and Brews | Casual Dining | Great Opportunity | Growth | Growing | GM | AGM | General Manager | OP | Operating Partner | RM | Operator | Operations Manager | Restaurant Leader| Restaurant Management | Management | Manager | Restaurant Management | Management | RM | AGM | Assistant General Manager | Restaurant | restaurant manager | manager | restaurant job | restaurant employment | restaurant careers | restaurant management jobs | restaurant manager jobs | Restaurant manager careers | restaurant management job | restaurant management jobs | restaurant managers | FOH manager | restaurant management | restaurant management careers | restaurant management | manager | assistant manager | restaurants | dining | management | Service Manager | Server Manager | Assistant Restaurant Manager | KM | EKM | Executive Kitchen Manager | Chef Manager | Culinary Manager | Culinary Management | Sous Chef | Chef de Cuisine | Kitchen Operator | Kitchen Partner |Chef Partner | kitchen manager | Restaurant | restaurant manager | manager | restaurant job | restaurant employment | restaurant careers | restaurant management jobs | restaurant manager jobs | careers |",,http://jobview.monster.com/restaurant-assistant-general-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169833348.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=20,,,2d4653ac78f7d70c6af62decbcac8ea4
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:14:25:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Sales Account Executive Area of Interest: Sales Department: 250000 - Direct Sales City: Houston State: Texas Job Description: Konica Minolta Business Solutions USA, Inc. currently has an exciting opportunity for a NAMED ACCOUNT EXECUTIVE – PROFESSIONAL SERVICES SPECIALIST – B2B Outside Sales. Here’s what YOU can count on when you join KONICA MINOLTA!Worldwide, Konica Minolta is one of the top information technology companies. Our proven experience is helping customers streamline workflow, improve output and IT infrastructure, reduce costs and strengthen their commitment to environmental protection. As an employer, our goal is to partner with individuals who want a career - not just a job. We offer a unique combination of competitive compensation; comprehensive product training and professional development programs that will help you enhance your professional skills. You’ll also discover the winning spirit that makes KMBS a great place to work; we offer a fun, energetic and fast paced sales environment where achievement is rewarded.If you’ve been working in outside, business to business sales, have a proven track record and a desire to continue building a successful career, you’ll have that opportunity as a Named Account Executive at Konica Minolta. A career in sales at KM provides opportunities to work in a team environment and is ideally suited to individuals who enjoy networking at all levels. We provide best in class training- in classroom, web-based and on-the job; having earned a college degree will be an asset. If you have strong communication, interpersonal, time management and organizational skills, along with the personal integrity and professionalism needed to succeed, now is the time to consider Konica Minolta Business Solutions.This is what will be expected of you as a Named Account Executive – Professional Services Specialist:Seek out new customers and partner with existing ones by offering a variety of solutions to improve their business; you will have to make it a priority to take exceptional care of your clients.Be able to thrive in a fast-paced environment; you must be driven to succeed and willing to strive to be the best. You must bring a high level of energy and be committed to achieve your sales goals.Be comfortable with cold calling and in-person prospecting for potential and established clients; you must be tenacious and have a desire to grow your knowledge as you build your career.Outbound calling to potential and established clients on a daily basis to set face-to-face appointments, ensuring outstanding customer service though regular follow-ups; you’ll be expected to report regularly to a branch office.Establishing and strengthening relationships with decision makers for current and potential clients.Learning and demonstrating the benefits of all KMBS products, services and solutions for clients.Designing and presenting solutions that will help customers’ businesses.Consistently closing sales and achieving monthly activity and revenue goals. Qualifications: Requirements: Knowledge in professional services field is preferred. Must have a minimum of two (2) years of business-to-business outside sales experience, selling to clients in the professional services industry OR in the digital imaging solutions or other technology industry College degree preferred A valid driver’s license and reliable transportation is required!KMBS Offers: Competitive salary (base salary + commissions). Strong results are well rewarded; President’s Club winners have earned trips to Ireland, Panama, Banff and this year, Atlantis, Bahamas. Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, to name a few) 401(k) plan with matching company contribution Excellent holiday/vacation plans Tuition Reimbursement Program Ongoing professional development training including access to online Harvard Manage/Mentor coursesKMBS is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, sex, pregnancy, age, sexual orientation, transgender status, gender identity, disability, alienage or citizenship status, marital status or partnership status, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",Sales Account Executive Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-account-executive-job-houston-tx-us-169887901.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,,c45b4db81aa30b4b23e6823f220ba1b2
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:14:22:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Interior construction superintendent, long term with limited travel involved, strong salary plus benefits Our Houston based client has been building their reputation from the inside out with interior renovations across the country, not only working alongside well developed relationships but also new clients who have been referred to them by the quality of the projects already completed. Due to the continued focus on quality of workmanship and with a number of new projects due to start over the next few months, they are looking for an experience interior superintendent with large scale remodeling in medical, office and retail build outs to join an exciting team and deliver the services that has seen the recent successes moving forward. As you progress in this role you will be working closely with the project managers, making sure that schedules and deadlines are met without sacrificing quality. You will provide support on the day to day running and organizing of site based functions, while having the safety of yourself and all others around you a very high priority. Your success in this role will require you to be an experienced superintendent, with 4+ year's interior construction experience and the ability to work well under pressure to achieve time sensitive deadlines. You will need an eye for detail, strong communication skills, familiarity on office/retail construction and fit out will be essential for this role. Also to be considered for this position you will need to have OSHA training along with a safety first attitude. If you fit these requirements please apply now. If you have specific questions about the role please contact Brandi Heidler at 346 980 4881.",Interiors Superintendent Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/interiors-superintendent-job-houston-tx-us-169651031.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=4,"70,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,5ede679baa5198ea5de90bf4b5ebee88
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:13:29:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Fortune 500 client is seeking a strong Front-End Developer for 12-month contract opportunity in Houston, TX. This person will work with all phases of web application development with a specific focus on the Front-End Development utilizing the .NET Framework, Angular.JS, Entity, and RESTful Web Services.Job Title: Front-End Developer Duration: 12+ months Work Location: Houston, TX Job Type: ContractMINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent work experience7-10 years' of professional experience in Application Analysis, Design, and Development using .NET technologiesExperience with JQuery frameworks & toolkitsMust have Angular.JS experienceExperience working with Dynamic Stylesheet Languages (LESS, SASS), and Cross-Browser ApplicationsExperience in effective UI Design, Mockups, Prototypes, Style Guides, Graphic Design, Mobile Web Design, UI templates and frameworks would be desiredMust have HTML5, CSS, JavaScript, jQuery, JSON, AJAX, .Net, MVC, ASP.NET, C#, TFS, XML, Visual Studio, and SQL ServerExcellence in Front-End web topics such as Responsive Web Design and Mobile Web DesignOther related skills include creation and consumption of JSON, AJAX and RESTful Web ServicesGraphics creation and UI framework design and developmentMust be self-motivated, possess strong communication skills and be able to work in a team oriented environment.Strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong written and oral communication skillsAbility to manage multiple priorities and deliverables, both short and long-term, in a busy, aggressive environmentADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Qualified candidates must be able to submit to and successfully pass all background checks and drug screensWilling to work on a C2C basis with vendors who are on our approved vendor listExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Senior Front-End Developer Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Our Fortune 500 client is seeking a strong Front-End Developer for 12-month contract opportunity in Houston, TX. This person will work with all phases of web application development with a specific focus on the Front-End Development utilizing the .NET Framework, Angular.JS, Entity, and RESTful Web Services.Job Title: Front-End Developer Duration: 12+ months Work Location: Houston, TX Job Type: ContractMINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent work experience7-10 years' of professional experience in Application Analysis, Design, and Development using .NET technologiesExperience with JQuery frameworks & toolkitsMust have Angular.JS experienceExperience working with Dynamic Stylesheet Languages (LESS, SASS), and Cross-Browser ApplicationsExperience in effective UI Design, Mockups, Prototypes, Style Guides, Graphic Design, Mobile Web Design, UI templates and frameworks would be desiredMust have HTML5, CSS, JavaScript, jQuery, JSON, AJAX, .Net, MVC, ASP.NET, C#, TFS, XML, Visual Studio, and SQL ServerExcellence in Front-End web topics such as Responsive Web Design and Mobile Web DesignOther related skills include creation and consumption of JSON, AJAX and RESTful Web ServicesGraphics creation and UI framework design and developmentMust be self-motivated, possess strong communication skills and be able to work in a team oriented environment.Strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong written and oral communication skillsAbility to manage multiple priorities and deliverables, both short and long-term, in a busy, aggressive environmentADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Qualified candidates must be able to submit to and successfully pass all background checks and drug screensWilling to work on a C2C basis with vendors who are on our approved vendor listExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Houston, TX 77002",http://jobview.monster.com/senior-front-end-developer-job-houston-tx-us-170035410.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,f2e6a6682fb74ee62ca47e14733d841c
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:13:29:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our manufacturing client has a confidential need for a new Controller. The qualified Controller candidate MUST have SAGE 100 experience, be CPA eligible, and manufacturing experience. The qualified Controller candidate will have strong supervisory experience with a ""hands on"" approach with an ability keep up with the pace of company growth. This role will handle all the financial accounting for 4 entities within the parent company. No consolidations.Responsibilities include: journal entries, reconciliations, analysis, budget/forecast, close, financial statement preparation, assisting with bank loan review and lines of credit, and more. Ability to create/update and implement policy and procedure as needed.If you are looking for a debt-free, stable, but growing company then this is the one for you!Success depends on your ability to be attentive to detail, sensitive to deadlines, ""hands on"", and able to multi-task and change gears as needed.Great salary, discretionary bonus, benefits, friendly and collaborative environment, and more! Requirements: Bachelor's Degree in Accounting or CPA eligible8 - 15 years total work experience (as indicated above) in financial accounting including manufacturing/cost4+ years in Supervisory position of at least 4 people""Hands on"" approachAttentive to detail and sensitive to deadlinesPositive leadership and development of subordinatesAbility to create or update and implement policy and procedure changes as neededAble to multi-task and change gears as needed  For consideration please send your RELEVANT and updated WORD format resume to christine.barnard@parkerlynch.com. For other Accounting/Finance jobs please visit www.parkerlynch.com for more information.  ",Controller SW Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77031",,http://jobview.monster.com/controller-sw-houston-texas-manufacturing-cpa-eligible-sage-100-job-houston-tx-us-169845921.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=18,"100,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,eaf0470fa3bcc59417839b3b9b885380
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:13:10:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:With a role as a Counter Manager in the Macy's Cosmetics Department, you will be responsible for supervising the complete operations of a cosmetics line, including developing a team of highly productive Beauty Advisors. Additionally, you will make one-on-one connections with customers to learn their sense of beauty and style, develop your artistic side through customer consultation and make-up and product application, and attain a sense of accomplishment when your skills combine with your passion for beauty to reach personal and team sales goals. Performs other duties as assigned.The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here.Essential Functions:- Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaboration- Recruit, train, coach, motivate and develop new and incumbent associates on company policies and procedures, product knowledge, and personal/department productivity goals- Alert Sales Manager of needs and concerns of the business and staff- Communicate regularly with vendors, planners, distributors, and buyers regarding stock needs, customer preferences, and special events- Develop and implement business-driving events and ensure proper execution to achieve counter productivity goals- Review and analyze business performance of daily, weekly, monthly, seasonal, and annual sales results- Regular, dependable attendance & punctualityQualifications:Education/Experience:- High school diploma or equivalent.- A minimum of one year of previous selling experience required, preferably in Cosmetics.- Previous supervisory experience preferredCommunication Skills:- Ability to read, write, and interpret general business reports and labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products.- Ability to effectively communicate with and present information to customers, vendors, buyers, peers, and all levels of managementMathematical Skills:- Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division.- Able to use a calculator and calculate percentages and ratios.- Must be able to make change in American monetary unitsOther Skills:- Superior organizational and time management skills.- Must be able to build relationships and influence others.- Ability to set and achieve goals. Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment.- Must posses a strong sense of urgency and a thirst for knowledge.- Must be able to lead by exampleWork Hours:- Ability to work a flexible schedule including days, nights, weekends, holidays, and sales events, based on department and store/company needsThis job description is not all inclusive. Macy's Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Retail Cosmetics Sales - Counter Manager IMPULSE,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-cosmetics-sales-counter-manager-impulse-full-time-houston-tx-macy%E2%80%99s-willowbrook-job-houston-tx-us-169950581.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=14,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,8809881faa645ee03e02ea4f88e3875e
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:13:10:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-houston-tx-us-169614099.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a2db5cc06403751f3002b23477ef1c6f
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:13:01:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Commercial Estimator needed for Top Tier Commercial Builder in Houston With decades of building experience in the commercial construction industry, this general contractor has a reputation for fostering innovation, embracing emerging technologies, and undertaking high-profile, complex projects. In light of recent growth in the Houston market, they are looking to hire an experienced Estimator to join the team . Your experience analyzing project plans and specifications to determine estimated costs of a project will be comprehensive in both quantity take-off and conceptual approaches. You will be adept in preconstruction activities including constructability reviews, logistics planning, phasing of work/scheduling and value engineering for project values in excess of $30m. Ideally you will be able to leverage relationships with local subcontractors and suppliers to maximize value and ensure coverage. In return, this firm is offering a competitive salary based on experience, ranging from $90K-$140K. In addition, they are offering medical and retirement benefit packages as well as bonus incentives. To be considered for this opportunity, or to discuss in further detail please forward your updated resume and project list and call Mike at 346-980-4912 for a confidential chat today.",Senior Commercial Estimator Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-commercial-estimator-job-houston-tx-us-169649050.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=7,"90,000.00 - 140,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,c96de598993d578cb1de7b88288364b1
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:12:42:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"You’re looking for an opportunity to do something incredible, right? As an industry leader we’re dedicated to connecting the world in groundbreaking and entertaining ways. And that’s when our Technology team members can really shine, combining your passion for innovation and drive towards the future. From mobile apps to products and services, here’s your chance to create and develop life-changing innovations. As a Senior Sourcing Specialist you will be in an individual contributor role and you’ll have responsibility for: Developing and administering contract administration policies, systems, procedures and methods. Providing interpretation of terms and conditions of contractual obligations and may negotiate contract modifications, follow-up quotations, revisions, terms and conditions with vendors. Reviewing and administrating long-term and/or blanket purchase contracts Commercial contract issues, negotiations and/or administration of licensing agreements including renewal, new business, invoicing, credit holds, receivable issues and consolidations. This position may be responsible for contributing to AT&T's compliance with environmental laws and regulations as applicable to its job function. This may include, but is not limited to, work related to fuel tanks, emergency and stand-by generators, boilers, hazardous waste, hazardous materials, batteries, manholes and vaults, water wells, linear and other construction projects, water discharge, or air emissions. Additional Responsibilities: Administering contracts in accordance with company and customer policies and procedures, provide interpretation and analysis of contract documents and reviews and evaluation of customer requests for changes in or revisions of contracts that involve technical specifications, cost, or schedule impact on the company Use skills as a seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of industry practices and company policies and procedures including resolving a wide range of issues You’ll earn an amazing benefits package including: Employee discounts and perks Paid time off Learning and development opportunities to help you along your career path Tuition aid 401(k) savings plan Medical, dental, and vision coverage and MORE AT&T is leading the way to the future - for customers, businesses and the industry. We're developing new technologies to make it easier for our customers to stay connected to their world. With a network that covers 225 countries, including more than 120 million customers, we’d say we’re well on our way. Together, we’ve built a premier integrated communications company and an amazing place to work and grow. Team up with industry innovators every time you walk into work, building the world you always imagined. So what do you say? Let’s do great things together. Our employees say it best, watch here! Apply now and in case your email filter doesn’t recognize us, please keep an eye on SPAM and junk folders so you don’t miss a message. We’ll Require: Strong verbal and written communication skills Strong organization and project management skills Strong experience with Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access) Ability to gather quantitative data from a variety of systems Strong knowledge of Outside Plant Engineering and Construction processes Ability to analyze complex data from a variety of sources and make appropriate recommendations Commitment to teamwork and quality The most successful new hires have had: Four year degree in Business Administration or Procurement Two or more years experience in the construction industry Working knowledge of time reporting systems and procedures Strong cost/efficiency focus and knowledge of the competitive environment",Senior Sourcing Specialist Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-sourcing-specialist-job-houston-tx-us-169992906.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=4,,,fbb11ee505d2eb331cb22dde26dc4446
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:12:04:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Superintendent needed to join a growing team Our client, one of the largest, most diversified builders in the United States are nationally recognized for their exceptional and innovative construction solutions across multiple market sectors, with a mixture of both public and private work across the country. Due to an expanding project portfolio and commitment to delivering quality services, they are looking for an assistant superintendent with experience on projects from $10-30 million. You will find yourself working with a team of experienced professionals focusing on growth and continued success as time progresses. As you progress in this company you will be responsible for not only the day to day running of the job but also assisting the superintendent by managing designated field activities associated with the project and supervision of designated field construction work by subcontractors and employees. Assists the project team to ensure the project is built on time, within budget, and in accordance with our clients policies & procedures . Along with the 2 + years of construction management experience your success in the role will require you to have ability to direct the work of others, including subcontractors and suppliers. Working knowledge of the construction process. Well-versed in safety and government regulations. In return for your commercial construction experience, as well as your on-going development within the company you will have excellent earning potential and career growth, with top benefits available for the right applicant.",Assistant Superintendents Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-superintendents-job-houston-tx-us-169691935.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=10,"60,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,12f038ffd0a83b8ba9704caadaf91448
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:12:04:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time Loss Prevention Service Specialist Houston Texas Loss Prevention Job Description Position Summary: The Loss Prevention Service Specialist will be placed in high risk/complex stores. The primary role of the LPSS is to engage customers, promote customer service, and provide deterrence to theft. The LPSS will be highly visible and spend the majority of their time at the store entrance and in “Center Core”. The LPSS will work to raise shortage awareness among store associates. This position will communicate frequently with both store management and loss prevention associates. Primary Responsibilities: Works to promote customer service in the store by implementing the Company’s “Smile and Say Hi” initiatives and helping customers with their needs Assists in implementing Loss Prevention Strategy Promote a Neat and Clean store appearance at the entrance. Conducts Associate Package checks Works in “centercore” or at entrances to deter theft and provide customer service Other Duties and Responsibilities: Will NOT make shoplifting apprehensions. May assist the Loss Prevention Associates, as necessary. Conducts building and physical security inspections to minimize exposure to loss. Promotes a safe environment for associates and customers and responds to emergency situations. General Requirements: Maintains attendance according to Company standards Strong communication and interpersonal skills. Works well with fellow associates, supervisors and customers Maintains high Ethical Standards and adheres to company policies and procedures. Maintains standards of appearance by following the required Company dress code Ability to participate in physical activities, including walking, lifting and climbing on a regular basis. Preferred Qualifications: Experience in a Customer Service environment Prior experience in retail Loss Prevention, security or law enforcement preferred. Company Overview At Kohl’s, we’re always looking ahead to creating the next great thing. Since 1962, our people have been our biggest asset and every great thing we do is thanks to the great people we hire. Auto req ID 33550BR Position Type full-time Pay Basis Hourly Location Name 0527:Katy Zip Code 77084",Monster,,"Full-Time Loss Prevention Service Specialist Houston Texas Loss Prevention Job Description Position Summary: The Loss Prevention Service Specialist will be placed in high risk/complex stores. The primary role of the LPSS is to engage customers, promote customer service, and provide deterrence to theft. The LPSS will be highly visible and spend the majority of their time at the store entrance and in “Center Core”. The LPSS will work to raise shortage awareness among store associates. This position will communicate frequently with both store management and loss prevention associates. Primary Responsibilities: Works to promote customer service in the store by implementing the Company’s “Smile and Say Hi” initiatives and helping customers with their needs Assists in implementing Loss Prevention Strategy Promote a Neat and Clean store appearance at the entrance. Conducts Associate Package checks Works in “centercore” or at entrances to deter theft and provide customer service Other Duties and Responsibilities: Will NOT make shoplifting apprehensions. May assist the Loss Prevention Associates, as necessary. Conducts building and physical security inspections to minimize exposure to loss. Promotes a safe environment for associates and customers and responds to emergency situations. General Requirements: Maintains attendance according to Company standards Strong communication and interpersonal skills. Works well with fellow associates, supervisors and customers Maintains high Ethical Standards and adheres to company policies and procedures. Maintains standards of appearance by following the required Company dress code Ability to participate in physical activities, including walking, lifting and climbing on a regular basis. Preferred Qualifications: Experience in a Customer Service environment Prior experience in retail Loss Prevention, security or law enforcement preferred. Company Overview At Kohl’s, we’re always looking ahead to creating the next great thing. Since 1962, our people have been our biggest asset and every great thing we do is thanks to the great people we hire. Auto req ID 33550BR Position Type full-time Pay Basis Hourly Location Name 0527:Katy Zip Code 77084",,http://jobview.monster.com/full-time-loss-prevention-service-specialist-job-houston-tx-us-170010923.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=18,,,655fa719890e5f0c4007797257667f88
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:12:04:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Eagle’s Trace is currently seeking an passionate Assisted Living/Social Services Mgr to oversee the management, operations and performance of Assisted Living Neighborhood. Through collaborate leadership the Assisted Living/Social Services Mgr will support residents, family members, and staff. If you are strong team player, communicator and facilitator with experience in long term care and assisted living, please consider Eagle’s Trace. We provide our staff with an engaging culture, career advancement opportunities, and a career where you can make a difference in peoples’ lives every day.• Social Work degree or degree in related field is required. MSW preferred.• One to two years related experience and/or training in Long term care/assisted living preferred.• Must have knowledge of geriatric population and the aging process; including the physical, psychological and social needs of the elderly.• Proficiency with Microsoft Office including Word and Outlook",Assisted Living Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77001",All,http://jobview.monster.com/assisted-living-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169836288.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),71e47368b7af6e084b6a783260e857bc
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:12:03:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Maintenance Technician you will be responsible for all phases of building maintenance including plumbing, cleaning, electrical and mechanical work. Specific job tasks will include, but are not limited to, working with modular furniture, clogged drains, door closures, lamp/ballast replacement, painting, sprinkler system repair, ceiling tile replacement and other building related maintenance tasks as they arise.REQUIREMENTS: High school diploma or GED is required Prior building maintenance experience preferred, but not required   Vocational schooling in HVAC is a plus, but not required  Possess a high interest in mechanical work, or working with your hands          Must be able to lift 50 pounds and maneuver/transport objects weighing up to 200-300 lbsAble to work outside or on ladders for long periods of time  BENEFITS:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance 401k with 100% matching up to 6% of compensation Referral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hirePaid holidays, vacation and sick days Professional development and training through Reynolds University Discounted membership to local area fitness centersOn-site medical clinic staffed by a Nurse Practitioner Company-sponsored events and sports leagues including: company picnic, softball, volleyball, bowling, and more! Gourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine optionsCredit Union membershipOpportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunities Reynolds and Reynolds promotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment.Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Maintenance Technician Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77040",AllComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-technician-job-houston-tx-us-169695425.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=2,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,6c7c63b8cf1ccc52368dac9397ce6195
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:11:57:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"RPS Klotz Associates is hiring a Project Engineer in our Houston, Texas Public Utilities practice. Job Requirements:BS or MS Degree in Civil Engineering with P.E. License or ability to obtain PE with one year. Must have 3-6 years of experience in a wide variety of municipal engineering projects including water, sanitary sewer, drainage and roadways. Must have experience in AutoCAD, preparing preliminary engineering reports, developing bid item quantities, PS&E preparation and coordination with governmental agencies. Excellent technical writing skills.  Local experience in the consulting industry a  plus.  For more information please visit www.klotz.com and choose openings by location.",Public Utilities Project Engineer Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77079",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/public-utilities-project-engineer-job-houston-tx-us-169839347.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=3,,Engineering,cb383606e8f63b49feb53039025ce194
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:11:28:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Who we are . . . Foresters Financial Services, Inc. provides everyday families and individuals with financial solutions, guidance, and tools, to meet their needs across all life stages. Our financial representatives, who are among the best trained in the business, offer personalized service combined with a solid, long-term approach and fresh thinking. You can also take pride in knowing that you are part of Foresters™, an international financial services provider that gives back to the community and cares deeply about family well-being. Each year Foresters organizes thousands of community activities, providing financial contributions and hands-on volunteerism in support of charitable partners that make a meaningful and lasting impact in local communities. What you need . . . • Bachelor’s degree • Strong communication and marketing skills with the ability to work one-on-one with clients • The ability to plan your day and achieve goals • An interest in developing financial strategies and a genuine concern for the welfare of others • An entrepreneurial work ethic and the desire to achieve financial success What you will do . . . • Recommend solutions to your clients for their investment needs • Collaborate with others in developing presentations delivered in group settings or one-on-one • Keep in touch with clients to ensure that they have the right products for their current needs • Create referral opportunities and build a referral-based practice • Determine the course for your career in terms of financial objectives How we help you . . . Our extensive training program and state-of-the-art learning system is designed to prepare you so you are both business savvy and confident when working with your clients. You will enjoy a professional office environment with all the support and tools you need to be successful. New Representatives start out earning wages and commissions, so while you take care of your clients, we take care of you. Products we offer . . . • Mutual Funds • Life Insurance (Whole Life, Term Life & Variable Life) • Annuities • Retirement Vehicles • Education Plans Foresters Financial is a member of: • FINRA (Financial Industry Regulatory Authority) • ICI (Investment Company Institute) • ASBO (Association of School Business Officials) • NTSAA (National Tax Shelter Account Association) • PPA (American Society for Pension Professionals and Actuaries) • SIPC (Securities Investor Protection Corporation) Areas of interests that lead to success . . .  Finance  Sales  Marketing  Hospitality  Banking  Retail  Industrial  Military  Insurance  Financial Planner  Customer Service  Customer Support  Public service  Communication  Entrepreneurship  Sociology  Social worker  Psychology Foresters Financial is building a brighter future . . . one Representative at a time! Foresters Financial™ and Foresters™ are trade names and trademarks of The Independent Order of Foresters (a fraternal benefit society) and its subsidiaries, including Foresters Financial Services, Inc. Foresters Financial Services, Inc. does not provide legal, tax or estate planning services. All investing involves risk, including the risk that you may lose money.",Houston Financial Representative Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/houston-financial-representative-job-houston-tx-us-166857882.aspx?mescoid=4100676001001&jobPosition=11,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,06344b46d46073a5a2390265250d0f20
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:11:20:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENR Top 20 Construction firm is seeking an experienced Heavy Civil Estimator For the last 30 years, this civil construction firm has concentrated on building the infrastructure that allows people and goods to move safely and efficiently throughout the country. With a track record of delivering high-profile DOT highway and expressway projects, they are poised for continued growth. As a result, they are looking for an experienced Heavy Civil Estimator to join the team. You will have a comprehensive background of estimating heavy highway projects with budgets in excess of $10m. Additionally, you will be well-versed in both competitive bid and design/build project delivery methods. Working knowledge of HCSS estimating software as well as Microsoft Excel and Word will translate well to the technical environment. In return this firm is offering a competitive annual salary package, based on experience, from $100K-$150K with medical and retirement benefits and bonus incentives. To be considered for this opportunity, or to discuss in further detail please forward your updated resume and project list and call Mike at 346-980-4912 for a confidential chat today.",Heavy Civil Estimator Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/heavy-civil-estimator-job-houston-tx-us-169649429.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=6,"100,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,1f116ed5a0778fb1987814bd339c19e9
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:11:08:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: NW Houston6 month contract positionResponsibilities • Provides the most complex financial analysis for the company’s Balance Sheet and Statements of Cash Flow results, typically exercising a unique understanding of the business to determine the best method for achieving objectives. • Support preparation and review of Balance Sheet and Cash Flow related schedules in executive reporting package for senior finance leadership • Support preparation and review of quarterly Balance Sheet and Cash Flow results review presentations to CFO and Investor Relations • Assist with policy and technical guidance to Balance Sheet matters • Participate in quarterly Balance Sheet Reviews with regions • Provide adhoc analysis as requested by management, business units, SEC Reporting, auditors and others for all aspects of the balance sheet • Provide oversight and review of PP&E reporting • Consults with business leaders to guide and influence long- term and strategic decision-making within the broadest scope. • Leads and advises on the most complex business initiatives, typically leading several analysts across multiple areas within finance and across geographies/organizations. • Drives process improvement and policy development initiatives that impact the function globally. • Represents the business unit during cross-regional or cross- functional planning processes. • Provides mentoring and guidance to analysts. Education and Experience Required • First level university degree with a focus in business or economics; advanced degree or accounting certification (e.g., CPA, MBA) strongly preferred. • Typically 10+ years of experience as a financial analyst. • Typically experienced in a variety of finance functions. Knowledge and Skills • Excellent understanding of accounting principles and financial analysis. • Excellent analytical skills. • Superior business application skills (e.g., SAP Business Warehouse, Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint). • Superior communication and influencing skills. • Superior teamwork skills • Excellent business acumen. • Excellent project management skills. Impact/Scope • Ability to influence an entire business within a broad scope, interacting with individuals at the VP and SVP level.",Financial Analyst Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-job-houston-tx-us-169660667.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=20,,IT/Software Development,906efa8709608bc1f28564e97ed253e5
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:11:07:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative AssistantContract to hire opportunity in Clearlake, TX for an Administrative Assistant at a Financial Services firm.Company Profile:Financial Services firm that has been in business since 20016Growing organizationOffice in Texas and LouisianaFeatures and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouse401k eligibility after just 60 days of employmentFeatures and Benefits of Client:Rapidly growing organizationGreat team oriented environmentStrong benefit packageHealth insurance plans availableVoluntary dental and vision plan401k eligibility after approximately 6 months. Paid holidaysThe Administrative Assistant position:Supporting 2 to 3 Senior Sales people. Coordinating calendar and meeting arrangements. Assistance with the coordination, planning and execution of various marketing events (annuity business). Emphasis on ability to coordinate and manage multiple, often changing schedules. Providing general office support including: phone coverage, word processing, copying and special projects. Handle follow up calls with clients and some face to face interaction.The Administrative Assistant Background Profile:2-3 years of work experience, preferably within financial services Excellent verbal and written communication skills. High attention to detail and follow-through. Ability to work solo on projects as well as on a team. Outstanding computer skills. Financial services experience preferred, but other professional services backgrounds will be considered as well (Administrative assistant from Real Estate, Mortgage, Title, Banking, Legal, CPA firm, etc.) https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Improve your job search reach with www.sumry.me/?afmc=ftl and let potential employers see you beyond just your resume.  It’s a smart way to invest in your search and the hottest trend in making a successful job transition. Frontline Source Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/houston-downtown.html",Administrative Assistant Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-houston-tx-us-169217344.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=7,12.00 - 14.42 /year,Administrative/Clerical,26bc5b81fd440d3632728e8a01c1c772
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:10:42:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-TimeBrookdale The Heights 2121 Pinegate Dr Houston, TX 77008 Job #: 063958Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management * Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications:* Current vocational nursing licensure within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * One to two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Vocational Nurse LVN Job in Houston,Part Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77008",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-vocational-nurse-lvn-job-houston-tx-us-169988611.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,f9ac4a041aac3b46e8e41722b23bc811
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:10:36:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"ReceptionistReceptionist position open in Houston, TX for a leading commercial banking institution on a contract to possible hire basis. Company Profile:Dallas based financial institution voted Best Places to WorkEstablished in 1999 and growing Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insuranceBenefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouse Features and Benefits of Client:Competitive Salary plus bonus incentivesMedical, Dental, Vision-Large portion paid by employerLife Insurance- Company Paid- 2x salary for Basic Life and AD&DDisability-Company PaidFlexible Spending Account401K- BMO RetirementEmployee Stock Purchase PlanLegal ShieldEducational Assistance Program Receptionist Role:Answering, screening and routing calls, receiving visitors, accepting and signing for Fed Ex/courier deliveries, and maintaining daily calendarsCreating and updating spreadsheets, reports and presentations Provide routine customer-related services General administrative duties, such as copy, filing and mail distributionMaintaining the file room and kitchen; order and maintain office suppliesProvide backup to Relationship Associates and Financial Service Reps during peak timesMaintain incoming mail log and monitor outgoing mailAssist with special projects and special events as needed Receptionist Background Profile:Must have a minimum of one (1) year receptionist/switchboard experience in a corporate environmentAbility to work in a high-growth, fast-paced environment with minimal supervisionGeneral familiarity with banking products and services helpful but not requiredStrong experience with Microsoft Office with a special focus on Outlook, PowerPoint and ExcelProven ability to quickly build rapport and relationships with prospects, clients and employeesShould be detail oriented and able to multi-taskAccurate typing of at least 40 WPM  Please visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/n.-west-houston.html https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Improve your job search reach with www.sumry.me/?afmc=ftl and let potential employers see you beyond just your resume.  It’s a smart way to invest in your search and the hottest trend in making a successful job transition.Frontline Source Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Receptionist Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-job-houston-tx-us-169204799.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=11,16.00 - 20.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,b6c1f959f28c2ba0d531daac4cac8377
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:10:24:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:Position: Bilingual Non Profit Administrative AssistantPay: $12 - 15Type of contract: Temporary to hireLocation: 77008Schedule: Mon-Fri 8am – 5pm  Are you a fully bilingual with administrative experience?  Do you enjoy helping those in need and working with a company who cares about making a change? If so, we have an exciting Bilingual Non Profit Administrative Assistant job in Downtown Houston that would be perfect for you! You will be responsible for assisting an office of Case Managers who meet with low income individuals and refugees seeking assistant as they enter the country. To qualify for this position you will need at least 6 months of relevant job experience and a Bachelor’s degree in Social Work or other human services field (phycology, sociology, etc) As a Bilingual Non Profit Administrative Assistant your responsibilities include:• Asses Case Managers as they asses people for benefit eligibility• Assist people to complete application forms and documentation needed to apply for benefits• Provide administrative support including: filing, printing, ordering supplies, etc• Ensure proper archiving of cases documentation• Participate in regular staff meetings Your qualifications:• 6 months of relevant job experience• Must have a Bachelor’s degree in Social Work or other human services field (phycology, sociology, etc)• Must be Bilingual (English/Spanish) • A desire to help those in need and work in a fun and fast pace work environment If you are bilingual, have a degree (bachelor’s) in the human services field and would like to be connected to this wonderful opportunity please apply below and/or send your resume to ana.aguirre@ajilon.com You will not want to miss out on this great job opportunity!   ",Bilingual Non-Profit Administrator Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Houston, TX 77008",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-non-profit-administrator-job-houston-tx-us-169835775.aspx?mescoid=2100323001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,33c7a8d1fc2daa29dd570a2e3ca9ff31
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:10:22:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. All employees who average 20 hours or more per week are eligible for educational assistance offered by Murphy USA. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-houston-tx-us-169664099.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4d64383566bee7bf5224ffc725613b65
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:10:20:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Project Manager reports directly to the Construction Operations Manager. The PM is the direct supervisor of assigned estimator(s). The PM is responsible for the solicitation of project documents and information, ensures that all information is put into the hands of hub estimators, support team members as well as outside vendors through a functional RFP procedure. The PM is responsible for following up on all outstanding RFP s to ensure the project bid date is hit. During the estimating process the PM solicits additional information from the client on behalf of the estimator, or ensures the estimator is gathering the information of their own accord. The PM may be called upon to meet with customers before and during the execution of the project. Proficiency using Microsoft office Minimum 3-5 years of progressive responsibility estimating for the construction industryExperience in contract negotiation with subcontractors and vendors as well as buyoutExperience managing a project budget ",Project Manager ( Z ) Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77034",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-1965-2z-001-job-houston-tx-us-169801137.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=13,,Business/Strategic Management,7b5fe79d686f24e675206f034ed2bcaa
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:10:17:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"AIG Investments has an opportunity for a Sr. Administrative Assistant/Legal Assistant in Houston, TX. This is a unique position involving approximately 50% senior administrative work and 50% legal documentation assistance. Performance objectives in this position are as follows:- Handling office support for several attorneys in the Houston office.- Supporting AIG's internal legal function on issues relating to day-to-day activities in a broad range of issues, mostly ancillary matters relating to corporate law and investments on behalf of our corporate entities.- Learning and taking ownership of basic business documents, including non-disclosure agreements (in connection with potential investments) and transfer documents relating to purchases of fixed income and other corporate investments.- AIG Investments prides itself on fostering and maintaining a collegial, professional, friendly, creative, entrepreneurial and supportive work environment. This is a client-facing role; accordingly through his or her example, the successful candidate will be expected to take ownership of, and help to promote, the Legal Department's positive culture. - Substantial administrative experience in a corporate legal office or a law firm working in business or corporate law; - Paralegal Certificate / Degree preferred (or comparable work experience); - Strong working knowledge of MS Office Suite; - Excellent communication, organization and grammar skills; - Excellent organization skills; - Emotional maturity.About AIGAmerican International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in more than 130 countries and jurisdictions. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. In addition, AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the United States.AIG Property Casualty is a global market leader, one of the few truly global property casualty franchises.AIG Life and Retirement is one of the largest life insurance organizations in the U.S., and provides protection, investment and income solutions needed for financial and retirement security.United Guaranty Corporation is the marketplace leader in mortgage insurance in the U.S.Additional information about AIG can be found at www.aig.com | YouTube: www.youtube.com/aig | Twitter: @AIG_LatestNews | LinkedIn: www.linkedin.com/company/aig",Senior Administrative Assistant/Legal Assistant Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-administrative-assistant-legal-assistant-job-houston-tx-us-169217059.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=8,,Administrative/Clerical,2e0a8ef80d6414e5b348ddc28e30b1e2
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:09:30:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requirements:License/Certification/Education: Requires a High School Diploma or equivalent w/1-2 years of experience.Job Description:Prepares laboratory specimens for designated departments/locations prior to laboratory analysis and testing. Unpacks specimens from branches or ports and routes specimens by type to various staging areas. Prepares all specimens received for testing in designated laboratory departments or locations such as staging of specimens, centrifuge, separate serum, and blood smears. Aliquots sample for departments. Prepares excess specimen samples for storage and resolves and document problem specimens.",Specimen Accessioner Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/specimen-accessioner-job-houston-tx-us-169964805.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,55b40fd3012d7419f7da01d6e78e3ad0
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:09:29:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is seeking a Field Engineer with in depth experience with Nokia market upgrades and sector add experience, for our client in the Houston, TX area. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Field Engineer IILocation: Houston, TX 77046Work Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US; ability to pass a drug and background screeningCompensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableResponsibilities / Expectations:Management of general contractor job quality, safety standards, and punch lists.Perform cell site audits after site is built to evaluate GC work qualityProvide reports to Construction ManagersInteract with outside governmental agencies, consultants and vendorsMaintain database of design walks, contacts, unique addressesCoordinate with utility companies for construction work and other situations as they ariseBuild and maintain superb relationship with clientDay to day completion of assigned work orders and trouble ticketsPerforming required maintenance on assigned sitesMonitoring site KPIs and troubleshooting with RF EngineerPerforming On Call duties at least one week per monthAddress defective Repair & Maintenance parts for marketOversee LTE deployment and integration of new technologies on assigned sitesRespond to Sales Team issues and customer complaintsDesired Experience:At least 3 years relevant experience required.Candidates experienced with Nokia market upgrades is a plus. ie- L700/L1900/ and sector add construction experienceExperis also has many other opportunities with this client in other markets.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Field Engineer II Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Experis is seeking a Field Engineer with in depth experience with Nokia market upgrades and sector add experience, for our client in the Houston, TX area. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Field Engineer IILocation: Houston, TX 77046Work Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US; ability to pass a drug and background screeningCompensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableResponsibilities / Expectations:Management of general contractor job quality, safety standards, and punch lists.Perform cell site audits after site is built to evaluate GC work qualityProvide reports to Construction ManagersInteract with outside governmental agencies, consultants and vendorsMaintain database of design walks, contacts, unique addressesCoordinate with utility companies for construction work and other situations as they ariseBuild and maintain superb relationship with clientDay to day completion of assigned work orders and trouble ticketsPerforming required maintenance on assigned sitesMonitoring site KPIs and troubleshooting with RF EngineerPerforming On Call duties at least one week per monthAddress defective Repair & Maintenance parts for marketOversee LTE deployment and integration of new technologies on assigned sitesRespond to Sales Team issues and customer complaintsDesired Experience:At least 3 years relevant experience required.Candidates experienced with Nokia market upgrades is a plus. ie- L700/L1900/ and sector add construction experienceExperis also has many other opportunities with this client in other markets.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Houston, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/field-engineer-ii-job-houston-tx-us-169832323.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=1,,Engineering,389d7ab0f38db2d96ec26535e1659197
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:09:17:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRNBrookdale West University 5151 Buffalo Speedway Houston, TX 77005 Job #: prnCDPLhouTX063695This Registered Nurse will travel to all Brookdale Houston area communities. The ability to work a flexible schedule is essential.A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division. Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Home Health RN to provide services in the Houston area. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients Your responsibilities: * Evaluates the patient and home health environment to determine required services and involves the patient and patient's family in developing the plan of care * Develops the POC based on findings from evaluation visit * Serves as the patient's advocate and maintains ongoing communication with physician, referral sources, caregivers, and facility management to facilitate coordination of care * Responsible for timely completion and synchronization of all documentation within the patient's home via device (EMR) * Provides direct supervision of nursing clinical care team members (LPN/LVNs & HHAs) Required skills and qualifications:* Graduate of an accredited school of professional nursing * Three year of experience in Medicare HH; proficient in OASIS-C and Home Health experience required* Licensed as an RN in the state of practice* Travel is required; must have a reliable car w/current insurance coverage and a current driver's license* Experience with Electronic Medical Records (EMR) devices preferred, but not required If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Registered Nurse RN Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77005",Healthcare Services Restaurant/Food Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-job-houston-tx-us-169832433.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,aef5a452c25b6b37cae8d63a56f3be32
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:09:11:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO   The fun and exciting world of event sales is calling for you! Will you answer? Our part time Event Specialist jobs give you the opportunity to represent the best brands on the market today! You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and retail sales. As a part time Event Specialist, you will work in one of the following locations: Albertsons, Albertsons Market, ACME Markets, Amigos, Carrs, Jewel-Osco, Market Street, Pavilions, Randalls, Safeway, Shaws, Star Market, Super Saver by Albertsons, Tom Thumb, United Supermarket, and Vons. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.        Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations. Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales. Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products. Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines. Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience. Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery preferred. Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting. Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day. Able to work independently and as a motivated team player. Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday. Access to reliable transportation. Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access.  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods.  Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers.  We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Advantage Sales and Marketing LLC, dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO Job in Houston,Part Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-aco-job-houston-tx-us-169627896.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,b4e4d45d64fb6dc02d3fc9142c630ecd
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:09:11:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Estimator position is responsible for residential and commercial takeoffs for both installed and material projects. This incumbent reviews plans and specifications relative to the schedule and scope of work, and works closely with salespeople to coordinate construction projects and paperwork. Estimators will:Read blueprintsUtilize computer for blueprint takeoffsCommunicate with professional buildersCommunicate with salesmenAbility to read, analyze and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures and government regulations; write reports, business correspondence and procedure manuals; effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers and the general public.Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists; interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram or schedule form.Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university, or at least 2 years of specific experience and/or training related to the essential functions of the job; or equivalent combination of education and training.Ability to read blueprints and perform material takeoffs/ estimates.Computer skills necessary for blueprint takeoffs.",Estimator (Store) (  ) Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77034",,http://jobview.monster.com/estimator-store-1965-41-001-job-houston-tx-us-169801140.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=12,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,7f637cdbe992a1feed11ec4de537704b
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:09:10:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"The role of the Promoter Manager is to supervise a team of Brand Ambassadors in the South Central areas of the US. He or she is expected to have management skills and excellent relationship building combined with team management.Travel:There will be out of town traveling involved and overnight stay in your territory (Houston, Dallas, Austin, New Orleans, Atlanta, Jacksonville, Orlando, Tampa, and South Florida.) Travel is approximately 75%Base Location: Candidate must reside in Houston, TXDescription of activities:Candidate will report directly to the Marketing Manager while supervising a team in the areas described. The team will be comprised of approx 20 Promoters and/or Brand Ambassadors.Hire, train or terminate Brand Ambassadors in assigned areas when necessary.Monitor performance on daily basisReport daily/weekly to Marketing ManagerReview timesheets prior to payment processingWork promotions in assigned territories along with the area Brand Ambassadors at store locations weeklyOn the job coaching and training of Brand Ambassadors to improve their overall performanceWork national events when requiredThis is a salaried position. Base plus bonus and full benefits including a company vehicle (or allowance), laptop, cell phone and expenses paid weekly.Qualifications/Requirements:College degree preferredKnowledgeable and experienced in the promotions/brand ambassador field is requiredCandidate must pass background and drug tests as required by employerCompetencies:Good verbal and written communication skillsIntermediate Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel and Microsoft OutlookReliable transportationImpeccable follow-up and follow-through skills to meet company deadlinesTeam management and recruitment of staff",Monster,,"The role of the Promoter Manager is to supervise a team of Brand Ambassadors in the South Central areas of the US. He or she is expected to have management skills and excellent relationship building combined with team management.Travel:There will be out of town traveling involved and overnight stay in your territory (Houston, Dallas, Austin, New Orleans, Atlanta, Jacksonville, Orlando, Tampa, and South Florida.) Travel is approximately 75%Base Location: Candidate must reside in Houston, TXDescription of activities:Candidate will report directly to the Marketing Manager while supervising a team in the areas described. The team will be comprised of approx 20 Promoters and/or Brand Ambassadors.Hire, train or terminate Brand Ambassadors in assigned areas when necessary.Monitor performance on daily basisReport daily/weekly to Marketing ManagerReview timesheets prior to payment processingWork promotions in assigned territories along with the area Brand Ambassadors at store locations weeklyOn the job coaching and training of Brand Ambassadors to improve their overall performanceWork national events when requiredThis is a salaried position. Base plus bonus and full benefits including a company vehicle (or allowance), laptop, cell phone and expenses paid weekly.Qualifications/Requirements:College degree preferredKnowledgeable and experienced in the promotions/brand ambassador field is requiredCandidate must pass background and drug tests as required by employerCompetencies:Good verbal and written communication skillsIntermediate Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel and Microsoft OutlookReliable transportationImpeccable follow-up and follow-through skills to meet company deadlinesTeam management and recruitment of staff",,http://jobview.monster.com/promoter-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169514848.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=4,,,501b25fb034eb1a2c66b346d460a7709
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:08:43:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"""HOUSTON'S FIRST""A New Era in the Life of a Houston LandmarkSt. Joseph Medical Center has provided quality healthcare to the ever-expanding Houston community for 125 years. Our Trauma Center, Center for Behavioral Health, a dedicated Women's Medical Center and the full-service acute care hospital are supported by the specialty inpatient and outpatient services that you'd expect from the Houston's first teaching hospital. Our mission matches your expectations - to delivery compassionate healthcare to the communities we serve. With 792 beds, St. Joseph physicians and staff are ready to care for you at any hour.St. Joseph Medical Center in the Heights opened as an extension of Houston's first hospital - St. Joseph Medical Center in downtown Houston. RN TRAVELER ASSIGNMENTS ARE AVAILABLE IN: Behavioral Medicine Case Management ICU/CCU Emergency Room Medical/Surgical Surgical Services Telemetry Women's ServicesAssignments are up to 12 weeksAvailable shifts: 7a-7p; 7p-7a rotating weekendsHousing allotment available for out of town travelers. Please Ask for details! Dual campus:  1401 St. Joseph Parkway, Houston, Texas 77002 1917 Ashland, Houston, Texas 77008NO AGENCIES! MINIMUM KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED:  Work Experience:3-5 years in area of specialty; acute care hospital experience License/Registration/Certification: Current RN licensure issued by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of Texas to practice professional nursing. Current American Heart Association Healthcare Provider certification required in the following areas:BLS Behavioral Medicine; Medical/SurgicalBLS, ACLS, PALS Emergency RoomBLS, ACLS ICU/CCUBLS, ACLS Surgical Services; TelemetryBLS, NRP Women's ServicesEducation & Training:Completion of an accredited school of nursing program resulting in an Associate Degree, Diploma or Baccalaureate degree in nursing.Skills: Technical, clerical, critical thinking and interpersonal skills relevant to total patient care/area in order to safely and efficiently treat patients. Good verbal and written communication skills necessary in order to be clearly and easily understood by patients, families and members of the Health Care team. Writes/prints legibly in order to document accurately and understandably, and to provide direction to support staff and others. Demonstrates a pleasant, helpful and caring demeanor in order to be an effective patient advocate.EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER MINORITIES / WOMEN / VETERANS / DISABLED",Registered Nurse (RN) - Traveler -  to  Week Assignment,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77001",,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-traveler-8-to-12-week-assignment-emergency-department-pm-55-per-hour-job-houston-tx-us-169639509.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,b3c2709e899075818725ff20aee7608f
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:08:27:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is seeking a VP of Corporate Business Development to oversee and manage the business development function out of their Baton Rouge, Louisiana corporate headquarters.  Our client is a full service general construction company providing engineering, deep foundation, civil, mechanical, fabrication & industrial building services to the refining, chemical, power, oil and gas, public infrastructure and marine markets.The responsibilities and qualifications for the VP of Corporate Business Development are:Responsibilities:·         Serve as a key member of the management team that assists in setting our client’s strategic direction·         Spearhead business development initiatives that are consistent with our client’s overall business strategy to achieve stated objectives regarding revenue, profitability and market share·         Responsible for overall management of corporate sales, proposals, and marketing efforts·         Lead business development efforts to identify new clients and opportunities·         Lead the business development team·         Provide recruitment, training and development of business development staff·         Manage business development budget·         Work collaboratively with operations management personnel·         Plan and conduct market research to identify opportunities for increased sales·         Analyze marketing programs and adjust strategy to increase effectiveness·         Manage client database·         Assist in planning, promotion and execution of sales meetings ·         Help establish and maintain consistent corporate image throughout product lines, promotional materials and events·         Responsible for client entertainment Qualifications:·         Strong interpersonal skills and comfort in working with multiple organizational levels (Executive, Operation Managers, Estimators and Project Managers) ·         Must be results oriented and have a hands-on and an engaged approach·         Bachelor’s Degree in related field.  Advanced degree and certifications are a plus.·         15+ years relevant industry experience in Gulf Coast industrial construction and engineering·         Experience managing a staff and budgets·         Proven ability to set and achieve business development goals·         Understands market trends and how to capitalize on business opportunitiesSome of the many benefits you can expect at our client are:·         Top industry pay·         A robust benefits package that includes above average medical, dental, prescription, vision, cafeteria plan, HSA, life insurance, short and long-term disability, paid vacation, sick time and holidays.·         Great company culture – work for a family owned business that truly cares about their employees and clients. ·         Diverse clientele — work with companies the following markets – alternative energy, chemical processing, industrial and manufacturing buildings, communication, emergency preparedness and disaster response, government infrastructure, oil and gas, energy, power (generation and T&D), refining, and water quality.  Email your resume to: cajun@workrocket.com  Please include 'WR 8818 - VP of Business Development'  in the subject line, or your resume may be overlooked. Our client is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions without regard to race, gender, disability, or protected veteran status.   ",VP of Corporate Business Development Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/vp-of-corporate-business-development-job-houston-tx-us-169214160.aspx?mescoid=1100008001001&jobPosition=9,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,f6a34ea70d9c8b1b4aaf9709dc51fd9e
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:08:26:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Electrical Supervisor needed to oversee and coach residential service technicians.  You will be responsible for providing technical support to technicians as well as assisting with closing techniques and up-sell tactics while in the field.  Job Responsibilities:·       Provide technical support to electricians in the field as needed.·       Provide sales support for technicians while on job sites ·       Maintain compliance to state codes and ensure all jobs are performed correctly·       Motivate licensed electricians to maximize each call they are dispatched to for opportunities of cross-selling.·       Determine skill level of electricians for job assignments.·       Develop technicians coming from other industries, (commercial & Industrial or new construction) ·       Teach electrical staff how to effectively communicate and educate homeowners on potential hazards within their home while presenting options for call resolution.·       Excellent customer service skills with ability to motivate others·       Hold a valid driver’s license and clean driving record·       Provide leadership/mentoring by riding with technicians in the field as needed.·       Texas Electrical Masters license required.This position offers a competitive base salary and benefits to include a company vehicle, gas card, cell phone and an incredible support team.",Electrical Supervisor Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/electrical-supervisor-job-houston-tx-us-170005780.aspx?mescoid=4701141002005&jobPosition=20,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,25121760d4041897d9650f3110e05f40
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:08:10:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Oversee that all work is performed in accordance with approved manuals and proceduresOversee that the project is constructed and documented in accordance with the contract documents and good engineering practicesCoordinates and monitors schedule updates, invoices and submittalsAssist in managing and reviewing the progress of contractors' construction schedulesReview weekly and monthly reports on the status and progress of the contracts, including project costs and potential changesQualificationsBachelors of Science in Engineering10+ years of project experience requiredChemical Plant or Refinery experience required.Experience with facilities construction sites preferredProficient with MS Office Suite of tools, exposure to schedule software",Project Support Engineer Job in Houston,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-support-engineer-job-houston-tx-us-169702194.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=7,,,a56b1199a4768d2c3f0d5b7d2bbd077c
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:07:14:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position SummaryThis person will support the risk function of Life, Health & Disability by following established guidelines/practices to analyze data, prepare risk communication materials, manage risks and resolve issues. Responsibilities include: Support the work team by maintaining various databases supporting ERM information.Producing risk reports and other management reports.Running pre-designed models and processes and testing controls to ensure that results are accurate.Coordinating the gathering of data source and controls data from the business units.Assist in risk assessments / analyses and conduct research as needed.Participate in various risk management projects.Assist in the preparation of documentation as needed.Gain knowledge and expertise in industry best practices of Enterprise Risk Management.Organizational StructureThis position is part of the Life, Health, and Disability ERM team and reports to the Director for US Life, Health and Disability. The Risk Analyst will work closely with the Life ERM team and may be involved in projects covering both US life and International life. The Risk Analyst will also interact with the business unit and as needed participate in broader, firm-wide ERM initiatives. The Ideal Candidate Will HaveBachelor's degree from 4-year college and 1-3 years of work experience in the Financial Services sector. Knowledge of Life insurance business and products preferred. Completion of 3 actuarial exams preferred. Excellent communication, interpersonal and analytical skills. Fast learner, attention to detail and highly organized with strong follow-through.Strong team player, ability to work effectively with people at all levels.Flexibility to adapt to dynamic projects.Technical skills including proficiency in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access). Familiarity with programming language and/or actuarial projection systems is a plus. About AIGAmerican International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in more than 130 countries and jurisdictions. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. In addition, AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the United States.AIG Property Casualty is a global market leader, one of the few truly global property casualty franchises.AIG Life and Retirement is one of the largest life insurance organizations in the U.S., and provides protection, investment and income solutions needed for financial and retirement security.United Guaranty Corporation is the marketplace leader in mortgage insurance in the U.S.Additional information about AIG can be found at www.aig.com | YouTube: www.youtube.com/aig | Twitter: @AIG_LatestNews | LinkedIn: www.linkedin.com/company/aig",Actuarial Risk Analyst Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",InsuranceFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/actuarial-risk-analyst-job-houston-tx-us-169207627.aspx?mescoid=1300119001001&jobPosition=9,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e547420a0d389c8e3d5da55b5f70e11e
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:07:13:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our organization prides itself on excellence, putting the education and development of our children first and foremost. When you consider a career at Learning Care Group, know you will be joining a team that is passionate about thoroughly preparing their students for all the challenges that lie ahead.In an Assistant Director, we look for committed individuals who want to make a difference in the lives of young children and their families, while effectively and efficiently running all School operations. Some of the exciting things that you will do as an Assistant Director include, but are not limited to:Make a difference every day!Be accountable for the operation of the school, ensuring that the school is operating in accordance with company and state licensing standards.Be responsible for ensuring an educational, caring and safe environment for the children and parents.Spark imagination, build self-esteem and help children discover new things each day.Promote the positive image of the company and play a major role in making the company a provider of choice in educational programs for the communities that we service.Recruit, select and retain quality staff.Help achieve profitability for the company.Job Requirements:In order to be considered for this position, you must meet all state licensing requirements, including:2 -3 years of child care experience or related field.Previous management experience preferredCDA or Associates degree in Early Childhood Education preferred21 years of ageWillingness to attain mandated Director requirements (Texas Directors License)",Assistant Director - Childcare Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-director-childcare-job-houston-tx-us-169391617.aspx?mescoid=3900658001001&jobPosition=2,,Education/Training,c75e53341527f0cb2b069a162a11da65
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:07:03:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Event Promotions: Marketing / Advertising / Public Relations Entry Level MarketingEvent PromotionsAdvertising Positions Gulf Coast Events, Inc. is a consistently growing company based in Houston that provides dynamic marketing, advertising and consulting services to large national companies and corporations. We identify and develop new stream of revenue for clients through on-site promotions, innovative marketing strategies and advertising campaigns. We create and execute these campaigns to each clients researched target market. Due to our successes, we have recently taken on new clients to our portfolio. This success and expansion has opened 5 new positions that are available immediately!We are looking for people who we will aid in the development of each new client and increase productivity in multiple divisions.  Our management training program uses a hands on approach that will challenge our team to learn marketing, advertising, sales, public relations and management. We provide a setting that will broaden experiences while promoting self-confidence, accomplishment and maturity. In just a short amount of time, entry-level candidates will have the opportunity to work with several difference clients as well as the management team. We are looking for candidates with various backgrounds, but the following majors or work backgrounds will be considered first: *Marketing*Management*Public Relations*Sports Management*Advertising*Communications*Cosmetic backgrounds*Fashion experience*Event Planning / Coordination Requirements -You must actually be ENTRY LEVEL (less than 5 years experience and willingness to learn) -You must possess great people skills. -You must demonstrate excellent work ethic and a ""coachable"" demeanor. -You must have a positive business attitude, like the rest of our enthusiastic staff. -You must be confident you'll be successful, just waiting for a career opportunity where you can prove  yourself. We will be reviewing all resumes, and the most qualified candidates will be contacted within the next week for a preliminary interview. Good Luck!       ",Event Promotions: Marketing / Advertising / Public Relations Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77057",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/event-promotions-marketing-advertising-public-relations-job-houston-tx-us-169912064.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=4,,Marketing/Product,02ec921852fe6d7a796cb8e442c0ef4b
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:07:02:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Area Manager of Private Duty Home Care/May live anywhere!Travel required throughout TX, TN, KS, AL, LAJob # AMPD1mwkWI056047aA career with Brookdale has never been more rewarding! Brookdale is the only national full-spectrum senior living solutions company and committed to providing the best options for our over 110,000 residents we serve. The services that we offer ensure residents continue to live the lives that they want while also meeting all of their needs along the way. Every day our associates collaborate to guarantee this promise is fulfilled in more than 1,150 communities in 47 states. Our Senior Living Solutions include: Independent Living, Assisted Living, Memory Care, Skilled Nursing, Continuing Care Retirement, Therapy, Hospice, Home Health, and Personalized Living.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Manage Personalized Living Programs on an interim basis* Financially responsible for profitability of Personalized Living Program* Continued education of Personalized Living Managers* Assist community with key Personalized Living positions* Continued program growth* Assist community with market development Required skills and qualifications:* RN licensure in good standing* Five years of experience* Private Duty Home Health experience required* Strong organizational and documentation skills * Homecare/Sales/Ancillary skill set critical* Strong marketing experience* Proven management experience* Strong team building and mentoring skills* 80% travel required If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone though the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Area Manager of Private Duty Home Care - RN Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77056",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/area-manager-of-private-duty-home-care-rn-job-houston-tx-us-169738642.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,d5c0d5ed4edd574ccdc37ee93cd9dd0c
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:06:30:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"<!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:Arial; panose-1:2 11 6 4 2 2 2 2 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Courier New""; panose-1:2 7 3 9 2 2 5 2 4 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Wingdings; panose-1:5 2 1 2 1 8 4 8 7 8; mso-font-charset:2; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:0 0 65536 0 -2147483648 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Cambria; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} a:link, span.MsoHyperlink {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:blue; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} a:visited, span.MsoHyperlinkFollowed {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:purple; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} p {mso-margin-top-alt:auto; margin-right:0in; mso-margin-bottom-alt:auto; margin-left:0in; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-fareast-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.MsoNoSpacing, li.MsoNoSpacing, div.MsoNoSpacing {mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:11.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} span.Competent {mso-style-name:Competent; mso-ansi-font-size:10.0pt; font-family:Arial; mso-ascii-font-family:Arial; mso-hansi-font-family:Arial; color:#76923C; font-weight:bold; mso-bidi-font-weight:normal;} @page Section1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.Section1 {page:Section1;} /* List Definitions */ @list l0 {mso-list-id:1968389214; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:1179171744 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l0:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1 {mso-list-id:2118405669; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:-1320939036 67698689 137539052 67698715 592069650 67698713 67698715 67698703 67698713 67698715;} @list l1:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1:level2 {mso-level-number-format:alpha-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Calibri;} @list l1:level3 {mso-level-number-format:roman-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:right; text-indent:-9.0pt;} @list l1:level4 {mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Calibri;} @list l1:level5 {mso-level-number-format:alpha-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in;} @list l1:level6 {mso-level-number-format:roman-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:right; text-indent:-9.0pt;} @list l1:level7 {mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in;} @list l1:level8 {mso-level-number-format:alpha-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in;} ol {margin-bottom:0in;} ul {margin-bottom:0in;} --> Position:  Market Development Manager  Presented by:  North American Recruiting and Consulting Location: Texas Job Code:  CRT01000 Client Overview:  Our Client, who is moving toward the full implementation of WCM, is currently seeking an experienced Market Development Manager for Texas.  Our Client is a world leader in flexible insulation foams for the equipment-insulation market, and is also a leading provider of engineered foams. Insulation is an effective and cost-efficient way to improve energy efficiency in industrial, commercial and residential infrastructure. Our Client’s insulation materials are designed for both new and existing installations. The Engineered Foams business develops light foams for the use in a broad range of end-markets including transportation/automotive, wind energy, sports & leisure and construction. Our Client holds a leading market position in every region in which it operates.  Over the last 25 years, few significant competitors have entered the market. Complex production processes with a steep learning curve, proprietary product formulas, and strict quality controls protect Our Client’s leading position.   Job Summary:The Market Development Manager is responsible for capturing market share and driving the insulation product specification and penetration. The Market Development Manager will also establish a customer base of mechanical engineers and key stake holders to develop new opportunities in assigned territories.  Other key responsibilities include relationship development throughout the entire sales cycle with engineers, owners, contractors, designers and the sales team to ensure commercial business achievement within the education, healthcare, government and commercial industries.Job Responsibilities:·    Work with engineers and owners to develop specifications that create pull-through demand. ·      Proactively drive commercial projects from origination of specification to installation.·   Educate customers on product features, highlights and benefits through demonstrations and presentations.·      Translate market and customer needs into technical product requirements.·      Effectively roll out new products into the marketplace and drive branding.·      Exceed sales objectives and cross-sell customers through multiple channels. Requirements and Qualifications:·      Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, technical field or Management preferred.·      Minimum of seven years of territory experience in HVAC, plumbing, construction, equipment industries with a familiarity of the Insulation industry preferred.·      Expert knowledge on bid/specification process for commercial, HVAC, plumbing and industrial.·      Proficient in Microsoft Office (Word, PowerPoint, Excel) and Salesforce.com.·      The ability to read mechanical drawings to identify application and equipment for products.·      The ability to travel up to 50-60%·      Excellent written, oral and presentation skills.Job Competencies:Please select the appropriate level for each competency listed below, rating 1 through 10, with 1 being the lowest and 10 being the highest. Each competency does not need to be a 10 for role effectiveness. 1. Knowledge and Learning Ability – Possesses expertise in work with a level of expected learning and problem solving on the job.   2. Communication, Verbal Reasoning and Teamwork – Written and verbal skill through basis of reasoning and vocabulary. Supports and works well with others in department.  3. Numerical Ability and Reasoning – Numeric calculation based on knowledge, reasoning and problem solving. 4. Leadership, Assertiveness and Conflict Management – Drives processes, takes charge in role, quickly resolves situations and coaches others. 5. Independence, Decisiveness and Resilience – Self-directed, ability to make sound decisions under pressure and self-reliant. Compensation:  Base Salary between $100 – 120 K; Exceptional Benefits; Very Generous Relocation Package Contact Information: Bob Turner, Ed. D. PresidentNorth American Recruiting and Consulting903-561-6928bob.turner@narecruiting.netwww.narecruiting.net  ",Monster,,"<!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:Arial; panose-1:2 11 6 4 2 2 2 2 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Courier New""; panose-1:2 7 3 9 2 2 5 2 4 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Wingdings; panose-1:5 2 1 2 1 8 4 8 7 8; mso-font-charset:2; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:0 0 65536 0 -2147483648 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Cambria; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} a:link, span.MsoHyperlink {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:blue; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} a:visited, span.MsoHyperlinkFollowed {mso-style-noshow:yes; color:purple; text-decoration:underline; text-underline:single;} p {mso-margin-top-alt:auto; margin-right:0in; mso-margin-bottom-alt:auto; margin-left:0in; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-fareast-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.MsoNoSpacing, li.MsoNoSpacing, div.MsoNoSpacing {mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:11.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} span.Competent {mso-style-name:Competent; mso-ansi-font-size:10.0pt; font-family:Arial; mso-ascii-font-family:Arial; mso-hansi-font-family:Arial; color:#76923C; font-weight:bold; mso-bidi-font-weight:normal;} @page Section1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.Section1 {page:Section1;} /* List Definitions */ @list l0 {mso-list-id:1968389214; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:1179171744 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l0:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1 {mso-list-id:2118405669; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:-1320939036 67698689 137539052 67698715 592069650 67698713 67698715 67698703 67698713 67698715;} @list l1:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1:level2 {mso-level-number-format:alpha-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Calibri;} @list l1:level3 {mso-level-number-format:roman-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:right; text-indent:-9.0pt;} @list l1:level4 {mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Calibri;} @list l1:level5 {mso-level-number-format:alpha-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in;} @list l1:level6 {mso-level-number-format:roman-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:right; text-indent:-9.0pt;} @list l1:level7 {mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in;} @list l1:level8 {mso-level-number-format:alpha-lower; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in;} ol {margin-bottom:0in;} ul {margin-bottom:0in;} --> Position:  Market Development Manager  Presented by:  North American Recruiting and Consulting Location: Texas Job Code:  CRT01000 Client Overview:  Our Client, who is moving toward the full implementation of WCM, is currently seeking an experienced Market Development Manager for Texas.  Our Client is a world leader in flexible insulation foams for the equipment-insulation market, and is also a leading provider of engineered foams. Insulation is an effective and cost-efficient way to improve energy efficiency in industrial, commercial and residential infrastructure. Our Client’s insulation materials are designed for both new and existing installations. The Engineered Foams business develops light foams for the use in a broad range of end-markets including transportation/automotive, wind energy, sports & leisure and construction. Our Client holds a leading market position in every region in which it operates.  Over the last 25 years, few significant competitors have entered the market. Complex production processes with a steep learning curve, proprietary product formulas, and strict quality controls protect Our Client’s leading position.   Job Summary:The Market Development Manager is responsible for capturing market share and driving the insulation product specification and penetration. The Market Development Manager will also establish a customer base of mechanical engineers and key stake holders to develop new opportunities in assigned territories.  Other key responsibilities include relationship development throughout the entire sales cycle with engineers, owners, contractors, designers and the sales team to ensure commercial business achievement within the education, healthcare, government and commercial industries.Job Responsibilities:·    Work with engineers and owners to develop specifications that create pull-through demand. ·      Proactively drive commercial projects from origination of specification to installation.·   Educate customers on product features, highlights and benefits through demonstrations and presentations.·      Translate market and customer needs into technical product requirements.·      Effectively roll out new products into the marketplace and drive branding.·      Exceed sales objectives and cross-sell customers through multiple channels. Requirements and Qualifications:·      Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, technical field or Management preferred.·      Minimum of seven years of territory experience in HVAC, plumbing, construction, equipment industries with a familiarity of the Insulation industry preferred.·      Expert knowledge on bid/specification process for commercial, HVAC, plumbing and industrial.·      Proficient in Microsoft Office (Word, PowerPoint, Excel) and Salesforce.com.·      The ability to read mechanical drawings to identify application and equipment for products.·      The ability to travel up to 50-60%·      Excellent written, oral and presentation skills.Job Competencies:Please select the appropriate level for each competency listed below, rating 1 through 10, with 1 being the lowest and 10 being the highest. Each competency does not need to be a 10 for role effectiveness. 1. Knowledge and Learning Ability – Possesses expertise in work with a level of expected learning and problem solving on the job.   2. Communication, Verbal Reasoning and Teamwork – Written and verbal skill through basis of reasoning and vocabulary. Supports and works well with others in department.  3. Numerical Ability and Reasoning – Numeric calculation based on knowledge, reasoning and problem solving. 4. Leadership, Assertiveness and Conflict Management – Drives processes, takes charge in role, quickly resolves situations and coaches others. 5. Independence, Decisiveness and Resilience – Self-directed, ability to make sound decisions under pressure and self-reliant. Compensation:  Base Salary between $100 – 120 K; Exceptional Benefits; Very Generous Relocation Package Contact Information: Bob Turner, Ed. D. PresidentNorth American Recruiting and Consulting903-561-6928bob.turner@narecruiting.netwww.narecruiting.net  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/market-development-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169574298.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=8,,,24a0e041bdc8ac84f7fc9f43e99cd6d2
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:06:28:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY The Associate in this position manages and performs administrative functions related to the vehicle/drivers of the Healthy Living Mobile Clinics (""HLMC""). Responsible for driving mobile units/vehicles with CDL license to clinic sites, scheduling drivers, maintenance and recording of maintenance of all vehicles in logbook according to specifications and communications with office coordinator. Capable of a flexible work schedule, with possibility of overtime, evenings and weekends schedule. Performs additional duties as assigned. MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES * Must be able to safely drive mobile units/vehicles in accordance with applicable TX DOT rules and regulations for a CDL driver. * Must perform Pre/Post trip vehicles inspections and report findings.* Must maintain mobile units/vehicles and generator fueled. * Perform maintenance of mobile units/vehicles that includes but not limited to(Changing of A/C filters, septic and water tank levels) Troubleshoots and resolves mechanical failures.* Schedule PM for all vehicles and maintain current log of all maintenances following manufacturer PM guidelines and ensures mobile units/vehicles run in good working conditions. Schedules repairs of units/vehicles when required. Additional duties as assigned. . Set-up and tear down of mobile units/vehicles at each location in accordance with departmental and/or manufacturers' guidelines. . Set-up vehicle electronics and medical equipment for clinic . Checks in and works with facility coordinator to discuss each clinic process. . Maintains patient traffic control in/around vehicle (s) during clinic . Assists patients entering/leaving unit . Operates wheel-chair lift . May perform additional duties as assignedPOSITION QUALIFICATIONS A. Education/Skills . High school diploma or GED equivalent . Training of commercial vehicles (safety and operation skills) . Computer skills with proficiency in Microsoft Office . Must be able to function effectively in a team-oriented environment . Must be flexible, reliable and demonstrates sound judgment and initiative . Must be able to interact with patients/public and team members in a friendly, professional and ethical manner B. ExperienceTwo years of experience driving a commercial vehicle at least 40 foot vehicleKnowledge of mechanics of large vehicles and safety maintenance of vehicles C. Licenses, Registrations, or CertificationsTexas Commercial Driver's License, CPR certification Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Coordinator - Mobile Unit Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77002",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/coordinator-mobile-unit-job-houston-tx-us-169757043.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,b017098a5fae8bd49ce4bb48ae96c016
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:05:42:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Prospects for new customers via phone, interactively and in-person within relevant industries to present and close on commercial pest control services and products. Creates new business at the local and regional levels, and follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction, increase existing business and obtain referrals. Collaborates with internal departments to deliver solutions and provide quality service to new and existing customers. Responsibilities 1. Prospects for new customers via phone interactively through tip groups, networking, cross-selling and referrals, and by canvassing for large potential customers in industries such as food grade, food processing, distribution/logistics, healthcare, manufacturing, and companies with multiple physical locations. 2. Presents commercial pest control services and products to potential customers through in-person presentations and electronic communications. 3. Creates new business at the local and regional and national levels through creative calls, leads, prospecting, networking, cross-selling and referrals. 4. Follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction of service and products and to obtain referrals for new business. 5. Collaborates with the National Accounts department to deliver solutions to multi-unit locations assigned as contract leads. 6. Works with Branch Managers, Sales Managers, Service Managers, Region Managers and service professionals to ensure quality service delivery to new and existing customers; assists in resolving customer issues. Education and Experience Requirements • High School Diploma or GED equivalent • Associate’s or Bachelor’s degree preferred, or equivalent combination of education and experience • Two or more years experience in business-to-business (B2B) sales; proven sales history with increasing sales amounts year after year Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Demonstrated knowledge of selling techniques (prospecting, overcoming objections, presentation skills, gaining commitment, negotiation) • Skill in taking independent action and being a self-starter • Skill in written and verbal communication • Ability to build customer relationships and provide appropriate levels of customer service • Business acumen and the ability to calculate numbers and amounts • Skill with Microsoft Office software applications (Word, Outlook, Excel, PowerPoint) • Skill in adapting to new company software and using the internet to research target industries and specific businesses • Ability to travel locally on an extensive basis Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Business Development Rep / BB Sales / Outside Sales Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-rep-b2b-sales-outside-sales-job-houston-tx-us-169753626.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c30a3e6a8ae0d7b67b86efd07bbd20df
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:05:41:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:     Assesses and provides treatment for infant, child, adolescent, young adult, and elderly patients according to chief complaint and presenting symptoms.   PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:  Triages, assesses, and prioritizes patients upon arrival according to the ESI Level 5 Triage System. Performs primary and secondary assessments on patients with traumatic injuries, and initiates immediate nursing care and therapy for patients presenting with cardiac symptoms. Assesses and manages patients with rapidly changing andor life-threatening conditions in accordance with Emergency Care Center guidelines, order sets, and Advanced Cardiac and Pediatric Life Support protocols. Manages pain control needs for all patients. Provides care and education congruent with age-related needs for the infant, child, adolescent, young adult, and elderly populations. Educates patient or caregiver on appropriate home care, including safe and effective use of medications, pain management and comfort, needed referrals and resources, and when to seek further care and follow-up after emergency care. Maintains eight (8) hrs of stroke specific education yearly. SCOPE OF CARE: The Emergency Department (ED) is designated as a Level III Trauma Center for adults and children. The Emergency Department has a total of sixteen (16) acute care beds and eight (8) ""Fast-track"" beds. Of the sixteen (16) acute care beds; one (1) bed is designated for psychiatric, and one (1) bed for isolation; and two (2) beds for major trauma/critical care. Sixteen (16) beds have central cardiac monitoring, and there are four (4) portable monitors that can be utilized for transports. Work Experience: One year experience in ER.   License/Registration/ Certification: Current RN permit or licensure issued by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of Texas to practice professional nursing. Current American Heart Association Healthcare Provider certification required. Current ACLS/PALS and TNCC certifications required. TNCC is required within 6 months of employment for new hires.Education & Training Completion of an accredited school of nursing program resulting in an Associate Degree, Diploma or Baccalaureate degree in nursing.    Skills: Technical, clerical, critical thinking and interpersonal skills relevant to total patient care/area in order to safely and efficiently treat patients.  Good verbal and written communication skills necessary in order to be clearly and easily understood by patients, families and members of the Health Care team.  Writes/prints legibly in order to document accurately and understandably, and to provide direction to support staff and others.  Demonstrates a pleasant, helpful and caring demeanor in order to be an effective patient advocate.   EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER MINORITIES / WOMEN / VETERANS / DISABLED",Registered Nurse (RN) - Emergency (ED); p-a; Evening Shift Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77001",,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-emergency-ed-2p-2a-evening-shift-job-houston-tx-us-169639566.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,15ce7232a3f72823c987a24a5bde22c0
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:05:31:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position overview: Oversees multi-store locations in a given geographic area. Characteristics: Background of successful sales and team building. People person with a mind for business. Entrepreneurial. Merchant. Hard worker. Searching for aggressive personal and professional growth.Responsibilities:Operations:Maximizes return on investment by managing the daily operations of the stores. Understands the profit and loss of stores in district and manages the operational costs to budget via the controls of company assets.Team Building:Experience in recruiting with process/vision to attract successful employees who fit culturally into the stores and market place.Articulate and effectively deliver the companies goals, vision and philosophy. Build continuous training programs that educate and motivate both managers and style consultants.Sales:Sales are the key to a successful organization and sales techniques including the selling process and guest loyalty and satisfaction are a must. Ability to mentor in these areas is required.Business:Analyze inventory turns and margins. Understand inventory trends in the marketplace. Provide feedback/ input to merchandising department regarding inventory and assortment. Provide input regarding staffing performance and success to store managers. Provide regional trends and marketplace reports to operations department. Provide input regarding marketing plans and experience to the marketing department.Communication:Communication between Field and Home Office with regards to operations, merchandising, personnel, sales, advertising, and market place.Must have experience in managing multiple stores in a retail apparel environment!",District Manager-Texas Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/district-manager-texas-job-houston-tx-us-170029820.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=2,"80,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e098dca8629387dfd4cd668b69681fcd
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:05:29:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking to advance your career with one of the top Fortune 500 Companies? Please apply today for a Part Time Nurse Position in Houston, TX! Pay:$37.96/HourPart Time-2-3 Shifts Per Week/ 1-2 weeks per monthBilingual: French, Spanish or German JOB DESCRIPTION:Travel Guard is an emergency travel assistance company, providing services to insured travelers who suffer illness or injury during their travels. The Medical Case Manager (MCM) follows the client’s case from the onset and monitors the medical condition until the client is cleared for travel either by commercial air or if medically necessary, air ambulance. The MCM must rely on education, experience, assessment skills, and critical judgment to make determinations that ensure the client is receiving appropriate medical care, or take steps to arrange a medical evacuation to the nearest adequate facility as quickly as appropriate for the acuity of the medical condition. Our clients travel the entire world and some cases present special challenges due to lack of resources such as local infrastructure, transportation, medical facilities, healthcare workers, needed medications, or supplies and remoteness of location.  RESPONSIBILITIES: Monitoring and managing medical cases, including medical evacuations, physician visits, and ongoing hospitalized cases worldwide; In conjunction with the recommendations of the treating physician and under the direction of the Travel Guard physician advisor on-duty, directs assistance activities; Exercises independent thinking and evaluates information critically in order to make appropriate decisions that directly impact medical outcomes.  QUALIFICATIONS: Associate/Technical or Bachelor of Science of Nursing Registered Professional Nurse in the State of Texas Demonstrates personal expertise and knowledge in: Emergency / critical care clinical nursing (minimum of 5 years) Out-of-hospital emergency care, aeromedical transport services, flight physiology (preferred) Critical independent thinking and ability to multi-task in situations wherein the outcome is time sensitive Effectively manages computer technology, typing and word processing Foreign Language fluency preferred  Please apply today!! ",Part-Time RN Job in Houston,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Houston, TX 77019",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-rn-job-houston-tx-us-169911956.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=3,,IT/Software Development,ecb2a909ced45c0bf75d5a807beef188
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:05:09:12,No,jobs.monster.com," Quantity Surveyor:Job Description:Quantity Surveyor / Progress Measurement Specialist - This is a field assigned position in the Beaumont / Port Arthur, TX area.  Our Construction Quantity Surveyor / Progress Measurement Specialist will have a strong understanding of fundamentals of construction planning. You will maintain development of detailed material take?offs and you will assist in large and complex progress tracking assignments. You will have a minimum of one year field experience with a passion to learn and grow. JOB ROLES: Responsible for the development of detailed material takeoffs Provide meaningful, accurate historical quantity and cost data Manage the measurement of baseline quantities for review. Accumulate and compile accurate quantity installation data. Evaluate and identify trends and deviations with regard to budgeted quantity vs. installed quantities. Qualifications: B.S. in Engineering or Construction Management, Primavera P6 and Earned Value Management experience. 5+ years in oil/gas or associated industry. Experience in project scheduling, reporting and progress measurement systems. Experience with coordinating and involving multiple engineering disciplines. Experience in downstream, field construction projects required. #LI-AG1",Quantity Surveyor Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/quantity-surveyor-job-houston-tx-us-169463215.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=5,,Engineering,fe653c3ca10f4334033b18b0d29ab086
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:04:56:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Combined Insurance is seeking Sales Agents to join our fast-paced, high energy, growing company. We are proud of our tradition of success in the insurance industry of over 90 years. Come join our team of hard-working, talented professionals! JOB SUMMARY: An Agent position with Combined Insurance offers you a full-time, direct employee position where you’ll receive company support and comprehensive training. We offer unlimited income potential, including expense-paid training, a limited guaranteed income to start, and a competitive benefits package. No experience is required, but prior exposure to sales and customer service is helpful. Experienced and licensed insurance agents are highly encouraged to apply. RESPONSIBILITIES: Conduct needs-based, consultative sales presentations to a wide range of individuals and independent business people Utilize marketing tools and resources to generate new business Secure referrals and set appointments to present to prospective customers Deliver excellent customer service to existing policyholders and prospective customers alike Develop and maintain a professional presence in the communities in which you work SKILLS/EXPERIENCE: While no specific experience selling insurance is necessary, prior exposure to commissioned sales, customer service and marketing experience can be helpful. Our training program will give you most of the tools and knowledge to help you succeed. One year of work experience required; commissioned sales and customer service experience in real estate, auto sales, and/or as an insurance agent is a plus Your respective state’s license to sell accident, health and life insurance, or a willingness to obtain proper licensing Strong interpersonal communication skills An outgoing, positive person who enjoys building relationships Driven, disciplined, resilient, achievement-focused, coachable professional Basic computer skills, including knowledge of Microsoft Windows, a plus A valid driver’s license, reliable transportation with liability and property insurance coverage on the vehicle EDUCATION: High school diploma or GED equivalent is preferred, college-level education is a plus Bilingual English/Spanish a plus OUR BENEFITS As a Combined corporate employee, you have access to one of the most comprehensive benefit plans in the business, designed to meet your needs and help you reach your financial goals.  We are committed to supporting its employees with a comprehensive compensation package that is appropriate in the market where they work. Below are several of the many benefits we offer our employees: Health insurance Dental insurance Tuition reimbursement A company-match 401(k) plan Disability insurance Life insurance Employee referral bonuses ABOUT COMBINED INSURANCE Combined Insurance is a leading provider of individual supplemental accident, disability, health and life insurance products. With a field sales force and corporate staff in excess of 5,000 people worldwide, Combined Insurance meets the growing coverage needs of policyholders around the globe. We pride ourselves on being customer-centric, people-driven, accountable, performance-minded, and ethical. We invest in our employees and take the time to focus on their development, needs and career aspirations. Connect with us onTWITTER, FACEBOOK, LINKEDIN, INSTAGRAM and GOOGLE+ Read our blog, SUPPLEMENTALLY SPEAKING, for more info on health and wellness topics  ",Sales Agent Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-agent-job-houston-tx-us-168953523.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,,5e17b2569a95f314f99e683044f3876e
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:04:30:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARYMaintain and track PBJ staffing data in Kronos. Compile and load agency staffing data into the external CMS PBJ system. Review and validate staffing data to ensure integrity. Analyze data to identify potential compliance gaps at all facilities with patient care staffing requirements.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Perform daily analysis of patient care staffing hours for contractors and salaried staff using reports and tools. Process corrections and input omissions as needed. Validate data in Kronos to ensure non paid PBJ staffing hours are accurate and not interfering with paid hours.Input agency hours into CMS PBJ. Track and validate agency staff to ensure accurate tenure and turnover is reported.Review combined data in CMS PBJ to ensure it is complete and accurate. Analyze and report on compliance for staffing requirements for all job categories at all facilities.Deliver fast and accurate work in a high volume environmentProvide excellent customer service. Maintain open communications with all levels of the organization as necessary to ensure accuracy of PBJ staffing dataParticipate in special projects and perform other duties as assigned. Knowledge and Skills: Highly skilled at understanding data provided, identifying issues, and has the ability to handle findings and correct or escalate appropriately.Full understanding of timekeeping processing, reporting and system query functionality.Working knowledge of payroll principles, best practices, regulations and procedures. Ability to analyze and interpret multiple sources of data and troubleshoot issues. Knowledge of computer applications, including proficiency with spreadsheets.Effective interpersonal (written and verbal) communication skills with the ability to work as part of a team. Ability to deal sensitively with confidential material. ENTRY QUALIFICATIONSHigh School diploma required. Fundamental Payroll Certification (FPC) preferredMinimum of four years of experience in payroll with proven ability to research, reconcile and resolve issues and experience creating system queries.Excellent oral and written communication skills, ability to work independently, and ability to manage a variety of tasks to meet competing deadlines.Must have a strong work ethic and be very dependable. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",PBJ Payroll Specialist Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Healthcare ServicesFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pbj-payroll-specialist-job-houston-tx-us-169997920.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=1,,,3a9edb9188e72df48bc274792c60b83a
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:04:22:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description: ·         Participate in customer site visits, proposal development, and contract development/reviews to ensure complete understanding of scope, contractual obligations, and risk of jobs·     Work with Project Sales Representative before project development; take the project from sales through development into execution; maintain communication with Project Sales Representative over the course of the project; and document changes that affect the job scope, schedule, or budget agreement·         Interact with customers, engineers, vendors, suppliers, and others throughout the design and planning phase of the project·      Work closely with project team to develop and maintain an overall project schedule.  Show critical path items and anticipate problematic issues.  Responsible to foresee typical issues that historically challenge schedules, construction, and impact project costs.  Identify these issues and work with project team to develop solutions to overcome potential problem areas·      Responsible to regularly and accurately communicate the project status, including schedule, financial status, risk assessment, quality, safety and other key areas·         Responsible for coordinating work crews and scheduling required equipment·         Must be willing to travel as needed and be able to work with and manage field leadership·         Full-time position, excellent benefits, salaried, compensation package, incentive pay 401k  Qualifications:·         Proven ability to manage multi-million dollar projects effectively, within budget, and on schedule·         10 years experience in construction, on large commercial/multi-disciplined/complicated projects is preferred·         Knowledge of heavy lift equipment and/or plant operations is desired·         Demonstrated understanding of engineering plans and specifications·         Experience with MS Office and MS Project, effective written and oral communication skills·         Must possess a valid driver’s license,·         Experience in logistics, i.e., trucking industry, a plus·         Must pass drug test, fit for duty test and background check·         Proven ability to manage multi-million dollar projects effectively, within budget, and on schedule·         10 years experience in construction, on large commercial/multi-disciplined/complicated projects is preferred·         Knowledge of heavy lift equipment and/or plant operations is desired·         Demonstrated understanding of engineering plans and specifications·         Experience with MS Office and MS Project, effective written and oral communication skills·         Must possess a valid driver’s license,·         Experience in logistics, i.e., trucking industry, a plus·         Must pass drug test, fit for duty test and background check",Project Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77015",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169786193.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Project/Program Management,1446fa101a891ee9fe87e6c085cdf97c
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:04:21:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279635 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Night",Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279635 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Night",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-full-time-nights-kindred-hospital-sugar-land-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913338.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,b8612dd8789068e30470304b74a40d94
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:04:10:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: TellerJob ID Number: 5258069-1Location: Houston,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionThis 40 hour Teller posting is located at the Sunnyside location. At Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. Tellers are the face of our company and represent Wells Fargo in the community. A Teller position with our team offers an opportunity to be part of one of America s greatest companies. You'll have exposure to a variety of responsibilities, people and experiences in a professional work environment - that's part of the fun! We value what’s right for our customers in everything we do. Everything we do, we do to protect the customer and the bank. Our teller’s role is to warmly welcome customers to our store, efficiently process the customer’s request, and build trust that Wells Fargo can help them with all of their financial needs. We want them to know about all of our innovative services, financial education information, as well as take advantage of the relationships we provide as Wells Fargo team members. Every teller is part of a team that is rated first, and most importantly, on the customers’ experience with the teams’ service. Every teller has her/his own scorecard with performance goals. Our best tellers constantly go the extra mile to greet customers and provide exceptional customer service, make them feel welcome and also engage them to learn about their financial goals. Reliable attendance is essential for success in this role. Your exciting role includes: Going the extra mile to greet customers, show them that we care, and make them feel welcome Asking questions to learn about their financial needs and, when the customer sees the value, introducing them to other Wells Fargo team members. Setting performance goals and working with your manager to increase your customer advocacy effectiveness through feedback and coaching Processing between 20-25 customer transactions each hour with no mistakes through patience, attention to detail, and the ability to follow procedures. Accurately maintaining and balancing a cash drawer. Delivering upon customer needs for products such as safe deposit boxes, merchant/vault, ATM processing, bonds and coupons, foreign currency and night drop. A happy, satisfied customer starts with you! At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others without being asked. We want team members who are committed to the success of the team. Tellers develop and improve their skills through training programs and regular feedback discussions with supervisors, to help them improve in their current role and further their professional development. Many of our managers and senior leaders started their career as a teller. With an organization the size of Wells Fargo, there are multiple opportunities to learn and grow and explore career options over time. Our vision and values supports developing and engaging our team members. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule(s) for this position is 7am. -7pm and may change based on business need Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsCustomer service focus with the ability to stay positive in interactions with customers and team membersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience achieving individual and team goalsCash handling experienceExperience selling products and servicesExperience working in a fast-paced environment Job Expectations Ability to stand for extended periods of timeAbility to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduled Street Address TX-HOU-Sunnyside: 4645 Reed Rd - Houston, TXDisclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Teller Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/teller-job-houston-tx-us-169980535.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b079e0fa08203530a4e118ef4891e886
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:04:07:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of our Clients, a specialty chemicals producer in the Houston, Texas area, has an immediate opening for an Environmental Manager.Primary ResponsibilitiesProvide overall leadership and direction to the company’s environmental policies and strategic initiatives.Identify, develop and implement programs to drive improvements that support environmental excellence, consistent with the company’s goals.  Lead project teams, as appropriate.Supervise other members of the environmental team.  Provide coaching and mentoring to encourage personnel development.Continually improve the company’s policies, plans and procedures to promote compliance with applicable environmental requirements under Federal, State and Local regulations.Maintain working knowledge of all applicable environmental laws, regulations, and industry standards.Provide leadership and support with incident investigation, emergency response planning, employee training, process hazard analyses, and contractor evaluation efforts.Provide guidance and leadership to all levels of the organization with respect to the company’s HES compliance tools and strategies.Enhance relationships with outside entities, including governmental and non-governmental organizations that are part of the company’s success in its HES programs.Provide direction in air pollution, potable water, storm water discharges, spill prevention & response, hazardous substance management & release reporting, and pollution prevention.Apply state-of-the-art and innovative management techniques and engineering solutions, including information systems and engineering approaches to resolve HES issues and to achieve program objectives on schedule.Utilize a real-time, data-driven approach to track, monitor, and improve environmental performance, consistent with company goals and objectives.Loss control responsibilities which include: conducting inspections and audits related to the Loss Control program as assigned, participating in Hazard Reviews as needed, recommending safety improvements, completion of safety action items as assigned, completing required regulatory training, and compliance with all applicable regulations.Actively/routinely monitors facility conditions and plant operations and maintenance activities to ensure HES compliance. Maintain visibility among plant personnel at all levels.RequiredBachelors degree or higher in Chemical Engineering, Environmental Engineering, or related discipline.Minimum of fifteen years of plant experience with relevant industrial experience.Working knowledge of federal, state, and local environmental related laws and regulations as they affect the plant.Class D Potable Water Operator Certification.RCRA/DOT Certification.EPA Method 9 Certification.Our client offers competitive compensation, an excellent benefits package, a 9/80 work schedule, and much more.Please send your resume in Word.doc format to Reed Rogers at reed@parkwoodintl.com and refer to Job No. 10764.",Environmental Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/environmental-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169648646.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=8,,Engineering,a68355fdcb0dbd988122ec53c48b2b90
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:02:26:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Personal Injury law firm with professional atmosphere seeks legal assistant/administrative assistant. The candidate must possess:General computer knowledgeExcellent communication/people skillsExcellent spellingStrong work ethicBe highly motivated, detailed and organized.",Legal Assistant / Administrative Assistant Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77027",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/legal-assistant-administrative-assistant-job-houston-tx-us-170042558.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=11,,Legal,37b2e4816f737c33e0b7a782d901282f
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:02:24:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARYResponsible for driving mobile units/vehicles with CDL license to clinic sites, scheduling maintenance and recording of maintenance of all vehicles in logbook according to specifications and communications with office coordinator and Director. Capable of a flexible work schedule, includes evenings and weekends. Performs additional duties as assigned. MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIESDriver: * Must be able to safely drive mobile units/vehicles in accordance with applicable TX DOT rules and regulations for a CDL driver. * Must perform Pre/Post trip vehicles inspections and report findings.* Must maintain mobile units/vehicles and generator fueled. * Perform maintenance of mobile units/vehicles that includes but not limited to(Changing of A/C filters, septic and water tank levels) Troubleshoots and resolves mechanical failures.* Schedule PM for all vehicles and maintain current log of all maintenances following manufacturer PM guidelines and ensures mobile units/vehicles run in good working conditions. Schedules repairs of units/vehicles when required. Additional duties as assigned. . Set-up and tear down of mobile units/vehicles at each location in accordance with departmental and/or manufacturers' guidelines. . Set-up vehicle electronics and medical equipment for clinic . Maintains patient traffic control in/around vehicle (s) during clinic . Assist patients entering/leaving unit . Operates wheel-chair lift . May perform additional duties as assigned POSITION QUALIFICATIONS A. Education/Skills . High school diploma or GED equivalent . Training of commercial vehicles (safety and operation skills) . Computer skills with proficiency in Microsoft Office . Must be able to functions effectively in a team-oriented environment . Must be flexible, reliable and demonstrates sound judgment and initiative . Must be able to interact with patients/public and team members in a friendly, professional and ethical manner B. ExperienceTwo years of experience driving a commercial vehicle at least 40 foot vehicleKnowledge of mechanics of large vehicles and safety maintenance of vehicles C. Licenses, Registrations, or CertificationsTexas Commercial Driver's License, CPR certificationEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Mobile Unit Driver Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77002",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/mobile-unit-driver-job-houston-tx-us-169757456.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,a24c1811d1c6bd56a2608f5c831e9f9f
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:02:11:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse-ICU Nights Kindred Hospital Spring ( Job Number: 269252 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! The ICU Nurse/RN will deliver quality patient care by contributing to the nursing care-plan from admission to discharge. The ICU Nurse/RN will prepare assessment of patient's progress and keep family informed.  The ICU Nurse/RN will monitor pain management procedures.  The ICU Nurse/RN will participate in the discharge-planning process.  The ICU Nurse/RN will ensure current and accurate patient documentation.  The ICU Nurse/RN will supervise ancillary staff members. Qualifications The ICU Nurse/RN Candidate will need: The ICU Nurse/RN will have excellent communication, interpersonal, and computer skills. The ICU Nurse/RN will have knowledge of medication-administration procedures. The ICU Nurse/RN will have at least six months Medical/Surgical experience in an acute-care setting are preferred. Critical Care experience preferred. The ICU Nurse/RN will have a BCLS certification; ACLS preferred. The ICU Nurse/RN will have a current state RN license. The ICU Nurse/RN will have a Bachelors degree in Nursing, an Associates degree, or a Nursing diploma from an accredited Institution. CONSIDERING NEW GRADS Benefits Kindred Healthcare offers an attractive benefits package for full-time employment, including medical/dental insurance, life insurance, short-term disability, PTO, 401(k), tuition reimbursement and much more. Premium salaries commensurate with experience. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : ICU Primary Location : TX-Houston-Kindred Hospital-Spring Organization : 4858 - Kindred Hospital-Spring Shift : Night",Registered Nurse-ICU Nights Kindred Hospital Spring Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse-ICU Nights Kindred Hospital Spring ( Job Number: 269252 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! The ICU Nurse/RN will deliver quality patient care by contributing to the nursing care-plan from admission to discharge. The ICU Nurse/RN will prepare assessment of patient's progress and keep family informed.  The ICU Nurse/RN will monitor pain management procedures.  The ICU Nurse/RN will participate in the discharge-planning process.  The ICU Nurse/RN will ensure current and accurate patient documentation.  The ICU Nurse/RN will supervise ancillary staff members. Qualifications The ICU Nurse/RN Candidate will need: The ICU Nurse/RN will have excellent communication, interpersonal, and computer skills. The ICU Nurse/RN will have knowledge of medication-administration procedures. The ICU Nurse/RN will have at least six months Medical/Surgical experience in an acute-care setting are preferred. Critical Care experience preferred. The ICU Nurse/RN will have a BCLS certification; ACLS preferred. The ICU Nurse/RN will have a current state RN license. The ICU Nurse/RN will have a Bachelors degree in Nursing, an Associates degree, or a Nursing diploma from an accredited Institution. CONSIDERING NEW GRADS Benefits Kindred Healthcare offers an attractive benefits package for full-time employment, including medical/dental insurance, life insurance, short-term disability, PTO, 401(k), tuition reimbursement and much more. Premium salaries commensurate with experience. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : ICU Primary Location : TX-Houston-Kindred Hospital-Spring Organization : 4858 - Kindred Hospital-Spring Shift : Night",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-icu-nights-kindred-hospital-spring-job-houston-tx-us-169913694.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,3345e06bbb6107818bb5ffb19794e2dd
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:02:11:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-TimeBrookdale Galleria 2929 Post Oak Blvd Houston, TX 77056 Job#: 064135Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities: * Implement and coordinate the delivery of care in collaboration with physician and resource health care personnel* Utilize the nursing process (assessment, planning, implementation, and evaluation) in applying nursing knowledge* Document all pertinent information regarding nursing care, care plans and observations* Maintain a working knowledge of facility infection control procedures* Provide functional direction and assistance to LPN's and CNA's, and complete new staff orientation as assigned* Make rounds on a timely basis to ensure continuity of careRequired skills and qualifications: * Graduate of an accredited school* Current registered nurse in the state of practice* Two years nursing experience, including long-term care experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Registered Nurse RN Job in Houston,Part Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77056",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-job-houston-tx-us-170042421.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,3816b85734fec6ddac48343fed0b6e20
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:01:31:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Software Education Representative, you will teach the benefits of Reynolds and Reynolds software to our customers and associates in a classroom setting and over the Internet. You will learn WebEx Training Center to conduct classes on-line, complete with live audio and video, application sharing, and hands-on lab computers for “students.” Some domestic and international travel to customer sites may be required.30-40% of your time will be spent writing course materials including course guides and Computer Assisted Instruction (CAI) courses. Course guides are 100 to 300 pages long and are used for instructor-led classes. CAI’s are written on Reynolds and Reynolds software to provide self-paced training to our customers at their own dealerships. You will also write quizzes and evaluations to determine if students have learned the course materials after their training.Training:Training will take you from student, to observer, to team teacher, to instructor in three to four months. You will also attend software education classes and complete a detailed checklist of training tasks, including visits to customer dealerships. You will learn very specific Instructional Design techniques to write course materials, test questions, exercises, and evaluations.Requirements:Bachelor’s degree required Strong public presence and love of learning Good sense of humor and ability to inspire others Okay with teaching via the Web or in person up to 6 hours/day Bilingual in Spanish preferred but not requiredBenefits:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including:Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance 401(k) – 100% matching up to 6% of compensation Referral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hire Paid holidays, vacation and sick days Professional development and training through Reynolds University Discounted membership to local area fitness centers On-site medical clinic staffed by a Nurse Practitioner Company-sponsored events and sports leagues including: company picnic, cook-off, softball, volleyball, bowling and many more! Gourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine options Credit Union membership Opportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunitiesReynolds and Reynolds promotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment.Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Software Education Representative Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77040",AllComputer HardwareComputer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/software-education-representative-job-houston-tx-us-169695062.aspx?mescoid=2500401001001&jobPosition=3,,Education/Training,744384db22a1fbf755a591c93cdd21a7
United States of America,US,10/Dec/2015:00:27:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Training Department plays a crucial role in connecting our customers to our software. The main purpose of this position is to help our customers make a smooth conversion to the Reynolds and Reynolds system and provide training and customer support throughout the process. You will be responsible for installing and upgrading Reynolds and Reynolds software solutions in all parts of the dealership. When working with the customers, you will not only be a trainer but also a project manager. You will be responsible for coordinating all parts required for the install and making sure that all team members are on the same page in order to successfully convert the software.You will typically be given at least 1 month advance notice about upcoming trips. You will travel both individually and with a team installing and converting our software for customers. This requires excellent presentation and communication skills as you will meet with dealership management to understand the needs for each dealership. Based on these requirements, you will customize the system and train key dealership personnel on how to use the solution. While in the office you will support current customers, prepare for future trips, and conduct follow-ups with recently installed customers.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor’s degree preferred Outgoing, friendly personality Strong written and verbal communication skills Ability to travel 80% of the timeTRAINING:Training lasts approximately 4 months and includes department observations, classroom instruction, and on-the-job training with a mentor during travel trips. Classroom instruction includes product training as well as automotive dealership operations. You will focus on one area of the software during your product training and assist experienced representatives with customer set-up and implementation. In addition, you will have the opportunity to see Reynolds’ solutions “in action” by visiting car dealerships that already utilize our solutions on a daily basis.BENEFITS:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance 401k with 100% matching up to 6% of compensation Referral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hirePaid holidays, vacation and sick days Professional development and training through Reynolds University Discounted membership to local area fitness centersOn-site medical clinic staffed by a Nurse Practitioner Company-sponsored events and sports leagues including: company picnic, softball, volleyball, bowling, and more! Gourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine optionsCredit Union membershipOpportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunities Reynolds and Reynolds promotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment.Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Customer Training Professional Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77040",AllComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-training-professional-job-houston-tx-us-169948077.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Customer Support/Client Care,e3b66406a3d9baf5db6f7057bfa4d587
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:00:06:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking Test Administrators for a short-term project in Irving, Texas (TX). The Test Administrators will be administering tests to students in grades 3 - 12.The dates of the project are as follows (not including the approximately 8 - 10 hours of paid training that will take place before the testing dates): 3/29-4/1 5/2-5/6 5/9-5/13Duties include: Traveling to test site Taking attendance for one's classroom and reporting absences to site coordinator Reading instructions to students / answering questions Actively monitoring students while they are taking the test Completing seating charts Accurately coding test information on answer documents Verifying answers have been bubbled on answer documents Verifying all bubbles are marked neatly and completely filled inREQUIREMENTS: Teaching experience is a plus but not required Must be able to pass background check",Test Administrator Job in Irving,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Irving, TX 75039",,http://jobview.monster.com/Test-Administrator-Job-Irving-TX-US-164864023.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,62ad7dc83ff9a32cdb0bff5a909785da
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:00:28:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"CPR HeartPlace has an excellent full time employment opportunity, with benefits, for an experienced Medical Assistant at its Mansfield HeartPlace clinic located in Mansfield, TX.  Prior working experience as a Medical Assistant in a clinical capacity is required.  Experience in cardiology is preferred.General SummaryPerforms selected nursing and administrative/clerical duties that assist in the management of our patient’s care.Principal Duties and Responsibilities1.  Provides excellent customer service and the highest quality patient care.2.  Escorts patient to exam rooms.3.  Takes patient vital signs (blood pressure, heart rate, weight, etc.)4.  Accurately records patient the details of medications in chart / EMR.5.  Responsible for EKG, rhythm strip, and signal average EKG hook-ups and printouts.   (Proficiency Required)6.  Assists physicians with patient exams as needed.7.  Responsible for Holter monitor hook-ups and removals, event recorders and Loop recorders. (Proficiency Required)8.  Maintains cleanliness and supplies in patient exam rooms.9.  Takes pharmacy phone calls, reviews charts, and calls in prescription refills.10. Monitors pharmacy samples, removing from stock as expired.11. Receives phone calls from patients and other external sources.12. Pulls patient charts when necessary.13. Utilizes the computer for patient inquiry and scheduling.14. Follows all OSHA and other safety guidelines. 15. Maintains current CPR certification.16. At all times, protects the confidentiality of protected health information (PHI) of patients per HIPAA regulations.17. Actively demonstrates teamwork at all times.18. Performs other duties as required.19. May also be responsible for insurance precertification, surgery scheduling and coordinating transfers and admissions.Knowledge, Skills and Abilities1. High school diploma or equivalent.2. Graduation from an accredited program for Medical Assistants.3. Medical Assistant certification required or must obtain within 90 days of hire date.4. Ability to responsibly ascertain detailed and important information provided by patients and accurately relays such information to physician in the scope of assistance of care, and records such information in the patient’s chart and/or EMR.5. Responsible for calling in prescription information to pharmacies and provide detailed drug information to patients.6. Maintains current BCLS certification.7. 2+ years medical assistant experience, preferably at a cardiology practice.8. Fluently speak, read, and write English.9. Understanding of OSHA requirements in a clinical setting10. Understanding of HIPAA requirements.11. Excellent verbal and written communication skills.12. Ability to meet physical demands of the job which include, but are not limited to: standing, bending, pushing, pulling, lifting, transporting supplies or equipment, walking for extended periods of time, and occasionally lifting and carrying items which may weigh up to 50 pounds.13. Vision and hearing must be within or correctable to within normal ranges.We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V.  We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.",MEDICAL ASSISTANT AT HEARTPLACE MANSFIELD,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/MEDICAL-ASSISTANT-AT-HEARTPLACE-MANSFIELD-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164747628.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=16,,,c355a3095cdd8a7409717a54cd2a9b0a
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:00:28:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are working with a retail company in North Dallas that is looking to add a Senior Accountant to their corporate accounting department. Industry experience is not a requirement but would be a plus! Duties and Responsibilities for this role include:Assist with monthly and annual close process Maintain the general ledger and posted journal entries to the general ledger Assist with daily operations of the accounting department including general accounting and accounts payable Compile and analyze complex financial information to prepare balance sheets and income statementsAdvanced Excel skills required Find Us on Facebook!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile: Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Senior Accountant Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,DallasTX,Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Accountant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165258872.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=9,0.00 - 32.50 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,28d25a38c9e40da508399c1d4557b1d2
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:00:52:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Mobile Developer. Team,  We have 11 (6 Android/5 iOS) openings in Dallas that the manager would like to be filled ASAP. Replacing the current HC in Dallas. Ideally would like to have 2 Leads and then a mix of mid and sr developers. All candidates need to be willing/eligible to convert to FTE.  KEYS:iOS, Android (Java, Android SDK), Web mobile development (HTML5, responsive)",Mobile Developer Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Mobile-Developer-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164772826.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,da8e25f52530eb5370bc92dce21558a5
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:01:15:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experienced Legal Assistants Look NO Further. Are you tired of the commute into Dallas? Do you live in DENTON COUNTY?This is for you! Must have 2-5 years legal experience. Preferably in a Plaintiffs firm. Familarility with Medical Records is a MUST. Great atmosphere, competitive pay and flexible schedule! This is a fantastic opportunity for the Denton County Applicants. INTERVIEWING now. Please contact jobs@hclegalsearch.com",Experienced Legal Assistant - Medical Records Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Experienced-Legal-Assistant-Medical-Records-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164412642.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=17,,,6f9278ffaea6836a0c7ed3957b5f4285
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:02:15:18,No,jobs.monster.com," Software AG is seeking candidates for a position as a Principal Consultant to provide professional consulting services to our customers in the Civilian, Defense, and Intelligence Community agencies and their suppliers in the Aerospace & Defense Industries.  We are a software company that addresses mission critical challenges with best-in-class software solutions for enterprise integration, Service-Oriented Architecture, Business Process Management, Fast Big Data, Complex Event Processing, in-memory computing and much more.  Our core products are webMethods, Terracotta (enterprise Ehcache), Apama, Aris and Alfabet. Primary Job Responsibilities·        Provide professional consulting services to help our customers solve complex business problems using the Software AG portfolio of software solutions and serve as our on-site representative.·        Lead or participate in a collaborative team environment and demonstrate the ability to work independently with appropriate direction to provide high-quality deliverables and recommendations using relevant best practices.·        Identify additional professional services and product sales opportunities, assist in proposal development, respond to customer requests for information, and participate in relevant business capture initiatives.·        Create and implement successful and innovative solutions that run, manage and optimize clients’ key business processes Requirements and Experience·        BS in Computer Science, Engineering or another computer related degree with 5+ years of related work experience·        Demonstrated success in professional services consulting projects in a leadership or individual contributor role·        Experience in one or more of the following technologies:o   Enterprise Integration, Business Process Management (BPM), SOA Governance and Process Automation or E-commerce solutions including webMethods, TIBCO, Oracle Fusion Middleware, Appian, Mulesoft, IBM Websphere, Metastorm or other integration toolso   Business Process Management (BPM), Business Process Analysis & Reengineering, Governance, Risk & Compliance (GRC), enterprise application design and system architecture using Business Process Modeling and Enterprise Architecture modeling tools including Aris, System Architect,Troux, MEGA, PowerDesigner, or other similar tools. o   Fast Big Data, In-Memory Computing technologies, Streaming Data, Complex Event Processing, Real-time Analytics, Universal Messaging and Java caching concepts using Ehcache, Terracotta, TimesTen, GridGain, Hazelcast or other Fast Big Data solutions.o   Real-time Analytics & Data Visualization tools including Presto or other similar toolso   IT Transformation, IT Portfolio Management, and Enterprise Architecture Management using IT planning tools including Alfabet or other similar software packages.o   Data Management solutions including traditional and in-memory databases including Oracle, SQL Server Sybase, Informix, or DB2 o   Familiarity with ERP tools like PeopleSoft, SAP, Oracle Applications or CRM tools like Siebel, Clarify, and Vantive o   Mainframe Modernization, Mainframe Integration, and Mainframe Offloading using Software AG solutions or other similar toolso   Transaction Processing Platforms including ADABAS or Natural ·        Experience in the latest enterprise operating systems including Linux, Unix or Windows including the ability to administer, configure, tune and troubleshoot complex environments·        Experience developing enterprise and web applications in the latest development tools and programming languages including Java, C/C++, .NET or other object oriented programming languages. ·        Demonstrate excellent customer service, effective communication, strong problem solving ability, organizational abilities, and polished presentation skills·        Ability to master a broad range of expertise ranging from understanding the business process to collecting and analyzing business and technical requirements.·        Willingness to travel to customer sites in the metropolitan, regional or national area as necessary·        U.S. Citizenship·        An active U.S. Government Security clearance is preferred. About The CompanySoftware AG Government Solutions is a growth-oriented software company dedicated to serving the U.S. Federal Government and the Aerospace & Defense Community. We operate with a startup culture and the backing of our $1B parent which is Software AG.   We are headquartered in a brand new facility located in the Worldgate area of Herndon, Virginia.  We are within walking distance to many restaurant options and a large fitness facility.  We offer a generous benefits package and handsome incentive opportunities. Software AG Government Solutions also encourages a healthy family, work life balance. The company is focused on building trusting relationships with our customers based on a highly effective “Special Forces” approach to solving mission critical IT challenges.  We believe in rapidly proving the viability of our solutions in our customer’s environment with world class products and talent in minimal time – often in only a few days.  This prove it first/prove it fast mentality has been positively embraced across our customer base as an extremely effective way of minimizing the risk associated with IT investments. Our solutions are highly differentiated in the areas of integration of disparate systems and extended supply chain partners, business process modeling and analysis and IT portfolio management.  Our solutions are particularly effective in large SAP environments where some of the largest SAP customers in the world leverage Software AG technology to get more out of their environments.  Our flagship product brands are webMethods, Terracotta (Enterprise Ehcache), ARIS and Alfabet. Software AG Government Solution is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, age, religion, color, marital status, national origin, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, disability, or veteran status. Click on the link to view the full EEO statement http://www.softwareag.com/corporate/images/EEO_Statement_tcm16-130491.pdf",Senior webMethods Consultant Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-webMethods-Consultant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164852284.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),533fd238df8961d42bd342699a500746
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:02:24:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryBDO’s Core Purpose is Helping People Thrive Every Day. Our Core Values reflect how we manage our work, our relationships and ourselves. As an employee of the firm, you will live true to our Core Values of people first, being exceptional every day in every way, embracing change, feeling empowered through knowledge and choosing accountability. Our Core Values are the standards by which we conduct ourselves day in and day out, both internally and externally.A Management and Technology Advisory Services (MTAS) Senior Associate is responsible for planning, organizing and performing various IT audits for Advisory clients.QualificationsEducation- Bachelor’s degree in Accounting, Computer Science, Information Systems or other relevant field required- Master’s in Information Systems or other relevant advanced degree preferredExperience- Two (2) to five (5)years of information systems and operational auditing experience required- One (1) or more year of supervisory experience preferred.- Prior experience working within a public accounting and/or internal auditing environment preferred- Prior experience performing general and application control reviews preferredLicense/Certifications- CPA, CISA, CISSP and/or CFE certification preferredSoftware- Proficient in the use of Microsoft Office Suite preferred.- Exposure to industry software such as PeopleSoft, JD Edwards, SAP, Lawson, Oracle Financials, Great Plains, Solomon IV, MAS/90-500, UNIX, OS400 or ERP application software packages preferredLanguage- English preferredOther Knowledge, Skills & Abilities- Excellent oral and written communication skills- Strong analytical and basic research skills- Solid organizational skills with the ability to meet project deadlines with a focus on details- Ability to successfully multi-task while working independently or within a group environment- Ability to work in a deadline-driven environment, and handle multiple projects simultaneously- Capable of effectively managing a team of professionals, and delegating work assignments, as needed- Capacity to build and maintain strong relationships with client personnel- Ability to successfully interact with professionals at all levels- Intermediate knowledge of internal controls- Ability to travel up to 30%MON",IT Audit Senior Associate Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Audit-Senior-Associate-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164553207.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,59d32e90dc7f0f5ddeb42907c36d9da8
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:02:25:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors. With pro-forma 2014 annualized scope revenues of £5.5 billion and over 40,000 people in more than 55 countries, the company operates across the whole of the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and close to 5,300 employees worldwide. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/commercial, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas.Role OverviewAmec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure is currently accepting resumes for upcoming on-call NACE III Coatings Inspector (Bridges) opportunities for the TXDOT Bridge Program. Bridge lead paint abatement experience is required. Projects could be located in a variety of locations throughout Texas. Status Our need is temporary, on call/as needed depending on project needs. Key Responsibilities Perform onsite inspection of all coating related activities (ambient conditions; DFT's; hazardous waste handling, storage, and disposal), in field locations such as bridges and other project sites, in accordance with contract documents Perform inspections utilizing coating inspection equipment Write daily notes in journal and complete daily reports on a laptop computer using Microsoft Business Suite applications Must be able to follow basic, standard procedures to accomplish assigned tasks and resolve routine issuesSkills / QualificationsNACE Level II or Level III Peer Review NACE Level Certified Coatings Inspector High school diploma or equivalent 2 or more years field experience with the inspection of bridge coatings and experience in lead abatement on bridges Willing to work with Hazardous Coatings (such as lead containing coatings) Willing to travel and work various shifts and weekends Capable of conducting meetings and meeting with clients in a professional setting Must be able to do simple mathematical calculations required for reports Good oral and written communication skills required for working with clients and writing daily reports Must have working knowledge of a computer and be able to utilize Microsoft Business Suite applications Will be required to submit timesheets and expense reports in online accounting systems on a weekly basis Valid driver's license required Must pass drug test, background check and must have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the Company's driving (MVR) policyPhysical Demands Climbing; Tight Areas; Outside in elements; Temperature extremes; Respirator Able to work at heights from Scaffold and Personnel Lifts Willing to work with Hazardous Coatings (such as lead containing coatings)   If you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",NACE Coatings Inspector (Bridges) Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/NACE-Coatings-Inspector-Bridges-Job-Dallas-TX-US-162917775.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),41df042814260284ad3557bf86b6b530
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:02:27:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"ACCELERATEYOUR CAREER.GO GREYHOUND!Now HiringMotorcoach Operators in DallasIts time to steer your driving talent, commitment to safety and customer service focus to a company where your efforts get the most mileage: Greyhound. We're going places, and so should you. Come drive with us.GREYHOUND PROUDLY OFFERS:- Free training (and money while you learn!)- Free travel passes- Competitive pay- Comprehensive benefitsincluding 401(k)GreyhoundCelebrating 100 Years as a Leaderin Ground TransportationA Division of First Group AmericaApply on-line at:apply.firstgroupcareers.comEQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYERClick here to see Newspaper adThe Dallas Morning News  -  03/06/2016",Motorcoach Operators Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75202",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Motorcoach-Operators-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164505815.aspx?ch=dallasmorning&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=19,,,ebcf9a10d3c39c14a3dee34c59d2dd89
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:04:17:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Financial Advisor – DallasLarson Financial is a nationwide planning and investment advisory firm that specializes in serving the financial needs of physicians and dentists. We are looking for highly ethical and tenacious individuals to become a part of our rapidly expanding team of Financial Advisors. This is an opportunity to become a part of a faithful and integrity-driven company, while building an independent book of clientele comprised solely of physicians. Our comprehensive approach to financial planning offers unique solutions for doctors from residency to retirement. Through our collaborative environment, LFG helps individual physicians and their medical practices succeed in the highly competitive and regulated healthcare field.We provide a successful marketing system and training platform that helps support our advisors to the fullest extent. New advisors will receive up to 2 years of mentoring advisor guidance and permanent operational assistance. There will be an indefinite stipend for the Advising role with eligibility for insurance benefits after 30 days.Job Responsibilities:Train in and adhere to Larson Financial philosophy and strategy, including physician-specific planning.Enhance business development by employing existing client recruitment methods.Prepare and host meetings, consulting with physicians under the purview and direction of your leading financial advisor.Perform concierge level follow up while balancing new business and existing client needs.Execute and negotiate follow through of implementation vehicles including insurance, investments, tax planning, debt management, estate planning and other tasks quoted to client.Job Requirements:4 year Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university or college.Excellent communication and presentation skills.Well organized with the ability to manage time effectively while managing multiple priorities.Successful completion of background check and pre-employment assessments.Licenses (required)Series 7/66 Securities LicensesLife and Health",Financial Advisor Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Financial-Advisor-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164596674.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9431d8ce5766a8e62eedd388a530df41
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:04:19:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"TeamSupport is a rapidly growing provider of customer support (or “helpdesk”) applications. We are looking for a dynamic and hard working Customer Engagement Specialist to join our growing team. The person we’re looking for will be technically savvy and a self-starter, someone who has an enthusiastic, positive attitude, excellent written and verbal communication skills, has strong attention to detail and above all, a dedicated work ethic. This individual must have a passion for customer satisfaction, be highly organized, have great energy and a drive to help build a successful product. Candidates must be able to work independently, apply excellent judgment based on experience and create solutions as needed for customers. This position will work closely with the sales, marketing and customer support teams. Our hiring process incorporates video interviews. Candidates that are selected for further review will be required to submit video interview responses. Responsibilities will include but are not limited to: -Customer Engagement: successfully develop and guide the delivery of programs designed to engage and deepen customer relationships. -Marketing Automation: execute marketing communication campaigns and to optimize trial customer conversions, onboarding, product adoption, retention, and community engagement. -Automated Training & Onboarding: design and implement a Learning Management System to automate product training and onboarding using in-app messaging, walk-throughs, and documentation. Manage, refine, and iterate this process on an ongoing basis. -Customer Development: manage and optimize product documentation. Work with the sales, support, and product team to build and manage a repository of resources and best practices for customers. -Customer Research and Analysis: guide the organization on how to make smart decisions and continually improve our customer experience through analysis and reporting. You will help us solve key customer engagement challenges: -How can we better understand the customer experience during the sales and onboarding processes? What opportunities are we missing out on to provide the best possible experience? -What are the main opportunities and roadblocks in our customer life cycle? How will you help us identify what those are? -How can we enhance our communication strategy to encourage customer engagement, adoption, and growth? Requirements:-Self-directed, but also excellent with collaboration: You are happy to work independently, but know when to ask for help. You know how to give, and receive, direct feedback. You are a team player and comfortable contributing to projects as well as open to leading projects. You deal well with ambiguity and realize it is an opportunity to test and experiment. -Excellent communicator: You are able to clearly communicate your thoughts, especially in text based communication. You know when a conversation should be in chat, Skype, or face-to-face.-Empathetic: You realize listening is just as important as speaking your mind. You assume good faith of your teammates when there is conflict and are curious about understanding their perspectives. -Comfortable or open to working remotely: The majority of your team will be distributed and you’ll communicate via remote tools: email, chat, video conferencing, etc.-Bachelor’s Degree or higher, preferably in Communications, Business, or Software and a minimum of 2 years relevant work experience (onboarding or customer training), preferably in the SaaS space-2+ years of experience in a customer-facing role like sales, customer service, or customer success. Proven track record of investigating customer challenges and creating sustainable solutions.-Experience working with multiple disciplines and departments to develop strategies and iterate on new marketing ideas. Experience working in the SaaS industry is preferred, but not required.-Proficiency in HTML.-A passion for delivering superior customer support Location: This is currently a virtual/telecommuting position, but it will require frequent visits to the Dallas or Denver office. We will give preference to candidates in either Denver or Dallas. We will evaluate candidates outside of Colorado and Texas on a case by case basis. Compensation: 40-60k salary depending on experience. If you are a quick learner, passionate about customer support and ready to be part of a successful team, apply today!",Customer Engagement Specialist Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Engagement-Specialist-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164942201.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=9,"40,000.00 - 60,000.00 $",Experienced (Non-Manager),5289f984b1b2baeb6893cf628e96eb68
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:04:28:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Function & Scope:Spectrum Properties, Ltd. is seeking a Property Accountant to join its team.  This position is responsible for the day-to-day accounting of multi-family communities.  The position is responsible for closing the accounting periods and records for 20 properties and all ancillary accounting related to these entities: Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:-       Manage routine general ledger accounting and recurring journal entries.-       Verify all cash entries are booked timely and accurately.-       Ensure all expenses have been accrued and are accurately reflected in the monthly reporting. -       Balance and account for inter-company activity between related entities.-       Prepare and record payroll entry.-       Review all property management financial reports on the individual assets.-       Record and reconcile financial information (i.e. security deposits, escrow account activity, loan balances, etc).-       Maintain accounting for fixed assets and depreciation.-       Account for new construction and reconcile draws.-       Manage projects and support Controller with duties as assigned. Month-end Close-       Calculate Management Fees.-       Reconcile all bank accounts and resolve reconciling issues.-       Prepare the monthly financial statements, the expense detail along with variance explanations on a monthly basis.-       Assist with the year-end tax preparation process. Annually-       Prepare and issue form 1099 to vendors.-       Prepare annual property budgets.-       Prepare annual tax workpapers.-       Reconcile significant accounts. Qualifications:Basic Qualifications:Required: Associates Degree in related field.Required: Two or more years of related accounting experience.Preferred: Bachelor's degree in Accounting. Additional Qualifications:Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite, specifically: Word and Excel.Knowledge of generally accepted accounting principles and business processes.Program management skills with ability to bring complex projects to closure in a timely manner.Strong written and verbal communications skills, including presentation skills, with ability to quickly and positively influence others.Organized and high attention to detail and accuracy.Use discretion, maintain company confidentiality and be honest.",Property Accountant Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75202",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Property-Accountant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-163936352.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fe25e9d01ecc60038bb96ea4516c51c9
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:04:37:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"What We Do…At Berlin Packaging, we believe that Anything is Possible and it is our mission to thrill our customers. Our top priority is to reduce their costs, increase their net income, and improve their productivity through packaging products and services. We pride ourselves on being ferociously committed to executing and going above and beyond in pursuit of thrilling our customers.Who We Are Looking For...We are in the market for hard workers who can create memorable experiences for our customers. If you want to be challenged by your job and surrounded by passionate, dedicated, creative people, you are looking in the right place. If you thrive on managing multiple accounts and offering a personalized customer experience, this position is perfect for you.The main focus of your job will be:Customer Thrill: Your main role is to build and maintain strong relationships with customer accounts by being the energetic and passionate first point of contact. We will rely on you to problem-solve to find creative solutions to their inquiries. Order Management: You will be the liaison between the customers and the sales force. You will be in charge of processing, reviewing, and handling all activities from order placement to delivery. Supplier Relations: You will maintain relationships with suppliers, source the product, and quote pricing. Project Management: You will coordinate and interact with customers, sales, and procurement to understand current and upcoming projects.What We Need From You:Passion for not just meeting customer expectations, but going above and beyond to exceed them. A love for managing multiple tasks in a fast-paced environment. A strong work ethic with a positive “can-do” attitude. You blow through obstacles and take pride in your work. Excellent written and verbal communication skills A Bachelor’s degree in a business-related discipline.In return, we are prepared to offer an outstanding compensation and benefits package including a 401(k) with company match, a casual work environment, and a quarterly bonus based on the growth and profits your operation generates.We are hungry to grow and do more, and our business is fueled by our people. If you want to be Greater, Faster, join our team at Berlin Packaging!",ACCOUNT COORDINATOR - INSIDE SALES Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75211",AllManufacturing - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/ACCOUNT-COORDINATOR-INSIDE-SALES-Job-Dallas-TX-US-158059072.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=1,,Customer Support/Client Care,d3904541121fad605d2996d9b3cc3b54
United States of America,US,09/Dec/2015:04:40:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in downtown Dallas is seeking an experienced HRIS Analyst with Kronos experience for a temp to hire opportunity. This role will provide technical support and advice regarding their payroll systems. The ideal candidate will be highly analytical with strong ability to identity, troubleshoot and resolve system errors.Duties and responsibilities:Business process configuration, including policies, agreements, compliance and segregation of dutiesIdentify current trends and developments within payrollMaintain user passwords and securityCoordinate all payroll system upgradesDesign and implement best practice payrolls proceduresCreate and maintain reports and interfacesRequirements:Working knowledge of regulations, policies and agreements relating to payroll administration and complianceAdvanced understanding of KronosIntermediate excel skills (will be tested)Find Us on Facebook!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile: Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",HRIS Analyst Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,DallasTX,Accounting and Auditing Services Financial Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/HRIS-Analyst-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164419271.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=18,"80,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,5bb4bcdced4a33f7e5140ec8012f96d1
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:00:19:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  702354Apex Systems is Hiring an Order Management Specialist II!For immediate consideration please call 804 292 7101 or email your updated resume and best method and time to contact to dsubkhangulova@apexsystemsinc.com!Job Title: Order Management Specialist IILocation: Milwaukee, WILength of Contract: 1 yearCompensation: Based on experienceATTN: *Looking for a candidate who is willing to split their time between the two locations: Waukesha and Tower Ave in Milwaukee *Essential Responsibilities:1. Plan and pro-actively manage the entire process of fulfilling a customer contract from Order Entry to Collection to ensure that customer requirements are met.2. Establish and maintain communication with the appropriate individuals throughout the process (OTR Regional Mgr, Install Specialist, OTR Logistics, Installation coordinator, application coordinator, Finance, 6 Sigma...).3. Order Entry and backlog quality. Implement changes as required for each project.4. Optimize Sales transfers. Fulfillment grounded on SCOT optimization.5. Ensure orders validation, compliance and approvals before Order Entry.7. Own and update timely key dates using local operating mechanisms and reports.9. Set up contract review with Finance/OTR Regional Manager.10. Daily follow up of customer credit documentation and inventory.12. Follow shipment, installation, application via reports.13. Follow up on collections issues due to OTR.14. Provide root cause on defect analysis.Qualifications/Requirements *Bachelor s degree OR Associates degree and 5 years related experience OR high school diploma & 15 years related experience.Desired Characteristics:*Strong verbal and written communication skills*Ability to work in a fast-paced environment*Need to be able to prioritize*Proactively follow up on open issues*Basic accounting skills*Previous GE Healthcare experience a plus*Current or previous experience in a project management, customer relations or order management role*Previous experience supporting Sales or Service teams*Proven ability to build relationships with remote colleagues*Demonstrated aptitude and success in fostering solid, value-based relationships with internal and external customers*Ability to work extended hours & weekends during peak times of the yearEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",GEHC - Order Management Specialist II Job in West Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  702354Apex Systems is Hiring an Order Management Specialist II!For immediate consideration please call 804 292 7101 or email your updated resume and best method and time to contact to dsubkhangulova@apexsystemsinc.com!Job Title: Order Management Specialist IILocation: Milwaukee, WILength of Contract: 1 yearCompensation: Based on experienceATTN: *Looking for a candidate who is willing to split their time between the two locations: Waukesha and Tower Ave in Milwaukee *Essential Responsibilities:1. Plan and pro-actively manage the entire process of fulfilling a customer contract from Order Entry to Collection to ensure that customer requirements are met.2. Establish and maintain communication with the appropriate individuals throughout the process (OTR Regional Mgr, Install Specialist, OTR Logistics, Installation coordinator, application coordinator, Finance, 6 Sigma...).3. Order Entry and backlog quality. Implement changes as required for each project.4. Optimize Sales transfers. Fulfillment grounded on SCOT optimization.5. Ensure orders validation, compliance and approvals before Order Entry.7. Own and update timely key dates using local operating mechanisms and reports.9. Set up contract review with Finance/OTR Regional Manager.10. Daily follow up of customer credit documentation and inventory.12. Follow shipment, installation, application via reports.13. Follow up on collections issues due to OTR.14. Provide root cause on defect analysis.Qualifications/Requirements *Bachelor s degree OR Associates degree and 5 years related experience OR high school diploma & 15 years related experience.Desired Characteristics:*Strong verbal and written communication skills*Ability to work in a fast-paced environment*Need to be able to prioritize*Proactively follow up on open issues*Basic accounting skills*Previous GE Healthcare experience a plus*Current or previous experience in a project management, customer relations or order management role*Previous experience supporting Sales or Service teams*Proven ability to build relationships with remote colleagues*Demonstrated aptitude and success in fostering solid, value-based relationships with internal and external customers*Ability to work extended hours & weekends during peak times of the yearEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/gehc-order-management-specialist-ii-job-west-milwaukee-wi-us-178421927.aspx?mescoid=4300724001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bc2bf0843fa041a9ba20cac5264d7dbf
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:00:28:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Senior e-Commerce Software Developer with 5+ years using e-Commerce and PHP as a Developer, please read on!Top Reasons to Work with UsLocated in Brookfield, WI, is our premier e-learning solutions company that provides customized training tools. Our team of highly skilled Developers are seeking to hire a Technical Lead that has over 5+ years of e-Commerce Software Development. Our team prides ourselves with being passionate, technically savvy, and easy-going professionals. If your personality sounds like a fit, you have over 5+ years as a Software Developer using e-Commerce platforms, have over 5+ years with PHP & Magento, and are local to Brookfield, WI, apply immediately!What You Need for this PositionRequirements:1. 5+ years as a e-Commerce Software Developer2. 5+ years of developing web applications3. 5+ years as a PHP Developer4. 5+ years with Magento5. Experience with Salesforce6. Expert with MySQLWhat's In It for YouCompetitive salary ranging from $100K - $130KPTOBenefitsSo, if you are a Senior e-Commerce Software Developer with 5+ years using e-Commerce and PHP as a Developer, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Senior e-Commerce Software Developer - e-Commerce Software Devel | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Mecca Benitez,Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-e-commerce-software-developer-e-commerce-software-devel-job-brookfield-wi-us-177847227.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=3,,,b717c1078acd2bedb64188353dd285c4
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:00:29:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in Milwaukee,Part Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-milwaukee-wi-us-177581380.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,5451159a9a1cfe38440a07fac2f98a91
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:00:57:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Need something to fill up your free time and earn a little extra money? Do you enjoy the freedom of the open road? Do you need a more flexible schedule?Would you like to have an opportunity to advance with a company? Want an exciting job for retirement? Can we count on you? Are you safe enough? Want to take on the challenge of keeping people safe? Could you be the driver we are looking for? Perks of working for PTI:Freedom to work outside of a buildingNo heavy lifting/long distance walking involvedHome every day (unless hours are maximized or weather prohibits travel)Supplement retirement incomeRoom for advancement within the companyMedical insurance after probation periodFlexible hours – Full/Part time available, nights and weekendsHoliday Pay after probation period (must have worked)Meet interesting peoplePaid vacation time after 1 year with company401(k) after 1 year with the companySafety recognition, awards, and incentivesDrug free work forceOn the job trainingDiscounted cellphone plans on contracted plansWork out of the elementsPersonal Days – 3 Unpaid DaysIndependenceCompany Provided Vehicles Interested? You will need to meet the following:Have a valid state driver’s license issued by the state of proposed employmentHave at least 7 years of verifiable driving experienceMust live within a 30 minute drive of the location for which they are applyingMust not have a physical impairment preventing him or her driving safely, or from performing the essential functions of the job with or without a reasonable accommodationMust be able to read, write, and converse in EnglishMust be able to use a GPS/Technology System, read and understand roadmapsAbility to lift and pull up to 15 poundsMust be able to climb in and out of the vehicleMust be able to bend to inspect the undercarriage of a vehicle and tiresMust be able to manually open and close all doors and hatches on the vehicleMust be able to pass a pre-employment drug screening, a 3year Motor Vehicle Record (MVR) check, background check, and driving performance test Drivers must meet these requirements and all other requirements as determined by PTI, its customers and/or its insurance company, at all times to remain employed as a PTI driver.  It is the responsibility of the employee to report any and all moving violations to his or her supervisor immediately. What would you be doing?Drivers are responsible for safely transporting railroad crews to their destination on time, while adhering to federal, state and local traffic laws, as well as PTI’s policies and procedures.  Essential Job Duties:Driving vehicles in a safe mannerProvide excellent customer serviceReport to work at the designated need time and locationReport any defects, mechanical problems, or missing items to your Branch ManagerPerform a vehicle inspection    Maintain strict confidentiality regarding PTI’s business secretsAbide by all Company policies and proceduresAll other duties as assigned by supervisorPast professional driving experience are preferred but not required *This job description does not necessarily list all responsibilities, duties, requirements or efforts associated with the job.  While this list is intended to be an accurate reflection of the job, the Company reserves the right to review and modify the functions, duties and requirements of the job or to require that additional or different tasks be performed as circumstances or business needs require. Who we are:Professional Transportation, Inc. (PTI) was founded in 1980 and began its operations serving as a crew transportation service for the railroad. With our main focus on safety, dependability and on-time performance, PTI is responsible for transporting crew members for most of the largest railroad companies in the nation.  PTI’s Field Support Center is located in Evansville, Indiana with managers and regional offices strategically placed throughout the United States. PTI has evolved into a multifaceted transportation organization and is always looking for growth opportunities in other parts of the industry. EEO",Van Drivers Wanted in Butler,Full Time Employee,"Butler, WI 53007",,http://jobview.monster.com/van-drivers-wanted-in-butler-wi!-job-butler-wi-us-178414387.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=8,,Logistics/Transportation,ea888a988fdc6d08764fdcb66afcb378
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:00:57:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Horizon Home Care & Hospice, located in Milwaukee, WI has been Wisconsin’s employer and home care provider of choice for over 25 years.  We work hard to ensure our patients receive the highest quality of care; but we don’t stop there.  We work hard to ensure our employees know we value their contributions as well.  Which is why we are proud to say that our agency has been named among the Milwaukee Journal Sentinels Top Workplaces 4 times!   Due to our phenomenal growth, we are seeking a dedicated and energetic full-time Phlebotomists for our Home Care Program.  The Phlebotomist will travel to patient’s homes throughout Milwaukee, Waukesha, Ozaukee, Racine and Washington County to obtain blood specimens and ensure proper handling of specimens to designated laboratories. Looking for a position that provides you with optimal work-life balance, look no further!  Full-Time 1st shift position with NO NIGHTS and NO WEEKENDS.   Qualifications for the role include a high school diploma (or equivalent) with previous Phlebotomist experience and/or completion of formal Phlebotomy program.  Because this position travels to patient homes, you must have a valid WI driver's license, a reliable vehicle, and current auto insurance. Horizon Home Care and Hospice, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer that does not discriminate in employment and ensures equal employment opportunity for all persons regardless of their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or status as a qualified individual with a disability or Vietnam era or other protected veteran. To achieve our goal of equal opportunity, we maintain an affirmative action program through which we take good faith efforts to recruit, hire and advance in employment qualified minorities, women, persons with disabilities, Vietnam era veterans, and other protected veterans. #LI-DNP",Phlebotomist - Full-Time,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI 53224",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/phlebotomist-full-time-first-shift-opportunities-job-milwaukee-wi-us-178139845.aspx?mescoid=3100561001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,2ac830c28b2db6f20e88abdea5c7661d
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:00:57:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Direct Sales Recruiter is responsible for driving all aspects of the talent relationship management process for exempt and non-exempt candidates with MGS's clients. This may involve full cycle recruiting (screening, scheduling, interviewing, testing, managing the hiring manager relationship, negotiating, employment branding, benefit and culture questions, follow through after the candidate is hired).  Based at MGS Corporate headquarters or HUB, client site, and/or home office. • Identify and submit qualified candidates to Client Hiring Managers based on the provided job description.o Assist with job requisition / description developmento Acquire a thorough understanding of job requisition / description for required competencies, skills, knowledge required of successful applicantso Maintain knowledge of how many resumes need to be generated for open positions • Identify and implement sourcing strategies based upon the job position by creatively conducting research and/or utilizing a multitude of resourceso Document research methods so they may be shared with other recruiting team memberso Train other recruitment team on new internet sites, blogs, RSS, networking groups and/or sites (i.e. Linked In, Konnects, Spoke, vShake, etc.)o Develop an ongoing and diverse pipeline using research, networking, database mining, etc. for prospective applicantso Manage referral sourceso Use a variety of technical tools to identify and attract a high qualified pool of candidates • Work with recruiting team to screen, test, and qualify applicants through the use of qualifying interviewing techniques and skill assessment testingo Use of Behavioral Based Interview techniques in screening and qualifying applicantso Create Behavioral Based Interviewing and Prescreening questionso Completion of skill and/or personality assessmento Completion of employment applications - analyze the information provided on application form  • ATS (applicant tracking system) maintenanceo Enter and maintain candidate information into applicant tracking system on a daily basiso Generate recruitment metric reports both manually and using applicant tracking systemo Create, file and maintain filing system for resumes, applications and miscellaneous paperworko Resume conversion and application maintenance • Manage Client Hiring Manager Relationshipso Provide Hiring Manager with updates and summaries of recruiting progress and activityo Work with Hiring Manager to determine best fit candidates, coordinate interviews, receive timely feedback and present/manage offerso Conduct recruitment related meetings as needed • Manage Offer Negotiation processo Work with Hiring Managers and make offer recommendations to close on selected candidateso Present offers and conduct offer negotiations with candidateso Participate in onboarding tasks as needed (i.e. offer letter submittals, final paperwork completion)  Required Education• Bachelor's Degree or equivalent experience preferred.      Required Years Experience • Sales recruiting or a sales background required for this role• 2+ years of recruiting experience required• Experience in at least two to three industries/verticals or specialty recruiting experience• Experience working directly with Hiring Managers and managing full life cycle recruitment processes to include: sourcing, screening, behavioral based interviewing and offer negotiations• Experience in a high volume, fast-paced environment may also be required depending on program Required Technical/ Functional Skills • Internet experience including job boards, job posting and networking• Demonstrated proficiency in utilizing a variety of recruitment strategies to include cold calling and direct sourcing• Understanding of recruiting metrics• Proficient in Microsoft Office applications, including Word, Excel and PowerPoint• Ability to build effective relationships with recruiting team and candidates• Ability to prioritize, multi-task, problem solve while maintaining flexibility• Strong customer orientation• Experience working within various applicant-tracking systems (ATS)• Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business information such as job descriptions, business articles, etc.• Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from managers, executives, candidates and the public• Strong oral and written communication skills• Works effectively and collaboratively in a team environment  Travel• No travel required Manpower is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Outdoor Sales High Volume Recruiter Virtual,,Full Time Employee,Full Time Employee,http://jobview.monster.com/outdoor-sales-high-volume-recruiter-virtual-job-milwaukee-wi-us-178148688.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,,614c8fbd79e58beb2e602dc122a78ed7
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:00:57:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  708663Apex Systems is Hiring an Environmental, Health and Safety (EHS) ContractorFor immediate consideration please call Diana at 804 292 7101 and email me your updates resume. Thanks!JOB TITLE: Environmental, Health and Safety (EHS) ContractorLocation: 4855 W Electric Ave, West Milwaukee, WI 53219Key responsibilities/essential functions include:* Work effectively and efficiently with 3 EHS department team members.* Support the EA EHS risk reduction plan by evaluating facility EHS conditions, assessing risk, identifying appropriate corrective actions and leading key projects.* Support the delivery of regulatory / non-regulatory EHS training to site employees.* Provide concern reporting response for site employees that includes escalating to appropriate owners such as Facilities Team Members or Leadership.* Participate on or support key EHS specific teams such as Accident Investigation, Medical Response, Ergonomics, Inspection and Emergency Response.* Primarily supporting second shift work hours between 1pm - 10pm;Initial onboarding of approx. 2 weeks during first shift hours between 8am - 5pm.Qualifications / Needs:* 2-3 years of applying regulatory knowledge and experience working under U.S. federal and state and /or equivalents regulations.* Ability to manage multiple tasks and other responsibilities.* General computer proficiency experience approx. 2-3 years.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",GEHC - EHS Specialist II Job in West Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  708663Apex Systems is Hiring an Environmental, Health and Safety (EHS) ContractorFor immediate consideration please call Diana at 804 292 7101 and email me your updates resume. Thanks!JOB TITLE: Environmental, Health and Safety (EHS) ContractorLocation: 4855 W Electric Ave, West Milwaukee, WI 53219Key responsibilities/essential functions include:* Work effectively and efficiently with 3 EHS department team members.* Support the EA EHS risk reduction plan by evaluating facility EHS conditions, assessing risk, identifying appropriate corrective actions and leading key projects.* Support the delivery of regulatory / non-regulatory EHS training to site employees.* Provide concern reporting response for site employees that includes escalating to appropriate owners such as Facilities Team Members or Leadership.* Participate on or support key EHS specific teams such as Accident Investigation, Medical Response, Ergonomics, Inspection and Emergency Response.* Primarily supporting second shift work hours between 1pm - 10pm;Initial onboarding of approx. 2 weeks during first shift hours between 8am - 5pm.Qualifications / Needs:* 2-3 years of applying regulatory knowledge and experience working under U.S. federal and state and /or equivalents regulations.* Ability to manage multiple tasks and other responsibilities.* General computer proficiency experience approx. 2-3 years.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/gehc-ehs-specialist-ii-job-west-milwaukee-wi-us-178422209.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),dab5f877e87cf088be2cf2ffdbb3ac5a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:01:06:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Apply Today. Train Tomorrow. Earn This Week!!We are looking for motivated and friendly outside sales representatives to meet with business owners and introduce them to our family of products and services.  We pay generous sales commissions daily, we offer expert sales support and we provide all of our sales representatives with daily sales leads. If you love meeting new people, communicate well & enjoy the flexibility of not being in an office all day, this position may be for you!Position Highlights:* Unlimited Earning Potential* $800 Good Start Bonus!* Commissions paid daily* $800 to $1,800+ Weekly earning potential* Lucrative sales bonuses paid monthly (Top producer in November 2015 exceeded $8,000)* Residual income potential* President's Club Members earn additional incentives and have access to a   dedicated Customer Care Liaison* Pre-Qualified Leads in your local area* B2B Sales (small to medium sized businesses)* No Nights No Weekends* Additional commissions for self-generated leads and referrals* State-of-the-Art solutions enable you to sell more accounts and earn additional commissions* Enthusiastic sales support to help (if needed) you close more dealsJob Requirements:We are looking for eager and enthusiastic sales representatives. Ideal candidates will have:    Excellent interpersonal and communications skills    Positive attitude and a willingness to learn    Desire to succeed in sales    Self-motivatedKeywords:____________________________________________________________________________Sales, Outside Sales, Outside Sales Representative, Sales Representative, Business Development, Customer Service, Retail Sales, Sales Rep, Account Rep, Account Representative, Sales Executive, Entry-Level Sales",Sales Reps,,"Milwaukee, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-reps-apply-now!!-800-bonus-daily-leads!!!-job-milwaukee-wi-us-174851319.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,"0.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Customer Support/Client Care,761be452d9568a1512c5af87fa2e85d0
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:01:06:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"HIRING – SEASONAL PART TIME CUSTOMER SERVICE REPRESENTATIVEA Career That’s Meant to BeAt David’s Bridal, we empower our customers and our employees to stay true to their dreams and find the one, whether that means the wedding dress that matches her personal style—or the career that’s a perfect fit.We’re looking for people with diverse backgrounds and fresh ideas to help create a uniquely personal retail experience.Now Accepting Applications for Seasonal Customer Service RepresentativeThe Seasonal Customer Service Representative (CSR) is responsible for providing professional and unsurpassed customer service to each of our David’s Bridal customers. The Seasonal CSR is the first point of contact for our customers, and in this role, the CSR will provide relevant information about David’s Bridal products and services, respond to all customer inquiries, and provide a friendly and encouraging checkout experience.Our most successful seasonal CSR’s are self-motivated individuals with upbeat, outgoing personalities, and excellent communications skills. They enjoy fast-paced environments, are incredible at multi-tasking, and offer friendly and encouraging service to all that enter our stores.If you would like to be part of a dynamic team, start the process as our customers dress for the most important days of their lives, and earn a competitive income, we would love to discuss your future at David’s Bridal. We offer regular part time employment to high performing associates that would like to stay on. Join to earn additional income, to benefit from a great discount, or to be part of something so unique and so special!Our store will host interviews over the next two weeks.Seasonal Customer Service RepresentativeResponsibilities:Welcome DeskGreet each customer that enters the store with courtesy and professionalismRegister brides, bridesmaids, and special occasion customersInform each customer of our return/exchange policies, benefits of our vendor programs, and David’s Bridal Credit CardAssign customer to consultants using the Customer Service ChartPoint of SaleProvide an efficient and friendly checkout experience for customersWrap and package purchased merchandise and present it to customersMaintain responsibility for cash register and cash balancingStarterPrepare for all upcoming appointments by printing the customer’s profile and favorites prior to her appointment timeDress SupportSell dresses by fully dressing and accessorizing bridesmaids, flower girls, mothers of the bride/groom, quinceañera, damas, prom customers, and other special occasion shoppers for their events, as neededMaximize sales and customer satisfaction by providing superior service, each time the customer visits, regardless of the purpose of her visit, as neededExplain services provided by the alterations department to the customer and how alterations can play an important role in enhancing the dress for the event, as neededOther Duties and Responsibilities:Assist in maintaining clean fitting roomsEnsure all merchandise presented to the customer is in first-quality conditionRetrieve dresses from stock room for returning customersMaintain housekeeping standards in the store, including floor recovery, vacuuming, dusting, straightening of merchandise, and upkeep of common areasFollow-up with customers regarding special orders, overdue layaways, and completed ordersProcess all inbound and outbound freight, check-in all merchandise, and utilize the UPS system to process all shipping, transfers, and special orders to and from the storePhysicalAbility to lift and/or move up to 10 pounds, climb, balance, kneel, crouch, bend, twist, and standPart Time AvailableProfessional EnvironmentGenerous Employee Discount After First Pay PeriodIf you are interested in working in our stores, please note that the online application process will take approximately 30 minutes.Now that we’ve popped the question, please say “I do”.<br />#CJT_jobBodyContent p {<br /> margin: 10px !important;<br /> min-height: 13px !important;<br />}<br />",Seasonal CSR [Part-Time] Job in Greenfield,Full Time,"Greenfield, WI 53220",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-csr-part-time-job-greenfield-wi-us-177665965.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),92de5a865670723650c3e55bda6efaa0
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:01:41:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Retail Sales Merchandiser FULL TIME   Retail Sales Merchandiser candidates are organized, self-motivated and friendly. As a member of our Top Performing Sales Team, you will work in full time Retail Sales with oversight and responsibility for increasing sales of our client’s products for leading brands in chocolate, candy/confections, sports drinks, soda products, and snacks. This Retail Sales position services and sells to retail accounts within an assigned territory, ensuring Client standards are met and sales volumes are increased. The ideal candidate for this Retail Sales position is independent, ambitious and driven to succeed with strong sales skills and the confidence to influence key decision makers at the store level. This is a great opportunity to work with Advantage Solutions, the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.   Responsibilities:   Meet and exceed sales goals, by maintaining proper product inventory Engage with store management using the latest technology to drive sales and enhance client satisfaction  Maintain client objectives  Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers, building rapport with clients and customers Perform merchandising duties QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or higher education or equivalent job-related experience Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Retail Sales Merchandiser Full Time Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-merchandiser-full-time-job-milwaukee-wi-us-177514700.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=20,,Retail,e945811ac583404c3dbde223f4e279e3
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:01:42:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:The Warehouse Associate is responsible for inputting data, preparing packing and shipping documents, picking and staging outbound shipments, ensuring inbound and outbound shipments are accurate and free from damage, and maintaining a clean, neat and orderly work area. He/She must also have the ability to manually move and lift 50 to 100 lb. boxes of tile on a regular basis and be available to work nights and weekends.  Responsibilities:Read customer order, work order, shipping order, or requisition to assemble customer orders from stock and place order on pallet or shelves.Sort and place materials or items on racks, shelves, or in bins according to predetermined sequence such as size, type, style, color, or product code.Complete all paperwork pertaining to inventory, which includes shipping confirmations, receiving confirmations, purchase orders, open orders, order check-off, and UPS.Ensure complete accuracy of store inventory at all times.Label all orders and back stock clearly.Participate in the cycle counting program.Load and unload customer vehicles; ensure proper paperwork is completed and signed off by the customer after loading of product.Process incoming freight trucks in a timely manner.Proper use of equipment, including but not limited to forklifts, to move inventory.Inspect equipment to maintain good working order.Record amounts of product received and distributed.Accountable for overall cleanliness/organization of the warehouse.Enter records into computer.Other duties as assigned. Qualifications:  High School DiplomaAbility to read and write in EnglishStrong work ethicForklift certification or willing to be certifiedExcellent organizational skillsBasic mathematical skillsBasic computer skillsKnowledge of proper safety measuresAbility to manually move and lift 50lbs regularly and up to 100 lbs.BenefitsGreat Pay and Exceptional TrainingIndividual Career Growth OpportunitiesHoliday, Vacation and PTO PayMedical, Dental, and Vision InsuranceHSA Employer Contributions401(k) Plan with employer matchingCompany Paid Basic Life Insurance and Accidental Death & DismembermentCompany Paid Long Term DisabilityThe Tile Shop is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Warehouse Associate Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI 53209",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-job-milwaukee-wi-us-177184730.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,dfb9cbc01015f6a11375afe20334acaa
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:02:27:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Dispatcher/Operations 1st shift operations for expedited freight company with inside sales. Apply in person 6023 S. Howell Ave. Milwaukee, WI 53207 #414-431-8143Posting provided by: Report","Taylor Made Express Job Application for Operations | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Address 6023 S HOWELL AVEMilwaukee, WI 53207",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-job-milwaukee-wi-us-177154239.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,,ed84aa499cd6deceb6a2beb9aba1cc7a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:02:28:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"CNAs & RN/LPN Looking for candidates in the Racine/Kenosha area. Candidate must have their certification or degree in their respected fields, 1+ year recent experience working a Hospital or Nursing Home setting as well as an updated TB and FLU shot. Call us at 262-786-6350 or apply online www.nursing-centers.com",CNA and RN/LPN Job in Brookfield,Full Time,"Brookfield, WI 53005",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cna-rn-lpn-job-brookfield-wi-us-177255085.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e25fc928379dde9102923b5a6ccdbf5a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:02:38:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is hiring immediately for multiple warehouse positions at Brady Corporation at 6555 W Good Hope Rd. If you are an experienced warehouse worker that enjoys working in a fast paced environment with accuracy and wants to work overtime- this is a great opportunity for you. To apply for this position, email your resume to Tiffany at tiffany.anderson@randstadstaffing.com This is a fast paced warehouse environment where quality and speed are valued. Must be accurate and detailed in working with numbers and quantities and be able to produce at expected levels daily. Must be flexible to learn and work different positions in the warehouse which you will be cross trained on. Pick/Pack/Warehouse $12.50 - $13.25 / hour3.00$12.50 / Hour2nd Shift: 2:00pm - 10:00pmMust be able to work 8-10 hour shifts including up to 10 hours of overtime a week.Responsibilities:- Pick & Pack orders accurately using pick sheets & RF Scan guns - Pick orders at expected production levels while meeting quality standards - Domestic & international shipping & receiving - Verify identifying information on incoming or outgoing shipments with bills of lading, invoices, - Verify incoming orders - Prepare appropriate documentation for domestic or international shipments- Maintain all shipping recordsWorking hours: 2nd Shift 2pm-10pmSkills:--HS Diploma or GED --Warehouse experience (1-2 years) --Forklift- requires a minimum of 1 year forklift experience in the past 3 years --Steady work history --Perfect Attendance and working overtime is required (up to 10 hours a week) --This position requires employment verification, 2 references, successful completion of a background check and drug test. Candidates interested in this job MUST SUBMIT THEIR RESUME in response to this ad or email to tiffany.anderson@randstadusa.com Qualified candidates will be contacted for interview and to start the application process.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse General Laborer/Picker/Packer - Brady Corp - nd Shift Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI 53223",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-general-laborer-picker-packer-brady-corp-2nd-shift-job-milwaukee-wi-us-178463697.aspx?mescoid=5301083001001&jobPosition=5,12.50 - 13.25 $ /hour,,333792e3eeceef1f985bd3bcbc392135
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:02:54:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Future of health care is Home Care as a Telehealth Nurse. This is not your average nursing gig. This is the evolution of nursing care. State of the art equipment. Plus old-fashioned warm bedside manner. Becoming a Telehealth Nurse is an opportunity to use the full spectrum of your skills, and maybe even some skills you didn't know you had! Telehealth keeps patients out of the hospital and allows them to learn to manage their chronic diseases in the comfort of their own their homes and improve their quality of life. You'll make a tremendous impact on the lives of patients and families.Horizon Home Care & Hospice, located in Milwaukee, WI, is a rapidly growing not-for-profit health care organization, and we seek a personable RN to help care for patients with chronic lung disease. In a nutshell, this person will assess and monitor telehealth patients in their homes, with a combination of hands-on assessment and the use of electronic equipment.If you're an experienced nurse with a passion for helping those with chronic lung disease, this is your dream job. You balance patient care and education out in the community with electronic assessment to keep patients out of the ER and prevent acute care hospitalization.The Telehealth Coordinator is responsible for staying on top of best practices in chronic lung disease management as well as case managing a specific group.This position works an appealing Monday-Friday schedule from 8:00am-4:30pm with NO required on-call or weekends and only two holidays a year! Generous compensation and benefits package including Health, Dental & Vision insurance, Retirements Savings with Employer Match, Paid Time Off, Mileage Reimbursement, and more!Qualifications include a BSN from an Accredited School of Nursing, a valid WI RN license, and at least 1-2 years of experience caring for patients with chronic diseases. Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease management and/or home care experience strongly desired. Because this position travels throughout Milwaukee, Waukesha, Ozaukee, and Washington Counties, you must have a current WI driver's license, reliable vehicle, and auto insurance.  Horizon Home Care and Hospice, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer that does not discriminate in employment and ensures equal employment opportunity for all persons regardless of their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or status as a qualified individual with a disability or Vietnam era or other protected veteran. To achieve our goal of equal opportunity, we maintain an affirmative action program through which we take good faith efforts to recruit, hire and advance in employment qualified minorities, women, persons with disabilities, Vietnam era veterans, and other protected veterans.#LI-DNP",RN - Telehealth Coordinator - $,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI 53224",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-telehealth-coordinator-10-000-hiring-bonus-job-milwaukee-wi-us-178139871.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,1a8fa2583e7879abbe370558d7b7cd3c
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:03:18:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Through its people and brands, CNH Industrial delivers power, technology and innovation to farmers, builders and drivers all around the world. Each of its brands, including Case IH, New Holland Agriculture, Case and New Holland Construction, FPT Industrial, Capital, and Parts & Service, is a major international force in its specific sector.As the National Account Manager, you will Manage National Accounts for sales of Construction Equipment Whole goods while providing leadership to various business functions and working with customers to provide high levels of product support and customer satisfaction to drive CNH market share in the construction equipment industry. This position is field based and would need to live near an US major airport.The Responsibilities include:Comprehensive management of all assigned customer relationships involving selling, developing key relationships, developing new customer opportunities, delivering plan, and forecast volumes for closures, managing customer support satisfaction required to meet all customer expectationsServe as an expert resource for each assigned customer with extended responsibilities including discovery, cultivation, and business development from an initial opportunity through invoice paymentEstablish and manage all relationships and key points of contact within the customer organization, including executive, functional, operating and maintenance personnel, while determining and understanding their decision-making process or processesProvide direct customer input and feedback to product management and product engineeringWork closely with CASE Construction distribution channel to ensure superior support to National Account customers, and assist commercial organization in resolving any dealer support issues, which may arise from sales to these customersDevelop and deliver professional sales presentations to National Account customersDevelop and deliver timely, accurate, professional quotesThe qualified applicant will have:BS/BA Degree required5+ years of construction equipment retail, or retail support, experience with a strong constructionExcellent business communication skills, both verbal and writtenStrong negotiating skills, interpersonal management skills, data analytical skills, computer skills and a solid business acumenAwareness and comprehension of basic accounting and finance principles to understand issues and events that financially affect the businessAbility to travel overnight (60-80%)The ideal candidate will have:MBAEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled.Equal opportunity employer. This company considers candidates regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",National Account Manager Job in Racine,Full Time Employee,"Racine, WI 53404",CNH Industrial,http://jobview.monster.com/national-account-manager-job-racine-wi-us-177705628.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,334ee2f69687f00c11f9a802615ff7a6
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:03:19:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Associate, VisualDepartment: Remote - Store OperationsReports to: Visual ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: NoLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Visual Associate is responsible for assisting the merchandising team by processing and staging all merchandise in store. The Visual Associate will ensure that all merchandise is aesthetically pleasing and set accordingly to brand standards and guidelines.  Deliverables: Support daily merchandising, styling, floor set planning and execution, replenishment, launches, updates, planning and execution, shipment, zero selling reports, loss prevention, and service.Partner with the merchandising team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, and field merchandising reportsFollow the floor set guidelines to ensure the sales floor is replenished in accordance to company standardsMaintain visual displays, presentation and conditions of sales floor at all timeEnsure service, mannequin maintenance and styling, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processesSupport all management, visuals, and sales team at all timesAssist in receiving and processing all new merchandise shipmentsEnsure all merchandise in stock rooms and on store shelves meet company standardsAssist in daily store recovery, before, during or after store opening hoursAdhere to company policies, procedures, and loss prevention practicesComplete sales transactions and maintain proper accountability at registersKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years oldA High School diploma or equivalent preferredMust have at least 1 – 2 years of retail merchandising or styling experienceMust have a demonstrated passion for customer service and visual merchandising skillsMust be able to work under close supervision and comprehend detailed instructionMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able to act with integrity and business maturity to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudice.Must be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be able to spend up to 100% of the working time standing and walkingMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shiftsAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 23418 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0250 - F21 - Bayshore Town Center, Glendale WI US 53217 Job Type : Part Time",Visual Associate - Bayshore Town Center # Job in Glendale,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Associate, VisualDepartment: Remote - Store OperationsReports to: Visual ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: NoLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Visual Associate is responsible for assisting the merchandising team by processing and staging all merchandise in store. The Visual Associate will ensure that all merchandise is aesthetically pleasing and set accordingly to brand standards and guidelines.  Deliverables: Support daily merchandising, styling, floor set planning and execution, replenishment, launches, updates, planning and execution, shipment, zero selling reports, loss prevention, and service.Partner with the merchandising team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, and field merchandising reportsFollow the floor set guidelines to ensure the sales floor is replenished in accordance to company standardsMaintain visual displays, presentation and conditions of sales floor at all timeEnsure service, mannequin maintenance and styling, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processesSupport all management, visuals, and sales team at all timesAssist in receiving and processing all new merchandise shipmentsEnsure all merchandise in stock rooms and on store shelves meet company standardsAssist in daily store recovery, before, during or after store opening hoursAdhere to company policies, procedures, and loss prevention practicesComplete sales transactions and maintain proper accountability at registersKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years oldA High School diploma or equivalent preferredMust have at least 1 – 2 years of retail merchandising or styling experienceMust have a demonstrated passion for customer service and visual merchandising skillsMust be able to work under close supervision and comprehend detailed instructionMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able to act with integrity and business maturity to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudice.Must be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be able to spend up to 100% of the working time standing and walkingMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shiftsAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 23418 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0250 - F21 - Bayshore Town Center, Glendale WI US 53217 Job Type : Part Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/visual-associate-bayshore-town-center-250-job-glendale-wi-us-177156917.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5cb2f647e8901da1c4a60480479b4d6a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:04:21:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the JobWhat is more secure than the replacement of burned out light bulbs?At Maintenance Engineering our sales team is devoted to bringing premium quality lighting and services to businesses no matter the size or industry. Our objective is to maximize a business’s revenue by assessing their specific lighting needs and providing them with a cost efficient solution.Working for the Nation’s leader, you will enjoy these advantages:commissions and bonuses pd weekly, earn an additional $3000 during training periodAdvancement opportunitiesIndustry leading products & servicesRecession proof market & industry Professional ongoing trainingPerformance rewards (cruises, resort trips)What our people are saying!“How I have blossomed and grown in the last 10 years with Maintenance Engineering is astronomical”“When you sell a Maintenance Engineering product line, you’re selling the very best in the market”Job DescriptionWe are seeking confident and highly motivated individuals for a great opportunity with unlimited earnings and growth potential. Our top performing Outside Sales Representatives earn over $100,000 each year, we want all of our Sales Professionals to be top earners and we will train for success. For over 40 years, our Sales Representatives have been conducting business with facilities across the U.S. Whether you’re a sales veteran or an entry level candidate right out of school, you will be able to take charge or your career and income as an Outside Sales Representative.Training includes: Trip to the company headquarters for advanced product and sales trainingPersonal career coachOne-on-one field trainingAll sales materials including portfolio, business cards, demo fixtures and more!RequirementsMaintenance Engineering will invest the time and effort to train the right candidate. You bring the desire and we will give you the tools. We do prefer the following:Good communication skillsA strong work ethicHonesty and integrityA competitive nature  Keyword Search:  Sales, sales rep, sales manager, sales mgr, outside sales, outside sales representative, outside sales rep, osr, account executive, acct exec, ae, account manager, acct mgr, am, marketing, business development, bus dev, business opportunity, bus opp,  independent contractor, salesperson, salesman, saleswoman, salespeople, selling, industrial, commercial, lighting, lamps, bulbs,fluorescent, tubes,  career position, career opportunity, customer service, retail, entry level, energy, environmental, green",Outside Sales Representative Job in Menomonee Falls,Full Time Employee,"Menomonee Falls, WI 53051",AllEnergy and UtilitiesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-representative-job-menomonee-falls-wi-us-178362438.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),10f5c62c18f14d971fb05ad93f4c786b
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:04:31:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"(Day Shift) II. POSITION SUMMARY: Under the direct: supervision of a Registered Nurse/licensed Nurse, this position will assist with routine and repetitive patient care activities on a nursing unit. This position also performs specific clerical, organizational and patient focused activities. The patient focused tasks will be supportive in nature. III. CORE VALUES: A. Dignity: respect for the worth of every person, recognition and commitment to the value of diverse individuals and perspectives, and special concern for the poor and underserved. B. Integrity: demonstrates honesty, justice and consistency in all relationships.C. Excellence: demonstrates high standards of service and performance.D. Compassion: demonstrates service in a spirit of empathy, love and concern.E. Stewardship: demonstrates wise and just use of talents and resources in a collaborative manner. IV. KEY JOB DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES: A. Assists with the admission, transfer and discharge of patients. Completes pertinent documents. Prepares rooms for admission by setting up IV pots, adjusting bed to appropriate level. (E)B. Assures that all patient belongings accompany the patient to the new unit or home at time of discharge. (E)C. Safely transports stable patients as required. (E)D. Maintains security/confidentiality when transporting patients and interacting with family and visitors. (E)E. Cleans, procures, and returns equipment and supplies.F. Run errands for the unit as required. (E)G. Assist Licensed personnel in providing a safe and comfortable environment at all times; replenishes patient room with water, linen, towels, as appropriate. (E)H. Perform unit specific patient care tasks in accordance with skills checklist and documents on the flowsheet. (E)I. Identify obvious changes in the patient's condition and takes responsibility for reporting those changes promptly to the nurse in charge. (E)J. Assist with the ordering and maintenance of stock items according to established inventory when needed. Keeps unit supplies in an organized and orderly fashion. (E)K. Respond appropriately to emergencies. (E)L. Communicate effectively with other team members during and between shifts. (E)M. Responds to phone calls and patient call lights. (E)N. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the population-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department. (E)O. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment, and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age specific and other developmental needs of each patient served. (E)P. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of Santa Rosa Health Care. (E)Q. Performs other duties as assigned. (M) QUALIFICATIONS: A. EDUCATION:1. Must have a high school diploma or GED.2. Must have completed a Nursing Assistant program and have the skills on the skills checklist. B. EXPERIENCE:1. Patient care experience in an acute care hospital, preferred.2. Knowledge of the hospital environment: is required. C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION:1. Certified Nursing Assistant certification is required.2. CPR certification is required. D. EQUIPMENT/SKILLS:1. Must have the physical and mental ability to perform the skills on the skill checklist.2. Must have the ability to follow detailed oral and written instructions and to maintain nursing records and charts.3. Ability to interact professionally with patients and families.4. Requires excellent communication and interpersonal skills. E. WORKING CONDITIONS/PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:1. Works in a modern, smoke free, temperature controlled facility.2. Must adapt to rapidly changing workload and frequent interruptions.3. Ability to stand and walk 90% of working hours.4. Requires physical stamina to lift and move patients.5. May be exposed to body fluids and infectious disease.6. May be floated to other units as needed. F. OTHER:1. Performs other duties as assigned. G. Must also successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening examination, and the annual screening each year thereafter as an employee. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",CNA,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78229",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cna-certified-nurse-assistant-telemetry-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169290346.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,266b6309860462f17e7689b1daf6b435
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:04:33:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY: This position is responsible for preparing and passing instruments and equipment for assigned surgical procedures in accordance with hospital and department standards and is responsible for carrying out identified patient care needs delegated by an RN, Physician or Manager/Supervisor. This position fulfills scrub role for patients undergoing complex specialty procedures.REQUIREMENTS: A. EDUCATION: * High school graduate or equivalent is required. * Completion of surgical technology program is required. B. EXPERIENCE: * A minimum of five years experience is required. * Ability to proficiently scrub 3 specialty areas including but not limited to: Transplants, Open Heart, Urology, Neurology, Titanium Rib, Robotics etc. is required. C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: * Current CPR certification is required. * 2. Must have completed an accredited surgical technology education program AND hold the certification. OR * 3. Must have completed an appropriate technologist certification training program in the U.S. military or U.S. Public Health Service. OR * Surgical Technologist must have been employed to practice in health care facilities prior to 9/1/09. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Certified Surgery Tech Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78251",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-surgery-tech-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170015633.aspx?mescoid=2900527001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,79a8d360ca6a8d6054c4ef1ad151dc00
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:05:35:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY: Under the direct supervision of a Registered Nurse/Licensed Nurse, this position will assist with routine and repetitive patient care activities on a nursing unit. This position also performs specific clerical, organizational and patient focused activities. The patient focused tasks will be supportive in nature.QUALIFICATIONS: A. EDUCATION: Must have a high school diploma or GED. Must have completed a Nursing Assistant program and have the skills on the skills checklist. B. EXPERIENCE: Patient care experience in an acute care hospital is preferred. Knowledge of the hospital environment is required. C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: Certified Nursing assistant certification is required. CPR certification is required.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",CNA Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78251",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cna-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169513687.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,834fa50d472ba4ea5dea31ba545407fc
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:06:26:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Full Charge Bookkeeper needed. Accounts Payable, Accounts Receivable, Payroll, Human Resource experience a must. 30-40 hours weekly once trained and comfortable with position. Monthly statements, daily sales reports, bill paying, payroll processing, bank deposits, account balancing, budgeting are among the duties required. Must have first-hand knowledge of ADP payroll services, PeachTree accounting software, Excel, Texas State Employment laws, cash handling procedures. Health insurance regulations and HSA knowledge. Hourly wage based on experience and company standards. Possible health insurance benefits available. Fun and active working environment. North Central San Antonio, 1604 and 281 in the Northwood's shopping area. Please include cover letter with resume.Requirements * Must have Full Charge Bookkeeping experience * Must have knowledge of ADP Payroll software and processing * Must have experience in A/R and A/P * Human Resource and Texas Employment laws experience * Cash handling and bank deposit experience * Knowledge of health insurance and Health Savings Account coverageSan Antonio, TX 78232Industry : Entertainment, Exercise – Fitness, Recreation Manages Others : NoJob Type : Accounting, General Business, Human Resources Education : 2 Year DegreeExperience : at least 3 year(s)Job Location:San Antonio, TX 78232Required education:Associate Report",Monster,,"Full Charge Bookkeeper needed. Accounts Payable, Accounts Receivable, Payroll, Human Resource experience a must. 30-40 hours weekly once trained and comfortable with position. Monthly statements, daily sales reports, bill paying, payroll processing, bank deposits, account balancing, budgeting are among the duties required. Must have first-hand knowledge of ADP payroll services, PeachTree accounting software, Excel, Texas State Employment laws, cash handling procedures. Health insurance regulations and HSA knowledge. Hourly wage based on experience and company standards. Possible health insurance benefits available. Fun and active working environment. North Central San Antonio, 1604 and 281 in the Northwood's shopping area. Please include cover letter with resume.Requirements * Must have Full Charge Bookkeeping experience * Must have knowledge of ADP Payroll software and processing * Must have experience in A/R and A/P * Human Resource and Texas Employment laws experience * Cash handling and bank deposit experience * Knowledge of health insurance and Health Savings Account coverageSan Antonio, TX 78232Industry : Entertainment, Exercise – Fitness, Recreation Manages Others : NoJob Type : Accounting, General Business, Human Resources Education : 2 Year DegreeExperience : at least 3 year(s)Job Location:San Antonio, TX 78232Required education:Associate",,http://jobview.monster.com/full-charge-bookkeeper-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169739161.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=15,,,2602464d81add307a2212983d224c582
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:06:27:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress.Job Requirements Education: Minimum of an Associate's Degree and Registered Nurse license required.",Part Time Registered Nurse OR Job in San Antonio,"Part Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-registered-nurse-or-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169511643.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,b0b63882f721834cfd4c19884f97f0b7
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:07:11:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:Under supervision, the incumbent of this position provides professional nursing care to clinic patients. Works collaboratively with the providers within the team setting to facilitate quality care for the patient. Job Responsibilities:1. Performs general nursing care to patients. Administers treatments in accordance with nursing standards. 2. Assists with the preparation of equipment and aids provider during treatment, examination, and testing of patients. 3. Observes, records, and reports patients' condition and reaction to drugs or treatments to providers. 4. Oversees appointment bookings and ensures preferences are given to patients in emergency situations. Maintains timely flow of patients. 5. Greets patients and obtains well-documented history and vitals. Prepares patients for physical exam. Instructs patients in collection of samples and tests. 6. May perform the following tasks in accordance with established procedures and as prescribed by applicable licensure/certification: Obtain/record vital signs; perform initial assessment on patient; coordinate patient transfer to hospital and/or discharge; give telephone orders; accept telephone test results; perform telephone triage; call in provider approved prescription refills; specimen collection including stool and urine midstream; catheterize patient; indwelling catheter urine collection; obtain throat culture; pregnancy testing; administer urine dip; obtain wound culture; perform snellen vision screening; eye injury management; administer optic/otic meds; assist with lumbar punctures; sputum collection; occult blood testing; assist with vaginal exam; teach crutch/cane walking; teach use of walker; apply Velcro splint; assist with plaster splint; apply moist heat and/or cold packs; administer enema; remove fecal impaction; administer oxygen; teach respiratory hygiene; administer chest physiotherapy; perform oral suction and/or infant suction bulb; wound care; apply sterile dressing; assist with circumcision; perform umbilical care; apply colloidal dressing; open sterile tray; apply topical medications; administer rectal and/or vaginal medications; give oral medications; and, give sublingual medications to adults and/or pediatric patients. 7. May perform the following tasks only if appropriate training has been obtained: Blood collection by lancet; pulse oximetry; incentive Spirometry; suture and/or staple removal; ear irrigation; administer breathing treatment; give allergy/insulin/immunization medications to adult and/or pediatric patients; give intramuscular and/or subcutaneous injections to adult and/or pediatric patients; give injections Z track to adult patients. 8. May perform the following tasks after providing verification of completion of special training: Blood collection venipuncture; audiometry exam; titmus vision screening; EKG; administer electrical stimulation; assist/process biopsies; draw blood from portocath; assist endoscopy, start saline lock or IV fluids and monitor IV fluids. 9. May administer IV push medications and/or add medications to IV only after completion of special training and only under direct supervision of licensed practitioner. 10. May make arrangements for patient testing and admissions. 11. May be required to have a working knowledge of ICD9, CPT and HCPCS coding and managed care. 12. Responds to incoming telephone calls and (per provider instructions) calls in refills and prescriptions to pharmacy. 13. Per provider and/or established protocol, instructs patients and/or family with regard to medication and treatment and documents the same. 14. Formulates and updates patient care plans. Orders, prepares, and inspects patient charts. Posts tests and examination results. Reviews patient's tests and examination results with provider; documents instructions and notifies patient. 15. Maintains patient files, records and other information in a professional manner following policies and procedures regarding documentation. 16. Ensures preparation of exam rooms including re-stocking of treatment areas. 17. Attends required meetings and participates in committees as requested. 18. Participates in professional development activities and maintains professional licensure and affiliations. 19. Follows the CHRISTUS Physician Group guidelines related to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), designed to prevent or detect unauthorized disclosure of Protected Health Information (PHI). 20. Maintains strict confidentiality. 21. Uses oral and written communication skills to effectively convey ideas in a clear, positive manner that is consistent with the CHRISTUS Mission. 22. Maintains established CHRISTUS Physician Group policies, procedures, objectives, quality assurance, safety, environmental and infection control. 23. Implements job responsibilities in a manner that is consistent with the CHRISTUS Mission and Code of Ethics and supportive of CHRISTUS Physician Group's cultural diversity objectives. 24. Supports and adheres to CPG Service Guarantee.Qualifications:Graduate from an accredited school of practical nursing or vocational nursing. Valid state license to practice nursing. Current CPR certification. Previous medical office experience preferredEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",LVN - Clinic Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78209",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lvn-clinic-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170056896.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,12c0614205282f21ef8d77adeb5cd394
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:07:12:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  663451PURPOSE OF POSITIONScrum Masters in this role facilitate and promote the effective use of the scrum development methodology. When done right, the use of agile and scrum techniques transforms the development process, allowing teams to quickly deliver value. Every story, iteration, and retrospective becomes an opportunity to collaboratively hear from our customers about what matters most.It is an exciting, fast-paced process, requiring Scrum Masters to leverage all their knowledge of agile and scrum, along with leadership and team-building skills, to create high-performing teams on a mission to serve our members.If interested, please email kespinoza@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.",Project Manager - Scrum Master Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-scrum-master-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169974156.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ad8239e41daee1bce0fa57c5c79b938f
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:07:15:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manpower is currently recruiting for a Mailroom Clerk to work for our client in San Antonio, TX!Job Responsibilities:* Timely processing of all incoming mail, including opening, sorting, batching, scanning, lien confirmation, data entry into VIN App system, and Indexing.* Process includes validating VIN numbers, lien holder and owner information.* Ability to perform entry level research to determine appropriate action taken on incoming titles/liens.* Track and maintain productivity accurately.* Adhere to all service level goals and personnel policies and procedures.Job Requirements:* High school diploma or equivalent.* Minimum of 2 years of mailroom or related experience.* Excellent ten key and data entry skillsAdditional Details:Location: San Antonio, TX 76155Length of Contract: 6 months contractPay Rate: $19/hrIf you are interested in this position please apply and go to www.manpowerjobs.com and create a profile with us! Should your qualifications match that of the position, the recruiter will contact you.When emailing or calling, please reference Advert ID# 307053NOTE: Please DO NOT contact your local manpower office directly, as this position is not being serviced out of that office, please reach out to the recruiter listed above.Manpower is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Employer!",Mailroom Clerk Job in San Antonio,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Manpower is currently recruiting for a Mailroom Clerk to work for our client in San Antonio, TX!Job Responsibilities:* Timely processing of all incoming mail, including opening, sorting, batching, scanning, lien confirmation, data entry into VIN App system, and Indexing.* Process includes validating VIN numbers, lien holder and owner information.* Ability to perform entry level research to determine appropriate action taken on incoming titles/liens.* Track and maintain productivity accurately.* Adhere to all service level goals and personnel policies and procedures.Job Requirements:* High school diploma or equivalent.* Minimum of 2 years of mailroom or related experience.* Excellent ten key and data entry skillsAdditional Details:Location: San Antonio, TX 76155Length of Contract: 6 months contractPay Rate: $19/hrIf you are interested in this position please apply and go to www.manpowerjobs.com and create a profile with us! Should your qualifications match that of the position, the recruiter will contact you.When emailing or calling, please reference Advert ID# 307053NOTE: Please DO NOT contact your local manpower office directly, as this position is not being serviced out of that office, please reach out to the recruiter listed above.Manpower is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Employer!","San Antonio, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/mailroom-clerk-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170047871.aspx?mescoid=4300757001001&jobPosition=4,18.00 - 19.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,b73243fb8c14c1ce7f659959032b4f2a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:08:05:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description SUMMARY: Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Requirements QUALIFICATIONS: 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. 2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. 4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-emergency-dept-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169964032.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,2ea0b69ae767492d3f6e4bf6611ebbfe
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:08:06:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Coordinates the medical and rehabilitative services provided to each patient using an interdisciplinary teach approach. Coordinates clinical team conference for all patients and facilitates interdisciplinary team functioning. Acts as liaison between payer, patient, family, and physician, treatment team, business and other resources. Provides direct patient care when necessary for demonstration of technique or procedure, or when required. Monitors quality of nursing care and nursing documentation. Responsible for education and mentoring of staff and new graduate nurses. Functions as Utilization Review Coordinator/Case Manager as needed. Oversees nursing care planning and actively supports interdisciplinary care team process. Monitors, reports, and collects Quality Improvement data. Serves as liaison between nursing unit, patients, physicians, and families. Completes pre-admission patient screening as assigned, and evaluates patients for admission. Involves provision of patient care/service to older adolescent, young adult, adult, and geriatric patients.Job Requirements EDUCATION: Graduate of an accredited school of Nursing. BSN and MSN preferred.  EXPERIENCE: Five years clinical experience with at least three years in an acute care hospital setting. Case Mgmt experience preferred. Ability to organize, plan, and implement patient care programs. Excellent communication skills. Ability to work in adverse and variable conditions. Strong networking, flexibility, and team skills.  LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: Minimum requirements: Current state RN license. Current CPR Certification",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-case-manager-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170053345.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,7d5d7fb2d43ac33027fdea0c1a43c1b4
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:09:17:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description SUMMARY: Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Requirements QUALIFICATIONS: 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. 2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. 4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-day-surgery-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169850314.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,0a94bd1fbd18ecc8d2e35842615a65a4
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:10:16:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is looking for a Quality Assurance III in San Antonio, TX.Responsibilities: Writes and executes automated test scripts and automation objects using Open CAFE Writes positive and negative smoke and regression test scripts to test product functionality and integration with upstream and downstream dependencies Tests APIs, user interfaces, web services and/or web applications Participates in test automation code reviews Collaborates with other quality and development engineers to build, evolve, and maintain a scalable continuous build and deployment pipeline Working on the project that builds support tools for the support organization; the tools being built can either be user interfaces or API's which the support members will use to gather customer information in order to assist customers Maintains and tracks works with daily check-ins to GitHub and Version One or JIRAWhy should Candidates be interested: Working in an award winning culture and a set of values they can stand behindREQUIREMENTS: 5 years of experience as an Automation Tester 5 years of experience with developing and/or testing enterprise systems at scale Experience with Linux, specifically Red Hat or Ubuntu, and shell scripting Strong experience with Selenium WebDriver Experience in the billing or financial systems domain Working knowledge of Oracle BRM, Fusion Middleware, EBS, etc Ability to communicate and document clearly and well in English",Quality Assurance III Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Antonio, TX 78218",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-iii-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170037290.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b1469787f5d2d390f84dcd2d047f6b25
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:10:17:30,No,jobs.monster.com,Job Description Under the supervisor of the Laboratory Manager the Phlebotomist performs aseptic venipuncture procedures to obtain venous and capillary blood samples for analysis.  This position also performs clerical duties to provide support for and assistance to laboratory personnel in the management of the laboratory.  The Phlebotomist adheres to policies/procedures that meet federal and state regulations and accreditation standards. Required Skills High School diploma or equivalent Knowledge of governmental and regulating policies/standards related to phlebotomy/lab Basic computer skills Ability to detect color and color changes Required Experience One year phlebotomist/lab experience preferred,Phlebotomist - PRN Job in Phoenix,"Full Time, Employee","Phoenix, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/phlebotomist-prn-job-phoenix-tx-us-169094623.aspx?mescoid=3100561001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,caa42d6c960fe9ffe1c173c76cfbd72c
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:10:33:57,No,jobs.monster.com," Retail CareersIt’s no secret that the retail industry is going through a period of rapid transformation. With great change comes great opportunity for talented retail managers with proven track records. At Sandy Jackson Associates , our client roster of companies looking to fill positions and build teams grows daily. Store Manager We are seeking a talented Store Manager or Assistant Manager with successful track record supervising a minimum of $1 million annual sales volume for a well known home furnishings retailer. RESPONSIBILITIES: Building RevenueMerchandise PresentationVisual Standards JOB REQUIREMENTS: Three to five years Store Manager or Assistant Manager experience preferably with a customer centric retailer. Bachelors degree preferred. Qualified candidates can send resume and salary requirements to resumes@sandyjacksonassociates.com Save any attachments in Microsoft Word or PDF format Keywords: Store Manager, General Manager, Store Director, Associate Manager, Store Leader ""s",Store Manager Job in San Antonio,Employee,"San Antonio, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/store-manager-job-san-antonio-tx-us-168504996.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),99d1b3aab77ab4129403052bcf09e156
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:10:46:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales Associate Needed - Full Training ProvidedJob Description*Team 210, Inc. is hiring for entry level inside sales associate, sales representative and retail sales positions!We are Growing!. We have a proven track record in B2B sales and have recently signed a MAJOR national account that requires us to hire for entry-level RETAIL marketing & sales positions with RAPID, merit-based advancement opportunity.Here at Team 210, Inc., we pride ourselves on providing clients with a personal, professional approach to promotional marketing and customer acquisition. Our talented team of marketing professionals represent our clients with unparalleled integrity to the business community. In order for our organization to prosper, we are aggressively seeking talented, enthusiastic individuals who are searching for an opportunity to quickly work their way from ENTRY-LEVEL into a position in MANAGEMENT, overseeing campaigns for our clients and managing a staff of 15+ employees. Our company strongly believes in developing our people into the future leaders of our organization.Our Company Offers: • Outstanding Performance Based Growth Opportunities • Paid Training • Amazing Team-Focused Environment • Base Plus HEAVY Commission Compensation PackageOur Management Development Program offers an exciting opportunity for candidates to learn all aspects of our business from the ground up. Job RequirementsResponsibilities in this program include: • Sales/Marketing • Team Leadership • Sales Training • Human Resources • Marketing Strategies and Sales Techniques • Oversee Campaign Development • Manage Customer Service, Administration, and Sales PeopleWe provide full training for the right candidates. This position is paid on a combination of base, commission, and bonuses. No outside sales or telemarketing are involved. Our office is located at the intersection of I-10 and Loop 410. Store locations are throughout Metro San Antonio! Four year degree preferred.Please report any scam or spam emails to our HR department.",Sales Representative - Entry Level Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78234",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-entry-level-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169574185.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,904570cc05ed93ef3d54c22a4522cc31
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:11:32:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Co-ManagerDepartment: Remote – Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: YesFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Co-Manager will provide leadership and direction to the store service and operations team. By creating long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Co-Manager will ensure maximum productivity, profitability, operational excellence, and compliance with company procedures.  Deliverables: Actively participate in store walkthroughs with the Store Manager and District leaders to ensure consistency in the quality of service, operation and visual executionTrain and monitor Associates on company policies and expectations, cashier training, loss prevention policies and procedures, and product standards informationResponsible for overall store maintenance by overseeing facility, safety, loss prevention, and inventory issuesManage and measure progress and results against key targets, and also be responsible for the email capture programOversee activity and execution of service, loss prevention, event marketing, cash handling and managing return to vendor and suppliesLead overall store earnings by driving top line sales and managing controllable contribution. This includes educating Associates on ways to drive sales through promoting service standards, product knowledge, etc.Collaborate with merchandising leaders to ensure the execution of markdowns/signage/marketing to align with merchandise placementAccountable for supply and maintenance expenses and to follow up with Facility Services on all maintenance issuesEvaluate customer surveys to assist with the execution of any action plan to enhance the customer’s in-store experienceMonitor daily payroll planner, adjusting schedules accordingly, and completing register audits as necessaryEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsPartner with the Store Manager with talent selection, recruiting, onboarding, networking, administrative work and service, new hire documents, training, coaching, engagement, retention, and recognition initiatives for the storeSpend at least 60% of the shift performing Leader On Duty tasksKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must have at least 2 to 4 years of retail management experience. Prior retail store leadership experience preferred.College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferredMust be skilled in leadership, coaching, and training, sales generation, strategic planning, authentic customer service, communication, conflict resolution, business acumen, time management, POS terminals, and general retail software proficiencyMust be able to provide feedback, develop others, embrace and lead change, and make decisions under ambiguityMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able act with integrity and professionalism to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudiceMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicals.Must be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts.At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22247 Division : Field - Region : Southwest Location : 0195 - F21 - The Shops at La Cantera, San Antonio TX US 78256 Job Type : Full Time",Co-Manager - The Shops at La Cantera # Job in San Antonio,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Co-ManagerDepartment: Remote – Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: YesFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Co-Manager will provide leadership and direction to the store service and operations team. By creating long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Co-Manager will ensure maximum productivity, profitability, operational excellence, and compliance with company procedures.  Deliverables: Actively participate in store walkthroughs with the Store Manager and District leaders to ensure consistency in the quality of service, operation and visual executionTrain and monitor Associates on company policies and expectations, cashier training, loss prevention policies and procedures, and product standards informationResponsible for overall store maintenance by overseeing facility, safety, loss prevention, and inventory issuesManage and measure progress and results against key targets, and also be responsible for the email capture programOversee activity and execution of service, loss prevention, event marketing, cash handling and managing return to vendor and suppliesLead overall store earnings by driving top line sales and managing controllable contribution. This includes educating Associates on ways to drive sales through promoting service standards, product knowledge, etc.Collaborate with merchandising leaders to ensure the execution of markdowns/signage/marketing to align with merchandise placementAccountable for supply and maintenance expenses and to follow up with Facility Services on all maintenance issuesEvaluate customer surveys to assist with the execution of any action plan to enhance the customer’s in-store experienceMonitor daily payroll planner, adjusting schedules accordingly, and completing register audits as necessaryEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsPartner with the Store Manager with talent selection, recruiting, onboarding, networking, administrative work and service, new hire documents, training, coaching, engagement, retention, and recognition initiatives for the storeSpend at least 60% of the shift performing Leader On Duty tasksKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must have at least 2 to 4 years of retail management experience. Prior retail store leadership experience preferred.College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferredMust be skilled in leadership, coaching, and training, sales generation, strategic planning, authentic customer service, communication, conflict resolution, business acumen, time management, POS terminals, and general retail software proficiencyMust be able to provide feedback, develop others, embrace and lead change, and make decisions under ambiguityMust have excellent interpersonal skills and be able act with integrity and professionalism to ensure that all business is conducted without bias or prejudiceMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicals.Must be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts.At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22247 Division : Field - Region : Southwest Location : 0195 - F21 - The Shops at La Cantera, San Antonio TX US 78256 Job Type : Full Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/co-manager-the-shops-at-la-cantera-195-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169952740.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),77ab762e62696d755192e794621a0537
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:11:34:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"City:San Antonio State:Texas Postal/Zip Code:78233 Oldcastle Materials Texas produces, distributes and sells high quality dolomitic limestone throughout the state of Texas. Our plant and distribution facilities are able to service our customers on the Austin Western, Burlington Northern Santa Fe (BNSF) and Union Pacific (UP) railroads in addition to local truck traffic throughout Central Texas. The company is headquartered in Round Rock Texas and services the markets of Austin, Houston, and Beaumont in addition to several markets in East Texas and Central Texas. Position Overview The Construction Laborer position is responsible for performing various duties on construction and/or paving projects. The employee will generally work in utility capacity by transferring from one task to another where demands are required. The career field for “Construction Laborer” includes, but may not be limited to, the following positions: Laborer, General Laborer, and Paving Laborer. Key Responsibilities (Essential Duties and Functions) Ensure a safe work environment in compliance with all safety policies and procedures using the appropriate tools and equipment for the task. Properly follow all company policies and OSHA/MSHA regulations for safe working procedures and environment. Report any problems to the Foreman, Superintendent, Safety Manager, or Human Resources Manager. Assist construction/paving crew with various duties such as; shoveling and raking, running wheelbarrow, safely backing/dumping trucks into paver. Signal operators of construction equipment to facilitate alignment, movement, and materials with shovel. Follow direction of Foreman as to daily tasks and expectations for each specific project or jobsite. May be called upon to run small power tools such as jack hammer. Digs, spreads, and levels construction materials. Lifts, carries and holds material, tools and supplies. Assists in the placement, moving and dismantling of signs, barricades, cones and other traffic control devices. Regular and predictable attendance at assigned times is required. Other duties as may be assigned. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Education/Experience High school diploma or General Education Degree GED is preferred. Previous related experience in the construction field.Work Requirements Must be 18 years in age or older. Must pass pre-employment physical, drug screen and criminal background check. Strict adherence to safety requirements and procedures as outlined in the Employee Handbook. Willingness to work in a team environment and assist co-workers or supervisors with other duties as required. Must be willing to travel and work away from home when required. Must be willing to work nights and weekends when necessary. Individuals are required to wear personal protective equipment (PPE) in designated operations and production areas as stated by OSHA and/or MSHA. Protective equipment that may be required, but not limited to, for this position is: Face Shield, Safety (hard toe) Shoes, and Coveralls. Compliance with all OSHA and/or MSHA regulations.Knowledge/Skill Requirements Knowledge of materials, methods, and tools involved in construction and paving. Ability to read, write and do basic mathematical calculations. Ability to understand and follow verbal and written instructions. Ability to effectively communicate verbally and in writing. Ability to use equipment and tools properly and safely.Physical RequirementsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Able to stand, walk, use hands and fingers to manipulate objects or controls, climb or balance, stoop, kneel, crouch, crawl, talk and hear. Vision abilities (with correction) include close, distance, peripheral, depth, and the ability to adjust focus. Able to work in all weather conditions. The employee is frequently required to sit, climb, and use hands. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, crawl, kneel, bend, and reach with hand and arms above their shoulders. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move any where up to 50 pounds. Work Environment While performing the duties of the job, the employee may be occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. The employee is occasionally exposed to moving mechanical parts; high, precarious places; outside weather conditions; and risk of electrical shock or burn. The noise level in some areas of the work environment may be loud, but is typically moderate. The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive. They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job. Other duties may be assigned as required. Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. What Oldcastle Offers You Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join our Talent Community to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook , Twitter , Instagram , Google+ , Pinterest , WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn ! Oldcastle Materials Texas is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Oldcastle Materials Texasis part of theOldcastlecareers™network.",Paving Laborer Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/paving-laborer-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169248710.aspx?mescoid=4700800001001&jobPosition=14,,,2ab6e9dc3416fe2741961ac71072e7cf
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:12:07:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"System One is seeking a Tax Accountant to provide provides tax compliance support within the Accounting and Administration department.  The main focus of the tax accountant will be to provide timely and quality tax support services to the Enterprise. The tax accountant’s main responsibilities are preparing and filing the federal and state income tax returns, and assisting with the annual tax provision for the external auditors.  Along with that, the tax accountant will assist in making quarterly estimated tax payments and filing annual tax extensions.  The tax accountant should have a general understanding of corporate income taxation and experience preparing and filing corporate income tax returns. RESPONSIBILITIESPreparing and filing federal income tax returns – including Form 1120 and 1065Preparing and filing state income tax returnsMaking quarterly tax payments – at a federal and state levelFiling annual state tax extensionsAssisting with state and federal IRS auditsAssisting with the tax preparation of the annual tax provisionVarious other income-tax related projects, including tax regulation researchREQUIREMENTSBachelor's Degree in Accounting3-5 years of related experience preferred. PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONSExperience preparing federal and state corporate  income tax returns    System One is an Equal Opportunity Employer and maintains a drug-free work environment.   ",Tax Accountant Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/tax-accountant-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170006950.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,aafdd329d49e12873ae9d6eb0c11f6f2
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:12:08:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"RN – Nurse Manager – Psych – Psychiatric Nurse Manager - RN Nurse Manager - PsychRegistered Nurse, RNSan Antonio, TX area Here's an incredible opportunity for a highly motivated and experienced nurse to work as a Clinical Practice Leader at a highly respected, cutting edge hospital located in Texas! Nurse Manager - Psych - This is a full time, permanent position available for immediate hire! - Top hospital in the area with amazing clinical programs! - Reports to the Director of Nursing - Will provide direct supervision of nursing staff employees - Must have 5+ years of relevant healthcare experience required- Must have 3+ years of leadership - Must have strong leadership and communication skills - BLS certification preferred - Current TX RN license required - BSN degree required, MSN degree preferred PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1569Robin SylvisCareer Specialist, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group / CoreInformation Technology 2 Keewaydin Drive, Salem, NH 03079 p: 800-995-2673 ext. 1569 | f: 866-420-1055robins@coremedicalgroup.com          OUR SERVICES ARE ALWAYS FREE! IMMEDIATE HIRE! All applicants must be a registered nurse. The ideal candidate will have a BSN degree and 5 years of relevant healthcare experience.  PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1569Robin SylvisCareer Specialist, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group / CoreInformation Technology 2 Keewaydin Drive, Salem, NH 03079 p: 800-995-2673 ext. 1569 | f: 866-420-1055robins@coremedicalgroup.com            Keywords: Clinical Practice Leader, Clinical Practice Leader of Psych, Psychiatric Nurse, Psych Nurse, Psychiatric RN, Psych RN, Administrative Director, Behavioral Health Services, Adult Psychiatric Mental Health Nurse Practitioner, Advanced Practice Nurse Psychotherapist, APN Psychotherapist, Advanced Practice Psychiatric Nurse, Associate Chief Nurse, Associate Director of Nursing, Coordinator of the Psychiatric Liaison Service, Deputy Director of Clinical Specialty Services, Psychiatric Clinical Nurse Specialist, Psychiatric Mental Health Nurse, PMH Nurse,",RN – Nurse Manager – Psych – Psychiatric Nurse Manager - RN Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78250",,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-%E2%80%93-nurse-manager-%E2%80%93-psych-%E2%80%93-psychiatric-nurse-manager-rn-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169745452.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,4bd895d53aca151e5f5df707b8405856
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:12:09:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY: Under the direct supervision of a Registered Nurse/Licensed Nurse, this position will assist with routine and repetitive patient care activities on a nursing unit. This position also performs specific clerical, organizational and patient focused activities. The patient focused tasks will be supportive in nature. QUALIFICATIONS: A. EDUCATION: Must have a high school diploma or GED. Must have completed a Nursing Assistant program and have the skills on the skills checklist. B. EXPERIENCE: Patient care experience in an acute care hospital is preferred. Knowledge of the hospital environment is required. C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: Certified Nursing assistant certification is required. CPR certification is required. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",CNA - Med/Surg Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78251",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cna-med-surg-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169756984.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,58686bc9d2149ece1f5e18f0a5586205
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:12:09:08,No,jobs.monster.com,Job Description Performs diagnostic procedures utilizing imaging equipment while providing quality care to patients of all ages.   Graduate of an accredited school of Radiology Technology. 0-1 years of experience with competency in components of computed tomography Possession of current registry in Radiology and CT and possession of current Texas state registration. BLS obtained through approved American Heart Association provider.,CT Tech PRN - Baptist M&S Imaging Medical Center Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ct-tech-prn-baptist-m-s-imaging-medical-center-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169964375.aspx?mescoid=2900520001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,01092bef7a21d115a3544b2d2661fccd
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:12:34:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Professional Sales Representative / Project Manager***SEVERAL IMMEDIATE OPENINGS in San Antonio, Texas***Roofing and Restoration Services of America (RRSA) has an immediate opening for numerous Sales Representative/Project Manager positions located in San Antonio.       Put your selling skills to work for you with a company that truly rewards your performance – welcome to Roofing and Restoration Services of America!  Our team is tremendously successful and continues to experience unprecedented growth which translates into great opportunities for your sales & project management career!This is a sales position in a creative, consultative environment with unlimited earning potential which allows you to be truly in control of your financial destiny.  This is an ideal position for recent college graduates, veterans, oil field workers, teachers, or ANYONE seeking a great career opportunity is encouraged to apply!  NO EXPERIENCE NEEDED!Company OverviewRoofing and Restoration Services of America (RRSA) partners with local roofing/siding/gutters contractors to meet the restoration needs of communities after catastrophic events such as tornadoes and hurricanes. This partnership allows us to provide our large customer base with the expertise and high level of customer service they have come to expect from RRSA.RRSA is a Texas-based company recognized for outstanding training that will prepare you to be successful. No previous experience required. We have the tools, technology and training to develop top ranking talent in our industry! The compensation and back-office support we provide to our sales consultants is a result of our commitment to supporting their efforts and prioritizing their success. This role will enjoy the benefits of a great brand, high quality products, exceptional back-office support, excellent service and the best warranty in the industry.  Job ResponsibilitiesAt RRSA, the Sales Representative plays a crucial role in the success of our company. Working in a high-growth, high-impact position within our business development team, the Sales Representative must maintain professionalism and a positive attitude at all times. Building solid, long-term relationships with our clients presents a rewarding opportunity for both entry level as well as experienced professionals. As a Sales Representative, you will primarily meet with customers at their homes to determine their needs in order to identify the best RRSA solution. Primary duties include: ·         Meeting face-to-face with the homeowner to gather information and answer questions·         Inspecting the home’s roof, gutters and siding to evaluate the condition and attain measurements·         Consulting with the homeowner regarding solutions that are specific to their needs and budget·         Presenting payment options for the customized proposal·         Communicate and negotiate with homeowners insurance company·         Completing the job contract authorizing work to begin·         Interacting frequently with the Management team regarding appointments and authorized work contracts   In addition to sales skills and project management skills, the Sales Representative will be trained on how to develop a comprehensive knowledge about the products and services being sold. Some physical requirements including the ability to bend, lift and climb a ladder.   A reliable vehicle and valid driver’s license is required.   This exciting opportunity won’t last long – apply today by selecting the APPLY NOW button! If you don’t have a resume, CALL the Hiring Manager Directly:  Derek (469) 658-5810 – leave a message.  ",Sales Representative / Project Manager - Office # Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78210",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-project-manager-office-008-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170036080.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,"40,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,edf6aff862c7d009bed2b673ff6b83d8
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:12:47:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"LVN / LPN DescriptionSummaryA licensed practical nurse (LPN) [referred to as LVN - Licensed Vocational Nurse - in some states] provides care and treatment in accordance with physician orders. Works in a team environment and within scope of practice as defined by State. The LPN / LVN works under the direction of physicians and registered nurses (RNs).Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesAssesses patients by physical examination, including pertinent diagnostic testing to determine health status.Administers medications and treatments.Participates in the care planning process.Supervises LPNs and certified nursing assistants.Communicates with physicians regarding changes in resident's conditions, diagnostic test results, etc.Documents assessments and care in compliance with standards of care and company policy.Educates patients and their families on health-related issues.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Performs other duties as assigned. LVN / LPN RequirementsQualificationsGraduate of an accredited school of Nursing.Valid State licensure as an LPN / LVN.Current CPR certification.Physical Demands & EnvironmentShift work may be required. Employee is frequently required to stand, walk, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, talk and hear. Employee is occasionally exposed to blood or other body fluids, fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. In compliance with applicable law, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the position. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Lvn-Lpn Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lvn-lpn-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170043796.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=6,,,2cffba037040ab8200e847db3b65763f
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:24:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"SALDIVAR PRIMARYHOME CAREBranch Office SupervisorField Supervisor (CNA)Data ClerkApply in person or email:9862 Lorene, Ste. 101210.384.0909 Tele - 210.384.0910 Faxvpalmer@scstx.us EOEClick here to see Newspaper ad",BRANCH OFFICE SUPERVISOR,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/branch-office-supervisor-field-supervisor-data-clerk-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169596023.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f12b6bff774d796bc57d5a8bdf7bff30
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"This subspecialty position is responsible for performing standard and complex congenital echocardiograms, stress echocardiograms, and assists physicians with transesophageal echocardiograms (TEE's). The patient population ranges from newborn to young adults. The echo sonographers must be skilled in working with pediatric patients with a wide variety of complex medical and psychosocial conditions. Must have patience and compassion to work with patients who may be ill or frightened. Must be technology-minded, detail-oriented and able to follow precise directions. Depending on department need may be asked to perform 12 and 15 lead ECG's, holter monitor hookup, cardiac event monitor hookup, and cardiac exercise treadmill testing. * High school graduate or equivalent is required * 0-5 years of recent experience in performing pediatric cardiac echo's is required. * BLS is required. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Pedi Cardio Echo Tech-Non-Invasive Cardiology Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78207",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pedi-cardio-echo-tech-non-invasive-cardiology-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169614301.aspx?mescoid=2900517001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,0fd7266310d71c33e3f9d08c2408148d
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experienced Standing Seam Metal Roofing crews wanted for the San Antonio area. Minimum 5 years experience. Lots of work, excellent pay!Call 210-822-6868",Experienced Standing Seam Metal Roofing crews wanted for the San Antonio area. Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",All,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-standing-seam-metal-roofing-crews-wanted-for-the-san-antonio-area-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170011393.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,,9061f2d5898c9b03d02ce695b376481a
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeSan Antonio, TX Job #:CTMCsaaTX063681A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.It's more than a job: it's a passion.Brookdale Home Health Servicesare looking for a Physical Therapist, Occupational Therapist, Speech Language Pathologist, LVN or RN to take on a Care Transitions Manager role for our San Antonio, TX Branch. A sound knowledge of Medicare Home Health as it relates to our communities and a High level of Customer Service or Clinical Sales experience is required for this position. Your responsibilities:* Coordinate business development and education of patients, insurance companies, physicians, hospitals, nurses, community resources, other health care specialists and the local community* Facilitate a consistent service delivery of the Brookdale Healthcare Services continuum including highest quality care for the patient and family* Participate in resident need identification processes including, but not limited to Collaborative Care, and is accountable for completing the referral process including communicating to the patient, the family, the staff and other professionals as appropriate* Participate in consistent meetings with Home Health Administrator and Sales Manager to review customer experience, quality of care delivery, program growth, and leadership skill development* Serve as an educational resource to the community regarding healthcare servicesRequired skills and qualifications:* Bachelor's Degree preferred* Minimum two years experience in healthcare required; with experience in socialservices coordinator for patients and customer service* Must be willing and able to communicate with patients of various levels of functioning andvarious types of personalities* Willingness to communicate perceived physical and emotional needs of patients toother skilled staff to assist with addressing their care needsIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Care Transition Manager Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78232",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/care-transition-manager-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169831275.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,a9d2119b70f5fc89430376e7a3cbd6e3
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position, working under the guidance and supervision of the Director, Laboratory Services CSR-CC, is responsible for supervising the day to day operations of the City Centre Laboratory.KEY JOB DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES: * A. Communicates and coordinates the Clinical Laboratory Service with Patient Care Services and other hospital or corporate departments as needed; conducts in-services to Laboratory policies and procedures; alerts pathologists to clinical issues. (E) * B. Oversees the day to day functions of the Clinical Laboratory Service at the downtown campus. (E) * C. Coordinates scheduling of support personnel to ensure proper staffing; evaluates workload, number, time and type of personnel needed; schedules days off, holidays and vacations to ensure adequate coverage at all times. (E) * D. Keeps accurate attendance and competency assessment records on all associates; maintains time and attendance records for the department. (E) * E. Complies with and assists in maintaining the standards of the appropriate accrediting or regulatory agencies such as JCAHO, CLIA, CAP, AABB, etc; assists the Director in ensuring that the laboratory is meeting all expectations for accreditation and works closely with the pathologists and section and shift supervisors to achieve this goal. (E) * F. Assists the Director in maintaining the Laboratory budget to include monthly analysis and variance reporting on expense detail. (E) * G. Supervises the ordering of supplies with input from section supervisors to be certain that equipment and supplies are maintained without avoidable delay in service and performance. (E) * H. Assists Director in preparing and maintaining current Laboratory policies, procedures. (E) * I. Coordinates and presents in-service education and training (Personal Development) from the downtown laboratory personnel. (E) * J. Recommends associates for hire, fire, transfer, promotion, interview, etc. The Supervisor -- Lab consults with the Director and Human Resources as needed regarding personnel action and has the authority to take corrective action when necessary after consultation with the Director. (E) * K. Assists the Director in evaluating support personnel; recommending merit salary increases, removal from retaining on, or placing on probation. (E) * L. Assists Director of Laboratory Services in maintaining orientation checklist on new associates. Coordinates or provides general laboratory orientation for new associates. (E) * M. Maintains and enforces appropriate safety policies and procedures as requires by good laboratory practice and to maintain compliance with all regulatory agencies (OSHA). (E) * N. Assists the Director in designing, implementing, collecting and analyzing data, and reporting all phases of a comprehensive performance improvement program that involves laboratory personnel in Performance Improvement activities. (E) * O. Represents the laboratory in all hospital meetings and task forces as required. (M) * P. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the population-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department. (E) * Q. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment, and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age specific and other developmental needs of each patient served. (E) * R. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of Santa Rosa Health Care. (E) * S. Performs other duties as assigned. (M) QUALIFICATIONS: A. EDUCATION: * Requires a bachelor's degree in Medical Technology, Clinical Laboratory Science or physical science. * Post graduate degree in Clinical Laboratory Science or in management is preferable B. EXPERIENCE: * Requires at least five (5) years experience as a Medical Technologist. * Two (2) years of supervisory experience, or comparable professional experience in a laboratory management setting C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: * Requires proof of registration as a Medical Technologist by American Society of Clinical Pathologists (ASCP) or as a Clinical Laboratory Scientist by the National Certifying Agency (NCA)Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Laboratory Supervisor Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78229",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/laboratory-supervisor-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169965600.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,8a4c41f6e47306f7983a052c4f39cc6c
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description SUMMARY: Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Requirements QUALIFICATIONS: 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. 2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. 4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-pre-testing-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169850312.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,fba2d146340df540c59988671b2f4f95
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"ManpowerGroup Solutions is currently recruiting for a client in Dallas or San Antonio, TX. We are looking for a Senior Recruiter.ResponsibilitiesActively recruit high volume mid to senior level professional positionsEvaluate, interview and present qualified candidates to hiring manager for reviewUnderstand sense of urgency and have the ability to hire within classesQualifications2+ years of high volume recruiting experienceAbility to work within a fast-paced, deadline driven environmentAbility to work both independently and on a teamStrong oral and written communication skillsStrong analytical, investigative problem-solving and decision making skillsPC literate (Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint) and other applicable toolsetsTaleo experience strongly preferredIf you are interested in this position, please directly apply.",High Volume Recruiter Job in Hollywood Park,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Hollywood Park, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/high-volume-recruiter-job-hollywood-park-tx-us-170007852.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=18,,Human Resources,fc4d7630025dbc06d3c8075a4914a247
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description SUMMARY: Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Requirements QUALIFICATIONS: 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. 2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. 4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-operating-room-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169850315.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,a236edec6f2c3b109e61550ed31614ae
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Responsibilities    Nursing Process    1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families.  Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members.     a.       Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents.     b.      Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately.     c.      Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain.2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices.  Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures.  Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals.     a.      Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems.     b.      Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs.     c.      Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure.       d.      Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization.     e.      Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements.     f.       Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements.3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments.  Performs timely re-assessment and documentation:    a.      Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed.     b.      Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge.    c.      Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.Patient Throughput/ Patient Flow Process    1. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow.    a.      Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change.    b.      Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed.    c.      Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs.    d.      Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration.    e.       Expedites admission/discharges/transfers.    f.       Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care.    Unit Operations    1. Demonstrates good stewardship in proper use and maintenance of equipment and supplies.    a.       Coordinates the selection of supplies and equipment in a cost effective manner.    b.       Charges for supplies/procedures appropriately.    c.       Ensures availability and organization of supplies and equipment for patient care.    d.       Performs and documents emergency equipment checks as assigned.    e.       Removes and returns discontinued supplies and equipment.    f.        Removes broken equipment from area immediately and initiates a work order.    g.       Ensures and documents that all alarms (patient and equipment) are functional.    Safe Practice/ Quality Care/ Regulations    1. Incorporates patient safety practices/guidelines to promote a safe environment resulting in positive patient outcomes.    a.      Demonstrates accountability for nursing research and quality improvement Activities.    b.      Demonstrates knowledge and skill in administering medications.2. Completes medication reconciliation upon admission, transfer, and discharge.3. Reviews physician's orders for clarity and accuracy, legibility & appropriate authenticity (name, title, date, time, etc.).4. Follows the restrictions on abbreviations and does not use abbreviations on the ""Do Not List"". Uses only approved abbreviations.5. Transcribes telephone orders per policy.6. Administers, documents, and evaluates medications according to policy and procedure.7. Instructs patient on medication including: expected effects, side effects, and possible food or medication interactions and documents instructions.8. Recognizes, reports, and documents medication errors and adverse drug reactions.    a.      Uses patient identifiers as defined by policy.    b.      Communicate patient information effectively across the continuum of care.9. Uses an approved hand-off communication format consistently.10. Follows the universal protocol, e.g. time out.11. Uses SBAR to communicate changes in patient condition.12. Follows the Chain of Command.13. Critical values are reported in a timely manner in accordance with policy.14. Sets clinical alarms according to equipment parameters and responds rapidly to the alarms.    a.       Initiates the Rapid Response team in response to deterioration in patient condition.    b.       Demonstrates safe patient handling practices.    c.       Promotes a safe patient care environment including compliance with restraint policy and rounding.    d.       Implements processes to prevent falls, pressure ulcers, and other hospital-acquired complications.    e.       Assures compliance with core measure implementation and documentation, e.g. SCIP, CHF, AMI, CAP.    f.       Identifies, corrects and/or reports patient safety and/or environmental safety hazards at the time of discovery.    g.       Demonstrates proper infection control and isolation techniques including providing appropriate information concerning isolation precautions and patient status to patient, family, and/or significant others and/or other disciplines.    h.       Adheres to CHRISTUS policies and procedures and the standards of the Joint Commission, OSHA, DHHS, HIPAA, etc.    Leadership    1. Serves as a leader of patient care.    a.       Guides and supervises other nursing staff in the operational activities in assigned area.    b.       Promptly recognizes and attempts to reinforce appropriate behavior and attempts to correct inappropriate behavior in self and co-workers.    c.       Delegates nursing and non-nursing functions according to standards.    d.       Participates in leadership activities including community activities, e.g. charge/team leader, council participation, preceptor/coach, unit education, staff/council meetings.    e.       Assumes responsibility for currency of knowledge and skills including participating in unit-level meetings and all mandatory education activities sponsored by the facility.    f.       Identifies and corrects inconsistencies in nursing procedures/techniques.    g.       Participates in implementing performance improvement and change activities.    h.       Assists in teaching and evaluating other personnel as assigned.    i.       Contributes to the learning experience of students and new employees.    j.       Acts as a resource person.    k.       Communicates the intensity of work load and collaborates with nursing leadership to meet patient care needs and unit activity.Job Requirements Qualifications    1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.""Working Conditions and Physical Requirements""    1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area.  There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone.    Other    1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-pediatric-surgical-unit-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169662172.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,f7391ac5d39e95862496aa9db410a703
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in North East San Antonio, Texas (TX) that is seeking an Analytical Accountant for a temporary role. The client is looking for a mid to senior level accountant for this role. This role will be heavy in GL work and financial reporting.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree or higher 3 - 5 years accounting experience Acquisition experience highly preferredAdvanced user in Excel: Pivot tables V-lookups If functions Marcos (a plus, not a must)",Analytical Accountant Job in San Antonio,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Antonio, TX 78247",,http://jobview.monster.com/analytical-accountant-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170079796.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),dffceb2bbf1ec7e1fc2760207f36abae
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Patient Access representatives facilitate a welcome and easy access to the facility and are responsible for establishing an encounter for any patient who meets the guidelines for hospital service. Patient Access staff ensures that all data entry is accurate including demographic and financial information for each account. Patient Access has numerous procedural requirements including data elements, insurance verification, authorization for services, and collections for all patient portions including prior balances. Patient Access staff is responsible for the successful financial outcome of all patient services. Patient Access is responsible for ensuring the hospital maintains compliance with Federal regulations, JCAHO, and Department of Health and Hospital compliance standards. Patient Access communicates directly with patients and families, physicians, nurses, insurance companies and third party payers. This position requires professional appearance, and behavior, good communication and effective organizational skills. Patient Access representatives require dependability, flexibility, and teamwork. This advanced level position is designed to promote the demonstrated knowledge and competency of Patient Access duties in all areas, including a demonstrated ability to use good judgment in making independent decisions to resolve customer issues in all routine operationsMajor Responsibilities: A. Accurately inputs all required data elements for scheduling and registration, including patient demographic, financial information, guarantor information, and relevant notes associated with the encounter. B. Verifies insurance eligibility and obtains necessary authorizations for services rendered. C. Calculates and collects the estimated patient portion based on benefits and contract reimbursement as well as prior balances. D. Performs financial assessment for appropriate program assistance. E. Communicates the purpose of and obtains patient/legal guardian signatures on all necessary hospital documents. F. Represents the Patient Access department in a professional, courteous manner at ALL times. G. Required to assist the hospital in the event of an internal or external disaster. H. Supports the flexible needs of the department to accommodate patient volume in all areas of the hospital. This may require assignment to another area of the department, and shift change. I. Serves as a point of primary contact for patient complaints/customer issues. J. Supports the department in achieving established performance targets. K. Completes required training as needed and as mandated. L. Participates in/assists with performance improvement initiatives and demonstrates an understanding and compliance of all department policies and procedures. M. Maintains the team discipline of following all elements of established standard processes N. Works with HPWT (High Performance Work Teams) to maintain an efficient, clean, and orderly workplace using 5S principles and practices once implemented in the work unit. O. Coordinates, communicates, and assists in monitoring work flow and work tasks necessary to manage fluctuating volumes. P. Provides feedback to the team to help identify educational needs, and mediation needs by reporting IPOs (issues, problems, and opportunities). Q. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned responsibilities is a manner that meets the population-specific and developmental needs of the members served by the department. (E) R. Appropriately adapts assigned assessment, treatment, and/or service methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each member served. (E) S. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities. T. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties. U. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of Santa Rosa Health Care. (E)V. Performs other duties as assigned. (M) Education/Skills: High school diploma or equivalent required. Experience: Two years experience in Patient Access, hospital registration, medical office, billing/collection functions, or a comparable customer service related position preferred. Licenses, Registrations, Certifications: Certified Healthcare Access Associate (CHAA) through National Association of Healthcare Management (NAHAM) completed within first 6 months of employment and no later than associates first anniversary. Continued employment at PAR II level hinges on passing this certification within stated timeframe and the bi-annual maintenance of certification.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Patient Access Rep ll (Full Time) Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78207",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-access-rep-ll-full-time-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169513881.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,e06657c48af2eebeaeb4e964af38570c
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Resident Care Specialist DescriptionSummaryProvides services and care for residents and patients.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesProvides personal care and services such as: a) Assisting with activities of daily living (turning and positioning, toileting, bathing and grooming, feeding, and mobility) b) Obtains and records vital signs and weight as assigned. c) Accurately documents all care as required by company policy and in compliance with state and federal regulations.Provides non-resident services such as, but not limited to, washing wheelchairs and cleaning resident / patient areas in compliance with infection control procedures.Contributes to the resident assessment and care plan.Makes routine rounds on each assigned resident and patient in accordance with established procedures.Promptly communicates any significant changes in behavior or condition to supervisor.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Performs other duties as assigned. Resident Care Specialist RequirementsQualificationsMinimum high school diploma or equivalent, or related experience and / or training.Successful completion of State-approved Nursing Assistant Certification course.Physical Demands & EnvironmentShift work may be required. Employee is frequently required to stand, walk, see, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, talk and hear. Employee is occasionally exposed to blood or other body fluids, fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. In compliance with applicable law, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the position. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Resident Care Specialist,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/resident-care-specialist-cna-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169204490.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=3,,,56991cdecec8a0107789e14c5c39badd
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.1. Incorporates the following values into the work environment:a.       Dignity:  demonstrates respect for the worth of every person, recognition and commitment to the value of diverse individuals and perspectives, and special concern for the poor and underserved.b.       Integrity:  demonstrates honesty, justice and consistency in all relationships.c.       Excellence:  demonstrates high standards of service and performance.d.       Compassion:  demonstrates service in a spirit of empathy, love and concern.e.       Stewardship: demonstrates wise and just use of talents and resources in a collaborative manner.As part of the application process for a role at CHRISTUS Santa Rosa - Westover Hills you have been invited to complete an assessment.   We believe that you will find this to be a challenging and enjoyable experience. You are expected to complete this assessment on your own without the assistance of anyone else. This assessment should take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete and you are not required to have any special computer skills to do so.  Please click on the link below to get started.    https://christushealth.selectrakonline.com/recruitment/recruit.aspx Job Requirements As part of the application process for a role at CHRISTUS Santa Rosa - Westover Hills you have been invited to complete an assessment.   We believe that you will find this to be a challenging and enjoyable experience. You are expected to complete this assessment on your own without the assistance of anyone else. This assessment should take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete and you are not required to have any special computer skills to do so.  Please click on the link below to get started.   https://christushealth.selectrakonline.com/recruitment/recruit.aspx1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area.  There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone.1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliancewith all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-telemetry-nights-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169662171.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,b9da07aa30a019cf2d6826bbb49edddf
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:26,No,jobs.monster.com,Seeking a part time Certified Hand Therapist.  TX licensed Occupational Therapist or Physical Therapist.  Please send your resume to ksullivan@phrehab.com Thanks!,Certified Hand Therapist (OT or PT) - Part Time Job in San Antonio,"Part Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78264",,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-hand-therapist-ot-or-pt-part-time-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169531026.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,dfa717cc788bcb30c83f3c033b524746
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network. IT Systems Engineer IIThis position supports the operation, management, and defense of a nationwide fiber optic transport network and two geographically separated network support centers.  The network is expected to sustain continual growth to include additional sites and customers across the life of the program.  Job Description Perform Network Management in an engineering and operations environment as a Tier 2 NOC Engineer. Provide expertise to monitor, diagnose, and troubleshoot network problems in a mixed vendor environment. First level of escalation to Tier 1 NOC personnel. Conduct test and turn-up (TTU) activities for routing/switching platforms and optical transport platforms. Administration of network management applications such as SolarWinds for monitoring, compliancy checks, firmware upgradesDevelop and maintain circuit level diagrams, IP routing schemes, and other supporting documentation.  Minimum Qualifications Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in an Information Technology field and at least six years of experience in a network management environmentSecurity+ or equivalent IAT/IAM/IASAE Level 2 of DoD 8570.1 is required.JNCIA is required; CCNA in addition to JNCIA is preferred.Proficient knowledge of common network architectures for routing, switching, and security technologies is required.Some knowledge and experience with optical transport technology is preferred.Expertise in the uses of network management protocols, tools and products, including but not limited to SolarWinds, Cisco Identity Services Engine, Cisco Access Control Server, EIQ SecureVue, Neuralstar, SNMP managers is required. Up to 15% travel can be expected due to possible deployments to lab facilities and other NOC locations. This position requires a Top Secret/SCI clearance  Alternate Location: US-Texas-San Antonio; US-Virgina-HerndonRequisition #: 53721 Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",IT SYSTEMS ENGINEER II - FEDERAL Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78201",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-systems-engineer-ii-federal-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169399632.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=7,,,ce1dd8c6e9c9c64fe7133bbb54914d85
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking an experienced Python Developer II in San Antonio, Texas (TX).REQUIREMENTS: 3+ years of SQL experience (Postgres preferred) 2+ years of Python application development experience Knowledge of Agile Methodologies preferred Knowledge of source code management systems such as Git Able to write clean, maintainable, documented code using best engineering practices in the industry (design patterns, TDD, peer review, CI, automated testing, etc) Understanding of web frameworks and web server technologiesPreferred Skills: Java or Ruby experience Experience in building or maintaining RESTFUL APIs",Python Developer II Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Antonio, TX 78218",,http://jobview.monster.com/python-developer-ii-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170092405.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8b1bc490b861b442c59b9b13b3d352d0
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hiring! Immediate openings for Customer Support Specialists for a world renowned technology company in the San Antonio, TX area. These are inbound technical support positions. Hours of operation for the center are 6am-11pm.Pay rate is $12.50. We want your excellent customer service skills for a company that built its reputation on customer service! You'll have the opportunity to support the hottest technology in the marketplace! If you have a passion for customer service along with trouble shooting experience you are encouraged to apply!Volt Offers: Competitive Wages, Benefits and Flexible Schedules. We offer a relaxed and fun environment while learning about the latest products in technology. This is your opportunity to get your foot in the door, but don't stop there....We offer opportunities for advancement; Volt promotes from within!! Bring your most updated resume to 3300 Sidney Brooks Rd. Bldg. 532, San Antonio, TX 78235.Unable to come in person? Call 210-338-7604. Dress for interview and bring a friend! Walk-ins are always welcome. Why? Because you deserve a job you love!!Volt has 60 years of experience and is a leader in the staffing industryVolt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Applicants must be at least 18 years of age; High School Diploma/GED; Type at least 25 wpm; pass customer assessments; Candidates must be able to work a full-time position; Employment offer is contingent upon successful completion of pre-screening eligibility requirements",Customer Service Representatives (SE San Antonio) Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representatives-se-san-antonio-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170051184.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,General/Other: Customer Support/Client Care,c3c026fa0fe0669318bb8a9be766d795
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Company DescriptionTAVHealth, a fast-growing and innovative healthcare services and software company is currently seeking a smart, dynamic, and motivated Software Engineer in our San Antonio office. At TAVHealth, we're committed to improving the lives of patients by establishing meaningful connections to valuable community resources and creating real conversations between providers, caregivers, families and friends. Our clients include major hospitals and medical systems with multiple facilities in several states throughout the U.S.Job DescriptionWe’re looking for a talented and dependable engineer with Java development skills and experience to help create innovative new tools and applications. We're building a web-based platform using Groovy, Grails, JavaScript, and various Amazon services. You will be responsible for defining requirements, creating mockups, documenting implementation details, testing, and getting user feedback as part of our iterative development cycle. Our focus is on a great user experience, elimination of repetitive data entry, and encouraging new ways to visualize healthcare information.You’ll be joining a small team of skilled engineers in the Austin office and will have the opportunity to contribute to many different parts of the system, including creating brand new product lines as we expand our footprint. We are committed to our customers and employees, and we're looking for special individuals to come join our team.RequirementsLocation:San Antonio, Texas Primary Duties and Responsibilities Build highly functional and reliable web-based user interfaces with a database backend Work independently or as part of a small team to define requirements and identify solutions Produce storyboards of new features and gather feedback Create solutions that solve real problems for our customers, based on data analysis, user interviews, and feedback loops Effectively apply the concepts of iterative design and development Share your skills and expertise with the rest of the Engineering team Experience and Educational Requirements 2+ years of experience developing Java web applications Proven experience with HTML and CSS Experience with Groovy and Grails is a major bonus Experience with JavaScript (jQuery) and related front-end frameworks preferred Experience with cloud-based solutions, in particular Amazon Web Services Excellent verbal and written communication skills Experience with git and agile development concepts Environment Working on a regular basis in the San Antonio office Occasional travel to Austin and other cities nationwide Frequent remote collaboration with colleagues in other cities Benefits Excellent medical benefits and vacation policy Profit sharing for all employees Report",Monster,,"Company DescriptionTAVHealth, a fast-growing and innovative healthcare services and software company is currently seeking a smart, dynamic, and motivated Software Engineer in our San Antonio office. At TAVHealth, we're committed to improving the lives of patients by establishing meaningful connections to valuable community resources and creating real conversations between providers, caregivers, families and friends. Our clients include major hospitals and medical systems with multiple facilities in several states throughout the U.S.Job DescriptionWe’re looking for a talented and dependable engineer with Java development skills and experience to help create innovative new tools and applications. We're building a web-based platform using Groovy, Grails, JavaScript, and various Amazon services. You will be responsible for defining requirements, creating mockups, documenting implementation details, testing, and getting user feedback as part of our iterative development cycle. Our focus is on a great user experience, elimination of repetitive data entry, and encouraging new ways to visualize healthcare information.You’ll be joining a small team of skilled engineers in the Austin office and will have the opportunity to contribute to many different parts of the system, including creating brand new product lines as we expand our footprint. We are committed to our customers and employees, and we're looking for special individuals to come join our team.RequirementsLocation:San Antonio, Texas Primary Duties and Responsibilities Build highly functional and reliable web-based user interfaces with a database backend Work independently or as part of a small team to define requirements and identify solutions Produce storyboards of new features and gather feedback Create solutions that solve real problems for our customers, based on data analysis, user interviews, and feedback loops Effectively apply the concepts of iterative design and development Share your skills and expertise with the rest of the Engineering team Experience and Educational Requirements 2+ years of experience developing Java web applications Proven experience with HTML and CSS Experience with Groovy and Grails is a major bonus Experience with JavaScript (jQuery) and related front-end frameworks preferred Experience with cloud-based solutions, in particular Amazon Web Services Excellent verbal and written communication skills Experience with git and agile development concepts Environment Working on a regular basis in the San Antonio office Occasional travel to Austin and other cities nationwide Frequent remote collaboration with colleagues in other cities Benefits Excellent medical benefits and vacation policy Profit sharing for all employees",,http://jobview.monster.com/java-groovy-developer-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169635875.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=16,,,03f05d334a3f46f8b594f632133af0e0
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for performing billing, collections and reimbursement services of claims and duties to hospitals supported by the RCBS. In doing so, ensures that all claims billed and collected meets all government mandated procedures for Integrity and Compliance. Performs billing, collections and reimbursement services in a prompt and efficient manner. Provides thorough, courteous and professional assistance to patients, physician offices, insurance companies and other clients on an as needed basis while maintaining strictest confidence. Documents, forwards, resolves incoming mail and correspondence. Demonstrates a level of accountability to ensure data and codes are not changed on claims prior to submission if related to diagnosis, charge and/or other clinical type data that RCBS would not have knowledge of. Ensures all Compliance errors are reported to the Director and maintain records and files of documentation supporting bill changes that are directed by Director and/or Integrity Officer. Responsible to ensure successful implementation of Governmental Regulatory Billing changes, including but not limited to Medicare OPPS effective August 1, 2000. A. Experience: * Must have minimum of 2 years experience in any of the following: Medicare, Medicaid and/or Commercial Insurance billing, collections, payment and reimbursement verification and/or refunds. Understanding of alternative Business Office financial resources and the ability to provide information and/or recommendations related to these sources of recovery are preferred. General hospital A/R accounts knowledge is required. * College education, previous Insurance Company claims experience and/or health care billing trade school education may be considered in lieu of formal hospital experience. B. Education and Training: * HS Diploma or equivalency required * Post HS education preferred C. Skills: * Must have good verbal and written communication skills in order to present and explain information to internal and external customers. * Ability to write letters. * Must have practical experience with Word, Excel, Adobe applications. * Must have ability to make independent decisions that are generally guided by established procedures. * Must have a desire to learn ethical and compliant business practices. * Must be able to handle sensitive, stressful and confidential situations and account information. * Must have excellent keyboarding and 10-key skill-set. * Must have knowledge to perform functions requiring the use of the internet. * Willingness and ability to learn new tasks. D. Licenses, Registrations, or Certifications: * None required Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Hospital Collector Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78229",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hospital-collector-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169925474.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,ae3d20bc5c3b6cb5284a01a6af1b0aeb
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time Brookdale Patriot Heights, 5000 Fawn Meadow, San Antonio TX 78240Job #: OTSNFsaaTX062346A career with Brookdale has never been so rewarding! Brookdale's Skilled Nursing Home Care and Rehabilitation communities offer an atmosphere that that feels more like a family than just a job. With locations all throughout the country, we get the opportunity to enrich thousands of lives every day. We are a trusted partner because we truly listen to the needs and wishes of our residents and their families, then customize a solution that puts that life within reach. We help residents recover with dignity while receiving compassionate care, personal attention and professional services. As with all other Brookdale solutions, those who serve our residents in skilled nursing and rehabilitation environments do so because it is their calling to serve others with passion, courage and true sense of partnership.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for an Occupational Therapist to provide therapy services for Brookdale's Patriot Heights Skilled Nursing Facility as well as be flexible to travel to our other two San Antonio Skilled Nursing Facilities when necessary. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients.Your responsibilities:* Provide and direct occupational therapy services to patients, including assessment, treatment, program planning and implementation* Function under physicians' orders and adhere to applicable principles and practices of physical therapy, Brookdale policies/procedures, and state regulations* Coordinate treatment plan with patient, family and other team members* Document results of patient's assessment, treatment, follow-up and termination of services* Review the quality and appropriateness of the total services delivered and individual occupational therapy programs using predetermined criteriaRequired skills and qualifications:* Bachelor's degree in occupational therapy from an accredited program* Successful completion of the National Certification Examination for Registered Occupational Therapists* License to practice occupational therapy within the state* Two years occupational therapy experience preferredIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Occupational Therapist Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78240",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/occupational-therapist-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169249502.aspx?mescoid=2900486001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,44b14875ab42c082dc54ecfe97ed6f86
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time (6a-2p or 2p-10p shift)Brookdale Hamilton Wolfe 5331 Hamilton Wolfe Road San Antonio, TX 78229 Job #: 061909aBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Ready to make a difference? As a resident care provider you'll make a real difference by building relationships with residents at our senior living community. You won't just be serving meals or helping residents bath, get dressed and look their best.  You'll deliver compassion, a sense of respect, and emotional support. Extra effort gets rewarded in our community and the opportunity for advancement in one of the fastest growing industries is within reach. We'll help you achieve a balance between work and family.Answer your calling for a more fulfilling career.Preferred Skills and Qualifications: *Positive attitude and contagious energy*High school diploma or GED*Must pass a drug screen and background checkIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Resident Care Provider Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78229",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/resident-care-provider-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169988295.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,1fadae0d9c8de30ceaa73eb38141401d
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Serves in a consultant role to improve care and coordinate services for identified palliative patients and their families. Works collaboratively with the palliative care team, physicians, bedside nurses, and other personnel to address quality of life issues for individuals with advanced illnesses and at end-of-life.    Job Requirements EDUCATION: Bachelors Degree in Nursing; Masters in Nursing preferred   EXPERIENCE: Hospice and Palliative Care Certification is desirable. Minimum of 3 years nursing experience; clinical nursing care in medical-surgical care, intensive care, oncology and/or hospice preferred.   LICENSES,CERTIFICATIONS OR REGISTRATIONS: Current unrestricted RN license to practice in state of Texas    ",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-palliative-care-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169850309.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,e90533ff055025c0e2d3ca3108d90ee1
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"FULL TIME SALES - ENTRY LEVELJob DescriptionThe Entry Level Sales position with Team 210 consists of conducting presentations for potential customers, managing those customers and collaborating with the team regarding stronger approaches, system improvements, and best practices. Within 3 months with the company, our associates have learned how to lead meetings within the company, execute client presentations with ease and begin the more advanced stages of the leadership training program.Responsibilities include:Multiple daily Sales Presentations in accordance with retailer codes of conductParticipate in training modules and drillsDevelop sales protocols and test new strategies in the fieldExcellent customer serviceReadiness to train and lead training modules (after entry level training is completed within a month)WE TRAIN!Job Requirements for an Ideal Candidate:Ability to learn and have a great student mentalityCompetitive and team orientedDriven to achieve success in an industry that is already growing1-2 years of customer service experienceEnjoys a fun environmentDisplays great attitudeMaintains great work ethicHighly AccountableDemonstrates a high level of integrityEnjoys peopleBenefits of the position with team 210:Professional Leadership DevelopmentDevelopment of Communication SkillsManagement training (critical conversations, situational leadership)Travel Opportunities in an outside of TexasConsistent challenges and competitionsPerformance based environmentTeam based Dynamic Rewards for performanceClear Guidelines for Growth within the companySupplemental health insuranceConsistent base Pay with Commission opportunities If you are looking for growth and opportunity in an already thriving industry, APPLY NOW!",Entry Level Sales Representative Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78218",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-sales-representative-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169788381.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e9f8714f7ce71d6d6814be68b6bfc09c
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilities:Operations:Maximizes return on investment by managing the daily operations of the stores. Understands the profit and loss of stores in district and manages the operational costs to budget via the controls of company assets.Team Building:Experience in recruiting with process/vision to attract successful employees who fit culturally into the stores and market place.Articulate and effectively deliver the companies goals, vision and philosophy. Build continuous training programs that educate and motivate both managers and style consultants.Sales:Sales are the key to a successful organization and sales techniques including the selling process and guest loyalty and satisfaction are a must. Ability to mentor in these areas is required.Business:Analyze inventory turns and margins. Understand inventory trends in the marketplace. Provide feedback/ input to merchandising department regarding inventory and assortment. Provide input regarding staffing performance and success to store managers. Provide regional trends and marketplace reports to operations department. Provide input regarding marketing plans and experience to the marketing department.Communication:Communication between Field and Home Office with regards to operations, merchandising, personnel, sales, advertising, and market place.Must have experience in managing multiple stores in a retail apparel environment!",District Manager-Texas Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/district-manager-texas-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170030404.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=18,"80,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e9a75805c3d139c97c65b28b99723708
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:37,No,jobs.monster.com,May be specialized to perform some clinical treatments including non-invasive sterile procedures. May do some basic unit assistant duties. Supervised by professional nurse/Manager.Education: H.S. Diploma or GED required. CPR/BLS Certification required. Certification for Nurse Assistant required.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled,OR Attendant Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78209",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/or-attendant-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169230138.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,08874e125cef6f222346ccd4dd653a4d
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job TRAINING, REHABILITATION, &DEVELOPMENT INSTITUTE (TRDI)(IMMEDIATE) EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIESin San Antonio, TX ! Locations/Open Positions (#)@ Hourly rate Randolph AFB/Cooks (22) @ $13.30/hourRandolph AFB/Cashiers (5) @ $11.75/hour; RandolphAFB/Dining Room Attendants (12) @ $11.50/hour CampBullis SATX /Grounds Maintenance Workers (4)@ $11.41/hour TRDI Job Fair: 7/20/2016 (9:30 AM to4 PM) at Hilton Inn Live Oak, 8101 Pat Booker Road LiveOak, Texas 78233 Additional positions at: http://www.trdi.org/employment.asp Additional Inquiries: Jose Garcia 210-572-0408Click here to see Newspaper ad Report",Monster,,"TRAINING, REHABILITATION, &DEVELOPMENT INSTITUTE (TRDI)(IMMEDIATE) EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIESin San Antonio, TX ! Locations/Open Positions (#)@ Hourly rate Randolph AFB/Cooks (22) @ $13.30/hourRandolph AFB/Cashiers (5) @ $11.75/hour; RandolphAFB/Dining Room Attendants (12) @ $11.50/hour CampBullis SATX /Grounds Maintenance Workers (4)@ $11.41/hour TRDI Job Fair: 7/20/2016 (9:30 AM to4 PM) at Hilton Inn Live Oak, 8101 Pat Booker Road LiveOak, Texas 78233 Additional positions at: http://www.trdi.org/employment.asp Additional Inquiries: Jose Garcia 210-572-0408Click here to see Newspaper ad",,http://jobview.monster.com/cashiers-dining-room-attendants-cooks-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169867137.aspx?mescoid=3500614001001&jobPosition=4,,,cc7b83f911a84d446aaa37713179e81b
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress. Job Requirements QUALIFICATIONS: 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. 2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. 4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.",RN,"Part Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-pt-labor-delivery-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170014420.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,4e08c23aa24071aa7e1871ebcbbf214e
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under the General Supervision of the Director, Cardiac Cath Lab, and the Indirect supervision of the Director, Intensive Care Unit,  the Registered Nurse is responsible for the provision of safe and effective care of the patient having invasive or non-invasive procedures in the Cath Lab to include the immediate pre-procedure period, during the procdure, and immediately following the procedure. Experience, Education & Skills REQUIRED:Graduate of an accredited school of nursing preferred. Current licensure in Texas as Registered Nurse. Previous clinical nursing experience in cardiac catherterization laboratory environment desired. Current CPR certification. ACLS obtained with in 90 Days of employment. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",RN - Cath Lab - Flex Pool Job in San Antonio,Per Diem Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78201",,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-cath-lab-flex-pool-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169966785.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fb48a705ebbd76d0b1790ea7f92e5588
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under the general supervision of the Clinical Director and direct supervision of the Clinical Coordinator, the Registered Nurse is responsible for professional nursing care and related assistance to patients of any age group admitted.  The Registered Nurse provides direction to Licensed Vocational Nurses and non-licensed nursing personnel in providing direct patient care.  The Registered Nurse supports the medical care of patients under the direction of the Medical Staff pursuant to the mission and objectives of the Hospital. Experience, Education & Skills REQUIRED: Graduate of an accredited school of nursing preferred. Current licensure in Texas as a Registered Nurse. Previous clinical nursing experience in a Dialysis and/or Medical/Surgical/Telemetry environment desired. Current CPR.  Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",RN - Dialysis - Flex Pool Job in San Antonio,Per Diem Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78201",,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-dialysis-flex-pool-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169966782.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fb9eafcde4a9e4b51323f9d7275fc602
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kforce is one of the premier leaders in the staffing industry, where Great People = Great ResultsSM. For over 50 years we’ve thrived on building relationships and making a positive impact in the lives of those we touch. We believe in acting with integrity, doing the right thing and giving back to our communities. A professional staffing services firm, Kforce stands for KnowledgeForce®, describing our highly skilled professionals. Our flexible and direct hire staffing specialists engage over 23,000 highly skilled Technology and Finance & Accounting professionals annually, connecting them with more than 4,000 customers. Our national network of 60 offices, two national recruiting centers, and 2,000+ associates support our ability to meet the needs of customers of all sizes, including 70% of the Fortune 100. Join the Kforce family and we will support you with expert training, innovative tools, an amazing culture, and a team of Great People that will cheer you on your road to success! Summary: The Talent Associate plays a critical role in fueling Kforce’s growth by connecting Great People together. The Talent Associate executes sourcing and recruiting strategies to identify and attract qualified and diverse candidates, and then matches them to opportunities with our clients. This position demands an exceptional balance of drive and commitment, coupled with exemplary interpersonal skills, topped off with a creative mindset. The Talent Associate possesses the uncanny ability to successfully manage multiple priorities in a high-paced and fast-changing work environment. As an emerging business partner, the Talent Associate will interact with internal and external contacts to facilitate the placement process while under the guidance of leadership. Responsibilities: Source candidates through networking, employee referrals, job boards, social media presence ad searches, career fairs, internet research and direct contact. Collaborate with Kforce colleagues to fully understand the client’s hiring objectives and requirements. Submit candidates, providing information needed to facilitate hiring decisions, including salary recommendations. Coordinate interview and follow up activities. As the candidate advocate, guide candidates thorough the recruiting process, including evaluation of skills and expertise, the interview process and salary negotiation. Facilitate the offer process, including salary negotiations, benefits and other terms and conditions of employment. Ensure pre-employment steps, including reference checks and background and drug tests are completed in a timely fashion. Manage consultants while on assignment; facilitate redeployment of consultants as assignments approach completion. Conduct all interactions with the utmost diplomacy and tact. Maintain confidentiality and treat others with conscientious respect. Connect with candidates, colleagues and clients on a regular basis to develop and maintain relationships, expand industry knowledge, and generate referrals and leads. Stay abreast of current recruiting trends and recommend creative strategies to meet hiring goals.Requirements: BA/BS degree preferred. 2-5 years professional experience in a staffing, corporate, recruiting or professional sales environment Ability to develop customer relationship management, consultative and negotiation skills. Proven organizational skills with attention to detail and the ability to self-manage, prioritize initiatives and work well in a team environment with competing demands and tight deadlines. Excellent verbal and written communication skills with an emphasis on tact and diplomacy. Strong internet research skills. Proficiency in MS office, including Word and Excel. Ability to grasp cutting edge technologies. CERTIFICATES AND/OR LICENSES: None required. TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS: Travel as required, up to 5%. Kforce is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans",Recruiter,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78216",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-finance-accounting-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169953600.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e412dfdfb2aebd697b62b19c914c60b0
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Must have RN license and 3 yrs. clinical practice Assess, plan, implement, coordinate, monitor, and evaluate case management activities across the continuum of care, within the scope of the case manager's licenseCoordination and service delivery, Physical and psychological factors, Benefit systems and cost benefit, Case management concepts and Community resources.Understand and maintain confidentiality of legal and ethical issues at all times.Check eligibility as per procedure/ client specificationsAssess initial clinical information and develop a treatment plan and goals that meet the individual patient's client's present needsHave good communication skills and customer service skills.The Hours 8-5, training hours 8-5. Location is hospital base.Clinical practice: Minimum 3 years of experienceRequired license or certification: RNCase Management Certification Preferred",Case Manager Job in San Antonio,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Must have RN license and 3 yrs. clinical practice Assess, plan, implement, coordinate, monitor, and evaluate case management activities across the continuum of care, within the scope of the case manager's licenseCoordination and service delivery, Physical and psychological factors, Benefit systems and cost benefit, Case management concepts and Community resources.Understand and maintain confidentiality of legal and ethical issues at all times.Check eligibility as per procedure/ client specificationsAssess initial clinical information and develop a treatment plan and goals that meet the individual patient's client's present needsHave good communication skills and customer service skills.The Hours 8-5, training hours 8-5. Location is hospital base.Clinical practice: Minimum 3 years of experienceRequired license or certification: RNCase Management Certification Preferred",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/case-manager-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169749428.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=7,33.33 - 45.30 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),e51b9fb3759a392b61482465d999be74
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T has a career opportunity for a Cyber Intelligence Analyst at Joint Base San Antonio-Lackland, Texas supporting cyber related activities. The intelligence analyst will assist and advise the Senior Intelligence Officer (SIO) by providing intelligence support to offensive and defensive cyberspace operations (OCO/DCO) conducted by the 688 CW. Assist the 318 OSS in supporting sister squadrons (90 COS and 346 TS) with their missions by providing tailored intelligence products derived from cyberspace intelligence units within the intelligence community (IC). This will include but not be limited to potential target vulnerability analysis, threat identification, malware intelligence reporting and vulnerability information, to include defensive countermeasures for AF/Joint cyberspace offensive platforms. • Support AF, 24 AF, COCOMS and their subordinate operational units with the development of enabling concepts, operating concepts, cyber requirements, papers, briefings designed to communicate operational community needs, gaps and intent of its stakeholder's requirements for non-material CWO capabilities. • Assist squadron Information Operations mission by providing support to AF, 24 AF, COCOMS and their subordinate operational units with the development of enabling concepts, operating concepts, Joint Reconnaissance Center (JRC) requirements, papers, briefings designed to communicate operational community needs, gaps and intent of its stakeholders requirements for non-material Initial Response Capabilities (IRC). • Support of the creation and update of applicable unit training processes to include initial/mission qualification training (IQT/MQT), standardization and evaluation (Stan/Eval) as well as continuation training (CT) for unit supported Mission Design series (MDS) weapons platforms. • Coordinate CNO related information needs with NAF and field units in accordance with Wing, NAF, USAF and DoD directives. • Assist in authoring, editing or reviewing reports, briefings to include stand-up preparation and country studies, long term intelligence and special topics analysis. • Satisfy Requests for Information (FRI) submissions in support of 688 CW subordinate units. • Support Wing Exercises Required Clearance: • TS//SCI (must have held TS//SCI position within the previous two years, not just SCI eligible). • Willing to take a counter espionage polygraph if required.Basic Qualifications: • B.A., or B.S., degree with 6+ years of experience with all-source intelligence analysis and production or 10+ years overall experience. • 2+ years of experience with support to Cyberspace security operations, information assurance, or information operations. • Knowledge of and research of classified intelligence community reporting databases and interfaces across NSANet, JWICS, SIPRNet, and NIPRNet. • Knowledge of and research of DoD network defense and incident reporting databases and interfaces. • Knowledge of open-source research capabilities regarding cyberspace threat information • Knowledge of and/or prior experience or basic knowledge of the CYBERCOM and/or 24 AF architecture. • Ability to collaborate with counterparts in other organizations and at senior levels.",Cyber Intelligence Analyst (Government) Job in San Antonio,,"San Antonio, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/cyber-intelligence-analyst-government-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169992447.aspx?mescoid=3300585001001&jobPosition=16,,,0e9b63414d944d0bc14e6a2bb78597da
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:33:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides administrative support for Directors to include: scheduling, tracking, and reporting information. Provides clerical support to include typing and answering calls. Receives and responds to routine correspondence. Compiles basic information for inclusion in reports.Experience: 1-2 years. Education: High School Diploma.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Administrative Assistant- Clinical Pastoral Education Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78207",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-clinical-pastoral-education-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169613475.aspx?mescoid=2100319001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,48f272123b804936af338b79950806e5
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:36:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse M/S Full Time Days- Kindred hospital San Antonio ( Job Number: 267815 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN CareerBuilder Key Words: RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing Qualifications Registered Nurse / RN Requirements:   Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-San Antonio-Kindred Hospital - San Antonio Organization : 4635 - Kindred Hospital - San Antonio Shift : Day",Registered Nurse M/S Full Time Days- Kindred hospital San Antonio Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse M/S Full Time Days- Kindred hospital San Antonio ( Job Number: 267815 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN CareerBuilder Key Words: RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing Qualifications Registered Nurse / RN Requirements:   Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-San Antonio-Kindred Hospital - San Antonio Organization : 4635 - Kindred Hospital - San Antonio Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-m-s-full-time-days-kindred-hospital-san-antonio-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170090846.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,006799a7cbb3d599511a16b80bc86c55
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:14:46:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Grimco, Inc. was founded in 1875 in St. Louis, Missouri. Today we have 45 locations across the United States, 5 across Canada, and a sales division that is focused solely on growth in the Caribbean and Latin American markets. Our #1 goal is growth in all wholesale markets for manufacturing/distribution of digital print products, signs, and sign-making supplies.Due to our excellent customer service we have been voted Vendor of the Year by our customers in the FASTSIGNS, Signs by Tomorrow, and Signs Now nationwide franchise networks! We are also celebrating our inclusion in the Top 500 Entry Level Employers listing released annually by CollegeGrad.com.What makes Grimco Special?We’re excited for our 141st year in business! We are a growing company that continues to evolve in our industry.We foster employee development that is focused on tailoring employees career paths based on their talents, strengths and interests.We have fantastic teams throughout North America and are proud of our reputation of being the most informed and educated supplier in the industry.Our executives and managers are extremely accessible and work on the front lines of our business!What Separates the Good from the Great at Grimco:Those who are successful at Grimco demonstrate determination, competitive drive, and an eagerness to learn all facets of our company. They must have a strong desire to provide exceptional customer service and sell. They must also possess the drive to make an immediate impact on a growing company. Grimco sells and supports Solvent, Flatbed, Aqueous, Eco-friendly, and Grand Format Printers. Our quality vendors include HP, Epson, Graphtec, and more! Grimco’s Tech Support Team conducts post-sale equipment installation, customer training, and technical support for large format digital printers, plotters, laminators and other pieces of equipment. More than 80% of our Tech Calls are resolved over the phone, prior to a Technician dispatch. Summary of this Position: This employee will participate as a member of our dedicated Tech Support Team both on the phone and on-site at our customers' design and production locations. This employee will be responsible for running and facilitating equipment demos in a facility located in Long Beach, California. RESPONSIBILITIES:·         Install and Train customers on hardware and software sold by Grimco.·         Research and develop cutting-edge solutions to common problems to eliminate redundant calls.·         Play an active role in vendor relations by effectively communicating escalated equipment problems to ensure timely resolution for our valued customers.·         Utilize a methodical approach to identify problems, investigate causes, and recommend innovative solutions to Tech Support Team and customers.·         Seek and obtain superior knowledge of Grimco’s equipment, media, and inks.·         Keep abreast of current industry trends, products, and technologies. ·         Provide superior technical support of digital printing hardware and software via email, telephone, and on-site visits.·         Answer questions concerning installation, operation, customization, and usage of digital printing equipment.·         Accurately document technical calls with CRM Database to facilitate diagnostics and prompt solutions for our customers.·         Advise and educate customers to ensure a complete resolution.·         Guide and support sales staff during sales process and resolution of technical issues.   REQUIREMENTS:·         Completed Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited college/university, preferred area of General Technology, Project Management, Computer Management & Information Systems, Graphic Arts Technology Management, Technical Resource Management, or Technology Management.·         Windows (All aspects)·         Strong/Advanced ability in PC Repair/troubleshooting.·         Strong/Advanced knowledge of PC configuration with outside software and connectivity to printers & other devices.·         Experience with Adobe Illustrator, Adobe Photoshop.·         Strong interpersonal skills—able to communicate effectively with vendors, employees, and executives.·         Work hard & smart—never satisfied with the status quo.·         Possess high expectations of what can be accomplished by self AND team.·         Natural leadership qualities.·         High degree of patience with people and processes.·         Travel 75%, sometimes with little notice. STRONGLY PREFERRED BUT NOT REQUIRED:Experience with color management software (Onyx, Flexi, Caldera)Experience with large color output devices. (HP Printers, Epson Printers, Seiko, Oce`)Sign/Digital Industry experience.  Immediate opening.  Full-Time Employment Status. Eligible for employee Benefits Package Including: Base Salary and commission potential, Health, Dental, Vision, Prescription, Accidental Death & Dismemberment, Company Paid Life, Voluntary, Long Term Disability, Accident, Critical Illness, 401k, Holiday & Vacation Accrual. ",Digital Service Technician Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78218",Wholesale Trade/Import-ExportAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/digital-service-technician-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170035881.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=15,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,579119cdfee88e25d6fcec3e046ef730
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:15:10:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Operating Room Nurse Manager - RN – Nurse - $90k+ Operations Manager – Operating RoomRegistered Nurse, RNSan Antonio, TexasHere is a great opportunity for a highly motivated and experienced nurse to function as the Surgical Services Nurse Manager at a reputable hospital with an outstanding local and national reputation in Texas. Position is essentially an Assistant Director of Perioperative services position in the Operating Room. Operating Room Nurse Manager Reporting to the Director of Surgical Services 85+ FTEs12 OR SuitesReports to Director Assistant Manager reportLow Turnover rate on UnitBSN required3+ years recent Operating Room or Surgical Services Nurse Manager experience highly preferredBLS  PLEASE CONTACT TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1395 Kristopher TonasPermanent Placement SpecialistCoreMedical Group(phone) 800-995-2673 ext. 1330(fax) 866-420-1055kristopher.tonas@coremedicalgroup.com   All applicants must be a Registered Nurse. The ideal candidate will hold a BSN and have recent experience working as an Operating Room or Surgical Services Nurse Manager. A strong Operating Room Charge RN, Supervisory or Assistant Nurse Manager will be considered. PLEASE CONTACT TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1330 Kristopher TonasPermanent Placement SpecialistCoreMedical Group(phone) 800-995-2673 ext. 1330(fax) 866-420-1055kristopher.tonas@coremedicalgroup.comwww.linkedin.com/in/mpaeplow             keywords: Operating room: OR, RN, Nurse, Registered Nurse, Operating Room, CVOR, Scrub, Circulate, PACU, Pre op, Pre-operative, Post op, Post-operative, Recovery room, Surgical, Ambulatory, operating room, OR, OR Nurse, ENT, OB/GYN, general surgeries, Plastic, Opthomalogy, Orthopedic, Neuro, sterile supply, Pre-admit, BSN, JCAHO, RNFA, First Assistant, Surgical Assistant, Charge Nurse, ICU, CCU, Critical Care, Intensive Care, hearts, telemetry, critical care services, vents, acls, bls, stepdown, vice president, CNO, chief nurse, director of perioperative, director, vice president, director of operating, director of surgical services",Operating Room Nurse Manager - RN – Nurse - $k+ Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/operating-room-nurse-manager-rn-%E2%80%93-nurse-90k-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169743039.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,"80,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",Medical/Health,673e5f04d5c3780c740c8a16cce8fcfd
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:15:10:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description SUMMARY: Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Requirements QUALIFICATIONS: 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. 2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. 4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-specialty-care-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170096951.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,6b5eac57f8cb796b6f5327b2ba07988f
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:12:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  671767Apex Systems is looking for a Crystal Reports Developer to join their clients team in San Antonio, Texas. If you are interested in this opportunity, please reach out to Abbie Niderberg at aniderberg@apexsystemsinc.com Duration: ContractLocation: San Antonio, TexasPosition: Crystal Reports DeveloperRequirements: Solid experience in Crystal reports development on SAP and non-SAP data sources (Oracle, SQL Server)Solid experience in relational databases (SQL, Stored Procedures, triggers)such as Oracle, SQL Server and ability to analyze application database models/schema to determine source dataAbility to independently interact with non-technical end users to understand application, processes, and report requirements to build pixel perfect, highly interactive complex reportsStrong Crystal Reports Developer w/experience in Crystal 2013 or Enterprise Experience with Change Mgmt Tools and creating tickets Strong communication skills Experience working with the business EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Crystal Reports Developer Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  671767Apex Systems is looking for a Crystal Reports Developer to join their clients team in San Antonio, Texas. If you are interested in this opportunity, please reach out to Abbie Niderberg at aniderberg@apexsystemsinc.com Duration: ContractLocation: San Antonio, TexasPosition: Crystal Reports DeveloperRequirements: Solid experience in Crystal reports development on SAP and non-SAP data sources (Oracle, SQL Server)Solid experience in relational databases (SQL, Stored Procedures, triggers)such as Oracle, SQL Server and ability to analyze application database models/schema to determine source dataAbility to independently interact with non-technical end users to understand application, processes, and report requirements to build pixel perfect, highly interactive complex reportsStrong Crystal Reports Developer w/experience in Crystal 2013 or Enterprise Experience with Change Mgmt Tools and creating tickets Strong communication skills Experience working with the business EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/crystal-reports-developer-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170034028.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b1a49406bee7dfdac2528e567f3b8ccc
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:13:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY: Patient Access representatives facilitate a welcome and easy access to the facility and are responsible for establishing an encounter for any patient who meets the guidelines for hospital service. Patient Access staff ensures that all data entry is accurate including demographic and financial information for each account. Patient Access has numerous procedural requirements including data elements, insurance verification, authorization for services, and collections for all patient portions including prior balances. Patient Access staff is responsible for the successful financial outcome of all patient services. Patient Access is responsible for ensuring the hospital maintains compliance with Federal regulations, JCAHO, and Department of Health and Hospital compliance standards. Patient Access communicates directly with patients and families, physicians, nurses, insurance companies and third party payers. This position requires professional appearance, and behavior, good communication skills and effective organizational skills. Patient Access representatives require dependability, flexibility, and teamwork.QUALIFICATIONS: A. EDUCATION: * High school diploma or equivalent required. * Successful completion of the core educational curriculum ""Excellence at the Front End"" required within one year of employment. B. EXPERIENCE: * One year experience in Patient Access, hospital registration, medical office, billing/collection functions, or a comparable customer service related position preferred. C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: * None Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Patient Access Rep Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78207",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-access-rep-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170056908.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,f69987ffb622bc1b3face19e6724d932
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:28:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Part-Time Accounts Receivable Clerk job is now available in the Pacific Beach area of San Diego, California, through Special Counsel!  Our client is looking to hire a part-time employee to handle bookkeeping and billing within their firm.   Part-Time Accounts Receivable Clerk Responsibilities:•Issue invoices to customers and create monthly statements•Process credit memos and update client files accordingly•Track exceptions and submit invoices by electronic data interchange  Qualifications:•One year of accounts receivable experience•Excellent verbal and written communications skill•Organized and able to handle simultaneous requests in a fast-paced environment •Ability to work 15-20 hours per week If you are interested in the Part-Time Accounts Receivable Clerk job in San Diego, CA, please apply below for immediate consideration.  Please also visit specialcounsel.com for other career opportunities.  ",P/T Accounts Receivable Clerk Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92109",,http://jobview.monster.com/p-t-accounts-receivable-clerk-job-san-diego-ca-us-167808759.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=18,,Legal,c9491cb26752eebf6a9681ca619d4d11
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:28:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you want to work in a fun, casual environment, with an ultra-successful company located just two blocks from the ocean? Do you thrive in a fast paced, rapidly changing environment with incredible growth opportunities? You may have just found your next adventure! FortuneBuilders, one of the nation’s fastest growing private companies, is currently looking for a professional, enthusiastic and highly motivated person to join our Finance Department. The Senior Accountant is responsible for closing monthly accounting books, reviewing financials and working with the Controller to provide information to help support management in decision making.What will you do?:The ideal candidate will have a passion for analysis, will be extremely detail-oriented, work closely with a team in collaborative environment, and will be ready to make a difference in a company. The successful candidate’s responsibilities will include, but not be limited to:Ensures accurate and timely month end close, which includes bank recs, monthly journal entries, and updating account schedulesPreparation and review of financialsSupports yearly outside auditSupports budget activitiesAssists in development and implementation of new procedures and features to enhance the efficiency/workflow of the departmentResponds to inquiries from the Controller and CFOPrepares ad hoc reports to assist teams and management in making business decisionsWhat competencies/skills MUST you have?:Knowledge of Accrual AccountingAbility to perform complex reconciliationsHighly competent in financial reportingGAAP skillsExcellent communication skills, both written and verbalHas ability to start a project and manage it to the end working cross-departmentallyStrong organizational and problem solving skills What education and experience is required?Bachelor’s degree in Accounting5+ years of experience in a professional accounting positionAdvanced in ExcelProficient in QuickbooksMicrosoft Dynamics experience a plus!Infusionsoft experience a plus!CPA or MBA highly desired!   About FortuneBuilders FortuneBuilders is the leading Real Estate investment education company in the country. We have been ranked by Inc. Magazine's prestigious Inc500 list for three consecutive years as one of America’s fastest growing private companies.  We show our real estate investor students the roadmap of how to turn their passion for real estate into a highly profitable business that provides the financial and lifestyle freedom they deserve. Our team has been inspiring, educating, and leading Real Estate investors across the country since 2006.  Our unique approach is highly sought after because we provide our students the blueprint to start and grow a Real Estate business, not just providing advice on a single aspect of investing. The FortuneBuilders’ headquarters are located in sunny San Diego, two blocks from the ocean. With 400 employees, we are growing every day and are looking for top A-Players to add value and contribute to the success of our students and our company.",Senior Accountant Job in San Diego,Full Time,"San Diego, CA 92109",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-san-diego-ca-us-167214648.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=19,"65,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),3a6c0eaaff24eecb040c56ed770943b4
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:28:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"NRT LLC is the nation’s largest owner and operator of residential real estate brokerages operating in more than 50 of the 100 largest metropolitan areas in the United States, with approximately 47,000 independent sales associates in approximately 790 office locations. Most operations are affiliated with Realogy’s franchise brands Coldwell Banker®, Sotheby’s International Realty® and ZipRealty® though it also operates powerful regional and local brands such as The Corcoran Group® and Citi Habitats. NRT quick facts:  Posted approximately $164.9 billion (pro forma) in total residential real estate sales volume in 2015  Ranked No. 1 nationally in real estate sales volume and transaction sides for 18 consecutive years  Visit www.nrtllc.com for more information If you are a hardworking, service oriented administrative professional seeking a fast-paced, team-oriented environment, Coldwell Banker Residential, may be right for you as the Administrative Assistant/Receptionist. This full time position includes Wednesday – Sunday. As a hybrid position responsibilities include Administrative support as well as Weekend Receptionist coverage.   Responsibilities and basic skills/qualifications are as follow but not limited to: Responsibilities: Communicating with and providing direct support for the agents Input new listings and changes HomeBase, Trident and other proprietary systems, including photo uploads and update General bookkeeping Assist with document scanning Maintains fax/copy machines and assists users with use of equipment and the transmission and Routing of faxes Answering multiple phone lines and directing callers to appropriate personnel Greets clients and supports other admin members/agents with admin tasks Backup for the all staff personnel Basic Skills/Qualifications: High School Diploma or equivalent work experience required Strong customer service and creative problem solving experience General computer knowledge and experience required Proficient in Microsoft Office; Outlook, Word, Excel and social medial Strong verbal and written communication skills Ability to multi-task in a fast paced environment with attention to detail Prior Real Estate office experience preferred To be considered an applicant for this position you must show how you meet the basic qualifications of the job in a resume or document you upload. Employment by NRT is contingent upon completing Form I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification, education verification, and satisfactory reference and background checks. NRT LLC, a subsidiary of Realogy Corporation, is committed to providing equal employment opportunity (“EEO”) and will make employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, sexual preference, gender identity or gender expression, veteran status, marital status, disability, or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations.Under the Americans with Disabilities Act and other applicable laws Realogy will provide reasonable accommodation to disabled applicants upon request during the application process to ensure equal opportunities to be considered for employment.",Administrative Assistant Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92108",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-san-diego-ca-us-167855011.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=5,,Administrative/Clerical,5ef86cbe37c2c6d90951492968aec740
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:28:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summer’s practically here… are you ready to advance your career with a company where you will have not only a better work life balance but growth opportunity? You know in no time it’ll be October, so why wait? If you are a Senior or Staff full cycle accountant familiar with bank reconciliations and journal entries we should talk. We are working with some fantastic companies who are looking for driven individuals with only 4-6 years of public/private accounting experience. Most of these positions report to the Controller or Accounting Manager. They each are direct hire, offer full benefits, and the salary ranges are between $55-75k. Responsibilities of these Senior/Staff Accountant jobs in San Diego are: Bank ReconciliationsJournal EntriesMonth end closePayroll, taxes, and benefits bi-weekly Assists with Financial statements and with the preparation of annual budgets and monthly forecastsAd hoc analysisWeekly operational reporting  Qualifications: BS in Accounting or Finance1-3 years of Public Accounting Experience MS Office Suite (ERP systems highly preferred)Ability to work well and effectively communicate with upper managementStrong accounting understanding including being very familiar with month end close, daily revenue posting, cash reports, variance analysis, and balance sheet recognition  If you feel you meet the above minimum requirements of these Senior/Staff Accountant positions in San Diego please send your resume in word format to jody.goss@parkerlynch.com or apply online at www.parkerlynch.com.  ",Senior/Staff Accountant Jobs in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92104",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-staff-accountant-jobs-in-san-diego-ca-job-san-diego-ca-us-168203935.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=7,"55,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2db3056b315e6b0ded8ba45fa776530d
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:28:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Technical Support Analyst in San Diego, CA.Responsibilities: Handle large number of tickets each day Efficiently and accurately resolve software problems Perform duties in highly interruptive conditions Frequently lift and carry computer equipment on the average of 20 pounds Perform duties and make decisions with patience and tact under frequent time pressures Troubleshoot utilities and handle desktop deployment and Basic network technology concepts Responds to incidents, performs diagnosis, executes incident resolution for those requiring medium to high complexity; utilizes previous experience to reach resolution and will contribute to knowledge management system(s); escalates issues when necessary Responds to customer requests received via the Service Management application; fulfills requests of moderate to high complexity; interacts with the customers in a courteous and professional manner Assists in the maintenance of and enters appropriate data into the device asset management system and the knowledge management systems to capture knowledge and work processes Responds to assigned issues and troubleshoots problems with desktops, laptops, tablets, mobile carts, printers and peripherals, including deployment of new devices; identifies potential issues that could adversely impact end-user experience and takes corrective action Participates in low complexity local and enterprise projects Participates in on-call rotation and provides on-call support General knowledge of Service Level Agreements (SLAs) and always works within those metrics Understanding and adherence to policies and procedures and adheres to new or modified policies Provides guidance, training and problem solving assistance to other team membersREQUIREMENTS: Associates/Bachelor's degree or 1- 2 years of related experience Knowledge of Windows 7 required; Windows 10 preferred Knowledge of Microsoft Office 2010 is required Experience Active Directory preferred SCCM Knowledge preferred Service Now knowledge preferred Knowledge of One Drive preferred Certifications: nice to have but not critical - MCSCE, A+, MCP Excellent customer service skills Strong oral and written communication skills",Technical Support Analyst Job in San Diego,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Diego, CA 92123",,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-support-analyst-job-san-diego-ca-us-168417024.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cd90cba55f3ccac912024c7dea576410
United States of America,US,06/Dec/2015:16:28:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a great full-time opportunity for someone interested in a fun, fast-paced, challenging, and energetic Sales environment with the opportunity to build your own client base.The role:Propose customer solutions that meet the customer\u0027s marketing and advertising needs.Develop and maintain a thorough knowledge of The Berry Company's services and pricing structure.Identify leads, manage prospects and acquire new business.Meet or exceed the new business sales goals.Prepare and deliver sales proposals/presentations and follow up with key decision makers.Utilize the company\u0027s CRM on a daily basis, scheduling and documenting activities, and developing prospective customer profiles.Complete required Customer Service Agreements, reports and other paperwork in a timely manner and in accordance with Company policy.Develop and maintain an awareness of market behavior and competitive trends and respond accordingly.Regularly meet with Sales Supervisor to review weekly sales activities, progress on goals, and status of prospective customers.1-3 years Sales experience (preferred)Digital Media/Advertising experience requiredAbility to strategically think and analyze the needs of clients.Experience in building and growing relationshipsMotivated individual, with a positive attitude, who can consistently strive to exceed expectationsExcellent problem solving, project management and analytical skills.Excellent communication skills, both written and verbalAttention to detail and highly organizedUse data to effectively tell a clear storyBenefits include: Base salary plus commissions with unlimited earning potentialBonus opportunitiesMedical, dental, and vision insurance401k plan with company matchOngoing training and skill developmentBecome part of a great team environment where you can grow your income while growing professionally. If you are qualified and would like to learn more, please respond to this ad with a cover letter outlining why you believe you may be a good fit for the position along with your resume. We are currently scheduling interviews.",Advertising Technical Consultant Job in Milford,Full Time Employee,"Milford, CT",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/advertising-technical-consultant-job-milford-ct-us-168398197.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=14,,,3e22e5735d59bdb73d4e9edb4598f399
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:00:37:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"""Summer Walk In Wednesdays"" July & August!! - Kindred Hospital Chattanooga ( Job Number: 273065 ) Description Kindred Hospital Chattanooga is hosting “Summer Walk in Wednesdays” July 6th, 13th, 20th, 27th August 3rd, 10th, 17th, 24th, 31st 10:00 am – 2:00 pm 709 Walnut Street, Chattanooga, TN 37401 We are seeking RNs (SCU and Med Surg FT or PRN) NEW GRADS WELCOME! Please stop by or apply directly at http://jobs.kindredhospitals.com , job #273065 If you can’t make the event, we would love to hear from you.  Please contact Michelle.Foster@Kindred.com 502-596-3101   #MON-HD #LI-HD Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare, Career Fair, Event, Hiring Event, Interview Day, Job Fair, Open House” Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TN-Chattanooga-Kindred Hospital - Chattanooga Organization : 4628 - Kindred Hospital - Chattanooga",Summer Walk In Wednesdays July & August!! - Kindred Hospital Chattanooga Job in Chattanooga,"Full Time, Employee","""Summer Walk In Wednesdays"" July & August!! - Kindred Hospital Chattanooga ( Job Number: 273065 ) Description Kindred Hospital Chattanooga is hosting “Summer Walk in Wednesdays” July 6th, 13th, 20th, 27th August 3rd, 10th, 17th, 24th, 31st 10:00 am – 2:00 pm 709 Walnut Street, Chattanooga, TN 37401 We are seeking RNs (SCU and Med Surg FT or PRN) NEW GRADS WELCOME! Please stop by or apply directly at http://jobs.kindredhospitals.com , job #273065 If you can’t make the event, we would love to hear from you.  Please contact Michelle.Foster@Kindred.com 502-596-3101   #MON-HD #LI-HD Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare, Career Fair, Event, Hiring Event, Interview Day, Job Fair, Open House” Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TN-Chattanooga-Kindred Hospital - Chattanooga Organization : 4628 - Kindred Hospital - Chattanooga",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/summer-walk-in-wednesdays-july-august!!-kindred-hospital-chattanooga-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169200347.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,976550122e79f561eb5b55e3d47d35e0
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:00:37:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  673796 Apex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest IT Staffing firm, has a developer opportunity available in the greater Chattanooga area, working within a global team environment utilizing resource teams and skill-sets from around the world.  Working with the leaders of the industry to create innovative solutions within the Business and Technology space.Serves as a recognized technical expert for one or more of the major software applications or systems. Collaborates with business partners to understand business needs and identify potential technical solutions.1yr Contract with potential to extendSalary: NegotiableLocation: Chattanooga, TNDesigns, creates, and maintains software by analyzing, testing, assessing and implementing programming applications based on business priorities and guidance from management.Provides technical expertise and guidance to project teams and software engineers, demonstrating significant creativity and flexibility provides guidance to teams and individual software engineers for build and release management develops features across multiple subsystems within the portfolio, including collaboration in requirements definition, prototyping, design, coding, testing and deploymentAssists teams with quickly and reliably debugging and solving the most complicated system issuesDemonstrates expert proficiency in fundamental and advanced application development conceptsDemonstrates expert knowledge of modern programming languages, system design, data structures, algorithm complexity, compiler capabilities, design methods, industry best practices, patterns vs. Anti-patterns, networks, security, development tooling, operating systems. C#, .net, asp.net, java, javascript, html5, jquery, entity framework, team foundation server (TFS), MS SQL server (table/query design, SSRS, SSIS, and SSAS), oracle, performance analysis tools, linq, open source dbs/frameworks/toolkitsAdvanced understanding of application systems from a business and technical perspective.A bachelors degree in computer science, engineering, mathematics or related field of study or equivalent education, training & experienceTechnology experience:.NetC#HTMLAngularMS SQL serverHow to apply:Please send your resume to Reece Belmondo rbelmondo@apexsystemsinc.com  EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",.Net developer Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  673796 Apex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest IT Staffing firm, has a developer opportunity available in the greater Chattanooga area, working within a global team environment utilizing resource teams and skill-sets from around the world.  Working with the leaders of the industry to create innovative solutions within the Business and Technology space.Serves as a recognized technical expert for one or more of the major software applications or systems. Collaborates with business partners to understand business needs and identify potential technical solutions.1yr Contract with potential to extendSalary: NegotiableLocation: Chattanooga, TNDesigns, creates, and maintains software by analyzing, testing, assessing and implementing programming applications based on business priorities and guidance from management.Provides technical expertise and guidance to project teams and software engineers, demonstrating significant creativity and flexibility provides guidance to teams and individual software engineers for build and release management develops features across multiple subsystems within the portfolio, including collaboration in requirements definition, prototyping, design, coding, testing and deploymentAssists teams with quickly and reliably debugging and solving the most complicated system issuesDemonstrates expert proficiency in fundamental and advanced application development conceptsDemonstrates expert knowledge of modern programming languages, system design, data structures, algorithm complexity, compiler capabilities, design methods, industry best practices, patterns vs. Anti-patterns, networks, security, development tooling, operating systems. C#, .net, asp.net, java, javascript, html5, jquery, entity framework, team foundation server (TFS), MS SQL server (table/query design, SSRS, SSIS, and SSAS), oracle, performance analysis tools, linq, open source dbs/frameworks/toolkitsAdvanced understanding of application systems from a business and technical perspective.A bachelors degree in computer science, engineering, mathematics or related field of study or equivalent education, training & experienceTechnology experience:.NetC#HTMLAngularMS SQL serverHow to apply:Please send your resume to Reece Belmondo rbelmondo@apexsystemsinc.com  EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/net-developer-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169444566.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3ce600f1aa9a9471864647d5de177db9
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:00:37:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market. Headquartered in Norwell, Massachusetts, Clean Harbors has waste disposal facilities and service locations throughout the United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. We offer competitive salaries and progressive benefits including health, dental, life insurance, 401K, generous paid time off, tuition reimbursement and more. We offer a drug free work environment and require a pre-employment drug screen. All Applicants are subject to pre-employment security background checks, and some positions may require pre-employment physical fitness for duty tests. Clean Harbors has an immediate opening for a Purchasing Specialist  RESPONSIBILITIES Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all times. Maintain the purchasing database. Ensure information entered into the purchasing database is accurate and has proper approval prior to entry. Maintain PeopleSoft item database, which includes creating item IDs, processing item links, updating pricing, and creating item catalogs. Maintain PeopleSoft vendor database, which includes creating new vendors, processing address changes, and creating vendor reports.  EDUCATION/KNOWLEDGEHigh school diploma or equivalent required. Associates degree with a business, supply chain or commerce focus preferred.3+ years purchasing support experienceStrong MS Office skills Employment is contingent upon a successful background check and drug screen.  Some positions also require a pre-hire medical exam.  Must meet all work eligibility requirements. Environmentally-responsible business.*CHPotential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Purchasing Specialist Job in Norwell,Full Time Employee,"Norwell, MA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/purchasing-specialist-job-norwell-ma-us-169393925.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=18,,Logistics/Transportation,0ab918b3a96da984d082543fbc3fe428
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:00:37:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for people with great people skills and that have an excitement to begin their careers for our Business Development Program. If you are a college graduate or looking for a career change then our Business Development Program is for you. Anyone interested in gaining Business Development, Sales, and Marketing experience is encouraged to apply Corporate Trainers in our Management Training Program can expect to be exposed to: - Team Management - Campaign Coordination and Management - Management National Accounts, Marketing, and Sales - Training and development of your colleagues What we believe: - Experience gained is unparalleled - Representatives will grow not only professionally but personally as well - We partner everyone with developed professionals to ensure success - Training and developing transferable skills is the best opportunity for growth to management - Entry level account executives have the opportunity of earning a great income as part of our Management Training Program. Our focus is on establishing relationships with business customers for our clients. All college graduates are encouraged to apply. Anyone with previous management experience is encouraged to apply, but no management experience is necessary.     RequirementsAn ideal candidate possesses the following qualities: - A team mentality - Effective interpersonal & excellent communication skills - Demonstrated leadership and team management abilities - Self-confidence, flexibility and sense of humor - Results driven attitude with a hunger for success To apply please submit your resume today",Entry Level Management Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Advertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-management-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169211713.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Business/Strategic Management,4f7da6ecbc931435e2611b146e17af7d
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:00:37:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse or LPN - Night Shift - Full-Time - (Braintree, MA) ( Job Number: 277412 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: The RN Charge Nurse manages a designated group of nursing employees on a nursing unit and assures smooth operations of the unit for a designated shift. (Could encompass one or more units depending upon size and clinical programs). Scope of work for the RN Charge Nurse may be modified by State specific rules under the Nurse Practice Act. #MON-NCD Qualifications Education: The RN Charge Nurse will be a graduate of accredited RN School of Nursing Licenses/Certification: The RN Charge Nurse will have current RN Licensure in the State employed The RN Charge Nurse will have a valid CPR verification Experience: The RN Charge Nurse will have at least one (1) years of nursing experience preferred The RN Charge Nurse will have evidence of continuing education or special preparation or experience in gerontological nursing and/or long term care nursing desirable. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Nursing Primary Location : MA-Braintree-Kindred Nursing and Rehab-Braintree Organization : 0685 - Kindred Nursing and Rehab-Braintree",Registered Nurse or LPN - Night Shift - Full-Time - (Braintree,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse or LPN - Night Shift - Full-Time - (Braintree, MA) ( Job Number: 277412 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: The RN Charge Nurse manages a designated group of nursing employees on a nursing unit and assures smooth operations of the unit for a designated shift. (Could encompass one or more units depending upon size and clinical programs). Scope of work for the RN Charge Nurse may be modified by State specific rules under the Nurse Practice Act. #MON-NCD Qualifications Education: The RN Charge Nurse will be a graduate of accredited RN School of Nursing Licenses/Certification: The RN Charge Nurse will have current RN Licensure in the State employed The RN Charge Nurse will have a valid CPR verification Experience: The RN Charge Nurse will have at least one (1) years of nursing experience preferred The RN Charge Nurse will have evidence of continuing education or special preparation or experience in gerontological nursing and/or long term care nursing desirable. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Nursing Primary Location : MA-Braintree-Kindred Nursing and Rehab-Braintree Organization : 0685 - Kindred Nursing and Rehab-Braintree",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-or-lpn-night-shift-full-time-braintree-ma-job-braintree-ma-us-169200323.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,5dd542f6da1a8953fc6e03852797e811
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:02:15:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under direction of the Director, Revenue Cycle, manages and coordinates Hospital Insurance/Patient Billing and Customer Service activities.  This position is responsible for maintaining cash flow and accounts receivable within established targets while maintaining optimal employee and patient satisfaction.  Manages 12 FTEs including a team leader position.  High school diploma or equivalent required. Bachelor's Degree or equivalent experience required. Usually requires a minimum of five years of Hospital patient accounting experience and/or previous management experience in a healthcare setting.  Office is conveniently located at the junction of US routes 24 and 106. *M  Signature Healthcare is committed to continuous process improvement. We have embraced LEAN as our management system and our way of working. All employees have a significant role in improving our environment of care through problem solving, generating improvement suggestions, goal setting & measuring results.",Manager,Full Time Employee,"Brockton, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-patient-accounting-job-brockton-ma-us-168744864.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,1a6225a7e6e699e5a94f2db24f22a367
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:02:20:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Why Valmont Welcome to Valmont, where a world of opportunity awaits. When you join our team, you become part of a passionate group dedicated to changing lives and conserving resources around the globe. We want problem solvers who roll up their sleeves to foster progress and innovation for all people. At Valmont, we provide infrastructure, irrigation, tubing and coatings to the world. We strengthen cities. We nourish croplands. We design, manufacture and coat. Our products and services make a difference. Join us, and BUILD YOUR WORLD.How you will contributeValmont is currently seeking a highly motivated and talented individual for the Maintenance Electronic Technician I position in the Global Utility Division. We are looking for a highly driven individual that will be responsible for the installation, maintenance, and repair of electrical equipment, welders, AC/DC motors, production machinery, CNC equipment and other types of installations.  Additionally, you will…Work from the direction of the Manager to support the preventative maintenance schedule, make unforeseen repairs, troubleshoot and install new or repaired equipmentPerform a variety of electrical-trade functions in the installation, maintenance or repair of equipment for generating, distribution and/or utilization of electric energy in an establishmentInstall or repair any of a variety of electrical equipment, such as generators, transformers, switchboards, controllers, circuit breakers, motors, heating units, conduit systems, or other transmission equipment; working from blueprints, drawings, layout or other specificationsLocate and diagnose trouble in the electrical system or equipmentCommunicate with the Supervisors, Manufacturing Manager, and General Manager regarding problems and estimated times for repairsWork standard computations relating to load requirements of wiring or electrical equipment using a variety of electrician’s hand tools, measuring and testing instrumentsLearn aspects of mechanical and electrical maintenance throughout the shopPerform other duties as directed by leaders and managementActively participate in department safety, and demonstrate excellent safety practices and behaviors which conform to all Valmont safety policies and procedures.What it takesRequired QualificationsHigh school diploma or GED equivalentThree years of previous experience in an electronic maintenance related positionThree years of previous experience in a manufacturing or fabrication environmentState electrical license480 electrical backgroundPossess a basic knowledge of PLC logic to troubleshoot and or repair the CNC equipmentCertified to run forklifts, man-lifts, cranes and all manufacturing equipmentComputer experience for input and retrieval of dataThe ability to read and decipher blueprints, schematics manufacturer specification manuals, state and federal code books and references without assistance and use them to properly perform the required maintenance installations, or tasksThe ability to calculate formulas using basic mathematics and standard U.S. and Metric MeasurementsThe ability to pay attention to detail and follow work instructionsExcellent communication, organizational, analytical, and interpersonal skillsAt the end of 90 Calendar days the candidate must be able to maintain an acceptable level of production, quality and attendance as determined by ManagementHighly qualified candidates will also possess:One year of previous experience operating a forkliftOne year of previous experience with overhead crane operationsOne year of previous experience operating hand and/or power tools in a professional environmentThe ability to work in a high volume, fast paced environmentThe ability to communicate and interact with coworkers in a positive mannerThe ability to effectively interpret and present information both one-on-one and in front of an audienceMust be a person of passion and integrity who has the drive to excel and deliver exceptional results#UT (Utility)Valmont does not discriminate against any employee or applicant in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identify, national origin, age, genetic information, veteran status, disability or any other characteristic protected by law.If you have a disability and require any assistance in filling out the application for employment, call (402) 963-1115 or email EEOCompliance@Valmont.com",Maintenance Electrician Job in Jasper,Full Time Employee,"Jasper, TN 37347",Valmont Industries Inc.,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-electrician-job-jasper-tn-us-169474256.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=14,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,8800f022cdb503e739294af2860c02a7
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:02:23:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"PerkinElmer is a global technology leader driving growth and initiative in the Environmental and Human Health Science markets. The company is a leading force in the development, production, marketing, servicing, and support of laboratory instrumentation and ancillary services throughout the world. Job Title:  Document and Training Management Specialist Location: Lexington MA Type of Assignment: Fulltime   Job Description: Primary Duties               Under the direction of the line manager, the Pharmaceutical Development (PD) Documentation, Training and Compliance Specialist is responsible for supporting all the documentation, training and compliance needs. Provide and support documentation and training coordinator services to the PD organization including numbering, version control, formatting, processing, and filing of documents. Expert in using MasterControl or any Electronic Documentation Management System (EDMS). Support training profiles, maintain training records and submit document records within our electronic training tracking system. Expert in using SABA or any Electronic Learning Management System (ELMS). Support oversight and linkage to training curricula in compliance with GxP, regulatory requirements and Quality Manual/procedures. Documents and Training strategy materials are developed and maintained in accordance to Shire’s policies, procedures and standards. Provide support during internal and external audits related to regulatory, pre inspection approval and internal audits for PD organization. Support line manager in PD audit and inspection readiness plans. Assist with documentation, training, and compliance projects.   Responsibilities % of Time Job Function and Description         45%   DOCUMENTATION: Support document issuance, version control, manual and electronic files maintenance, and document status notifications. Consult with functional heads regarding current document owners and business process owners. Follow-up on documents biennial review process. Perform logbook creation, review, scan, and file function.      Perform and support document formatting, printing and update document trackers. Expert in using MasterControl or any Electronic Documentation Management System (EDMS). Maintain the system current while doing quality checks from time to time. Maintain a complete and accurate index of documents. Issuance of reagents logbooks. Support internal and external audits and inspections.           45%   TRAINING: Support and create training profiles, update training profiles on paper and electronic system, create training reports, maintain training metrics, etc. Consult with document owners and business process owners to determine training plan for procedural documents. Develop and maintain training contents for Instructor Led Training (ILT), On-the-job Training (OJT), Web-based Training (WBT) and knowledge Checks (KCs). Consults with hiring managers to identify appropriate curricula assignments for job roles. Expert in using SABA or any Electronic Learning Management System (ELMS).      Maintain the system current while doing quality checks from time to time. Perform and support administrative functions in our training tracking system: update training profiles, updates documents records, etc.      Assist with training and documentation projects. Support internal and external audits and inspections.       10%   GENERAL: Assist, create and implement continuous business improvements projects. Creating weekly, monthly and yearly metrics. Assist in preparing newsletter and updating SharePoint site for the group.     Education and Experience Requirements   Minimum Bachelor’s degree must. At least 2-3 years of Biopharmaceutical industry experience is preferable. Train-The-Trainer capability. Experience in designing training using various delivery methods. Exceptional training skills are required. Ability to interact well with and provide training to all levels of the organization. Documentation experience required (paper-based and as well as electronic system). Training system experience required (paper-based and as well as electronic system). Embrace Shire culture – operates with a high sense of urgency Embrace Shire core values -  BRAVE (bold, resilient, accountable, visionary and ethical)   Key Skills, Abilities, and Competencies   Minimum 2-3 years of experience is required. Microsoft Suite detailed knowledge is must including SharePoint sites. Familiarity with style and formatting within MS word is must. Microsoft Excel pivot table’s knowledge is required. Expert in using MasterControl or any Electronic Documentation Management System (EDMS). Expert in using SABA or any Electronic Learning Management System (ELMS). Expert in using TrackWise or any Electronic Quality Management Software (EQMS). Must be able to learn complex software quickly and independently. Regulatory and compliance knowledge is must. Familiar with all the regulatory agencies and link them with CMC submissions processes. Must be able to work independently but also be customer service oriented.   Complexity and Problem Solving   Emphasis on excellent customer service. Must be able to work independently and handle multiple projects at the same time. Must be able to work in a team environment and take directions from line manager. Prioritization decisions will be made by line manager. Able to solve problems and escalate issues to line manager.       Other Job Requirements   Ability to participate in early and late meetings/teleconferences. Working hour’s flexibility to meet deadlines as needed. Ability to work overtime as needed. Availability during audits/inspections.                                                     Benefits at PerkinElmer Competitive base salary and incentive compensation plan / Job training and professional development / Comprehensive benefits package / Paid time off and holidays / Tuition reimbursement plan / 401(k) with match",Document and Training Management Specialist Job in Lexington,Full Time,"Lexington, MA 02420",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/document-training-management-specialist-job-lexington-ma-us-169146885.aspx?mescoid=1500148001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bf237dee00387187e1a266ada05a434f
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:02:25:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Backup Support TechnicianSenior Backup Support TechnicianOur client, a technology services provider based outside of the city is seeking a Senior Backup Support Technician to join their growing team! This company really values their employees, and they want you to become an integral part of the organization. Do you want to work in an environment that has many perks and a great culture? The Senior Backup Support Technician will be working with leading-edge technologies to proactively monitor and administrate custom-designed Data Protection architecture, supporting technologies implemented across a wide range of environments. This is an opportunity to solve new challenges every day and gain first-hand insight into the ever-growing industry shift to cloud and managed services data protection services- qualified applicants, APPLY TODAY!! Qualifications: Minimum of Associates' degree in Information Technology and 5 years' experience administrating Enterprise Backup and Data Protection technologiesStrong experience in Veritas NetBackup administration (including appliance hardware) - related certifications highly desiredExperience with EMC DataDomain Appliances in various configurationsConfident in performing Disaster Recovery of NetBackup environmentStrong experience troubleshooting issues involving HPUX, Red Hat Enterprise Linux, VMware and Windows ServerFamiliarity with: HPUX; RedHat Enterprise Linux; EMC NetWorker; Veritas NetBackup; Veeam; Zerto; SolarWinds; VMware vSphere; APTARE; and Windows Server, Group Policy, and Active DirectoryAnalytical, creative troubleshooting skills, including testing and implementing resolutionsFluent in MS Windows and Office suiteStrong communication skills, both written and verbal- especially when explaining technical concepts to a non-technical audienceStellar customer service skills, especially in efficient issue resolution/escalation/resolution follow-upAbility to manage multiple projects concurrently, prioritizing them according to urgencyWE ARE ONLY ABLE TO CONSIDER IN-STATE CANDIDATES FOR THIS POSITION.GD123 Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Senior Backup Support Technician Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Computer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-backup-support-technician-job-boston-ma-us-169378430.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,d2355973c423deda44bbd08082feaf93
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:02:28:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.       Position Summary                                                     The Event Specialist generates excitement, brand awareness, and increases product sales through event sampling and promotions.  The Event Specialist is responsible for reading all program materials, set up and breakdown of their working area, and preparing and sampling products on scheduled event days.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities   Conduct Demo Event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Engage the consumer by creating brand awareness and enthusiasm Dynamically and aggressively sell product to consumers Sample product to consumers (may include cooking) Move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart and engage them in a professional manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event May be required to expediently escort customers from cart location to other locations within store to obtain product Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing 52-74 lbs. distance of 150-300 feet (from storage area to event execution area) Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet and up to 10 feet overhead Purchase product and supplies (requires lifting up to 40 lbs. and reaching up to 10 feet; carrying up to 40 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart; Construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials- insert price signs, display product information and hoist sign with assistance up to 5 lbs. Set up/display product/materials on cart Break down/clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up/Sanitize Cart Disassemble Cart  Push cart weighing 52-74 lbs. distance of 150-300 feet (from event execution area to storage area) Return appliances/equipment (requires carrying/lifting up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet and reaching up to 10 feet overhead) Wash Utensils/Cookware Administrative Work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports and timesheets Attend trainings;  products/ materials Check voice mails, emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed Supervisory Responsibilities     Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements     Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications   Education Level: (Required)High School Diploma or GED  or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Excellent customer service orientation Ability to work effectively with management Good interpersonal skills Good written communication and verbal communication skills Basic computer skills including familiarity with Word, Excel, and Internet usage Must pass online Food Safety training exam (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Compliance with all food safety requirements and regulations Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Reps Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes. Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Chattanooga,Part Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169303704.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,0d414e67cfbf63c586e343bbf4b8374a
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:02:29:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job ID: 258480 Contract Length: 4 months Face to face interview required. W2 only. Our client is an international insurance agency that is the recipient of many “Top Employers” awards.  With over 150 years of experience, they are dedicated to making a difference in their communities and the lives of their employees.  They are currently looking for a Software Developer to join their growing team. The project that the Software Developer will work on is to convert all External FTPs from FTP to SFTP using the Managed File Transfer product (MFT) Sterling File Gateway (SFG). SFG is a Gateway between the external Internet and the Internal business Environment. All external SFTP Processes must flow into and out of the SFG. Requiring revising, testing, and implementing script changes as necessary.  What You'll Do: Convert all Internal Mainframe FTPs from FTP to FTPS. This will include revisions of all FTPs in all business Mainframe Applications JCL and Procedures (Procs). This will also include debug testing and coordinated implementation Convert all Internal UNIX and NT FTPs from FTPs to SFTPs. This will include revisions of all FTPs in all Signator UNIX and NT Applications Scripts. This will also include debug testing and coordinated implementation Provide support for all SFTPs after initial installation Prepare documentation and training materials for internal IT team Manage and support all initial incidents from initiation to resolution Facilitate and coordinate with Global Support Areas as well as vendors on specific FTP to SFTP conversions Prepare, maintain, and update FTP/SFTP documentation for the new and existing business processes Who You Are: IBM Sterling File Gateway – Managed File Transfer Tool  CA Workload Automation Desktop Client (ESP_D)  IBM Job Control Language (IBM Mainframe OS 390)  UNIX – for coding SFTP Scripts using vi as the editor  NT – for coding SFTP Batch files using DOS commands  Testing Experience in a multi-level testing environment (Dev, Systest, Sage, and Production) Knowledge of the financial and insurance industry MS Office Tools (Word, Excel, Project, PowerPoint, Visio) UNIX Tools (putty, vi)  Informatica  IBM Mainframe COBOL  Apply now! About Eliassen Group: Eliassen Group has been driving the success of our clients, consultants, and employees within Technology Staffing and Consulting Services since 1989. For over 25 years, we have been at the forefront of innovation by uniting talented people and quality solutions within successful companies to help them attain their business objectives. Our solution oriented approach to understanding your needs ensures that we identify and represent the best possible talent available in the market, personally selected and matched to your requirements by our highly-tenured, extraordinarily capable recruiting team. Our consulting divisions include expertise focused on Agile, Big Data, Biometrics & Data Solutions, Creative Services, Government Services, Life Sciences and Workforce Management. Eliassen Group is privately held and headquartered in Wakefield, MA. Don’t miss out on our referral program! If we hire a candidate that you refer us to then you can be eligible for a $1,000 referral check!",Software Developer Job in Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/software-developer-job-boston-ma-us-169438468.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=15,,IT/Software Development,787c970ac59de40fe8e711086b2d5124
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:02:39:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"SQL Server Data Analyst - Big DataLocation:  Boston, MADuration:  Direct Hire Candidate must be eligible for W-2 employment - No Visas Job Description:The SQL Server Data Analyst will work as a member of an Advanced Analytics Group building and maintaining Big Data infrastructure.  This infrastructure supports the development of a strategic data asset and the execution of data science projects, which include complex applications of machine learning, visualization, and data mining.  Design, build and measure data ingestion and integration pipelines for large volumes of temporal data from different sources. Examples include database extracts, application server logs, scanned images, voice recordings, Twitter streams, websites, and health sensor data.Design, build, and measure complex ETL jobs to process disparate, dirty data sources and form a high integrity, high quality, clean data asset.Support and scale Big Data infrastructure (Cloudera CDH 5, MongoDB, and HP Vertica).Monitor and track data quality and data flow dynamics.Design and build web based APIs to facilitate easy access to data. Qualifications:Must have 5-8+ years as a SQL Server Data Analyst with experience developing and administering large data systems.Must have 5+ years of coding and scripting (Python/Java/Scala/Go/Bash/Git) and design experience. Solid computer science fundamentals in algorithms and data structures.Must have 3+ years of data modeling and administration of NoSQL and SQL databases.Must have 3+ years of experience with at least one of the following: Hadoop, MapReduce, HDFS, HBase, Hive, Flume, Sqoop, Spark, Vertica, SQL, data warehousesFamiliarity with web programming and web app frameworks like Flask, Django or Play!Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related discipline; M.S. or Ph.D. in Computer Science or Engineering preferred.Certifications in one or more of the following tools preferred: Hadoop, MapReduce, HDFS, HBase, Hive, Flume, Sqoop, Spark, Vertica, SQL, data warehouses.",Monster,,"SQL Server Data Analyst - Big DataLocation:  Boston, MADuration:  Direct Hire Candidate must be eligible for W-2 employment - No Visas Job Description:The SQL Server Data Analyst will work as a member of an Advanced Analytics Group building and maintaining Big Data infrastructure.  This infrastructure supports the development of a strategic data asset and the execution of data science projects, which include complex applications of machine learning, visualization, and data mining.  Design, build and measure data ingestion and integration pipelines for large volumes of temporal data from different sources. Examples include database extracts, application server logs, scanned images, voice recordings, Twitter streams, websites, and health sensor data.Design, build, and measure complex ETL jobs to process disparate, dirty data sources and form a high integrity, high quality, clean data asset.Support and scale Big Data infrastructure (Cloudera CDH 5, MongoDB, and HP Vertica).Monitor and track data quality and data flow dynamics.Design and build web based APIs to facilitate easy access to data. Qualifications:Must have 5-8+ years as a SQL Server Data Analyst with experience developing and administering large data systems.Must have 5+ years of coding and scripting (Python/Java/Scala/Go/Bash/Git) and design experience. Solid computer science fundamentals in algorithms and data structures.Must have 3+ years of data modeling and administration of NoSQL and SQL databases.Must have 3+ years of experience with at least one of the following: Hadoop, MapReduce, HDFS, HBase, Hive, Flume, Sqoop, Spark, Vertica, SQL, data warehousesFamiliarity with web programming and web app frameworks like Flask, Django or Play!Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related discipline; M.S. or Ph.D. in Computer Science or Engineering preferred.Certifications in one or more of the following tools preferred: Hadoop, MapReduce, HDFS, HBase, Hive, Flume, Sqoop, Spark, Vertica, SQL, data warehouses.",,http://jobview.monster.com/sql-server-data-analyst-big-data-job-boston-ma-us-169477087.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=18,,,0f70b10317f34767db55e8846c7e6c7b
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:03:14:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drive your Future! Pilot Flying J is committed to making life better for Professional drivers. Pilot Flying J has over 650 retail locations and is the largest operator of travel centers and travel plazas in North America. With over 350 restaurants, we are one of the largest restaurant franchisees in America. We serve our customers 24 hours a day, 365 days a year. If you are customer-service driven and thrive in a fast-paced, high-energy environment, then we've got the opportunity you've been looking for. Now Hiring! Coffee HostsMaintenanceCashiersDeli Team Members Restaurant Team Members Face to Face Interviews: Tuesday, July 26th 10:00am - 6:00pm Location: Pilot Travel Center281 Pleasant Grove RD SWMcDonald, TN, 37353Phone: (423) 476-3892 What Are We Looking For? Our team ensures each customer in our Travel Centers receives excellent customer service. Our team achieves this by consistently delivering fast service, friendly smiles, and clean facilities to all of our customers. You could be our ideal candidate if you have: • Incredible customer service skills & the ability to help maintain a customer focused culture.• Ability to work as part of a team and interact with different levels from hourly team members, customers, vendors, and corporate representatives.• Ability to work a flexible schedule of nights, days, weekends, and holidays. - Flexible Schedule - 401(k) - Weekly Pay - Flexible spending account - Medical/Dental/Vision - Tuition reimbursement - Adoption Assistance   - Pilot Flying J provides an extensive training program to help provide new hires with everything they need to succeed and thrive in our fast-paced environment! Click the APPLY NOW button, or visit your local Pilot Travel Center or Flying J Travel Plaza to apply!",Coffee Host - Maintenance - Cashier - Deli Team Member - Restaurant Team Member - Interviews! Job in Mcdonald,,"Drive your Future! Pilot Flying J is committed to making life better for Professional drivers. Pilot Flying J has over 650 retail locations and is the largest operator of travel centers and travel plazas in North America. With over 350 restaurants, we are one of the largest restaurant franchisees in America. We serve our customers 24 hours a day, 365 days a year. If you are customer-service driven and thrive in a fast-paced, high-energy environment, then we've got the opportunity you've been looking for. Now Hiring! Coffee HostsMaintenanceCashiersDeli Team Members Restaurant Team Members Face to Face Interviews: Tuesday, July 26th 10:00am - 6:00pm Location: Pilot Travel Center281 Pleasant Grove RD SWMcDonald, TN, 37353Phone: (423) 476-3892 What Are We Looking For? Our team ensures each customer in our Travel Centers receives excellent customer service. Our team achieves this by consistently delivering fast service, friendly smiles, and clean facilities to all of our customers. You could be our ideal candidate if you have: • Incredible customer service skills & the ability to help maintain a customer focused culture.• Ability to work as part of a team and interact with different levels from hourly team members, customers, vendors, and corporate representatives.• Ability to work a flexible schedule of nights, days, weekends, and holidays. - Flexible Schedule - 401(k) - Weekly Pay - Flexible spending account - Medical/Dental/Vision - Tuition reimbursement - Adoption Assistance   - Pilot Flying J provides an extensive training program to help provide new hires with everything they need to succeed and thrive in our fast-paced environment! Click the APPLY NOW button, or visit your local Pilot Travel Center or Flying J Travel Plaza to apply!",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/coffee-host-maintenance-cashier-deli-team-member-restaurant-team-member-interviews!-job-mcdonald-tn-us-169193564.aspx?mescoid=3500612001001&jobPosition=18,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,9ccea92570ae55cfc3665e76df1a8e09
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:03:15:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:  Provide support to the Human Resources function including benefits, worker’s compensation, recruitment, new hire orientation and other related areas.   Essential Duties and Responsibilities:   Communicate benefits plans to all employees Answer questions relating to benefit coverage as necessary Administer worker’s compensation and control claims to ensure timely return to work, and OSHA record keeping compliance Maintain application files Conduct applicant screening, interview and background checks Prepare internal/external job postings Recruitment activities to ensure appropriate staffing levels College recruitment events Create offer letters as necessary Conduct new hire orientation Assist in resolving payroll issues for employees Work with payroll to maintain current records ie:  process Employee Action Forms for new hires, terminations, transfers, salary changes, personal information changes, etc. Communicate company policy to all levels of employee Arrange travel as necessary Facilitate Distribution roundtables Attend monthly Driver meetings Complete routine documentation audits Quality assurance of Federal I9 / WOTC compliance All other duties as assigned     Education and/or Experience:   BA or BS degree required Job Requirements:Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:   Ability to communicate confidently and effectively with all levels of employees with an ability to converse, read & write in English Ability to work with confidential information appropriately Excellent organizational skills and attention to detail necessary Ability to perform intermediate mathematical calculations  Req. Code : 3475 Division/Department : W.B. Mason Company, Inc % of Travel Required : 20-30% Skills : Human Resources -> Compensation, Staffing/Recruiting, Payroll, Benefits, Employee Relations",Human Resource Coordinator Job in Woburn,Full Time,"Woburn, MA 01801",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-coordinator-job-woburn-ma-us-168968886.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=8,,Human Resources,7d7a6bdca04b28d54f46274fafc694ef
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:04:13:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org)is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  TheCenter provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention,early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisisservices. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess theability to relate to individualsand families of varied ethnic and cultural backgrounds, ages, educationallevels and economic circumstances with respect and dignity.  Excellentverbal, written and computer skills are necessary in order to work effectivelyand collaboratively with clients, collaborating agencies and communityprofessionals, as well as, maintaining proper documentation.  Clinical staff members must be able totake and pass without major modification a course in Handle with Care, whichrequires hands-on, physical components to ensure the safety of the clients andstaff. Clinical staff members must possess reliable transportation, ability toacquire an F endorsement on driver's license and transport clients.HRMCis an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers License Record, DegreeVerification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingent upon cleandrug screen, background check and driving record. Additionally, certainprograms are subject to TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingual applicantsare encouraged to apply.HRMC iscurrently seeking a qualified and enthusiastic professional for the following position:  Hamilton County Case Manager.Job SummaryProvides information and referral, agency linkage, advocacy, home visits and follow-up services as defined by the Case Management Service Plan. Provides crisis intervention and emergency services, as well as utilizes center-wide and community resources as needed for client benefit. Embraces key values of case management: empowerment, normalization, rehabilitation, and continuity of care.Job RequirementsEducation/Knowledge: Bachelors degree in human servicesor related field with course work or experience in the areas of culturaldiversity, human development, etiology and treatment of mental illness, alcoholand drug abuse, physical and sexual abuse, suicide, and mental retardation.Experience: One year experience in a humanservices or related field preferred. Experience working with childrenpreferred.Essential Functions: 1) This position requires utilizinga personal, dependable vehicle to conduct Center business. Maintaining adependable vehicle and certified driver status is a condition of employment. 2)This position requires certification in and adequate implementation of verbaland physical de-escalation techniques that include a wide range of bodilymovements including but not limited to grasping, holding another person,running, and walking.Physical: Exposure to biological hazards.Hearing of normal and soft tones. Close eye work. Valid driver's license with Fendorsement. Lifting up to 50 lbs. Pushing/pulling up to 150 lbs. frequentsitting, standing, walking, bending, stooping, and reaching.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1200&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Hamilton County Adult Case Manager Job in Chattanooga,Full Time,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hamilton-county-adult-case-manager-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169269990.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=9,,,ba323d6f70f813341955bc2a4ca0be1b
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:04:14:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"The goal of the Outside Sales Representative position on our Document Services team is to prepare you for taking on your own territory by starting you in a Trainee capacity. Reynolds Document Services provides over 5,000 different types of printed forms and promotional items to the automotive market, including business forms, license plate frames, banners, and much more. As a Trainee, you will be assigned a seasoned Sales Representative, as a mentor, to learn about our products and the overall sales process within various accounts and territories. You will assist your mentor in lead generation and other aspects of the sales cycle. Once you complete the training period and a territory becomes available, you will be required to relocate to the open territory and take over selling documents and promotional products to existing customers as the territory’s assigned Sales Representative. In this role, you will also develop and maintain new customers throughout your specified territory. You are eligible to receive a company car for both business and personal use. In addition, you will be provided a company cell phone, laptop and home office equipment.Document Services Facts: With eight out of 10 car dealerships in the U.S. using a document or product produced by Reynolds – Reynolds Document Services has a level of brand awareness that stands out with dealerships. Document Services delivers the Reynolds brand with excellence. In Voice of the Customer surveys, dealers score Reynolds documents a near-perfect 97 percent in customer satisfaction.Training:Our extensive, world class training includes on-the-job training with a mentor, as well as classroom instruction at our corporate headquarters in Dayton, Ohio. You will complete courses on our products, processes, sales skills and automotive dealership operations. We take the time to train you right because your success is our future. Requirements:·         Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience·         Must be a self-starter with the ability to schedule time effectively·         Strong influential skills/level of charisma for building long-term relationships with customers·         Good organizational skills·         Ability to learn both sales process and product and make applicable use of knowledge·         Must be willing to relocate upon completion of trainingBenefits:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including:·         Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance·         401(k) with up to 6% matching·         Company car for business and personal use·         Working remotely with a company cell phone, laptop, and other provided home office equipment·         Professional development and training·         Promotion from within·         Referral bonuses·         Associate discounts for cell phones, cars, computers, entertainment, and much more  Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Outside Sales Representative (Trainee) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",AllRetailBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-representative-trainee-job-boston-ma-us-169373758.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=9,"$40,000.00+ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,8953c51bc7c4984a58e603b30096ff68
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:04:34:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Software Engineer (Python)Senior Software Engineer (Python) My team and I are currently working on a Sr. Software Engineer role with a cutting edge cloud software company just outside of Boston. They have been named Boston's Best places to work for the last 3 years and offer a competitive salary and excellent work environment. The ideal candidate will have Middleware experience and be comfortable coding and developing with Python. If this sounds like perfect next step in your career, we want to see YOUR resume! Apply today!! Qualifications:At least 4 years' hands-on Python experience; comfortable with intricate, multi-threaded programmingStrong MySQL skills- complex queries, troubleshooting, basic administrationAble to work easily in a Linux environmentSolid object-oriented design skills, familiar with common software architecturesDistributed source control system experience (GIT strongly preferred, comparable program also acceptable)Proactive approach to tasks and problemsExcellent communication and interpersonal skills, able to make meaningful contributions in a small to mid-sized team development settingExperience in a fast-paced Agile/ Scrum environmentUnderstanding of ETL frameworksBachelor's degree in a technical field, or equivalent progressive work experienceGD123 Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Senior Software Engineer (Python) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Computer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-software-engineer-python-job-boston-ma-us-169428345.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,5fd9938a8e06a06455cc04bc4f373878
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:04:39:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"This individual will be responsible for reviewing, reconciling, and maintaining a variety of accounting and financial data and information, including assisting with financial closings, preparing a variety of reports and records of assets and liabilities, and other complex financial transactions. This highly visible position will report directly to the Accounting Manager and offers the opportunity to move up and advance quickly within the organization.Client DetailsThis publicly-traded environmental company has grown for the past 40 years through organic growth as well as acquisitions across the globe. Headquartered in Norwell, MA, this company is the most well-known and highly-regarded throughout the Northeastern United States in the space in which it operates. With a culture of promoting from within, individuals that join the company tend to stay and grow their careers.DescriptionPrepare reconciliations of specialized balance sheet accounts that are more complex in nature; Prepare account analyses of the more complex balance sheet accounts with month to month changes and year to year changesAnswer questions from external auditors and provide support as neededSupport the Field and other business units regarding revenues, expenses, prepaids, accruals, etc. and other journal entry or monthly questions that ariseAssist in the preparation of monthly, quarterly and annual financial statements including assisting Reporting Manager with consolidation requirementsPrepare financial information included in footnotes and management discussion of 10Qs and 10Ks; Prepare some of the more difficult footnotes under the Corporate Accounting responsibilityAssist in the preparation of the annual budget and participate in the forecasting process as needed.Key Liaison with external auditors for quarterly and annual filings.ProfileBachelor's Degree in Accounting, Finance, or related field3+ years of Public Accounting experience requiredCPA license or actively pursuing with sections passedAdvanced Microsoft Excel skills and proficiency in Windows based applications and Accounting Information systemsJob OfferInterested? Submit your resume now!",Senior Accountant: Publicly-Traded Environmental Firm Job in Norwell,"Full Time , Employee","Norwell, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-publicly-traded-environmental-firm-job-norwell-ma-us-168929640.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=5,,,3b21c09022d938ceb5f4221570d5a33a
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:05:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionSales Management TraineeAs one of the nation's largest consumer finance organizations, Springleaf serves more than 1 million customers with personal loans, automobile loans, and other credit-related products. ""Lending made personal"" reflects our commitment to putting customers first. For 90 years, we've made the Springleaf promise of friendly, fast and affordable financing a reality for our customers. Opportunities to advance to the roles of Branch Manager, District Manager and beyond are possible for those demonstrating leadership skills. You can also expand those opportunities by demonstrating a willingness to relocate. Relocation benefits are based on position eligibility and IRS guidelines. Starting your career with Springleaf, you have the potential to earn $40,000 per year with salary and incentives. As you progress to Branch Manager, you have the potential to earn $60,000 per year with salary and incentives.Responsibilities:• Business development and full cycle sales of personal loans, automobile loans and other credit related products• Follow up on leads from customer inquiries (online or through customer service)• Assist customers in making financial decisions to help them achieve their financial goals.• Learn all facets of direct consumer lending• Learn credit underwriting techniques and skills• Manage servicing and collections activities• Provide referral or walk-in customers with the proper loan products to fit their needs• Accurately comply with company guidelines and procedures• Educate customers on the terms and conditions of the loan to ensure a clear understanding• Network within the community to gain referral business• Work as an individual contributor and as part of the team to achieve business/organizational objectivesRequirementsQualifications:• Bachelor's degree or some college preferred• Relevant work experience in Retail Sales or Customer Service a plusOR• HS Diploma/GED; and• 1 Years full-time, relevant work experienceo Sales experience (e.g. retail sales, sales goals, commission sales, account executive); oro Management/Supervisory - in a sales/service industryAND• Excellent verbal and written communication skills• Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment• Demonstrated leadership abilities, motivation, competitive drive and outgoing personality• Must have a valid driver's license• Bilingual English/Spanish skills a plus in certain areasSpringleaf team members benefit from competitive pay and sales driven incentive programs, relocation benefits, health, dental, vision, 401K, profit sharing, paid time-off, paid volunteer time, tuition reimbursement and much more. Our Team Members work in a collaborative manner to support one another to create a great work environment.Take the first step toward a challenging and rewarding career at Springleaf! Apply now!Relevant Tags: Sales, Retail, Loan Sales, Customer Service, Customer Care, Business Development, New Grad, Newly Graduated, Entry level, Financial Sales, Management Development, Management Trainee, Finance, Full-time, Career, Benefits, Customer experience, Financial Representative, Credit",Sales Management Trainee Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-management-trainee-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169402376.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,55b5f56097924fa64a1e09d3a6a4d626
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:11:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Chattanooga,Part Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169304277.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,c1a06a061a802a9dde59c3236965e41a
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:13:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Private equity backed Oil & Gas business seeks Senior Accountant following recent acquisition.Client DetailsMy client is a private equity owned Oil & Gas company with operations West of Boston.DescriptionReporting into the Chief Financial Officer, the role is to assist the accounting department by performing several functions including: reconciling specific complex accounts with significant judgment and estimates (such as Electricity Revenue, environmental reserves), developing policies and procedures to enhance the divisional monthly close process, preparing complex journal entries, assist with year-end audit, assist with year-end financial statement with footnote disclosure, and other projects as directed by management. Additional duties and responsibilities will include the following:Prepare complex accounting entries and prepare reconciliations for complex accounts.Review judgments and estimates used in determining the balances for reasonableness and appropriateness.Obtain supporting documentation and make recommendations for assumptions used for the Electricity division activity and LNG division activity and other accounts and reconcile the support to the amount recorded on the trial balance. Post journal entries for any adjustments needed.To ensure that respective accounts are updated to the current balance and post journal entries to adjust in a timely manner.Identify key controls and key control gaps in existing process cycles.Policies and procedures are maintained in a central database, with updates posted by finance.Review procedures for appropriateness and identify areas to gain efficiency's. Identify controls for testing and control gaps for remediation.To ensure there are written policies and procedures for all significant accounting processes.To ensure there are adequate controls over the accounting process.Assist in the preparation of year-end financial statements with footnote disclosures.Audited year-end financial statements are required to be submitted to the bank within 105 days from year-end.Assist with the year-end audit and preparation and coordination of year-end audit schedules, work as primary contact with auditors to answer questions and prepare analysis related to assigned areas/accounts.By preparing requested audit schedules. Respond to auditor's requests by coordinating with appropriate Company personnel to obtain the information.Communicate with Company personnel the request and objective of the information requested.To ensure the audit schedules are accurate and reasonable.This individual will have direct contact with most departments within the company, vendors and with the external auditors. This individual will work primarily with the Asst Controller, VP Controller, Operational Accounting etc.Apply today for immediate consideration!ProfileIn return for a competitive remuneration package, the successful candidate will possess the following:Big Four accounting experience (non-negotiable)CPA (non-negotiable)A minimum of three years accounting experience, ideally having already taken the step out of public accountingAbility to work under tight deadlines, prioritize tasks, work well with others, identify issues along with potential resolutions.Job Offer$90,000 to $105,000 base salary plus bonus.",Senior Accountant - Private Equity Backed Firm Job in Wellesley,"Full Time , Employee","Wellesley, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-private-equity-backed-firm-job-wellesley-ma-us-168870982.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=15,"90,000.00 - 105,000.00 $ /year",,691c7db3a67119b03d967470103e65a4
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:30:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is searching for an Applications Developer in the Boston area. Description * Lead requirements gathering, service-oriented modeling, analysis and design activities * Evaluate business requirements and prepare detailed functional and technical specifications * Communicate design to all stakeholders and varying levels of the organization * Serve as the liaison between business and systems analysts, developers and project management groups * Collaborate with quality assurance team to ensure testing efforts align with system deliveries and business processes * Develop strategies to improve service development life cycle and governance processes * Develop detailed source-to-target data mapping and data transformation rules * Develop and use enterprise service and data models * Evaluate business requirements and develops solutions/design that follow project guidelines and are required to develop written programs * Formulates, defines and documents the functional system specifications * Devises or modifies system design that solve complex business problems with due consideration for hardware/software capacity and limitations, operating times and the desired results * Analyzes and revises existing functional documentation * Present and evaluate design solutions objectively and facilitate conflict resolution * Assists in training junior level personnel in technical complexities of assigned work Positions in this function work in the analysis phase of the system development cycle and consult with users to evaluate business requirements, identify operating procedures and create detailed system specifications from which programs will be written Required Qualifications: * Bachelor's Degree or equivalent work experience * 3+ years of experience in Systems Analysis or IT Development * 3+ years of experience in all phases of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) /System Development Life Cycle * 3+ years of experience translating business requirements into a detailed system specification * Proficiency with MS Project, Word, Excel, Visio, PowerPoint * 3+ years of Relational Database experience Preferred Qualifications: * Healthcare experience * Experience working with test plans and test cases Please contact Russell Carlson Experis 855-407-7986 Ext 405 Russell.Carlson@experis.comExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",IT - Applications Development Consultant Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,IT - Applications Development Consultant,"Boston, MA",http://jobview.monster.com/it-applications-development-consultant-job-boston-ma-us-169378956.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,597e148e93e1c123f133ae131d3a02b6
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:32:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"AGFA // &lt;br /&gt;$(document).ready(function(){&lt;br /&gt; finalizePage();&lt;br /&gt;&lt;br /&gt; $(&apos;.popup-gallery&apos;).magnificPopup({&lt;br /&gt; delegate: &apos;a.popup-image&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; type: &apos;image&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; tLoading: &apos;Loading image #%curr%...&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; closeOnContentClick: false,&lt;br /&gt; mainClass: &apos;mfp-img-mobile&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; gallery: {&lt;br /&gt; enabled: true,&lt;br /&gt; navigateByImgClick: true,&lt;br /&gt; preload: [0,1] // Will preload 0 - before current, and 1 after the current image&lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; callbacks: {&lt;br /&gt; buildControls: function() {&lt;br /&gt; // re-appends controls inside the main container&lt;br /&gt; var items = $(&quot;.popup-image&quot;).children(&quot;img&quot;).size();&lt;br /&gt; if (items &gt; 1) this.contentContainer.append(this.arrowLeft.add(this.arrowRight));&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; image: {&lt;br /&gt; tError: &apos;The image #%curr% could not be loaded.&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; titleSrc: function(item) {&lt;br /&gt; var title = item.el.attr(&apos;title&apos;);&lt;br /&gt; var alt = item.el.attr(&apos;alt&apos;);&lt;br /&gt; var link = item.el.attr(&apos;link&apos;);&lt;br /&gt; var text = &quot;&quot;;&lt;br /&gt; if (!!title) text = title;&lt;br /&gt; if (!!alt) text += &apos;&lt;br&gt; &apos; + alt;&lt;br /&gt; if (!!link) text += &apos;&lt;br&gt; &apos; + link;&lt;br /&gt; return text;&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; });&lt;br /&gt; });&lt;br /&gt;// // &lt;br /&gt;cc.initialise({&lt;br /&gt; cookies: {&lt;br /&gt; analytics: {&lt;br /&gt; title: &apos;Analytics&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; description: &apos;We anonymously measure your use of this website to improve your experience&apos; &lt;br /&gt; , link: &apos;/co/global/en/internet/main/cookies.jsp&apos;&lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; necessary: {&lt;br /&gt; title: &apos;Strictly necessary&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; description: &apos;Some cookies on this website are strictly necessary and cannot be disabled&lt;br/&gt;The support for Social media can cause third party cookies to be loaded.&apos;&lt;br /&gt; , link: &apos;/co/global/en/internet/main/cookies.jsp&apos;&lt;br /&gt; } &lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; settings: {consenttype: &quot;implicit&quot;, hideprivacysettingstab: true, bannerPosition: &apos;bottom&apos;, tagPosition: &apos;bottom-right&apos;, style: &quot;light&quot;, disableallsites: true, useSSL: false},&lt;br /&gt; strings: {&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; seeDetails: &apos;see details&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; hideDetails: &apos;hide details&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; learnMore: &apos;learn more&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; savePreference: &apos;Save preference&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; closeWindow: &apos;Close window&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; privacySettings: &apos;Privacy settings&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; privacySettingsDialogTitleA: &apos;Privacy settings&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; privacySettingsDialogTitleB: &apos;for this website&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; privacySettingsDialogSubtitle: &apos;Some features of this website need your consent to remember who you are&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; preferenceConsent: &apos;I Consent&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; preferenceDecline: &apos;I Decline&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; notificationTitleImplicit: &apos;Agfa uses cookies to ensure you get the best experience on this website.&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; seeDetailsImplicit: &apos;change your settings&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; allowCookiesImplicit: &apos;close&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; allowCookies: &apos;Allow cookies&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; notificationTitle: &apos;Your experience on this site will be improved by allowing cookies&apos;&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; });&lt;br /&gt;// The Agfa-Gevaert Group develops, produces and distributes an extensive range of analog and digital imaging systems and IT solutions, mainly for the printing industry and the healthcare sector, as well as for specific industrial applications. Agfa-Gevaert has three focused business groups: Agfa Graphics, Agfa HealthCare, and Agfa Specialty Products. Agfa's headquarters and parent company are located in Mortsel, Belgium. The company has production facilities around the world, with the largest production and research centers in Belgium, the United States, Germany and China.  Agfa is commercially active worldwide through more than 40 wholly-owned sales organizations. In countries where Agfa does not have its own sales organization, the market is served by a network of agents, distributors and representatives. The Purchasing Department supports the three business groups as a Global Shared Service organization in finding the best vendors/suppliers at the best quality, with the right delivery capabilities and at an optimal price under the TCO (Total Cost of Ownership) principle. The team is a global team with the largest group in the HQ. The performance and quality of Agfa product offerings and services in the IT area in Healthcare is a key contributor to revenue and profit enhancement. A significant portion of performance and quality is linked to suppliers’ selection and performance. Agfa Purchasing Department North America is looking for an IT Technology Vendor Manager for both hardware and software. This position suppors all the business units and departments to optimize direct spend, in line with Global Best-Practice and Guidelines: Build and maintain a comprehensive IT HealthCare fact base Identify strategic procurement opportunities Perform qualitative and quantitative analysis to support the formation and execution of IT strategies resulting in superior cost and availability performance. This position has both Global and Regional, upstream and downstream strategic responsibilities, including engagement with thought leaders, developing positioning and supporting the planning and execution of content along the customer buying cycle. The IT Technology Vendor Manager will need to foster strong peer relationships with various key business group leads. This position will report directly to the Head of Purchasing HealthCare North America. This position may be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area: Boston, MA New York, NY Carlstadt, NJ   AGFA // &lt;br /&gt;$(document).ready(function(){&lt;br /&gt; finalizePage();&lt;br /&gt;&lt;br /&gt; $(&apos;.popup-gallery&apos;).magnificPopup({&lt;br /&gt; delegate: &apos;a.popup-image&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; type: &apos;image&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; tLoading: &apos;Loading image #%curr%...&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; closeOnContentClick: false,&lt;br /&gt; mainClass: &apos;mfp-img-mobile&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; gallery: {&lt;br /&gt; enabled: true,&lt;br /&gt; navigateByImgClick: true,&lt;br /&gt; preload: [0,1] // Will preload 0 - before current, and 1 after the current image&lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; callbacks: {&lt;br /&gt; buildControls: function() {&lt;br /&gt; // re-appends controls inside the main container&lt;br /&gt; var items = $(&quot;.popup-image&quot;).children(&quot;img&quot;).size();&lt;br /&gt; if (items &gt; 1) this.contentContainer.append(this.arrowLeft.add(this.arrowRight));&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; image: {&lt;br /&gt; tError: &apos;The image #%curr% could not be loaded.&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; titleSrc: function(item) {&lt;br /&gt; var title = item.el.attr(&apos;title&apos;);&lt;br /&gt; var alt = item.el.attr(&apos;alt&apos;);&lt;br /&gt; var link = item.el.attr(&apos;link&apos;);&lt;br /&gt; var text = &quot;&quot;;&lt;br /&gt; if (!!title) text = title;&lt;br /&gt; if (!!alt) text += &apos;&lt;br&gt; &apos; + alt;&lt;br /&gt; if (!!link) text += &apos;&lt;br&gt; &apos; + link;&lt;br /&gt; return text;&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; });&lt;br /&gt; });&lt;br /&gt;// // &lt;br /&gt;cc.initialise({&lt;br /&gt; cookies: {&lt;br /&gt; analytics: {&lt;br /&gt; title: &apos;Analytics&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; description: &apos;We anonymously measure your use of this website to improve your experience&apos; &lt;br /&gt; , link: &apos;/co/global/en/internet/main/cookies.jsp&apos;&lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; necessary: {&lt;br /&gt; title: &apos;Strictly necessary&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; description: &apos;Some cookies on this website are strictly necessary and cannot be disabled&lt;br/&gt;The support for Social media can cause third party cookies to be loaded.&apos;&lt;br /&gt; , link: &apos;/co/global/en/internet/main/cookies.jsp&apos;&lt;br /&gt; } &lt;br /&gt; },&lt;br /&gt; settings: {consenttype: &quot;implicit&quot;, hideprivacysettingstab: true, bannerPosition: &apos;bottom&apos;, tagPosition: &apos;bottom-right&apos;, style: &quot;light&quot;, disableallsites: true, useSSL: false},&lt;br /&gt; strings: {&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; seeDetails: &apos;see details&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; hideDetails: &apos;hide details&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; learnMore: &apos;learn more&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; savePreference: &apos;Save preference&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; closeWindow: &apos;Close window&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; privacySettings: &apos;Privacy settings&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; privacySettingsDialogTitleA: &apos;Privacy settings&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; privacySettingsDialogTitleB: &apos;for this website&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; privacySettingsDialogSubtitle: &apos;Some features of this website need your consent to remember who you are&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; preferenceConsent: &apos;I Consent&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; preferenceDecline: &apos;I Decline&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; notificationTitleImplicit: &apos;Agfa uses cookies to ensure you get the best experience on this website.&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; seeDetailsImplicit: &apos;change your settings&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; allowCookiesImplicit: &apos;close&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; &lt;br /&gt; allowCookies: &apos;Allow cookies&apos;,&lt;br /&gt; notificationTitle: &apos;Your experience on this site will be improved by allowing cookies&apos;&lt;br /&gt; }&lt;br /&gt; });&lt;br /&gt;// The Agfa-Gevaert Group develops, produces and distributes an extensive range of analog and digital imaging systems and IT solutions, mainly for the printing industry and the healthcare sector, as well as for specific industrial applications. Agfa-Gevaert has three focused business groups: Agfa Graphics, Agfa HealthCare, and Agfa Specialty Products. Agfa's headquarters and parent company are located in Mortsel, Belgium. The company has production facilities around the world, with the largest production and research centers in Belgium, the United States, Germany and China.  Agfa is commercially active worldwide through more than 40 wholly-owned sales organizations. In countries where Agfa does not have its own sales organization, the market is served by a network of agents, distributors and representatives. The Purchasing Department supports the three business groups as a Global Shared Service organization in finding the best vendors/suppliers at the best quality, with the right delivery capabilities and at an optimal price under the TCO (Total Cost of Ownership) principle. The team is a global team with the largest group in the HQ. The performance and quality of Agfa product offerings and services in the IT area in Healthcare is a key contributor to revenue and profit enhancement. A significant portion of performance and quality is linked to suppliers’ selection and performance. Agfa Purchasing Department North America is looking for an IT Technology Vendor Manager for both hardware and software. This position suppors all the business units and departments to optimize direct spend, in line with Global Best-Practice and Guidelines: Build and maintain a comprehensive IT HealthCare fact base Identify strategic procurement opportunities Perform qualitative and quantitative analysis to support the formation and execution of IT strategies resulting in superior cost and availability performance. This position has both Global and Regional, upstream and downstream strategic responsibilities, including engagement with thought leaders, developing positioning and supporting the planning and execution of content along the customer buying cycle. The IT Technology Vendor Manager will need to foster strong peer relationships with various key business group leads. This position will report directly to the Head of Purchasing HealthCare North America. This position may be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area: Boston, MA New York, NY Carlstadt, NJ   The IT Technology Vendor Manager performs critical planning, research, and analytics required to develop and execute a sourcing strategy for a defined category within IT HealthCare (Hardware, Software, and Services), and is an individual contributor. Sourcing Strategy Assist the pertinent business groups within IT Healthcare in developing and implementing strategies. Analyze historical and forecasted spend to identify and evaluate strategic sourcing opportunities across multiple commodities and subcategories Analyze market dynamics and supply base for each commodity, including supplier cost structure and drivers, economic improvement levers, and major trends Execute the supplier RFP/RFQ process and negotiate costs Coordinates with internal and external stakeholders to facilitate compliance sign-off for new contracts Perform ad-hoc research and analysis to support the buying and subcontracting teams Supplier Management Manages both the existing and potential supply base strategy for the designated category Evaluate existing supplier delivery, cost, and quality performance through the development and maintenance of a supplier scorecard Work with suppliers to implement supplier improvement initiatives Develop relationships with new suppliers that support commodity strategies and program requirements. Engagement of Strategic Meetings and Cross-Functional Teams Participates on the management team and other committees addressing the strategic goals of the department and organization.    Required Skills: Strong understanding of the IT industry both HW & SW and competitive environment, Healthcare is a plus. Demonstrated results in achieving increasing value and significant savings for stakeholders (internal customers) Business analysis [Possession of sound business instincts and analytical capabilities that can be leveraged to generate logically sound conclusions regarding business decisions (e.g., business case and strategy development, market research)] Contract management/ FDA compliance (Experience tailoring contract T&Cs and/or managing compliance processes) Project management (Ability to methodically plan complex processes and delegate tasks to appropriate individuals or groups; Ability to monitor progress vs. plans and make adjustments accordingly) Strong skill set in gaining market place intelligence and communicating the commercial impact of such information back to internal decision makers for timely resolve  Complementary competencies: Critical thinking ( Ability to process complex issues and perform sound, objective, data-based analysis to draw logical conclusions; Consistent application of logical reasoning to identify opportunities and manage risk in a business) Quantitative analysis (Should-cost pricing, variance analysis, cost structure evaluation and modeling, supplier economics) Communication (Ability to synthesize complex data and analyses into compelling written or presentation materials to facilitate decision-making; Ability to engage in active listening and draw out key conclusions from colleagues)       Supplier development (Ability to build and maintain supplier relationships; supplier performance management) Category expertise (Familiarity with end-user requirements and specifications for specific product categories; Understanding of the relevant supplier landscape and relationships with key suppliers; -Knowledge of key cost drivers of sourced materials/services; Commodity strategy development and implementation) Commodity strategy development and implementation) Familiarity with FDA Compliance guidelines is strongly preferred Ability to travel 20% of the time – both domestically and internationally Experience/Education: Bachelor Degree in IT, Business Administration or Technical Discipline. Master Degree preferred. Minimum 5 years experience in an IT environment, preferably in Healthcare or in another relevant industry. Purchasing experience in industries where IT is critical to the business (HealthCare/Medical, Software companies, Banking, Telecom, etc.) is a plus. Minimum 5 years of experience working with financial information as a means of decision making, pricing and benchmarking. Capabilities to work internationally We offer a rewarding career in a field that impacts lives, the opportunity to work with a talented, committed team of individuals, training and career development programs, and a competitive compensation and benefits package. If you want to be part of this experience, we'll take you there.   Learn more about Agfa HealthCare and follow us on Twitter.   Agfa HealthCare Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities/Women/Individuals with Disabilities/Protected Veterans #LIPOST  #LIPOST #LIPOST",IT Technology Vendor Manager(b) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-technology-vendor-manager-b-job-boston-ma-us-169482296.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=5,,Other,dfa9b948c918f8429383a3af9259e20c
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:46:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Applications Development Manager EDUCATION: BS / BA or equivalentEXPERIENCE: 8-10 yearsADDITIONAL SKILLS: Knowledge of complicated database architecture, programming methods, development concepts, project and resource planning and management, understanding of software applications and proven success in managing a team and executing.MANAGEMENT OF STAFF: Provide leadership and management of development team, including Developers, Solution Architects, Report Writers and ContractorsREPORTS TO: CTOTechnical SkillsC#Object Oriented ProgrammingSQL Server 2008/2012T-SQLOLTP/OLAPSQL Server Integration ServicesTeam Foundation ServerVisual Studio 2013/2015Crystal, SSRS, or other reporting toolsI wanted to see if you, or anyone you know, would be interested in having a conversation about some of our current Application Development Manager opportunities in Boston. We currently working with innovative company.I would love to speak with you as soon as possible to see if this opportunity aligns with your career goals. Please call me at 617-451-5900 or let me know the best time and number to reach you.Even if you are not actively seeking opportunities right now, please still follow up with me for future roles in 2017, it never hurts to network!Michael HanRecruiting ManagerDIVISION OF SNI COMPANIESGrow your business. Grow your career.Three Center Plaza, Suite 200Boston, MA 02108Phone 617.451.5900 Fax 617.451.3825",Applications Development Manager Job in Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/applications-development-manager-job-boston-ma-us-169481502.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e7d3340094ef7f0fa5274cc71ac45ca1
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:51:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title #317 Chattanooga Co-Manager Auto req ID 1222BR Address 1 2288 Gunbarrel Road Suite 118 City Chattanooga State/Province Tennessee Zip Code 37421 Job Description - Overview ARE YOU AN A+ PLAYER? Do you have the desire to become a Store Manager, District Manager, or even a Regional Vice President, but feel stuck in your current position? At Hobby Lobby, since we only promote from within, that desire can become a reality!We recognize that success begins with our people, and that beginning could start with you! We want to find the right people to integrate into our unique company culture. A Co-Manager is the first step to becoming a Hobby Lobby Store Manager, or even developing into a Multi-Unit Manager position.Co-Managers are responsible for assisting the Store Manager in managing the day-to-day operations of the store, as well as maintaining our Seasonal Department. Possessing strong merchandising skills and consistent detailed operations are essential to our company’s success. Qualified candidates will be energetic motivators who aren’t afraid of a “hands-on” management approach.A CO-MANAGER IS INVOLVED IN: Financial Goals Operational Controls Customer Relations Inventory Management Job Description - Requirements Relocation is preferred. Must have previous retail Store Management experience. Demonstrate leadership and work ethic in a fast-paced environment. Regional and district travel will be expected for participation in various store projects. EOE - Drug/Alcohol testing compliant with applicable statutes. For reasonable accommodation of disability during the hiring process call (877)303-4547.",# Chattanooga Co-Manager Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/317-chattanooga-co-manager-job-chattanooga-tn-us-168540360.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=11,,Retail,4e38171ed13d286880936769afdc4e68
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:53:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce client outside Boston, MA is looking to fill an Assistant Controller position. A great opportunity for someone coming out of public accounting this is a chance to provide leadership and coordination of company accounting and financial reporting functions. Ensures company accounting procedures conform to generally accepted accounting principles. The Assistant controller will be responsible for managing the general ledger close and reconciliation process including assisting in the preparation of our SEC filings, including the 10-Qs and 10-K, Proxy Statement and miscellaneous filings. This position will report to the Controller, and will interact closely with the Accounting Department as well as all major functional leaders of the Company and senior executives. The ideal candidate should be a highly motivated self-starter, a creative problem solver, with a strong desire to make an important contribution to the financial management of a dynamic and fast growing company. Essential Responsibilities and Duties: Manage routine GL system maintenance and monthly GL account reconciliation preparation, journal entry controls, and month end financial closing process Manage monthly, quarterly, and year end accounting close process including financial reporting Prepare the Quarterly and Annual Reports on Form 10-Q and 10K and manage the internal and external review for these documents Assist in preparation of quarterly earnings release Assist in the coordination of annual audit and quarterly review activities of external auditorsREQUIREMENTS: Knowledge of finance, accounting, budgeting, and cost control principles in public company including Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP). Knowledge of automated financial and accounting reporting systems Public company SEC reporting is a must, including 10K, 10Q etc.; internal controls and SOX compliance experience is beneficial Consolidation of multiple subsidiaries Consolidation of foreign subsidiaries Big 4 and CPA license a plus",Assistant Controller (Publicly Traded Company) Job in Billerica,Full Time Employee,"Billerica, MA 01821",,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-controller-publicly-traded-company-job-billerica-ma-us-169472497.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=1,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5d3aad5e4a3b342727ad928861bb4980
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:05:54:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Agfa HealthCare, a member of the Agfa-Gevaert Group, is a leading global provider of diagnostic imaging and healthcare IT solutions. The company has nearly a century of healthcare experience and has been a pioneer on the healthcare IT market since the early 1990's. Today, Agfa HealthCare designs, develops and delivers state-of-the-art systems for capturing, managing and processing diagnostic images and clinical/administrative information for hospitals and healthcare facilities, as well as contrast media solutions to enable effective medical imaging results. The company has sales offices and agents in over 100 markets worldwide.   SOFTWARE ENGINEER   SUMMARY This position is responsible for providing design guidance and writing code to implement functionality using prescribed software development tools and processes to meet business goals.  Under minimal supervision, the Software Engineer is responsible to manage assignments in a proficient and professional manner.  The Software Engineer will work with individuals in development, marketing, testing and service departments and across geographical boundaries to ensure that the goals of the software release phase are met.   This postion will be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area Boston, MA Canton, MA   Agfa HealthCare, a member of the Agfa-Gevaert Group, is a leading global provider of diagnostic imaging and healthcare IT solutions. The company has nearly a century of healthcare experience and has been a pioneer on the healthcare IT market since the early 1990's. Today, Agfa HealthCare designs, develops and delivers state-of-the-art systems for capturing, managing and processing diagnostic images and clinical/administrative information for hospitals and healthcare facilities, as well as contrast media solutions to enable effective medical imaging results. The company has sales offices and agents in over 100 markets worldwide.   SOFTWARE ENGINEER   SUMMARY This position is responsible for providing design guidance and writing code to implement functionality using prescribed software development tools and processes to meet business goals.  Under minimal supervision, the Software Engineer is responsible to manage assignments in a proficient and professional manner.  The Software Engineer will work with individuals in development, marketing, testing and service departments and across geographical boundaries to ensure that the goals of the software release phase are met.   This postion will be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area Boston, MA Canton, MA   RESONSIBILITIES Manage day-to-day assignments to resolve software defects and implement features to meet schedule commitments with a high-level of quality, and applying appropriate diligence for design, software changes and testing. Ensure that work products meet all requisite software development practices and sanctioned production processes including the creation of regulatory artifacts. Work collaboratively with software development peers and cross-functional counterparts to ensure that relevant information is communicated in a timely and comprehensible manner to satisfy the goals of the production cycle.  Proactive communication with individuals and managers in the roles of design control, resource management, and business planning. Acquire, share, and apply knowledge of standards, tools and technology with a focus on pragmatic application to business prioritized software solutions. RESONSIBILITIES Manage day-to-day assignments to resolve software defects and implement features to meet schedule commitments with a high-level of quality, and applying appropriate diligence for design, software changes and testing. Ensure that work products meet all requisite software development practices and sanctioned production processes including the creation of regulatory artifacts. Work collaboratively with software development peers and cross-functional counterparts to ensure that relevant information is communicated in a timely and comprehensible manner to satisfy the goals of the production cycle.  Proactive communication with individuals and managers in the roles of design control, resource management, and business planning. Acquire, share, and apply knowledge of standards, tools and technology with a focus on pragmatic application to business prioritized software solutions. REQUIREMENTS Required   A minimum of 3 years software development experience with HTML5, CSS, and JavaScript A minimum of 5-6 year software development experience working in a team environment applying Object-Oriented design to complex solutions and extensive background in applying these skills in a technical lead role preferred. Professional experience developing rich user interfaces in the browser using frameworks such as AngularJS and jQuery  Experience in test-driven development practices Experience developing software using modern Java EE (EE 6+) Working knowledge of SQL databases: MySQL, Oracle  Bachelors in Computer Science/ Engineering or a related field. Preferred Experience working on teams that utilize Scrum as their Agile approach to software development Experience with Java web application development using IntelliJ IDEA (or the Eclipse IDE), Maven, and SVN Experience with systems integration strategies and patterns, such as REST/SOAP web services, messaging, direct SQL/LDAP  Familiarity with the following standard Java EE APIs: CDI, JPA, JSF 2.x, JAX-RS, JAX-WS, JAXB, JNDI, JMS, JDBC, Java API for Web Sockets (JSR-356) Knowledge of the industry standards for software development in the healthcare industry is a plus (such as the DICOM Standard, HIPAA regulations, etc.) TRAVEL Minimal We offer a rewarding career in a field that impacts lives, the opportunity to work with a talented, committed team of individuals, training and career development programs, and a competitive compensation and benefits package. If you want to be part of this experience, we'll take you there. Learn more about Agfa HealthCare and follow us on Twitter. Agfa HealthCare Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer. #LIPOST",Sr. Software Engineer (b) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-software-engineer-b-job-boston-ma-us-169482271.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=6,,Engineering,b2620e76750412d773175e8a73c4ae25
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:06:20:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Promote and sell offerings to individual customers by knocking every door within assigned territory. Displays familiarity with features, benefits, product differences, pricing and campaigns.Communicates and develops rapport with customers.Evaluates individual customers existing and potential product needs and makes recommendations.Increases customer understanding of the products and pricing models as well as competitive advantages over other service providers.Creates and executes basic sales plans with minimal assistance.Meets and exceeds sales goals as established by local market.Develop and demonstrate record of success in residential canvassing sales environment with emphasis on business to consumer sales.",Direct Sales - Full time - Chatanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/direct-sales-full-time-chatanooga-tn-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169342499.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,d7f0dbf3190e2f0dab1efdedef7d147e
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:06:31:30,No,jobs.monster.com," UPS Freight Truckload is hiring individuals to work as Full-time Dedicated OTR Dry Van Drivers. This position involves the driving of a tractor-trailer for the over-the-road delivery of freight to two or more locations. Dedicated drivers are primarily assigned to run freight for one customer, and may be assigned to an operation based at a specific customer location. These drivers are normally on the road from three to five days at a time. The term “dedicated” refers to the customer, not a particular lane or destination. Dedicated Drivers must pass a DOT physical and successfully pass a UPS Freight road test. Qualified applicants must have a valid Class A Commercial Drivers’ License with Haz-Mat endorsement. Dedicated Drivers are expected to comply with all appearance standards. Applicants must be at least 21 years of age. Applicants must be able to read, write and speak the English language. Applicants must also meet the Department of Transportation (DOT) and Company mental and physical requirements; and must be physically and mentally able to safely perform the essential job functions without obvious risk of injury to the employee or co-workers. Applicants must receive satisfactory results from a background check, as conducted in accordance with applicable laws; and must pass a drug screening.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS OTR CDL A Tractor-Trailer Truckload Driver (HazMat REQ) Dedicated Job in Chattanooga,,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-otr-cdl-a-tractor-trailer-truckload-driver-hazmat-req-dedicated-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169436738.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,abacec0bd41dd724fbfdd30edceb49c5
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:06:33:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Study Guides for pre-employment screening (click the links below to open the various study guides) Retail Sales Consultant Test Reid Report Apply now! Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Retail Sales Consultant Job in Boston,,"Boston, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-job-boston-ma-us-169160922.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=19,,,279e963e10e873204a701b3802fee2b3
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:06:53:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in the Medford, Massachusetts (MA) area is seeking an Entry Level Payroll Administrator on a temporary to permanent basis.Responsibilities Include: Processing payroll for 3,000 employees for U.S and Canada Reviews and implements internal controls and provides support on a variety of payroll projects and analysisREQUIREMENTS: 2 years of related payroll experience Experience working with Microsoft Office applications including Word and Excel required Automated payroll experience, working knowledge of Human Resources and Benefits as it relates to payroll and HRIS",Entry Level Payroll Administrator Job in Medford,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Medford, MA 02155",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-payroll-administrator-job-medford-ma-us-169060060.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5d0dd32eff9397d30238f8ef5b14f87f
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:07:09:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Agfa HealthCare, a member of the Agfa-Gevaert Group, is a leading global provider of diagnostic imaging and healthcare IT solutions. The company has nearly a century of healthcare experience and has been a pioneer on the healthcare IT market since the early 1990's. Today, Agfa HealthCare designs, develops and delivers state-of-the-art systems for capturing, managing and processing diagnostic images and clinical/administrative information for hospitals and healthcare facilities, as well as contrast media solutions to enable effective medical imaging results. The company has sales offices and agents in over 100 markets worldwide.   SOFTWARE ENGINEER   SUMMARY This position is responsible for providing design guidance and writing code to implement functionality using prescribed software development tools and processes to meet business goals.  Under minimal supervision, the Software Engineer is responsible to manage assignments in a proficient and professional manner.  The Software Engineer will work with individuals in development, marketing, testing and service departments and across geographical boundaries to ensure that the goals of the software release phase are met.   This postion will be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area Boston, MA Canton, MA   Agfa HealthCare, a member of the Agfa-Gevaert Group, is a leading global provider of diagnostic imaging and healthcare IT solutions. The company has nearly a century of healthcare experience and has been a pioneer on the healthcare IT market since the early 1990's. Today, Agfa HealthCare designs, develops and delivers state-of-the-art systems for capturing, managing and processing diagnostic images and clinical/administrative information for hospitals and healthcare facilities, as well as contrast media solutions to enable effective medical imaging results. The company has sales offices and agents in over 100 markets worldwide.   SOFTWARE ENGINEER   SUMMARY This position is responsible for providing design guidance and writing code to implement functionality using prescribed software development tools and processes to meet business goals.  Under minimal supervision, the Software Engineer is responsible to manage assignments in a proficient and professional manner.  The Software Engineer will work with individuals in development, marketing, testing and service departments and across geographical boundaries to ensure that the goals of the software release phase are met.   This postion will be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area Boston, MA Canton, MA   RESONSIBILITIES Manage day-to-day assignments to resolve software defects and implement features to meet schedule commitments with a high-level of quality, and applying appropriate diligence for design, software changes and testing. Ensure that work products meet all requisite software development practices and sanctioned production processes including the creation of regulatory artifacts. Work collaboratively with software development peers and cross-functional counterparts to ensure that relevant information is communicated in a timely and comprehensible manner to satisfy the goals of the production cycle.  Proactive communication with individuals and managers in the roles of design control, resource management, and business planning. Acquire, share, and apply knowledge of standards, tools and technology with a focus on pragmatic application to business prioritized software solutions. RESONSIBILITIES Manage day-to-day assignments to resolve software defects and implement features to meet schedule commitments with a high-level of quality, and applying appropriate diligence for design, software changes and testing. Ensure that work products meet all requisite software development practices and sanctioned production processes including the creation of regulatory artifacts. Work collaboratively with software development peers and cross-functional counterparts to ensure that relevant information is communicated in a timely and comprehensible manner to satisfy the goals of the production cycle.  Proactive communication with individuals and managers in the roles of design control, resource management, and business planning. Acquire, share, and apply knowledge of standards, tools and technology with a focus on pragmatic application to business prioritized software solutions. REQUIREMENTS Required   Experience in test-driven development practices Experience developing enterprise software using Java, J2EE (EE 6+) Experience working with Application Servers: Jboss (6+) Familiarity with Java EE APIs: CDI, JPA, JSF 2.x, JAX-RS, JAX-WS, JAXB, JNDI, JMS, JDBC Experience applying Object Oriented Design Patterns Experience working with SQL databases: Oracle, MySQL Experience working with Ontologies, semantic web, knowledge-bases Experience with Maven, and SVN Bachelors in Computer Science/ Engineering or a related field. A minimum of 5-6 year software development experience working in a team environment applying Object-Oriented design to complex solutions and extensive background in applying these skills in a technical lead role preferred. Preferred Experience working on teams that utilize Scrum as their Agile approach to software development Experience with systems integration strategies and patterns, such as REST/SOAP web services, messaging, direct SQL/LDAP Familiarity with SNOMED, LOINC Knowledge of RDF, OWL Knowledge of the industry standards for software development in the healthcare industry is a plus (such as the DICOM Standard, HIPAA regulations, etc.) We offer a rewarding career in a field that impacts lives, the opportunity to work with a talented, committed team of individuals, training and career development programs, and a competitive compensation and benefits package. If you want to be part of this experience, we'll take you there. Learn more about Agfa HealthCare and follow us on Twitter. Agfa HealthCare Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer. #LIPOST",Sr. Software Engineer (b) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-software-engineer-b-job-boston-ma-us-169482128.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=8,,Engineering,9878ff2cab66793853c2317b28f13304
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:07:10:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  Housekeepers are responsible for cleaning and maintaining the guestrooms to meet guest and client satisfaction. Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Vacuums large areas Empties and hauls trash Cleans restrooms Cleans conference rooms Cleans elevators and stairways Mops floors Spot cleans carpets Cleans glass and dusts furniture Cleans office cubicles Complies with all Aramark and the client's policies and procedures Follows all of Aramark's safety  policies Performs other cleaning duties assigned Qualifications Past cleaning experience preferred",Housekeeper - Unum Chattanooga - Part time nd shift Job in Chattanooga,"Part Time, Employee","Chattanooga, TN 37402",,http://jobview.monster.com/housekeeper-unum-chattanooga-part-time-2nd-shift-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169481045.aspx?mescoid=3700623001001&jobPosition=3,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,2948428f31f6f6fc4dc0bd7aff5a8153
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:07:19:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Tax Analyst - great team!My world renowned Financial Services firm is seeking a Senior Tax Analyst to join their team. If you are currently in Public Tax and are looking for a much better work / life balance this is the opportunity for you. Strong technical tax knowledge and 3+ years required. Keys:- Bachelor degree in Accounting, MST a huge plus- Public Accounting preferred- 3+ years- Strong technical tax accounting knowledge including experience with ASC 740 (FAS 109 & FIN 48) - Experience with CorpTax Provision software is preferred - Solid accounting background and analytical abilities - Ability to multi-task and prioritize work flow - Ability to work well in a team environment - Focus on deadlines and perform self-review of work Responsibilities include:- Assist with preparation and reconciliation of federal and state tax provisions and balance sheet accounts (taxes payable, DTL/DTA) and determination of valuation allowances for deferred tax assets. - Preparation of related income tax footnotes and other tax disclosures required under IFRS and US GAAP.- Prepare and/or review all federal, state, local income, and sales/use tax returns, tax payments and related workpapers. Includes all state extension requests as well as quarterly estimated tax payments.- Identifies process improvement opportunities related to the tax provision and tax compliance processes. Works with the accounting team to maximize opportunities for automating book to tax differences.- Assist in general tax projects as needed and provide daily support for ongoing activities of the tax department in the areas of miscellaneous corporate filings, international taxes, and strategic tax planning- Oversee tax audits and notices to ensure efficient resolution. For immediate consideration please contact: ttaormina@hollisterstaff.com Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Senior Tax Analyst - great team! Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-tax-analyst-great-team!-job-boston-ma-us-169482622.aspx?mescoid=1300116001001&jobPosition=4,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,567c3dd3e6ab8b411b97e9e7705254c6
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:07:19:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  657581Apex Systems, part of On Assignment the 2nd largest IT staffing Solutions firm in the country has an opportunity for a Senior Java Developer role in the Boston, MA area. It is a 6+ month (expected to be longer) contract position and the pay rate is flexible depending on experience. Here are the details:Please send a Word resume to Ally Pasquariello, Technical Recruiter, at apasquariello@apexsystemsinc.com• Position Title: Senior Java Developer• Location: Boston, MA• Pay Rate: Flexible based on experience• Duration: 6+ month contractResponsibilities:Hands-on codingBack end java development (working with front end teams as well)one project at a time- will work on multipleRequirements:1. Java 7+ years2. UI technologies; html, javascript, CSS (working knowledge) will not be front end developing3. Oracle4. Multi-threading5. SpringDesired Skills: IBM MQEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.",Sr. java Developer Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  657581Apex Systems, part of On Assignment the 2nd largest IT staffing Solutions firm in the country has an opportunity for a Senior Java Developer role in the Boston, MA area. It is a 6+ month (expected to be longer) contract position and the pay rate is flexible depending on experience. Here are the details:Please send a Word resume to Ally Pasquariello, Technical Recruiter, at apasquariello@apexsystemsinc.com• Position Title: Senior Java Developer• Location: Boston, MA• Pay Rate: Flexible based on experience• Duration: 6+ month contractResponsibilities:Hands-on codingBack end java development (working with front end teams as well)one project at a time- will work on multipleRequirements:1. Java 7+ years2. UI technologies; html, javascript, CSS (working knowledge) will not be front end developing3. Oracle4. Multi-threading5. SpringDesired Skills: IBM MQEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-java-developer-job-boston-ma-us-169296878.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),71838d9f71f5fc23ac8856e74cf6606d
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:07:59:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Scrum Master. Ethusiastic Scrum Master who has experience working/ leading teams who are working within a large organization on enterprise applications.  Requirements • Must - thorough understanding of Lean & Agile frameworks & have applied them in an enterprise setting as a scrum master. • Must - Bachelor’s Degree in a relevant field or equivalent experience. • Ability to clearly communicate processes to team so processes and benefits are clearly understood. • Must be willing to jump in and help, get hands dirty with team as needed during release cycle. • Must possess strong technical and analytical skills. • Must be the first to notice differences and issues as they arise and elevate them to management. • Must be able to lead and demonstrate value-add principles to a team • Must be able to ensure Agile/Scrum concepts and principles are adhered to, must be able to be a voice of reason and authority, hold Team accountable for process, make the tough calls. • Ability to put agile processes in place for several work streams at once. • Ability to lead a team to self-organization. • Ability to form solid relationships between cross functional team members. • Experience guiding people to write User Stories. • Experience working with JIRA preferred",Scrum Master Job in Framingham,"Full Time, Employee","Framingham, MA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/scrum-master-job-framingham-ma-us-168754712.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,1166c4beb4fdd7da7ef450d181a88cbf
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:08:00:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Receivable / Billing Coordinator in Woburn, MA Our Client is looking for a high energy individual who will work closely with the Revenue Accountants billing team and Collections Manager. The role will support customer invoicing functions, coordinate network and managed services billing, and collect outstanding accounts receivable.  Accounts Receivable / Billing Coordinator Responsibilities Assist the billing team to ensure proper, accurate, and timely invoice preparation Based upon contracts, compile information to generate customer invoices as needed for network and managed services   Assist in reviewing billable time utilization reports and communicate to managers Coordinate customer billing activities and reporting issues with account managers Research and resolve customer/employee billing inquiries/requests    Assist with accounting related duties including general ledger account analysis/reconciliations and journal entry preparation and entry Assist in identifying cash receipts with accounts payable ensuring proper clients are credited for payment Generating/updating various reports on a monthly basis    Researching/contacting clients who are past due or have overpayment/credits on account  Accounts Receivable / Billing Coordinator Qualifications BS/BA or Associates in Accounting or Finance preferred   1-2 years of billing/invoicing experience for professional services or software industry Strong computer skills including MS Excel, MS Word; Great Plains experience a plus     Excellent communications skills Strong interpersonal skills and sound judgment Ability to interact professionally with all levels of the organization Must possess a can-do attitude and be a team player  To learn more about the Accounts Receivable / Billing Coordinator Job in Woburn, MA, email your resume in to boston@accountingprincipals.com AND apply online to this position with your resume in Word. For other great opportunities, please log onto www.accountingprincipals.com to learn more.",Accounts Receivable / Billing Coordinator Job in Woburn,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Woburn, MA 01801",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-billing-coordinator-job-woburn-ma-us-169285972.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=7,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,0b572e35860507bb11c22acb441ddff0
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:08:34:04,No,jobs.monster.com,Senior C# Developer - Boston - FinanceOne of the industry's top performing financial technology firms is expanding multiple teams and looking for senior level C# Developers. You will be helping to create new and expand existing commercial products used by the best companies in the financial space. As a Senior C# Developer you will remain very hands on with a team of highly skilled professionals. The ideal candidate will come from a full stack background with JavaScript experience along with any of the modern JavaScript libraries.Responsibilities:Act as a senior member of the team and mentor junior developersDesign and code enhancementsParticipate in meetings to conceptualize new development ideasBe involved with architecture and designRequirements:10+ years of professional C#/.Net development experienceAny front end experience with JavaScriptStrong database skills (SQL is preferred)Full knowledge with SDLCExperience working on a multithreaded application is a large plusIf you are interested in being a part of a successful and expanding team then this is the role for you. This is an exciting space to be working in right now which is why we are looking to speak with passionate development professionals. If you would like to move forward please apply now!,Senior C# Developer - Boston - Finance Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee",Boston   MA,,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-c-developer-boston-finance-job-boston-ma-us-169377233.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,,6b2e00837a317d721189bc8d39dc7871
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:08:47:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Principal Statistical Programmer will be recognized as a subject matter expert, providing technical support and expert advice to internal and external sponsors. In addition, the Principal Statistical Programmer will lead; liaise with sponsors, Data Operations Leads, and other functional areas as required. Further, the Principal Statistical Programmer will monitor quality, timelines, resource allocation, and productivity in relation to budgets. General areas of responsibility also includes: import/export programming specification development, test data creation and test data entry, import/export programming functional testing, as well as mapping specifications to support relevant data standards Key Accountabilities Provide leadership, project specific training, stakeholder management, external sponsor support, resource management, and project management for the required programming tasks supporting clinical trial activities. Provide oversight and guidance on multiple-trial programs, complex trials, and submission projects (including Integrated Summary of Safety or Efficacy). Coordinate project start-up activities, including Unix/PMED project area set-up, creation of global programs (e.g. setup.sas, formats.sas, etc.), tracking spreadsheets, and required documentation. Assist in the production and QC of analysis plans, produce and QC TLF mock-shells, derived dataset specifications, programming specifications, and other process supporting documents. Input into and negotiate statistical programming timelines. Ensure that timelines are adhered to. Coordinate and lead a statistical programming team to successful completion of a study within given timelines and budget. Monitor project resourcing, project budgets, and identify changes in scope. Ensure quality control (QC) on all process and technical activities related to derived dataset, table, listing, and figure programming in accordance with corporate quality standards, WSOPs/Guidelines, ICH-GCP and/or other international regulatory requirements are performed. Maintain all supporting documentation for studies in accordance with WSOPs/Guidelines to ensure traceability and regulatory compliance. Work closely with the Quality Management Groups (QMG) to ensure compliance with WSOPs/Guidelines, ICH-GCP and any other applicable local and international regulations and participate in internal/external audits and regulatory inspections as required. Maintain and expand local and international regulatory knowledge within the clinical industry. Provide a broad range of leadership and influencing capabilities to achieve the business objectives and goals for both PAREXEL and sponsors. Provide broad support, including advice on new technologies and industry technical standards (e.g. EDC, CDISC, Statistical principles, CFR Part 11, electronic submissions, applications and communications technologies, etc.) and their integration into Programming processes. Use efficient programming techniques to produce and/or QC derived datasets tables, figures and data listings. Understand regulatory requirements concerning industry technical standards (e.g. CDISC, 21 CFR Part 11, electronic submissions, etc.) and implications for the department. Create standard macros and applications to improve the efficiency of the department. Represent PAREXEL at sponsor marketing and technical meetings. Represent Statistical Programming on cross-functional technical initiatives. Qualifications Proficiency in SAS. Knowledge of the programming and reporting process. Knowledge of WSOPs/Guidelines/System Life Cycle methodologies, ICH-GCP and any other applicable local and international regulations such as 21 CFR Part 11 and proven practical application. Ability to successfully work together with a (“virtual”) team (including international teams as required) as well as independently. Demonstrate strong organizational skills, ability to manage competing priorities, and be flexible to change. Ability to negotiate and influence in order to achieve results. Business/Operational skills that include customer focus, commitment to quality management and problem solving. Good business awareness/business development skills (including financial awareness). Ability to create, maintain and define strategies to improve the efficiency of running a clinical trial. Effective time management in order to meet daily metrics or team objectives. Show commitment to and perform consistently high quality work. Education Educated to degree level in a relevant discipline and/or equivalent work experience Language Skills Competent in written and oral English. Excellent communication skills. Minimum Work Experience Relevant Clinical Trial industry experience. Project leadership experience required. Proven record of leading a team and large scope of projects in a GRO, Technical, Clinical, Medical or Statistical environment. EEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Senior Statistical Programmer Job in Billerica,Full Time Employee,Home Based,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-statistical-programmer-job-billerica-ma-us-169213318.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f4b0bb0bdb38993cb108117e954ef655
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:09:09:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary SUMMARY This is a paid internship; prefer 16-24 hours per week August 2016 – December 2016. Weekly hours during the semester can be adjusted due to the student’s course work demands. The internship is based at Dassault Systèmes North American Headquarters at 175 Wyman Street, Waltham, Massachusetts. There is a free shuttle bus service during the morning and evening commutes between the MBTA’s Red Line Alewife T stop and our office. The Intern will not exceed 999 hours worked in a one year period from start date.   Position Description RESPONSIBILITIES •    Serve as the initial contact for incoming  telephone and chats from cloud based customer•    Document the problem clearly within our bug tracking system and determine the severity•    Dispatch problems to local  support subject matter expert as needed•    Document process improvements and knowledge articles based upon their experiences•    Contribute to building and debugging test Environments for 3DExperience Platform as part of our installation and migration teams•    Catalog builds VCloud environments within our ENOVIA and VCLOUD systems.   Requirements REQUIREMENTS •    Currently enrolled in a Bachelor, Master, or PhD program•    Must be enrolled in a Bachelor, Master, or PhD program for the duration of the internship; cannot not graduate or have graduated•    Minimum cumulative GPA 3.0 or higher•    Work onsite at a Dassault Systèmes location; 175 Wyman Street Waltham Mass 02451•    Ability to work independently and/or within a collaborative team structure•    Positive, self-motivated individual with high level of enthusiasm and willingness to learn and incorporate coaching and instructions into daily tasks and assignments•    Highly organized with critical attention to details•    Ability and willingness to self-teach new and advance software functions; coaching and instruction will be provided, but we want someone who goes after knowledge•    Functional use of Microsoft Office Excel, Word, PowerPoint, and knowledge Visio, Access or SQL•    Strong communication skills in two parts: 1.) verbally clear, concise, and grammatically correct oral (speaking) communication skills in English; 2.)  very strong writing skills utilizing the rules of English grammarPlusses, not required•    Minimum cumulative GPA 3.3 or higher•    Advance knowledge and experience with Excel, Word, PowerPoint functions, and SQL•    At least one additional language other than English, such as (but not limited to), French, Spanish, Portuguese, German, Dutch, Italian, Russian, Korean, Japanese, Mandarin, Vietnamese, etc   Closing Statements AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER: Dassault Systèmes is committed to a policy of non-discrimination and equal opportunity for all employees and qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, ancestry, age (40 and above), disability, veteran status, military service, application for military service, genetic information, receipt of free medical care, or any other characteristic protected under applicable law. DS will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.  ",Technical Support Internship-Cloud,"Full Time, Employee","Waltham, MA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-support-internship-cloud-august-december-2016-fall-2016-job-waltham-ma-us-169158121.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),82d7d5c88c482774115fbbd1481fbf75
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:09:19:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Per-Diem - Harrington House (Walpole, MA) ( Job Number: 277709 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progess in achieving restorative goals. *CB CNA Certified Nursing Assistant Certified Nursing Assistants Certified Nurse Assistant Certified Nurse Aide Certified Nursing Aide CNAs C.N.A. Transitional Care Rehabilitation #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : MA-Walpole-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington Organization : 0198 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington",Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Per-Diem - Harrington House (Walpole,"Full Time, Employee","Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Per-Diem - Harrington House (Walpole, MA) ( Job Number: 277709 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progess in achieving restorative goals. *CB CNA Certified Nursing Assistant Certified Nursing Assistants Certified Nurse Assistant Certified Nurse Aide Certified Nursing Aide CNAs C.N.A. Transitional Care Rehabilitation #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : MA-Walpole-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington Organization : 0198 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-nursing-assistant-cna-per-diem-harrington-house-walpole-ma-job-walpole-ma-us-169332661.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,7744852d1e2ac7fc98ceef9267191764
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:09:21:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  675886EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Project Manager Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-boston-ma-us-169468672.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),77593666623501489100b5cd4cd5a215
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:09:56:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Per-Diem - Day Shift - Highgate (Dedham, MA) ( Job Number: 277817 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progress in achieving restorative goals. *CB CNA Certified Nursing Assistant Certified Nursing Assistants Certified Nurse Assistant Certified Nurse Aide Certified Nursing Aide CNAs C.N.A. Transitional Care Rehabilitation #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : MA-Dedham-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate Organization : 0681 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate",Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Per-Diem - Day Shift - Highgate (Dedham,"Full Time, Employee","Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Per-Diem - Day Shift - Highgate (Dedham, MA) ( Job Number: 277817 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progress in achieving restorative goals. *CB CNA Certified Nursing Assistant Certified Nursing Assistants Certified Nurse Assistant Certified Nurse Aide Certified Nursing Aide CNAs C.N.A. Transitional Care Rehabilitation #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : MA-Dedham-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate Organization : 0681 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Highgate",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-nursing-assistant-cna-per-diem-day-shift-highgate-dedham-ma-job-dedham-ma-us-169332568.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,7f3bfd4a1baec622336ee0ca58a0b215
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:10:01:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:The Vice President, Corporate Real Estate will design, align and drive the definition and execution of PTC’s global real estate strategy, processes and initiatives.  They will manage real estate services and support to the business, including transaction management and associated interdepartmental communication. The position will manage and direct extended real estate team resources to support delivery of services and workplace solutions. This person will be responsible for directing facilities management and strategic budgetary planning with oversight responsibility.Responsibilities:Develop, revise and recommend standards, policies, and procedures for PTC’s Global Real Estate Portfolio and organization.Conduct research, analysis, and design of the multi-year plan, budgets and forecast for the Real Estate organization.  Has input to annual Capital budgets including estimating, forecasting, compliance, and adjustments based on corporate direction.Responsible for the development and reporting of the Real Estate & Workplace Services related to the Worldwide Lease Portfolio and Project Management.Ensure the orderly, accurate, integrated and timely maintenance of and accessibility to historical, current and forecast information of CRE management, including KPI’s, respective P&L, financial statements, etc.Develop grids, dashboards, and reports related to critical dates, lease terms, and other lease related information.Develop success indicators and monitor program performance. Make adjustments to program based on industry standards and best practices.Generate interim progress reports, final reports, and presentationsManage internal and external relationships in support of program.In conjunction with Finance, maintain policies, standards and procedures for budgeting, accounting, reporting, forecasting and financial analysis, and support internal and external audits as required.Consult with internal partners, such as Security, Health & Safety, Business Continuity and IS to ensure a safe and productive work environments across the portfolioMonitor and report compliance with corporate guidelines and all applicable laws, and regulatory guidelines as it relates to the Real Estate Portfolio. Continuous training of personnel with facility oversight of current laws and regulationsResponsible for the solicitation, negotiation and review of contracts for facility management required vendors and other services Qualifications:·         Experience in building, developing and motivating high performance teams·         Experience in developing and managing capital budgets·         Ability to multi-task and meet multiple deadlines effectively and a willingness to learn are essential·         Attention to detail with emphasis on accuracy and quality·         High tolerance for ambiguity, changing work priorities and deadlines.  Ability to maintain professionalism at all times under stressful situations·         Domestic travel and International travel may be required·         Bachelor’s degree in Design, Construction, Real Estate or Engineering or equivalent experience preferred·         8+ years’ experience in Facility/Corporate Real Estate management·         FMP, CFM or BOC certification preferred; PMP a plus·         Must have extensive experience working with MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook and Project)Current on OSHA and ADA Health & Safety regulations",Vice President,"Full Time, Employee","Needham, MA 02492",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/vice-president-corporate-real-estate-workplace-job-needham-ma-us-169473582.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative/Clerical,384e2766996aac11004bec5ca3ad8233
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:10:12:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse or LPN - Part-Time - Harrington House (Walpole, MA) ( Job Number: 277708 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: The RN Charge Nurse manages a designated group of nursing employees on a nursing unit and assures smooth operations of the unit for a designated shift. (Could encompass one or more units depending upon size and clinical programs). Scope of work for the RN Charge Nurse may be modified by State specific rules under the Nurse Practice Act. #MON-NCD Qualifications Education: The RN Charge Nurse will be a graduate of accredited RN School of Nursing Licenses/Certification: The RN Charge Nurse will have current RN Licensure in the State employed The RN Charge Nurse will have a valid CPR verification Experience: The RN Charge Nurse will have at least one (1) years of nursing experience preferred The RN Charge Nurse will have evidence of continuing education or special preparation or experience in gerontological nursing and/or long term care nursing desirable. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Nursing Primary Location : MA-Walpole-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington Organization : 0198 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington",Registered Nurse or LPN - Part-Time - Harrington House (Walpole,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse or LPN - Part-Time - Harrington House (Walpole, MA) ( Job Number: 277708 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: The RN Charge Nurse manages a designated group of nursing employees on a nursing unit and assures smooth operations of the unit for a designated shift. (Could encompass one or more units depending upon size and clinical programs). Scope of work for the RN Charge Nurse may be modified by State specific rules under the Nurse Practice Act. #MON-NCD Qualifications Education: The RN Charge Nurse will be a graduate of accredited RN School of Nursing Licenses/Certification: The RN Charge Nurse will have current RN Licensure in the State employed The RN Charge Nurse will have a valid CPR verification Experience: The RN Charge Nurse will have at least one (1) years of nursing experience preferred The RN Charge Nurse will have evidence of continuing education or special preparation or experience in gerontological nursing and/or long term care nursing desirable. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Nursing Primary Location : MA-Walpole-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington Organization : 0198 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Harrington",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-or-lpn-part-time-harrington-house-walpole-ma-job-walpole-ma-us-169332665.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,1d4faf5ef07f7f1d58f627fb436cba95
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:10:16:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Systems EngineerSystems EngineerOur client, a university in Cambridge, MA, is seeking a Systems Engineer to join their growing IT team! You'll be working closely with both end-users and department heads to investigate and define technical solutions that simplify or enhance business processes, then designing and implementing those solutions. If you love building custom, problem-solving technical solutions and have great customer service skills, please submit your resume to apply for this exciting opportunity! Responsibilities:Identifying and investigating technical solutions to business problems/ inefficiencies, working with both management and end-users to define business requirementsDesigning and implementing technical solutions within custom business applicationsSupporting applications, both with proactive testing and by responding to issue notificationsCreating documentation and training materialsManaging vendor relationships Qualifications:Bachelor's degree, preferably in Computer Science or related fieldAt least 7 years' experience supporting systems and applicationsExtensive hands-on experience with Active Directory, Terminal Services, and Microsoft SQL""Above-and-beyond"" customer service skillsAble to manage multiple projects with appropriate sense of urgencyExcellent communication and interpersonal skillsAnalytical, creative approach to troubleshooting and problem solvingGD123 Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Systems Engineer Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Computer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-engineer-job-boston-ma-us-169466878.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,892517df835c81ac893b8708c73bb867
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:10:18:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Principal Scientist will provide medical and scientific leadership for clinical trials where imaging and/or clinical data is used. The majority of clinical trials are likely to be in the oncology/ hematology space, but willingness to work across the therapeutic areas is expected. The successful candidate will serve as medical and scientific liaison to clients. Lead project related aspects of charter and application development, medical documentation and independent reviewer quality monitoring from a medical/scientific perspective collaborating with the project team. Work closely with clients to develop strategies for the use of imaging in clinical trials. Assist in marketing and sales of products and services. Provide medical and scientific guidance to new service/product development. Serve as medical and scientific liaison to subcontractors providing medical/scientific services.Key Accountabilities:Be responsible for or accountable for providing scientific guidance for project specific independent review charter developmentBe responsible for or accountable for scientific guidance for development of project specific electronic case report forms (eCRFs) the customization of image analysis software toolsBe accountable for the initiation and facilitation of the project specific Reviewer Training including: scheduling the training, slide preparation, selection of training/testing cases, preparation of training/testing cases, preparation of clinical dossiers (as needed)Lead or consult on training of independent readers (i.e. radiologists, oncologists) on the use of imaging software, eCRFs, and implementation of the review criteriaPerform or support quality control and evaluation of the results of independent review and provide necessary guidance and feedback to independent readersOwn or be accountable for the development of project specific imaging parameters to ensure standardization of imaging techniquesAttend investigator meetings or support investigator meeting preparation, as necessary, to present and train sites and clients on assessment criteria and imaging parametersProvide scientific leadership to internal project teamsAct as scientific liaison with client project teamsProvide support for the preparation of clinical protocols, journal articles, and other documents for clients/sponsorsProvide scientific and technical leadership to strategic business group for specific therapeutic areasWork with key opinion leaders and criteria authors to refine assessment criteriaWork with Marketing in the preparation and participation of webinars, symposiums, industry conferences, journal articles, white papers, etc.Assist in the preparation of client proposalsDevelop sales and marketing presentations to potential clientsParticipate in industry meetings and/or presentations to promote awareness of PIWork with Engineering to develop core analysis applications to meet business needsDevelop, as necessary, and ensure compliance with relevant standard operating proceduresLead therapeutic and strategic meetings within SciMedProvide consulting services in area of expertiseManage Scientific and Medical Services staff as requiredQualificationsKnowledge and Experience:9 +years of experience in Healthcare, Pharma, or Academia required7+ years of experience in Medical Imaging requiredEducation:MD/PhD or MA/MS / BSN/RPh +3 years of experience or BA/BS/Technologist Certification +6 years of experience requiredSkills:Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skillsClient focused approach to workA flexible attitude with respect to work assignments and new learningGood analytical skillsCapability of handling confidential mattersAbility to manage multiple and varied tasks with enthusiasm and prioritize workload with attention to detailWillingness to work in a matrix environment and to value the importance of teamworkAptitude for High Performance CultureEEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Principal Scientist,Full Time Employee,"Billerica, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-scientist-scimed-job-billerica-ma-us-169213040.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),effadeadc45b7fb304109ca469d60abe
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:10:39:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Agfa HealthCare is a leading medical imaging and information management company, providing solutions for hospitals worldwide. With Agfa HealthCare products, hospitals provide more efficient and effective care for patients.  Using the latest technologies, Agfa's solutions are revolutionizing how patients are diagnosed and treated, ultimately saving lives. As a pioneer in our field, we take great pride in our people and our work to modernize the delivery of healthcare.   We offer a rewarding career developing technology in a field that impacts lives, the opportunity to work with a talented, committed team of individuals, and a competitive compensation and benefits package.   We are currently seeking a Cardiovascular Clinical Applications Specialist to join our team As product/knowledge expert, the Cardiovascular Clinical Applications Specialist is responsible for support of the development team on engineering projects within his/her area of expertise: Verification and validation testing on pre-release software. Translating clinical workflow environments into detailed product specifications to represent end user needs. Supporting ongoing implementations of released products.  Developing and delivering internal applications training to members of the regional teams as well as Agfa customers. The position is based in Boston MA, and will include approximately 25% travel to customer sites and regional Agfa offices. Some international travel may be required. Working environments include office and clinical hospital setting. Agfa HealthCare is a leading medical imaging and information management company, providing solutions for hospitals worldwide. With Agfa HealthCare products, hospitals provide more efficient and effective care for patients.  Using the latest technologies, Agfa's solutions are revolutionizing how patients are diagnosed and treated, ultimately saving lives. As a pioneer in our field, we take great pride in our people and our work to modernize the delivery of healthcare.   We offer a rewarding career developing technology in a field that impacts lives, the opportunity to work with a talented, committed team of individuals, and a competitive compensation and benefits package.   We are currently seeking a Cardiovascular Clinical Applications Specialist to join our team As product/knowledge expert, the Cardiovascular Clinical Applications Specialist is responsible for support of the development team on engineering projects within his/her area of expertise: Verification and validation testing on pre-release software. Translating clinical workflow environments into detailed product specifications to represent end user needs. Supporting ongoing implementations of released products.  Developing and delivering internal applications training to members of the regional teams as well as Agfa customers. The position is based in Boston MA, and will include approximately 25% travel to customer sites and regional Agfa offices. Some international travel may be required. Working environments include office and clinical hospital setting. Participate in the R&D Project Core Team as a supporting member and representative of the Cardio V&V Team.  Lead clinical verification and validation activities. Create training materials, deliver training, write documentation, conduct on the job training, conduct pre-sale customer demonstrations of new products, and support initial installs of new products. Provide applications support and problem-solving assistance to Agfa subsidiary personnel on topics/products within his/her area of expertise, particularly in the areas of Echocardiography, Pediatric Echocardiography, and Non-Invasive Vascular imaging and reporting, EKG management, and Nuclear Medicine, including solutions that are integrated with third-party applications. Investigate and document problems, propose solutions as necessary, and recommend clinical feature/functionality improvements. Deliver applications training and on-going support (both on-site and remote) to validation sites for Agfa products within his/her area of expertise. Document validation as required. Collaborate with the Training Manager and Course Developer(s) to develop comprehensive application training courses on Agfa and third-party products within his/her area of expertise. Participate in the R&D Project Core Team as a supporting member and representative of the Cardio V&V Team.  Lead clinical verification and validation activities. Create training materials, deliver training, write documentation, conduct on the job training, conduct pre-sale customer demonstrations of new products, and support initial installs of new products. Provide applications support and problem-solving assistance to Agfa subsidiary personnel on topics/products within his/her area of expertise, particularly in the areas of Echocardiography, Pediatric Echocardiography, and Non-Invasive Vascular imaging and reporting, EKG management, and Nuclear Medicine, including solutions that are integrated with third-party applications. Investigate and document problems, propose solutions as necessary, and recommend clinical feature/functionality improvements. Deliver applications training and on-going support (both on-site and remote) to validation sites for Agfa products within his/her area of expertise. Document validation as required. Collaborate with the Training Manager and Course Developer(s) to develop comprehensive application training courses on Agfa and third-party products within his/her area of expertise. Strong clinical knowledge is required, including familiarity and work experience with clinical workflow of cardiology departments.  Experience with database manipulation and software customization. Experience creating training materials and delivering training to professional adults in a one on one or group setting. Excellent communication, listening, and organization skills. Excellent time-management and organization skills, as well as the ability to work productively under tight deadlines and with quickly changing priorities. A 4-year college degree is required, as well as a minimum of 5 years of hands-on applications experience in a clinical setting. While a hospital setting is preferred, a clinic setting will also be considered. Certification in a cardiovascular area (CCI -Cardiovascular Credentialing International, or ARDMS - American Registry for Diagnostic Medical Sonography, or NMTCB – Nuclear Medicine Technology Certification Board). Prior experience in field applications or medical device product development is highly preferred. Agfa HealthCare Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities/Women/Individuals with Disabilities/Protected Veterans #LIPOST",Cardiovascular Clinical Applications Specialist (b) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cardiovascular-clinical-applications-specialist-b-job-boston-ma-us-169482190.aspx?mescoid=1500126001001&jobPosition=7,,Other,af1c08aacf75129297faaf687109dd32
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:11:11:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a well known and established managed care organization, is currently seeking a Senior Regional Contract Manager for their Boston location.   The Senior Regional Contract Manager is responsible for the development of cost-effective provider networks, maintaining complex and geographically diverse contracts and performs all critical functions necessary to improve provider network adequacy and performance. Key Functions/Responsibilities: Gathers and analyzes data in assessing provider network adequacy against required standards and business expectationsIdentifies, assesses and develops strategies for improving provider and network cost utilization and quality performanceLeads negotiations of financial and other contractual termsDevelops and maintains business relationships with high-level representatives of key contracting hospitals, physicians and ancillary service providersParticipates in the development & continuous improvement of departmental policies as they relate to network development and provider contracting Qualifications & Requirements:5 years experience preferred Medicaid managed care experience preferredIn-depth knowledge and understanding of current healthcare industry issues and trendsProven negotiation skills with hospitals, Integrated Delivery Networks, physicians and ancillary service providers; Knowledge of federal and state Medicare, Medicaid, and relevant guidelines, regulations and standardsIf interested and qualified, please apply directly here. For any inquiries, please send an email with your updated resume to Kelly at KGRAHAM@JUDGE.COM",Senior Regional Contract Manager Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee","Boston, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-regional-contract-manager-job-boston-ma-us-169475837.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,5728105fa37dcd8c2905faf5aae2f01c
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:11:33:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PROFILE:Provides operations functions in one or all of the following areas: operates high volume duplicating equipment, performs associated copying tasks, ships and receives product and supplies, sorts, distributes and handles incoming and outgoing mail/faxes, as well as applies necessary postage. Provides copier maintenance and/or repair of customer site equipment. May also perform bindery, QC and final check, housekeeping, file services, call center representative, and reception, etc. May performs various building support functions related to meeting set ups and light maintenance. Note: Due to the higher level of presentation and telephone skills needed to perform receptionist duties, employees performing this function are considered to be Senior On-Site Services Specialist. This position reports directly to the Site Manager, Site Supervisor or Assistant Site Manager, depending on site personnel configuration.JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Runs high volume copy machines and performs binding and finishing work.Ensures convenience copiers are working properly, checking for quality via daily inspections. Clears paper jams and informs technicians of specific problems.Performs all repair service on customer copier equipment.Maintains records for management reports and inventories of supplies needed.Distributes office supplies, fax transmissions and mail to company personnel and/or designated drop-off points as required.Calculates charges for jobs performed and maintains some billing logs.Responds to and coordinates all service calls required by customer.May perform filing duties in conjunction with specific customer requests.Delivers completed jobs to pre-determined customer locations within and outside of the site.Maintains daily meter and service logs.May travel between customer's buildings.Answers customer questions regarding status or feasibility of job requests.Ensures upkeep of convenience copier areas by keeping neat and well stocked.Performs duties related to the shipping of materials.Performs duties related to the receiving of materials.May perform meeting room and conference room set ups.May perform building occupant moves within assigned facilities.May perform re-lamping and light maintenance duties as assigned.May perform occasional cleaning duties as needed.May require periodic overtime on nights and weekends, including off-hour emergency response.Uses shrink-wrap machine, paper cutter, hole driller, bindery equipment, jogger, tape machine, stackers, electric stapler and scales in completion of various jobs contracted.Uses all copier equipment, calculator, fax machine, postage meter and some PC.Performs filing duties, which may include 'purging' and archiving old documents.Performs other duties as assigned.QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Experience, and Certifications):Requires high school diploma or GED and 1-2 years of related work experience.Some related copy job experience is preferred.May require valid driver's license and minimum levels of auto insurance coverage per Ricoh.Ricoh is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer -- Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled.",Customer Service / Office Services Associate Job in Lexington,Full Time/ Employee,"Customer Service / Office Services Associate Job in Lexington 02421, Massachusetts US",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-office-services-associate-job-lexington-ma-us-169171424.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=11,,Customer Support/Client Care,f7c9d7f5e0957db4c0caaa35be5ec027
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:02:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"R&D Engineering Technician having strong mechanical technical hands on experience, preferably within medical instrumentation and polymeric materials manufacturing is needed for a long term contract position in the Burlington, MA area! Candidate will work within a R&D environment to assist with light manufacturing of membrane type filtration test samples, conducting performance challenges of polymeric devices, documentation of results, troubleshooting etc. Associate Degree or equivalent experience in Mechanical Engineering is required. Some local travel. Please apply today for immediate consideration!Responsibilities for the R&D TechnicianWithin a R&D environment to assist with light manufacturing of membrane type filtration test samplesConduct performance challenges of polymeric devicesDocumentation of resultsPerform any troubleshooting of found resultsRequirements for the R&D TechnicianAssociate Degree with minimum of 5 years of experience in Mechanical Engineering evvironmentMicrosoft Office familiarity neededMust have high level of attention to detail, thoroughness and follow upPosition requires fast learning skills and a cooperative temperament to support technical teamGood communication skillsStrong mechanical technical hands on experience, preferably within medical instrumentation and polymeric materials manufacturingBenefitsThis Job is located in Lexington, MA -> United States",R&D Technician - Medical Instrumentation/Hands on/ Mechanical/Detail / Documantation / Troublesho Job in Lexington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Lexington, MA 02421",,http://jobview.monster.com/r-d-technician-medical-instrumentation-hands-on-mechanical-detail-documantation-troublesho-job-lexington-ma-us-169130695.aspx?mescoid=5101010001001&jobPosition=12,35.00 - 38.00 $ /hour,,de5380f1081f3eeb4428688002dc9f2d
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:03:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Staff Accountant Location: ArlingtonLeader Bank is a nationally chartered bank located in Arlington, MA with over $1 billion in assets. We are currently seeking to add a Staff Accountant to our team. The bank’s footprint is in the greater Boston area, with several retail branches and a strong presence in lending. Leader Bank is consistently growing and expanding both the footprint and the business lines.  Responsibilities: The candidate should be an entrepreneurial and open-minded individual with a desire to contribute to a fast-paced, growing company. The candidate will report directly to the Accounting Manager of the bank and be expected to lead, take ownership of his/her areas of responsibility and ensure accurate and timely completion of company reporting requirements. The position is responsible for the following:  ·         Posting daily and monthly entries to the general ledger·         Preparing balance sheet account reconciliations, to include analysis and resolution of outstanding items·         Assist with the month end and year end close ·         Assist with the daily loan funding and sales process·         Performing daily wire activities·         Maintaining files and documentation thoroughly and accurately, in accordance with company policy and accepted accounting practices·         Researching and assist with inquiries and requested information in a timely manner ·         Other duties as assigned  Qualifications: ·         The ideal candidate must have 0-3 years of experience in accounting, with a strong understanding of GAAP, have a bachelor’s degree (or equivalent) with a major in accounting, finance, or economics. ·         Other qualifications include strong leadership, interpersonal, organizational, detail-oriented, problem-solving, planning, multi-tasking, verbal and written communication skills. The ideal candidate will be proficient in Microsoft Office with an advanced excel spreadsheet aptitude.   Leader Bank offers an excellent compensation and benefits package including: 401k plan with corporate match, medical and dental insurance, and the opportunity to work for a fast growing, local organization. Leader Bank, N.A. is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, age, gender, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, military status, veteran status or any other protected class.",Monster,,"Job Title: Staff Accountant Location: ArlingtonLeader Bank is a nationally chartered bank located in Arlington, MA with over $1 billion in assets. We are currently seeking to add a Staff Accountant to our team. The bank’s footprint is in the greater Boston area, with several retail branches and a strong presence in lending. Leader Bank is consistently growing and expanding both the footprint and the business lines.  Responsibilities: The candidate should be an entrepreneurial and open-minded individual with a desire to contribute to a fast-paced, growing company. The candidate will report directly to the Accounting Manager of the bank and be expected to lead, take ownership of his/her areas of responsibility and ensure accurate and timely completion of company reporting requirements. The position is responsible for the following:  ·         Posting daily and monthly entries to the general ledger·         Preparing balance sheet account reconciliations, to include analysis and resolution of outstanding items·         Assist with the month end and year end close ·         Assist with the daily loan funding and sales process·         Performing daily wire activities·         Maintaining files and documentation thoroughly and accurately, in accordance with company policy and accepted accounting practices·         Researching and assist with inquiries and requested information in a timely manner ·         Other duties as assigned  Qualifications: ·         The ideal candidate must have 0-3 years of experience in accounting, with a strong understanding of GAAP, have a bachelor’s degree (or equivalent) with a major in accounting, finance, or economics. ·         Other qualifications include strong leadership, interpersonal, organizational, detail-oriented, problem-solving, planning, multi-tasking, verbal and written communication skills. The ideal candidate will be proficient in Microsoft Office with an advanced excel spreadsheet aptitude.   Leader Bank offers an excellent compensation and benefits package including: 401k plan with corporate match, medical and dental insurance, and the opportunity to work for a fast growing, local organization. Leader Bank, N.A. is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, age, gender, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, military status, veteran status or any other protected class.",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-arlington-ma-us-169426490.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=20,,,35ed20a23e8e90d983b524331c6215bd
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:54:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description The Facility Foreman performs hands on operations and supervision of plant operations such as drum pumping, drum dumping, tank farm operations, equipment maintenance, and keeping up with facility compliance. RESPONSIBILITIES Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all times. Performs one or more specific plant operations such as, drum pumping, drum dumping, tank farm operations, truck offloading/loading, maintenance and wastewater treatment. Assures all associated paperwork as required for waste tracking movements is maintained and submitted immediately after processing operations have been completed. Ensures operations meets all compliance standards. Responsible for maintaining a clean work environment. Performs other duties and tasks as assigned from time to time by management and will be required by the needs of the Clean Harbors business.  EDUCATION/KNOWLEDGE 2+ years of work or industry related experienceIndependent and self-motivatedMechnically inclinedPC Skills and ability to use an iPad PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTSClimb on and off forkliftsLifting up to 50 lbs. from the ground to your wasteClimb up and down vertical laddersCapable of reaching out, over and down exerting a force20/20 eyesight corrected or uncorrected - depth perception is critical10 pushups, deep knee squats and sit-ups (to determine if fit)Good hand/eye coordination Employment is contingent upon a successful background check and drug screen.  Some positions also require a pre-hire medical exam.  Must meet all work eligibility requirements. Environmentally-responsible business.Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market. Headquartered in Norwell, Massachusetts, Clean Harbors has waste disposal facilities and service locations throughout the United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. We offer competitive salaries and progressive benefits including health, dental, life insurance, 401K, generous paid time off, tuition reimbursement and more. We offer a drug free work environment and require a pre-employment drug screen. All Applicants are subject to pre-employment security background checks, and some positions may require pre-employment physical fitness for duty tests.*CHPotential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Facility Foreman Job in Woburn,Full Time Employee,"Woburn, MA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/facility-foreman-job-woburn-ma-us-169323180.aspx?mescoid=4701141002005&jobPosition=15,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,3b6b0b43682c89dccd2bec48205431a4
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:54:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is actively seeking a Medical Review LPN for a contract position with a large healthcare client in Chattanooga, TN!This job will have the following responsibilities:Perform comprehensive/pre-existing reviewsReview diagnoses, possile misrepresentation, drug appeals, provider/member appeals, denial interpretation, retrospective claims, UM pre-certificationResearch and documenation to support decisionInitiate referrals for discharge planningQualifications & Requirements:An active Licensed Practical Nurse in Tennessee (or other Compact State)Bachelor's Degree in Nursing is preferred but not required3+ years of varied clinical experiencePrevious medical review experience is requiredProficient in Microsoft OfficeCustomer Service oriented Please send your most up to date to Rachel Smith at r.smith@judge.com or give Rachel a call at 484-270-1837 Thank you so much and best of luck!",Medical Review Nurse - Lpn Job in Chattanooga,"Full Time, Employee","Chattanooga, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-review-nurse-lpn-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169428926.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,4ccc2364dfec9fd191c04b936fb870be
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:54:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is currently seeking a Java Developer. The ideal candidate will be proficient in JEE application development practices, Java and JavaScript as well as HTML and XML, and is expected to be able to quickly develop a proficiency and expertise in the fundamentals and internal workings of product framework.  This job will have the following responsibilities:Design, architect, code, test, and deploy JEE based solutions into industry-leading container/application server environmentsServe as a leader and mentor for the Product Development teamWork directly with / support customers to analyze requests and constructively provide feedback that meets the requirement while leveraging our core products as much as possibleWork directly with product analysts and management to develop technical requirementsFacilitate software architecture design sessionsConduct design and code reviewsProactively identify development roadblocks, issues and/or delays and escalate accordinglyWork independently and assume ownership of all assigned deliverablesOther duties as assigned Qualifications & Requirements:A Bachelor’s degree (or equivalent experience) and a minimum of 7- 10 years’ software development experienceProven depth of proficiency in Java, JavaScript, HTML, SQL, XML, Maven developmentExperience with both database and server configurationAbility to accurately estimate the amount of time required to complete a development task, while effectively managing potential technical riskAbility to effectively manage multiple competing priorities at any given timeDetail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively in a deadline-driven environmentExcellent communication skills, both verbally and in writing, with an ability to explain complex technical decisions in business termsAbility to work effectively both independently and as part of a teamAlso nice to have: AngularJS, JSON, REST, Bootstrap and jQuery experienceAgile project management principlesIntegration Frameworks including PilotfishUnderstanding of ACORD XML standards and Insurance domain ",Java Developer Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee","Boston, MA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/java-developer-job-boston-ma-us-169429312.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,c38fab00e7d27538106d6a60d146fc73
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:54:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a IT Recruitment Professional  in Chattanooga, TN! This job will have the following responsibilities:Strategic advisor to hiring managers to understand business objectives and clearly define position requirements for hiring in order to meet annual recruiting objectives.  Develop and implement strategic recruitment plans, in collaboration with business units’ objectives, and overall corporate initiatives. Proactively network: internally, externally, and through specialized websites, organizations, and conferences to assure a constant influx of potential candidates.  Propose and implement ongoing improvements to recruitment efforts by applying a wide range of experience on industry best practices for acquiring strong performers, marketing/branding at a national level, and bench-marking progress against industry leaders.  Negotiate offers by partnering with hiring manager, senior management, and other groups  as needed, while managing the candidate process and acting as a candidate advocate. Awareness of company’s EEO/AAP status and conduct search activities to meet the Plan’s goals.  May manage and facilitate employee immigration services, including communications with external immigration attorney, ensuring adherence to federal and state regulations and guidelines. May manage employee relocation process. Qualifications & Requirements:Education: Bachelor’s Degree in BA, I/O, HR, or a related field, or equivalent work experience. Must have previous IT recruiting experience   Minimum of 3 years experience in the Human Resources field required. Minimum of 1 year of hands-on full-life cycle recruiting experience preferred. Must be detail oriented, deal well with ambiguity, demonstrate strong strategic thinking and creativity skills, and be an effective communicator with both internal and external partners/customers.  Microsoft Office skills required (Outlook, Word, Excel and PowerPoint) HR certification (PHR/SPHR) preferred. All interested and qualified candidates please send your resume to Jessica at jbiggs@judge.com or call her at 484-434-2947.Thanks  ",IT Recruitment Professional Job in Chattanooga,"Full Time, Employee","Chattanooga, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-recruitment-professional-job-chattanooga-tn-us-168451105.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,10fc6e69cbcbb5550ff18a0e2ee44097
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:54:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Powered by Zip Team at Coldwell Banker Residential Brokerage is looking for experienced, enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated real estate sales agents to work with home buyers.  We are a unique full-service, client-focused, residential real estate sales brokerage, but we're different; we have a better way. Our award-winning lead/customer management tool streamlines the real estate sales process. Consumers are embracing our approach, and our website, cbzhomes.com, is one of the most-visited real estate sales brokerage websites in the world! Qualifications:·         Active real estate sales agent license·         Vibrant personality and professional presence·         Drive and determination ·         Demonstrated skills in customer service, sales, and customer negotiation·         Entrepreneurial spirit Advantages:·         ZAP (Zip Agent Platform): our industry-leading online real estate sales agent platform and client management system·         Dozens of new client leads every single month·         Your own real estate sales page/portal on cbzhomes.com·         Top-notch education and business coaching is available We can provide you with everything you need to build and grow your real estate sales business. Apply now and learn more about the advantages of being an independent real estate sales agent affiliated with Coldwell Banker Residential Brokerage on the Powered by Zip Team.",Real Estate Sales - Licensed - Leads provided - Greater Boston Area Job in Stoughton,,"Stoughton, MA 02072",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/real-estate-sales-licensed-leads-provided-greater-boston-area-job-stoughton-ma-us-169482023.aspx?mescoid=4100687001001&jobPosition=9,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,1d12a5fcb4a160b47e6b6aec86d3f64a
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:54:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Staff Accountant in Watertown, MA.Responsibilities: Assist with day-to-day accounting operations and close process Perform general ledger procedures Prepare bank and balance sheet account reconciliations Enter journal entries Maintain and update fixed asset and prepaid schedules Prepare financial statements Assist with 1099 reporting Support financial and tax audits Assist with SOX compliance Complete ad-hoc or special projectsREQUIREMENTS: B.S. degree in accounting 2 - 4 years of accounting experience in public accounting or private industry Knowledge of GAAP Proficient with Excel Knowledge of Microsoft Dynamics SL a plus Strong communication skills",Staff Accountant Job in Watertown,Full Time Employee,"Watertown, MA 02472",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-watertown-ma-us-169477398.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=10,"45,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),ddc64d2019d525e60f1842195a24f413
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:12:54:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a RN Acute Case Manager. This Case Manager will have the following responsibilities:Coordinates management of care for a specified patient population in a single hospital; follows patients throughout the continuum of care and ensures optimum utilization of resources, service delivery and compliance with external review agencies. Provides ongoing support and expertise through comprehensive assessment, care planning, plan implementation and overall evaluation of individual patient needs. Enhances the quality of patient management and satisfaction, to promote continuity of care and cost effectiveness through the integration of functions of case management, utilization review and management and discharge planning.Qualifications & Requirements:Three years clinical experience requiredAppropriate minimum degree for preferred licensure or certification or commensurate experience in a related healthcare field. Healthcare professional licensure preferred as Registered Nurse or Social Worker.  Highly Prefer experience in Case Management, Quality Management, Utilization Review, or discharge planning. Must have extensive acute care experience or LTAC.Apply directly with an updated resume if qualified. For any inquiries, contact Kelly at KGRAHAM@Judge.com with your updated resume.",RN Acute Case Manager Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee","Boston, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-acute-case-manager-job-boston-ma-us-169428956.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,834503ddc2b80d17e720183b250cd827
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:13:14:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tennant Company is searching for a Commercial Service Technician to join our growing team! Our service techs travel within their territory to our customer locations to maintain, troubleshoot, and repair Tennant products. We are looking for candidates that are mechanically inclined and able to quickly and accurately diagnose equipment issues, and determine what is needed to get the equipment running again. We are also looking for candidate that will be able to provide top notch customer service as you troubleshoot the equipment and deliver solutions. WHAT’S IT LIKE AT TENNANT?Tennant Company offers a competitive salary with an excellent benefits package, as well as a company vehicle, corporate credit card, cell phone, and laptop.  In addition, our service technicians also participate in a comprehensive training program at the start of employment and a paid week long training trip each year to continue education.   WHAT A COMMERCIAL SERVICE TECHNICIAN DOES:·         Responsible for basic repair and service on small commercial floor care machines. Primarily servicing Tennant products but may also include some competitive products·         Responsible  for scheduling and repairing small products at customer locations·         Satisfy in a timely and complete fashion, all business reporting documentation: timesheets, repair orders, machine checklists, receiving records, expense reports, and repair order logs ·         Receive incoming parts orders, verify quantities, store material in proper service truck bin location, assign and adjust bin locations, and ensure that excess inventory is purged ·         Advise the customer of his/her present and/or future service needs ·         Estimate machine repair requirements and prepare necessary data to provide an accurate repair quote to the customer, including labor and trip charges  ·         Responsible for effectively scheduling time and arranging customer service calls to maintain effective customer service ·         Advise sales representatives of potential customer applications for equipment replacements or additions ·         Consistently present a professional image, both in personal appearance and condition of company equipment·         Install commercial products to satisfy national accounts and regional account requirements For more information, visit our website and apply online!  https://jobs.tennantco.com/job/South-Boston-Commercial-Service-Technician-Boston-South%2C-MA-MA-02368/325242200 / ",Service Technician Job in Boston,,"Boston, MA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/service-technician-job-boston-ma-us-169467466.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f0f9456f3609f8eace5a0059ca676447
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:13:14:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accountant / Financial Analyst, Private Equity (Downtown Boston)Accountant / Financial Analyst, Private Equity (Downtown Boston) Accountant / Financial Analyst needed for large, international firm headquartered in Downtown Boston. This individual will report directly to the Accounting Manager of a large corporate team, with exposure to different business units, as well as foreign based accounting teams, providing many opportunities for professional growth. Responsibilities Prepare month end and quarterly journal entries with adequate support / documentation.Compile and analyze budget to actual reports.Work with others (i.e. respective finance/accounting departments) to prepare account reconciliations.Actively participate in the month end accounting close. Perform major account/cost analysis; identify and interpret trends.Prepare monthly allocation schedules for due diligence travel expenses.Prepare, reconcile and communicate accounting information.Participate in the development and completion of special projects as assigned. Assist in the annual audit process with external auditors, including preparing audit schedules.Dashboard Reporting, Corporate Budgeting and Financial Analysis. EducationBachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance or Economics Experience 1-4 years of experience Skills & QualificationsAnalytical, logical, methodical and intellectually curious.Demonstrates enthusiasm, energy, execution and eagerness to learn.Problem solving and issues resolution management.Sharp / polished / desire to grow with company. Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Accountant / Financial Analyst (Downtown Boston) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",BankingAccounting and Auditing ServicesFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-financial-analyst-downtown-boston-job-boston-ma-us-169373411.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=10,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a9a80407fc3f7e4494867a123691b946
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:14:26:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"        Credit and Collection Representative   Summary:  The Credit and Collection Representative will effectively collect past due balances on assigned accounts while building lasting relationships with our account base and the WB Mason community with the goal of minimizing Days Sales Outstanding (DSO) and Over 90 day delinquencies.  The Credit and Collection Representative will work to become proactive in his/her approach as he/she develops relationships with the customer base as well as with key internal partners.     Essential Duties and Responsibilities:   Perform collection activities on invoices and deductions for assigned accounts while working under the direction of the Corporate Collections Manager or Regional AR Supervisor Build strong relationships with customers Effectively communicate with accounts payable contacts, customers’ senior management, or business owners in an effort to minimize past due items. Build relationships with all members of the WB Mason Community, in particular the sales force, customer service, and peers. Make Credit Hold decisions throughout the day; take all appropriate actions to obtain payments, release orders on time, and/or to minimize bad debt expense, while maintaining a productive and mutually satisfactory relationship with the Customer. Resolve disputed items with customers through research of all available information and communicate findings. Maintain all necessary customer data fields in our receivables system. Assist with fielding a designated number of incoming daily customer service calls, which is a shared responsibility within the collection department. Write up Credits and/or Financial Adjustments as required while adhering to department policy. Work on special projects as needed.     Education and/or Experience:   College degree preferred 3+ years of collection and credit experience with a focus on receivables management and order management for customers on credit hold Must be proficient with Microsoft Office applications including Excel, Word, and Outlook. Knowledge of Microsoft AX a plus     Job Requirements:Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:   Outstanding communication skills with an ability to converse, read & write in English Strong organizational skills Must be detail oriented and have the ability to manage multiple priorities successfully Basic computer skills and keyboarding ability Ability to “think you your feet” in a fast paced, dynamic work environment Req. Code : 3553 Division/Department : W.B. Mason Company, Inc Skills : Accounting -> Collections",Account Receivable | Credit and Collections Department Job in Brockton,Full Time,"Brockton, MA 02301",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/account-receivable-credit-collections-department-job-brockton-ma-us-168966570.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=6,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,77519879560019cc17417b0e01d1a891
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:14:27:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.Be bold. Be great. Have fun.Welcome to the best kind of work, where you can bring your enthusiasm, give your all, and leave each day feeling challenged, empowered, and excited. T-Mobile employees will tell you: there""s nothing like the feeling you get when you make a difference to your customers-and your co-workers. At T-Mobile, we""re looking for a few great people to bring their passion, fierceness, and hard work to the job. In exchange, we offer real career growth opportunities in a place where awesome work is rewarded. So what""s it take to do this job? We""re looking for customer advocates who can consult and sell as they bring a collaborative attitude to every call. You should also have: Prior experience in a similar environment (call center or customer service is ideal) The ability to really talk with-and listen to-our customers, like an expert If you""ve worked in a performance-based culture, let""s talk! Okay. You""ve got all the makings of a top performer. Here""s what we can offer you in exchange for your amazing work: Competitive base pay plus incentives Medical, dental and vision benefits Matching 401(k) Generous paid time-off programs Phone service discounts Education reimbursement Serious growth potential for your career Fun, fast-paced environmentThis is more than a job. It""s a chance to build a career and do work you can be proud of. Come on, what are you waiting for? It""s time to explore an opportunity that could become the job of a lifetime. So apply today! Customer Service Professional General CareBe the point person for our customers, thinking on your feet as you deliver world-class service. This job isn""t for everybody. It""s for driven, confident people, who can rise to the challenge and be advocates for our customers. Sound like you? Here are the basics: Customers call in with billing, product, or service questions You spring into action, proactively identifying solutions It doesn""t stop there: you take a hands-on approach to resolving every issue, taking it from start to finish This isn""t a one-time thing: your great work inspires those customers to stay customers, and that""s important to us Over time, you""ll become an expert on all the T-Mobile technology and servicesT-Mobile USA, Inc is an equal opportunity employer and gives consideration for employment to qualified applicants without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, disability or protected veteran status, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Customer Service Specialist-Requisition BR Job in Chattanooga,,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-specialist-requisition-55979br-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169299658.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=7,,,8444474d09c8c28f5b3856e8a5833563
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:14:32:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Senior Software Quality Assurance Engineer in Waltham, Massachusetts (MA).Essential Functions: Build infrastructure, tools and automated tests Maintain infrastructure Write and review design documentation Participate in test initiatives Setup, upgrade and maintain test environments Report on and demo resultsREQUIREMENTS: Undergraduate degree in CS or related 5+ years of programming experience. Advanced experience in Python Experience in an automation team environment Experience with security technologies and products Strong communication skills Agile experience preferred Exposure to virtualization technologies is a plus",Senior Software Quality Assurance Engineer Job in Waltham,"Full Time, Employee","Waltham, MA 02451",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-software-quality-assurance-engineer-job-waltham-ma-us-169312845.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=2,"95,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),165e2394f747f2753ca6c50afac3159c
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:14:40:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is looking for a hands-on Product Manager .  As Product Manager, you will be responsible for delivering new products and features for product offerings (Digital Engagement Platform), and will guide a team responsible for driving product evolution. Qualified candidates will be results-oriented, self-driven, transparent, and have the ability to successfully prioritize and execute many detailed tasks at any given time while managing to deadlines, and directing a small analyst and UX team. Must be expert in customer experience and understand how predictive analytics, marketing techniques, data, persona’s and customer journey maps all work together to customer experiences.   Responsibilities:• Hands-on definition of the product requirements and the prioritization process. Defining and driving both the tactical and strategic product roadmaps and release plans. • Work independently to lead and inspire the Product Management team, manage release schedules, work with clients, manage team tasks and milestones. • Provide strong project management, communication and transparency to the product teams as well as coordinate GTM activities across Product Development, Marketing, Services, and Sales to deliver successful products within aggressive timeframes. • Ability to work across teams and develop innovative approaches to overcoming obstacles and mitigating risks.   Skills:• Lead and direct cross functional teams on projects through the product lifecycle process. • Demonstrable expertise in gathering requirements using latest techniques such as personas, customer journey maps, uses cases/workflows, user stories, story maps, wireframes and other artifacts. • Experience and expertise in Customer Engagement, Customer Experience, UX design, predictive analytics, content management, CRM and personalized-targeted marketing. • Excellent communication skills and transparency providing real-time product release status reporting, issues/obstacles, and risk mitigation plans. • Act as a Product Owner in an agile development environment to get new products and features developed quickly with our engineering team. • Develop the Go-to-Market Strategies and coordinate across Product Development, Marketing, and Sales for launch • Fundamental knowledge of Product Marketing, Product Positioning, Product Branding and Pricing for B2B commercial products. • Identify value propositions on new features and prioritize the most valuable features at the top of the development list. Experience:• Bachelor's degree. MBA preferred. • A proven track record of leading projects and cross-functional teams that successfully achieve milestones and complete deliverables. • A minimum of 5 years of experience in product management including: new product introduction experience using structured development processes and product development research. • Strong analytical skills in requirements gathering, UX, market research, and predictive analytics. • Insurance industry experience a plus, but not required. ",Product Manager Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee","Boston, MA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/product-manager-job-boston-ma-us-169429038.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,9c732aefad272a1d80be0fa42ce771de
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:14:55:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"We currently have exciting opportunities available for experienced Associate Directors of Clinical Operations to join our team in the WestThe Associate Director is responsible for the oversight of a team of high level individual contributorsor a group of Managers within Clinical Operations. This includes ensuring successful delivery of his/her organization’s project deliverables, on time with high quality. The role is responsible to resource client projects with suitably developed professionals and to retain and develop these professionals within the company. The role is responsible to promote new business by participating in project bids and client presentations as appropriate. The role is responsible to provide expertise and consultation to project teams. The candidate for this role is an experienced leader capable of workingindependently, under supervision of the Director or Sr. Director and may deputize for the Director or Sr. Director as needed. RelationshipsReports To Director or Sr. DirectorDirectly Supervises Individual Contributors or Management Team MembersProvides Work Direction to Direct Reports, Project Team MembersWorks Closely with All Project Team Members, Sponsor, Business Project & SupportTeam Members, Project Leadership, Business DevelopmentExternal Relationships ClientsInvestigational SitesExternal SuppliersAcademic Societies Key Accountabilities• Manage and oversee departmental activities including appropriate resourcing of staff, staff assignments, quality control of project deliverables and timely delivery of project deliverables.• Meet and aim to exceed client expectations by recruiting, retaining and developing a skilled, experienced and motivated team.• Maintain an agreed level of productivity/billability and staff turnover.• May be responsible to coordinate client or account activities for department or function.• Participate in and contribute to project bids, including client presentations.• Ensure client and business needs are met and that all projects are optimally resourced with suitably experienced staff • Ensure direct reports meet departmental and project productivity and quality metrics by efficient execution of their project in line with project plan.• Meet percentage of travel and billability guidelines for department, region or function, where appropriate.• Produce accurate resourcing plans in conjunction with appropriate Project Team Members.• Provide expertise and consultation, facilitate metrics collection and develop action plans in conjunction with Director/Project Leader/Lead to keep projects on time and within budget.• Drive team members to improve their efficiency and effectiveness at prioritizing work and improving performance evidenced by the work produced, client feedback, audit results and QC measures.• Take appropriate action following regular feedback sessions from client’s technical groups.• Act as executive oversight of a large project where applicable.• Act as the client contact for local business when required.• Manage multiple countries and/or subcontractors.• Implement process improvements, in conjunction with Management team and Quality Management Group, in response to client and team feedback and quality audits.• Follow up departmental metrics, drive team members to meet departmental goals• Ensure management team check quality of department deliverables (e.g., site visits, Central File documentation) and take appropriate remedial action.• Determine training needs and collaborate with internal partners to ensure appropriate availability of training.• Revise, implement and monitor departmental compliance with SOPs.• Participate in committees, task force groups as needed. Qualifications • Look within and beyond Clinical Operations to encourage teamwork, quality and productivity efforts to thebenefit of Clinical Operations and the Company.• Work with senior departmental management in developing managers and ensuring a talentedpipeline of management staff within the department or function.• Performs a leadership role in ensuring managers and staff are communicating and coordinatingefforts to provide superior line management services to staff.• Demonstrate excellent leadership skills within department, function or location. This includestaking an active role in departmental, functional or location activities (e.g., managementmeetings), ensuring employees adhere to corporate policies and following up with managementas appropriate.• Train and mentor new managers• Undertake the full range of duties relevant to the leadership, management and development ofthe team to ensure their performance meets and or exceeds both the business and their ownpersonal goals/objectives• Maintain a positive, results orientated work environment, building partnerships and modelingteamwork, communicating to the team in an open, balanced and objective manner• Participate in formal staff review processes e.g. performance and salary reviews to corporatestandards and timescales.• Participate in Company and department system/standards improvement activities.• Support efforts for generating business leads (client networking, public speaking, etc.).• Departmental or Project tasks as assigned.• Travel as needed Skills• Strong ability to manage and motivate direct reports• Strong ability to successfully manage a full workload across multiple-projects.• Ability to manage Managers and lead a global, “virtual” team• Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills (including experience inmaking presentations at conferences, meetings, training sessions)• Outstanding negotiation and organizational skills.• Client focused approach to work• A flexible attitude with respect to work assignments and new learning• Strong ability to manage multiple and varied tasks with enthusiasm and prioritize workloadwith attention to detail• Ability to work in a matrix environment and to value the importance of teamwork.• Comprehensive knowledge of relevant software: Windows, Word, Excel, Outlook.• Excellent negotiation skills• Excellent analytical and problem-solving skillsEducation• Educated to a degree level (biological science, pharmaceutical or other health related disciplinepreferred) or relevant clinical or business equivalent. Language Skills• Competent in written and oral English and local languageMinimum Work Experience• Substantial industry related clinical operations and previous monitoring experience.Applicable experience in a management position. EEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Associate Director,Full Time Employee,Home Based,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-director-clinical-operations-west-job-billerica-ma-us-169213067.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f396d5c8c6fd014a6eadc659b943d10b
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:14:56:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Five Star Senior Living, a national healthcare and senior living provider headquartered in Newton, Massachusetts, proudly offers the highest quality service and care with the warmth and hospitality of home. Founded in 2000, Five Star has two major operating divisions: Five Star Senior Living and Five Star Rehabilitation Services. The Five Star Senior Living division includes more than 260 senior living communities across the United States and is one of the country's largest providers of quality retirement living in the nation offering Independent Living, Assisted Living, Alzheimer's/Memory Care, Healthcare Centers with Skilled Nursing & Rehabilitation and Continuing Care Retirement Communities. Five Star Rehabilitation Services include outpatient rehabilitation, day programs, and respite/short stay options.Five Star Senior Living's corporate headquarters are located in Newton, Massachusetts. Just 20 minutes outside of downtown Boston, the building features easy access to public transportation and the Massachusetts Turnpike.At this time, we are seeking a Social Media Specialist to join our team!  Social Media Create and implement social media strategy and expand overall social media presence for the company Make daily posts to social media platforms, creating or sourcing relevant content to engage and grow social media accounts Oversee implementation of corporate blog on fivestarseniorliving.com Reputation Management Monitor all reviews being written about Five Star communities on such sites as Caring.com, SeniorAdvisor, Yelp and Google Craft responses to negative reviews, with input from community members and regional/ divisional management as needed Post review responses through respective dashboards, manage/mediate relationships between the company and online reviewers Imagery Maintain a library of images that can be used company-wide for websites and marketing collateral Schedule/oversee community photo shoots across the country Provide images and feedback to creative teams/vendors to be used in collateral Light photo-editing using programs such as Adobe Photoshop Make updates to community websites using content management system (CMS) Text and Image updates Building out articles/blog posts/other content Support Corporate Marketing projects as needed: Occupancy reporting Branding initiatives Video development Marketing contests Ability to analyze and report on data, Written Communication, Organization, General Math Skills, Data Entry Skills, Microsoft Office Skills, Self-Development. Must function independently, have flexibility, personal integrity and the ability to work effectively with senior management, facility / community personnel and outside agencies Must have the capacity to teach and mentor others. Freedom from use and effects of drugs and alcohol in the workplace. Persons who have been found guilty by a court of law of abusing, neglecting, or mistreating individuals in a health care related setting are ineligible for employment in the position. Five Star prohibits discrimination against any employee or applicant for employment with regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability or veteran status. In addition to federal requirements, Five Star complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has communities and/or facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Marketing Assistant Job in Newton,,"Newton, MA 02458",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-assistant-job-newton-ma-us-168963754.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=18,,Marketing/Product,bc57ec5f1fd014f82628e1cc0141eb40
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:15:35:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Audit Accountant (Senior or Staff) Job Overview: Are you looking to join a successful CPA firm?  What’s special about this job at this place is the company culture is friendly and very employee oriented so people join stay and grow their careers here!  The management team gives you plenty of autonomy with input when you need it, and you won’t be micro-managed here.   You will audit key financial records at small to mid-sized businesses in retail, distribution, manufacturing and service industries.   Located on the route 128/I-95 corridor. Waltham Burlington Lexington. Please note there is frequent but reasonable domestic travel.    Your auditor job’s primary functions include: Reviewing financial statements, including balance sheets, cash flows and income statements to ensure accuracy. You will pay particular attention to key accounting categories such as: inventories at clients such as performing tests of stated inventory levels, scrutinize shrinkage reports and roll-forwards  as well as reviewing cash, A/R, lines of credit review, vendor payment trends.You will evaluate, analyze and provide written reporting of your findings and analysis to management team. Your travel to client company sites in order to execute above key tasks generally involves frequent but short term trips.  For job qualifications, you will: Be highly self-motivated, well-organized, and oriented toward generating results.  Enjoy accounting and understand audit principles. Completed Bachelors in Accounting or related.Bring two to five (2-5) years of Audit experience (highly preferable!) or performing accounting and auditing work for a service or retail or distribution industry may be considered. Possess excellent verbal and written skills required.  Have high proficiency with Microsoft Excel and Word.  If you’re interested in this fabulous Auditing accountant role, please email your resume directly along with cover letter to michael.boyd@parkerlynch.com      ",Audit /Senior Auditor Job in Lexington,Full Time Employee,"Lexington, MA 02420",,http://jobview.monster.com/audit-senior-auditor-job-lexington-ma-us-167406521.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=17,"55,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,49281f051606860260898144e965c47b
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:15:35:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Talascend is currently seeking an SAP HR Analyst (with ABAP) for a direct hire opportunity located in Chattanooga, TennesseeOVERVIEW:Role supports IT Manager in defining, documenting, and validating the key business processes required to execute a given business function and aligning these business processes to appropriate technology solutions.  He / She plays a lead role in business application (systems) project implementation to assure that key business process metrics are addressed as part of the system rollout.  This individual specializes in a subset of the client's core business processes and is responsible for documenting these processes and understanding the technology solutions that are used to support the execution of these business processes.  This individual works directly with business process owners (and technology users) to identify where processes can be improved and how the technology solutions supporting these processes can facilitate that improvement.  He / She is also responsible for working with the PIO to understand the technology roadmap for GoA and how this technology roadmap impacts the business process(es) that they have responsibility over.  This individual works with the Manager and Technology Strategy areas to identify and report on key performance indicators and how a given technology solution has impacted these key performance indicators. This specialist is responsible from gathering business requirements through the implementation of a system solution that fulfill the Business requirements (mainly SAP). He / She displays strong skills in SAP Technology with focus on and ABAP plus SAP functional expertise in the HR area.  The SAP HR Analyst will act as a project manager and functional consultant.  As part of a worldwide group, he/she might work with a globally dispersed cross-functional team to lead resources, prepare appropriate documentation based on the project size, delegate tasks to team members, effectively and clearly communicate project status, manage project risk and monitor the change readiness of the business as well as conduct post implementation audit reviews. He/she oversees all aspects of project information including timelines, budgets, resource allocation, scope and definition. He/she must have the ability to manage small to medium global cross-functional projects.  PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:• Create and maintain Business and System documentation for transparency• Work with the Business Area Leader to make transparent through explicit documentation the, business processes, business applications (system landscape), system information (batch jobs, interfaces) and the interrelationship among all of these attributes of the Business Architecture.• Ensure that the Business Area Leaders are aware of the Business Architecture and the implication of the architecture to enable or constrain changes in business strategy.    • Create Application (System) Lifecycle Plans    • Work with the Business Area Leader to ensure that a multiyear lifecycle plan is created to support level 3 processes that includes milestones for all known system version or functional upgrades and sunset and successor system implementation.    • Assess and Manage Business Process / System Requirements and Business User satisfaction    • Work with the business area leaders to determine, for a given business process, the current level of performance satisfaction and risk with current process and systems. Create with the business area requirements plans for continuous improvement of the process and system.    • Identify Automated Solutions which support business process maturity or improvement   • For a given business process, work with the business to identify, document, and analyze business process risk and opportunity costs associated with current process and system     • Identify from the AG Master Construction Plans (MCP) the current and or future generation of Group Solutions as potential successors for the current processes and systems.     • For a given business process, work with the business to create business case documentation (with standard template) to evaluate scenarios to replace or adapt current processes or systems.      • Facilitate the Acquisition and Maintenance of Application Software    • Work with the business to specify the appropriate system controls within the design of the application and facilitate the process of acquiring and defining maintenance guidelines for the application.    • Work with the business to facilitate the development of end-user training based on the business processes, which the acquired application is geared to support.    • Manage Process and System Implementation Projects• Technical Project Leader for the implementation of the new MCP systems or upgrades through the change control process.• Ensure that the system implementation projects follow the GoA ITPO Project Management standards including insuring that all required documentation is current and accurate.• Responsible of requirements validation with the areas of responsibility• Responsible for the functional requirement definitions and for some projects  responsible of the system configuration or programming• Responsible for the PMO of the assigned project (tracking, status reporting)POSITION REQUIREMENTS:Required• 5-10 years of professional work experience in related field.• Competence in defining documenting business processes and process governance using Microsoft Visio Professional 2003 and / or ARIS.• Proficiency in MS Office 2003 / 2007• Proficiency in Process Management• Proficiency in Project Management • SAP Knowledge (HR)• SAP and Process consultant skillsPreferred• Exposure the SEP Software Development Process• Mixed Functional and ABAP experience in SAP manufacturing environment with • SAP HR focus• SAP SuccessFactors ExperienceEDUCATION REQUIREMENTS:Bachelors in Business Administration, Management, Finance, Information Systems or related discipline. Preferred• Master’s in Business Administration",SAP HR Analyst (with ABAP) Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sap-hr-analyst-with-abap-job-chattanooga-tn-us-168752771.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,8a956a7498c3e6eb29dad70817e831f8
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:15:53:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"An exciting opportunity to join an Industry leader as a Medical Operations Leader (MOL) This role combines your drug safety experience with your project management expertise! The Medical Operations Leader will provide leadership, management, general oversight and direction for Medical Services projects, including but not limited to medical monitoring, clinical and post-marketing pharmacovigilance, clinical endpoint adjudication, and data safety monitoring committee management. The MOL will also be responsible to ensure client satisfaction, project team management and communication, quality, adequate resource planning and allocation, and financial performance. If designated as the Global MOL (GMOL) for a project the MOL will serve as the primary point of contact and communication between the PAREXEL Project Leader, the Sponsor team and Medical Services worldwide and, with the Global Lead Physician (GLP) be accountable for performance of the entire Medical Services team on that project.QualificationsEducation• Degree in Pharmacy, Nursing, Life Science, or other health-related field, or equivalent qualification• Associates/diploma degree in any of the above with appropriate work experienceLanguage Skills• Fluent EnglishMinimum Work Experience• Considerable drug safety knowledge and experience• Substantial experience working in drug development and/or healthcare environment• Project management and/or significant team leadership experienceEEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Medical Operations Leader/Drug Safety Project Manager Job in Billerica,Full Time Employee,"Billerica, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-operations-leader-drug-safety-project-manager-job-billerica-ma-us-169213075.aspx?mescoid=1100049001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),217d8f9f8f5de0c856417871a9ae9732
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:16:09:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  675681 Apex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest IT Staffing firm, has a high-profile opportunity for a technician to support one of our Fortune 500 clients in Boston MA. This Contract opportunity offers a competitive salary, benefits, and 401K! If interested, please send a copy of your resume and best method of contact to Jordan at jpumpelly@apexsystemsinc.com Job Overview:Project is to convert all External FTPs from FTP to SFTP using the Managed File Transfer product (MFT) Sterling File Gateway (SFG). SFG is a Gateway between the external Internet and the Internal business Environment. All external SFTP Processes must flow into and out of the SFG. Requiring revising, testing, and implementing script changes as necessary.Duties:Experience with SFTP and FTPSUNIX Experience in creating and modifying UNIX Scripts. Experience with Sterling File Gateway is a Plus – but not necessaryExperience in creating and modifying Windows Scripts. Mainframe TSO JCL Experience.  Ability to Document changes made and create training materials.2 plus year’s experience is required with Secure File Transfer and SFTP Tools (Sterling File Gateway, CA Workload Automation Client, SFTP, PSFTP).Expectations:Convert all Internal Mainframe FTPs from FTP to FTPS. This will include revisions of all FTPs in all business Mainframe Applications JCL and Procedures (Procs). This will also include debug testing and coordinated implementation. Convert all Internal UNIX and NT FTPs from FTPs to SFTPs. This will include revisions of all FTPs in all Signator UNIX and NT Applications Scripts. This will also include debug testing and coordinated implementation.  Provide support for all SFTPs after initial installation. Prepare documentation and training materials for internal IT team.  Manage and support all initial incidents from initiation to resolution.  Facilitate and coordinate with Global Support Areas as well as vendors on specific FTP to SFTP conversions. Prepare, maintain, and update FTP/SFTP documentation for the new and existing business processes. Experience:  IBM Sterling File Gateway – Managed File Transfer Tool  CA Workload Automation Desktop Client (ESP_D)  IBM Job Control Language (IBM Mainframe OS 390)  UNIX – for coding SFTP Scripts using vi as the editor  NT – for coding SFTP Batch files using DOS commands  Testing Experience in a multi-level testing environment (Dev, Systest, Sage, and Production).  Knowledge of the financial and insurance industry.  MS Office Tools (Word, Excel, Project, PowerPoint, Visio).  UNIX Tools (putty, vi)  Informatica  IBM Mainframe COBOL • Strong communication, presentation, negotiation and influencing skills • Ability to work both independently and within a team environment EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",FTP Developer Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ftp-developer-job-boston-ma-us-169444605.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),21600f2d0b5a0beaaf20b58be63de0b8
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:16:17:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Ooltewah, TN Date Posted: 2016-06-22 Job Description LAUNDRY AIDE AND HOUSEKEEPERThe Bridge at Ooltewah in Ooltewah, TNPart-time position available. (EOE/M/F/V/D)Join our team at The Bridge at Ooltewah. We're an upscale senior living community in Ooltewah, TN.  IDEAL CANDIDATE- cheerful personality- customer service skills- a desire to serve today’s seniors- flexible- laundry aide or housekeeper experience preferred but not mandatoryWill train the right candidate.The Bridge at Ooltewah provides a beautiful workplace and a team atmosphere.The Bridge at Ooltewah 423-760-8540 5901 Snow Hill Road Ooltewah, TN 37363 www.bridgeatooltewah.com                                                       75153 Job Requirements see above",LAUNDRY AIDE AND HOUSEKEEPER Job in Ooltewah body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,"Location: Ooltewah, TN Date Posted: 2016-06-22 Job Description LAUNDRY AIDE AND HOUSEKEEPERThe Bridge at Ooltewah in Ooltewah, TNPart-time position available. (EOE/M/F/V/D)Join our team at The Bridge at Ooltewah. We're an upscale senior living community in Ooltewah, TN.  IDEAL CANDIDATE- cheerful personality- customer service skills- a desire to serve today’s seniors- flexible- laundry aide or housekeeper experience preferred but not mandatoryWill train the right candidate.The Bridge at Ooltewah provides a beautiful workplace and a team atmosphere.The Bridge at Ooltewah 423-760-8540 5901 Snow Hill Road Ooltewah, TN 37363 www.bridgeatooltewah.com                                                       75153 Job Requirements see above",,http://jobview.monster.com/laundry-aide-housekeeper-job-ooltewah-tn-us-169117580.aspx?mescoid=5100960001001&jobPosition=2,,Food Services/Hospitality,2e3d8e7487b552ce0161f15e350a798c
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:16:17:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job ID: 258415 Face to face interview required. Our client, a leader in the financial services industry, is looking for a Business Systems Analyst.  Our client does business in dozens of countries around the world and manages over 200 billion dollars in assets.  This is a position with a market leader that has over two centuries of experience. As a Lead Business Systems Analyst, you will provide functional analysis, design and specifications for product and client information delivery systems.  Projects will vary from tactical application improvements to strategic design and implementation of improved systems capabilities.  We are seeking an individual who is passionate about mobile and web based digital transformation.   What You'll Do: Create clear and open communication channels between business, technology, operations, and data management teams through interpersonal communications and through structured specifications and specification frameworks Ensure that project deliverables are clearly scoped, and specifications are articulate, complete and reflect the best ideas from project team members Design and create specifications orchestrating complex global asset management data streams and define the transformation of financial data streams into end-user information for institutional investors and their associates Design and participate in the design of data models, process models, systems interfaces, user interfaces, data migrations and workflows Design and create data flows and conceptual data models from business requirements using ERDs, xml schemas, and object oriented design patterns Analyze complex data relationships with SQL, Excel, MS Access, VBA, Perl, Python or Java Help define appropriate use of mobile and web based digital strategy tools, infrastructures and services for delivering content appropriate to persona, region, language, SEO, tagging and entitlement management requirements Create clear and concise presentations and documentation in MS Word, Visio, Excel, database reports and PowerPoint Ensure written specifications align with business needs from tactical and strategic perspectives Work with Quality Assurance team to provide fully qualified, testable specifications Provide input and seek clarification on test plans Contribute to the definition and implementation strategy of specification prototypes and to the SDLC Ensure software is developed within information security standards Identify and report all risk and compliance issues, breaches and suspicious activities Act in accordance with Risk Excellence as part of our Way Ahead foundation Apply now! About Eliassen Group: Eliassen Group has been driving the success of our clients, consultants, and employees within Technology Staffing and Consulting Services since 1989. For over 25 years, we have been at the forefront of innovation by uniting talented people and quality solutions within successful companies to help them attain their business objectives. Our solution oriented approach to understanding your needs ensures that we identify and represent the best possible talent available in the market, personally selected and matched to your requirements by our highly-tenured, extraordinarily capable recruiting team. Our consulting divisions include expertise focused on Agile, Big Data, Biometrics & Data Solutions, Creative Services, Government Services, Life Sciences and Workforce Management. Eliassen Group is privately held and headquartered in Wakefield, MA. Don’t miss out on our referral program! If we hire a candidate that you refer us to then you can be eligible for a $1,000 referral check!",Business Systems Analyst Job in Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/business-systems-analyst-job-boston-ma-us-169395233.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,64ae936575b79ced801c564a487caf0a
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:16:26:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you're looking for the benefits of joining an industry leader, with a high-charged, energy-filled environment, then you can stop looking, because you have found what you're looking for in the Utility Worker position at our Hertz Local Edition location. Bring your energy, drive, and motivation to Hertz, and set your goals on cruise control! The Hertz Corporation, a world leader in the car rental industry, currently seeks energetic team players to join our team. Duties include assisting with customer pick-up and delivery, cleaning the interior and exterior of the vehicle, checking and filling all necessary fluids under the hood, refueling the vehicle and checking tire pressure. Customer service experience is requiredMust be able to stand for long periods of time with continuous bending and twistingMust be available to work scheduled hours depending on the needs of the branch including Saturdays and SundaysMust be at least 20 years of ageValid Driver's License with clean motor vehicle recordPeriodic MVR checks will be performed if hired. Educational Background: High school diploma or equivalent education required. Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening. EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Utility Worker -Part Time Job in Chattanooga,Part Time / Employee,"Chattanooga, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/utility-worker-part-time-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169126545.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=7,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,fed0fe36e0822ece8a9a7bf6d8fa9f45
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:17:00:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Establish systems for and direct and oversee all aspects of environmental services to include housekeeping, laundry, and maintenance services for the facility.High school diploma or equivalent *Related experience at a level necessary to accomplish the job Must have the ability to read, write and follow oral and written directions at a level necessary to accomplish the job Must be capable of maintaining regular attendance",Specialist Maintenance  Job in West Newton,Full Time Employee,"West Newton, MA 02465",All,http://jobview.monster.com/specialist-maintenance-3-job-west-newton-ma-us-169466419.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,b323ed48b416d257c3e8b11578267ef5
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:17:08:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Combined Insurance is seeking Territory Managers to join our fast-paced, high energy, growing company. We are proud of our tradition of success in the insurance industry of over 90 years. Come join our team of hard-working, talented professionals! JOB SUMMARY: The Territory Manager (TM) is responsible for leading, developing, building and managing a team of 5 or more Agents, generating sales to new customers, sales and service to current Combined Insurance policyholders, recruiting of new agents and delivering annual new sales objectives RESPONSIBILITIES: Developing New Agents Field train a minimum of 4-5 days each week for the first two weeks with all new Agents. Field train a minimum of 3 days each week for the next 5 weeks with all new Agents. Develop in each Agent expertise with all aspects of the sales process New and Established Agents Receive monthly internal leads from Marketing Director (MD) and distribute to Agents (biweekly) Receive externally generated leads, distribute to Agents immediately and report disposition daily Support Agents in assignment planning/appointment setting as needed Field train Agents by accompanying them during sales visits as needed, typically at least one day every 2 weeks per Agent Collect post-sales documentation and process according to documentation type including disposition of internal lead cards weekly Meetings Conduct daily meetings with the team each morning for the purpose of training and development Attend monthly full day market team meetings and deliver training as required Attend bi-weekly full day meeting with MD and other TMs Conduct and attend training and development meetings Core sales process and personal production Meet production standards and guidelines set by management Be able to effectively demonstrate the company's sales process Engage in personal production during Incentive Weeks only (Incentive Week to typically take place twice a  quarter) Execute core sales process as outlined during that week Contact externally generated leads and report dispositions in requested timeframe Plan assignments Conduct sales presentations consistent with new customer approach Complete all post sales administration and data collection documents Service customer service calls or refer to appropriate channel Recruiting/Field Demos Field recruit prospective new Agent candidates while training and selling Establish local networks and sources within territory to find qualified new agent candidates Conduct informational recruiting seminars to prospective new Agents as needed Represent the Company at local job fairs or other hiring events Assist MD’s with interview process of new agent candidates as needed Take all prospective territory Agents that have passed MD interview on field demos Make final hiring decisions together with MD Other Establish local presence for Company Follow company policies and standards COMPETENCIES: Capacity to manage and lead a sales team Strong communication and organizational skills Good coaching and mentorship skills Ability to conduct small group training meetings Maintain high ethical standards Excellent sales and negotiation skills SKILLS/EXPERIENCE: Successful and stable work history Demonstrated leadership skills Minimum of 1 year Insurance sales Minimum of 1 year Insurance Sales Management experience Basic PC skills required Obtaining your Life, Accident, and Health license is required prior to employment EDUCATION: High School Degree or equivalent required College Degree preferred OUR BENEFITS As a Combined corporate employee, you have access to one of the most comprehensive benefit plans in the business, designed to meet your needs and help you reach your financial goals.  We are committed to supporting its employees with a comprehensive compensation package that is appropriate in the market where they work. Below are several of the many benefits we offer our employees: Health insurance Dental insurance Tuition reimbursement A company-match 401(k) plan Disability insurance Life insurance Employee referral bonuses ABOUT COMBINED INSURANCE Combined Insurance is a leading provider of individual supplemental accident, disability, health and life insurance products. With a field sales force and corporate staff in excess of 5,000 people worldwide, Combined Insurance meets the growing coverage needs of policyholders around the globe. We pride ourselves on being customer-centric, people-driven, accountable, performance-minded, and ethical. We invest in our employees and take the time to focus on their development, needs and career aspirations. Connect with us onTWITTER, FACEBOOK, LINKEDIN, INSTAGRAM and GOOGLE+ Read our blog, SUPPLEMENTALLY SPEAKING, for more info on health and wellness topics  ",Territory Manager Job in Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/territory-manager-job-boston-ma-us-168954339.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c2e025f4d7edee5e9d0575b7bc586df0
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:17:33:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate Director, Career AdvisorSalary - $90-100KTerrific opportunity with world-class university for experienced Business professional to provide career planning assistance/education for blue-chip MBA students. Responsibilities:·       Will advise within a generalist model of delivering services; evaluate and review current offerings; create and deliver career seminars for large and small groups·       Support students' career planning activities; build relationships with employers hiring MBAs; organize events; advise students on a broad range of career paths·       Contribute to developing and delivering a comprehensive, timely, and relevant career education process·       Partner on the delivery of career seminars and programming and lead topical seminars·       Identify and solicit support from alumni and faculty to support the career education process for resourceful and motivated students·       Provide one-on-one advice to students on goal setting, job search strategy, and personal marketing tools·       Partner with several job function/industry student clubs and with firms to offer career development programs; and foster positive relations with MBA employers. Requirements:·       Bachelor's degree (master’s degree preferred, specifically an MBA) with a minimum of 5+ years' relatable professional experience·       Strong knowledge of and interest in MBA employers/careers·       Must be comfortable with and able to address the challenges of highly motivated business professionals in career transition·       Knowledge of and interest in finance, technology or strategy, finance, and sustainability careers a plus·       Experience in MBA career development, career advising, or corporate recruiting also desiredContact: Please forward a word doc resume to: Jobs@CharlesRiverSearch.comMBA, Human Resources, Recruiting, Financial Services, Investments, Associate, Analyst, Portfolio Analyst, Advisory, Career Guidance, MBA, Human Resources, Recruiting, Financial Services, Investments, Associate, Analyst, Portfolio Analyst, Advisory, Career Guidance,",Career Advisor for MBA Students Job in Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/career-advisor-for-mba-students-job-boston-ma-us-169431511.aspx?mescoid=2100310001001&jobPosition=2,"90,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /yearExcellent Benefits",Experienced (Non-Manager),496d8786691c385676fb6d76afea33bb
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:18:07:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Engineer needed for immediate direct opportunity located on the north shore of Boston, Massachusetts! We are simply looking for a highly motivated design engineer with excellent communication skills to join our team. This engineer will be equipped with a working knowledge of metal forming, joining and heat treating in order to write proposals, win new business as well as manage new product development projects. This position requires creativity and the ability to sell your ideas internally and to customers. This individual should have a BSME along with 5 years related experience. This is an excellent opportunity to land with a well established company in a convenient north shore location ! Responsibilities for the Project EngineerWrite proposals to win new business Manage new product development projectsRequirements for the Project EngineerBSME and a minimum of 5 years related experienceA solid understanding of heat transfer, fluid mechanics and applied thermodynamicsWorking Knowledge of metal forming, joining and heat treatingKnowledge of IS0 9000 Design Process RequirementsDemonstrated Written and Oral Communication EffectivenessAny experience working with AS9100, CFD analysis or Structural FEA software is a plus!!BenefitsBase salary, a performance-based bonus and a comprehensive benefits packageThis Job is located in Reading, MA -> United States",Project Engineer - Proposals / Bids /Heat Transfer / Fluid Mechanics/IS  / Material Science Job in Reading,Full Time Employee,"Reading, MA 01867",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-proposals-bids-heat-transfer-fluid-mechanics-is0-9000-material-science-job-reading-ma-us-168831422.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=18,"72,000.00 - 82,000.00 $ /year",,75a0f8f1ee6a174297bde2d0f2ffe2d1
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:19:14:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.The Senior Telesales Representative, working in partnership with the Telesales Coach, coaches and develops the telesales team to drive sales and expand relationships with business customers through inbound sales calls directly from prospective and/or existing business customers.Requires competency in customer focus, change & innovation, strategic thinking, relationship building & influencing, talent management, results focus and inspirational leadership.1+ years in a telesales / inside sales role with proven track record of sales success, or previous sales supervisory experienceTalent for confidently making presentations to groups as well as one-on-oneSuperior oral and written communication skillsSuperb leadership, coaching, employee relations, and interpersonal skillsA knack for effective time management, organization and prioritizingStrong decision making, change management and negotiation skillsAbility to work well and quickly under pressureTelecommunications or wireless industry experience desiredAssist Coach in coaching and developing a team of effective telesales employees to meet or exceed overall sales quotas and service goals. Build skills and successes through continued coaching conversations. Identify and recommend action plans to the Coach and assist with coaching team on action plansConduct ongoing coaching of sales and service behaviors through mentoring, role playing and review of metricsReinforce training and development as outlined by the Coach and Sales TrainerKeep abreast of the rapidly evolving T-Mobile technology. Ensure that the team is up to speed on new products and offerings and know the sales techniques necessary to sell them.Lead an environment of recognition - celebrate individual and team success and best practices. Coordinate and run team meetings, morning huddles and performance updates under the direction of the Coach; may run meetings in absence of CoachAnalyze reporting to identify team selling and operational opportunities sales metrics, team performance, team calls, account touches, account churnWe Take Equal Opportunity Seriously - By Choice T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with our Company values and will not be tolerated. Furthermore, such discrimination or harassment may violate federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Sr Rep,,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-rep-telesales-tmobile-at-work-job-chattanooga-tn-us-169099069.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,,b357454045ceae8dca8e5112e8259622
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:19:25:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Clean Harbors is hiring a Telecommunications Specialist to be responsible for administering requests for Telecommunications equipment and services throughout the Clean Harbors organization.  Responsibilities:  Manage Moves, Adds and changes for all company facilities Place repair and service requests for various Clean Harbors field locations Evaluate new site requirements; recommend and order new equipment and services Place orders for installation of new telephone numbers; moving or disconnecting numbers for company sites as requested. Provide training and documentation of the telecommunications features and functions Provide assistance with special projects as needed Requirements: Solid analytical, organizational, customer service, administrative, and problem solving abilities Project Management experience as pertaining to office openings/closures and acquisitions Hardware and Software troubleshooting experience Avaya VoIP experience required, Norstar experience would be a plus Solid knowledge of ticketing systems such as Service Now required Knowledge of CISCO VoIP and/or MS Lync as well as the ability to work with Century Link VoIP Platform preferred Ability to create and trouble shoot Audio Conference and WebEx accounts High School diploma Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market. Headquartered in Norwell, Massachusetts, Clean Harbors has waste disposal facilities and service locations throughout the United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. We offer competitive salaries and progressive benefits including health, dental, life insurance, 401K, generous paid time off, tuition reimbursement and more.  Employment is contingent upon a successful background check and drug screen. Must meet all work eligibility requirements. Environmentally-responsible business.#LI-MW1*CHP*CH*SK Potential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Telecommunication Specialist Job in Norwell,Full Time Employee,"Norwell, MA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/telecommunication-specialist-job-norwell-ma-us-169481126.aspx?mescoid=1501148002005&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,f0167e7e4f296ba7580ddb77a7979eea
United States of America,US,08/Dec/2015:19:26:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tech Support EngineerTech Support EngineerConsider joining our Boston-based client as their Tech Support Engineer and become a member of the clients' Engineering Support Team. As Tech Support Engineer you will provide advanced technical support for industry-leading products, ensuring problem resolution and client satisfaction. This company has great benefits and really encourages a healthy work-life balance- APPLY TODAY for immediate consideration!Responsibilities:Responding to escalated technical issues, primarily by web portal, telephone and e-mailResolving complex technical issues through research, reproduction, and advanced troubleshootingCollaborating directly with colleagues in technical support, quality assurance, development, and sales operations to resolve problemsDocumenting all issues, developing and documenting content for knowledge baseAssisting with beta product testingParticipating in on-call programRequirements:At least 3 years of experience in Enterprise\Datacenter software or SaaS solutions supportExperience with VMware vSphere familyExcellent interpersonal skillsExcellent communication skills, both written and verbalVCP certificationCloud Computing experienceComputer Science degreeGD123 Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Tech Support Engineer Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Computer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/tech-support-engineer-job-boston-ma-us-169431733.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,0704717d4e1e01f0ecc15dd1102bd165
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:23:28:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"An American multinational corporation specializing in Internet-related services and products is currently seeking a Project Coordinator for the Outside Plant (OSP) Build Team for a Fiber-to-the-Home program in Charlotte, NC. This is a 1 year CONTRACT position, with the possibility of extension. Local candidates only, no per diem available.Responsibilities for the Project CoordinatorDevelop and prepare project documentation, track status and generate reports to communicate the detailed status of a project and its requirementsAssist team functional leads by facilitating on-time delivery of projects, providing high quality continuous innovation and by exceeding expectationsAnalyze data using logic and reason to make sound recommendations to the program management teamRun / host cross-functional meetings, identify action items and drive them to successful completionRequirements for the Project CoordinatorAS Degree or equivalent work experience2+ years experience in a Project Coordinator roleOSP experienceExperience using reporting and scheduling toolsProficient in Google Apps products and Google AppScript is helpfulPrevious experience with P6 software a plusBenefits401KHealth InsuranceThis Job is located in Charlotte, NC -> United States",Project Coordinator - OSP/Fiber-to-the-Home/P Job in Charlotte,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Charlotte, NC 28201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Coordinator-OSP-Fiber-to-the-Home-P6-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165628210.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,29.95 - 36.53 $ /hour,,9f4063e22089720fa58318c6bfd9b17d
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:23:28:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors. With pro-forma 2014 annualized scope revenues of £5.5 billion and over 40,000 people in more than 55 countries, the company operates across the whole of the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and close to 5,300 employees worldwide. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/commercial, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas.We offer competitive salaries along with a complete benefits package including: medical, vision, & dental coverage, 401K Matching, Educational Reimbursement, and a variety of Training and Development Programs to help you develop the skills you need to succeed in your chosen career path. Additional information can be obtained from our website at www.amecfw.com. Overview / Responsibilities  Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure currently has opportunities available for Telecommunications Quality Assurance Auditors at datacenters across the country (Des Moines, IA and Chicago, IL).   The Telecommunications Quality Assurance Auditor will be responsible for observing and tracking the delivery, installation and testing of telecommunications components of a large-scale mission-critical facility in order to ensure compliance with the project-specific drawings and specifications. Key Responsibilities ·         Ensures compliance with the project-specific drawings and specifications via routine inspections of all telecommunications components·         Identifies and logs issues / shortcomings with telecommunications components project-specific issues log·         Coordinates directly with the owner, the construction manager, the general contractor and their lower-tiered subcontractors to identify and prioritize inspections ·         Participates in daily kickoff meetings and weekly progress meetings ·         Prepares daily and weekly reports summarizing the inspections performed and their results·         Assist in the review of design drawings and specifications Skills / Qualifications  ·         5-10 years of construction experience on complex, mission-critical facilities; Data center experience preferred ·         Experience on large scale complex communications installations, testing and startup·         Experience with fiber optics required·         Registered Communications Distribution Designer (RCDD) certification, or other similar certifications, preferred·         Familiar with major regulations, industry codes, and standards affecting telecommunication work·         Knowledgeable in standard telecommunications materials and methods of construction If you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Telecommunications Quality Assurance Auditor Job in Des Moines,Full Time,"Des Moines, IA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Telecommunications-Quality-Assurance-Auditor-Job-Des-Moines-IA-US-165095350.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),15760a1b90b12bacef55730fdff72fdc
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:23:20:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"We provide our utility clients with a wide range of energy-saving and renewable energy solutions. From individual utility customers and construction contractors, to utilities, municipalities, and government bodies, our clients have come to depend on our customized energy efficiency programs to help them to meet their energy saving goals. This positions is responsible for providing leadership on one of our energy efficiency programs. In this hands-on management role, you will oversee energy programs and will work closely with both clients and our energy professionals to achieve client energy efficiency goals and other program objectives. You will also be working with others who are passionate about energy efficiency and making a positive impact on the industry. Develop and implement a plan attract new customers/trade allies to obtain program objectivesProvide administrative services plan to develop customer correspondence and application processingComplete reviews of program applications to ensure adherence to program rules and requirementsDevelop QA/QC plan to ensure accurate program results and good evaluation resultsCoordinate with program evaluators to understand evaluation plans and communicate program procedures to staffManage direct reports and oversee program staff. This includes interviewing, planning, assigning, completing performance evaluations, coaching, mentoring and directing workResponsible for completely quarterly safety QA/QC audits of staffUnderstand and implement the Franklin Energy Sales Process, which includes both trade allies and customer outreach/sales.Assist training department with reinforcement of classroom training for all direct reports and field staffComplete pre and/or post site visits as neededDevelop case studiesManage the utility relationship and serve as an advocate for our clientManage multi-million budget to ensure full utilization of funds while meeting or exceeding energy goalsDevelop and oversee the processing of energy efficiency project paperwork through energy efficiency tracking systemPrepare monthly invoices and activity reports as required to the client, partner or Franklin Energy managementIncorporate “best practice” methods of energy efficiency program implementationLead and attend relevant presentations promoting energy efficiency programs Specific Qualification for the role include:Bachelor's degree required; advanced degree, preferred. Equivalent work experience may be consideredMinimum of 5 years management/supervisory experience including hiring, coaching, performance reviews, and mentoring; Proven leadership abilities in a rapidly changing environmentProficiency in financial managementBackground in engineering, technology or science and experience in working in a technical environment3 or more years of experience in managing energy efficiency programs – PreferredPMP certification - PreferredExperience in lighting, HVAC, and other technologies installed in commercial and industrial applications – PreferredTechnical experience in developing and/or reviewing energy savings calculations to determine paybacks and incentive levels for customers – PreferredSales or business development background-PreferredDetail oriented and have an ability to prioritize work load in a fast paced environment and delegate appropriate work assignments to staffProficient in Microsoft Office and tracking systems/databasesAbility to analyze and interpret data, work with mathematical concepts such as the fundamentals of plane and solid geometry and trigonometryValid driver's license and reliable transportationWillingness to travel up to 40% of the time. May include occasional overnight travel. PI93305791Apply Here",Program Manager Job in St. Paul,Full Time Employee,"St. Paul, MN 55114",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Program-Manager-Job-St.-Paul-MN-US-165540753.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,Project/Program Management,144d19a3e94bee23117d428e85f4764c
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:22:42:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leader in innovative products and complete solutions in the healthcare industry is currently seeking an Engineer in the Newark, DE area. This is a 1 year CONTRACT position. No per diem is available for this assignment. Required to travel 25% of the time, both domestic and international.Responsibilities for the Supplier Quality EngineerManage the Supply Chain and Manufacturing activities (SC&M) of medical device related product development projects. Participate in R&D design reviews to ensure design quality, manufacturability, testability, global sourcing and lowest cost over the life of the design. Coordinate supplier interface and participation during design and layout reviews for manufacturing. Work with R&D to minimize the use of special material, components, hardware and processes except where required by functionality and availability or alternative choices. Requirements for the Supplier Quality EngineerBSEE or BSME with experience working in a regulated (ISO, FDA) manufacturing environment with a preference for new product introduction. Experience working with suppliers to investigate and correct issues. SAP experience preferred.Machine design / manufacturing background (preferably working with electromechanical assemblies). Strong Microsoft Excel skills (VBA programming, database functions, etc). Benefits401KHealthcareThis Job is located in Newark, DE -> United States",Supplier Quality Engineer - R&D/Machine Design/Manufacturing Job in Newark,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Newark, DE 19714",,http://jobview.monster.com/Supplier-Quality-Engineer-R-D-Machine-Design-Manufacturing-Job-Newark-DE-US-165269009.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=10,25.00 - 26.00 $ /hour,,139aaf9038a615662dc9d1822a6ad30f
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:22:39:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Arkansas Department of Human Services (DHS) is the state's largest agency with 8,200 employees working in 86 county offices serving more than one million people. Employees work in 10 major divisions and five support offices to provide services to Arkansas citizens. DHS is currently seeking to fill a DHS Institution Business Manager in Arkadelphia, AR. The DHS Institution Business Manager is responsible for managing the administrative and business affairs of a state-operated institution. This position: Directs professional and administrative support staff by interviewing and recommending for hire, arranging for training, assigning and reviewing work, evaluating the performance of incumbents, reviewing supervisory evaluations, and providing technical assistance.Plans and directs institutional business affairs by establishing goals and devising short and long-range plans and activities and develops, implements, and monitors operating policies and procedures for business office.Monitors institutional budget, analyzes and prepares financial reports, and keeps superintendent and management informed of fund availability.Manages various administrative support functions including accounting and fiscal management, purchasing, and inventory activities.Manages client personal fund accounts which includes deposits, expenditures, and bank reconciliation of accounts and answers questions from vendors, parents and guardians, and staff concerning expenditure of funds.Performs other duties as assigned.   MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSThe formal education equivalent of a bachelor's degree in business administration, management, or a related area; plus four years of experience in the administration and management of a residential institution or treatment facility or a related area, including two years in a supervisory or leadership capacity. PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONSNursing Home Administrators License or willingness to work toward obtaining one. Position number: 22097345 Closing date: April 11, 2016; 11:59 p.m. APPLY ONLINE AT HTTP://WWW.ARSTATEJOBS.COM  Like us on http://www.facebook.com/ardhsjobs & follow us on http://www.twitter.com/ARdhsjobs for more great DHS career opportunities!",DHS Institution Business Manager-  Job in Arkadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Arkadelphia, AR 71923",,http://jobview.monster.com/DHS-Institution-Business-Manager-22097345-Job-Arkadelphia-AR-US-165762573.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=1,,Project/Program Management,6f3103ab98a6f42c41b5d47fc837f08e
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:22:14:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"PeopleShare is currently seeking candidates for a great opportunity as a Project Coordinator! This is a great opportunity with a growing organization in the insurance industry, offering a fantastic work environment and great benefits! Don't miss out! Apply today for immediate consideration.Job duties will include:Coordination of marketing campaignsDeveloping marketing listsEnsuring successful project completion within deadlinesScheduling seminars and webinarsMaintaining marketing calendarRequirements:Previous experience in a related roleStrong communication skills a must!Ability to multi-task at a fast paceComputer proficiency, including MS OfficeOrganizational skills and attention to detailMinimum HS Diploma or equivalent",Project Coordinator - Insurance Industry Job in Harrisburg,Full Time Employee,"Harrisburg, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Coordinator-Insurance-Industry-Job-Harrisburg-PA-US-165763842.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,15.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,Project/Program Management,9bfa3e6f093cc633a45a3bc06c6ef13b
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:22:02:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60197 # Positions  1 State  CT City  Stamford Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  10390 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Part-Time Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Part-Time-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165276045.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=8,,Project/Program Management,05d202becc67d9db6589f98d81dd9521
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:22:01:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Engineering company is looking for a Project Manager with 15-30+ years of experience working in an operating Nuclear Power Plant or working in a Consulting Engineering company that specializes in the Nuclear industry. Specific experience with or knowledge of 10CFR50.59 process is preferred. Project located in Richland, WA and client prefers local candidates, but will provide a per diem if needed.Responsibilities for the Project ManagerResponsible for managing a full range of engineering, procurement, and construction management projects related to the operation, maintenance, modification, and licensing of existing utility nuclear generating stationsYou will collaborate and coordinate with internal and external clientsCoordinate project planning, including scoping, budgeting, maintaining schedules, communicating and managing deadlines and establishing and performing to critical project objectivesCoordinates work requiring judgment in the independent evaluation, selection, adaptation and modification of standard engineering techniques, procedures and criteriaWork on and support 10CFR50.59 programsInterface with clients on schedules, contracts, estimates, scope of work requirements, etcInitiate client development and maintenance and assume the lead role in sales presentations, proposal preparation, contract negotiations & preparation, and project performanceRequirements for the Project Manager15-30+ years of experience working at an operational nuclear power plant or with a Consulting Firm that specializes in the Nuclear industryMust have at least 3 years of experience as a Project Manager, managing design projects in the Nuclear industryMust have a BS or MS degree in Engineering, a PE or any advanced degrees would be a PLUSMust have the ability to make informative and persuasive presentations to clients, regulatory agencies and the general publicKnowledge of 10CFR50.59 processMust have demonstrated supervisory skills and personnel management skills to review work assignments and performance to ensure the efficient, cost-effective utilization of staffBenefitsMedical benefits package available401k programPTO Program providedThis Job is located in Richland, WA -> United States",Project Manager - Nuclear/Engineering/Project Job in Richland,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Richland, WA 99353",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Nuclear-Engineering-Project-Job-Richland-WA-US-165227119.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=2,60.00 - 75.00 $ /hour,,fe2f696133c0faa6dae528d56afef453
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:21:01:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"APPLICANTS MUST HAVE DIRECT EXPERIENCE WITHIN THE EARTHWORK AND UTILITIES CONSTRUCTION FIELD.Plans, directs, and coordinates activities of designated projects to ensure that goals or objectives of project are accomplished within prescribed time frame and funding parameters by performing the following duties:Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following, though other duties may be assigned: Directs and coordinates activities of project personnel to ensure project progresses on schedule and within prescribed budget. Reviews Job Status Reports and modifies schedules or plans as required. Prepares project reports for management, client, or others. Confers with project personnel to provide technical advice and to resolve problems. Coordinates project activities with activities of government regulatory or other governmental agencies.Competencies To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies: Job Knowledge - Competent in required job skills and knowledge; exhibits ability to learn and apply new skills; requires minimal supervision; uses resources effectively.Be knowledgeable of construction equipment capabilities.Have a working knowledge of civil construction specifications.Conduct weekly meetings for project specific scheduling, budgeting, and planning with supervisors.Identify, track, and obtain approval for all change orders.Provide timely billing for project and track payment schedule.Manage and schedule subcontractors.Design - Demonstrates attention to detail. Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner. Project Management - Coordinates projects; communicates changes and progress; manages project team activities.Communications Expresses ideas and thoughts verbally; expresses ideas and thoughts in written form; keeps others adequately informed.DelegationSets expectations and monitors delegated activities.Managing PeopleIncludes staff in planning, decision-making, facilitating and process improvement.Quality ManagementLooks for ways to improve and promote quality. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.Education and Experience​​Bachelor's degree from four-year College or University in Civil Engineering or Construction Management. Minimum of two years of project manager experience.Language Skills ​​ Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of organization.Reasoning Ability ​​ Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or diagram form. Ability to deal with problems involving several variables in standardized situations.Computer Skills ​​ To perform this job successfully, an individual should be proficient Heavy Job, Primavera P6, and Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel, and Outlook. Individual should be comfortable working with Windows and compatible software. Knowledge of industry-specific accounting software is encouraged.(Acknowledgements : The above job description is not intended to be an all -inclusive list of duties and standards of the position. Incumbents will follow any other instructions, and perform any other related duties, as assigned by their supervisor.)",Project Manager Job in Lanham,Full Time,"Lanham, MD 20706",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Job-Lanham-MD-US-165366252.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),9a16be4f8b0e143d17929474969a9137
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:21:00:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"An established tier 1 automotive supplier is actively seeking a Quality Engineer to add to their team. This is a newly created position due to the continued growth of this facility and the company as a whole. The ideal candidate will have experience with APQP, PPAP, PFEMA, and Root Cause Analysis. Responsibilities for the Quality EngineerPrepares advanced quality planning documents and participates in quality planning activities; including FMEA’s, Process Flow Diagrams, Control Charts, and Gage R&R and capability studiesCreates necessary documentation for customer initial sample submissions; including AQP, customer documents, and any other required documentationTravels to customers’ facilities to participate in all phases of the customer’s launch activities; including Component Review Team meetings, assembly trials, and SOP activitiesPerforms technical and statistical investigations and analysis on production, quality, process, and equipment issues using standard problem solving methodRequirements for the Quality EngineerBachelors Degree 2-5 years of related quality experience within an automotive environmentBenefitsExcellent Benefits, 401k, profit sharing bonusRelocation PackageThis Job is located in Centralia, IL -> United States",Quality Engineer - Quality/Engineer Job in Centralia,Full Time Employee,"Centralia, IL 62801",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Quality-Engineer-Job-Centralia-IL-US-165268962.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=11,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",,db6556876d7453edb7e930cfa55554f6
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:20:51:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60724 # Positions  1 State  RI City  Pawtucket Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  10227 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165727808.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=15,,Project/Program Management,809fd12aed496d8f3b33d941080a6bbf
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:20:41:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES If you are looking for a fun summer job working with people in the great outdoors, then look no further than your local state park/field office. Come work with us in the DNR, Parks and Recreation System. Perfect position for students eighteen years old or older, school personnel available during the summer, individuals looking to re-enter the workforce, or seniors/retirees looking to be more active during the warmer months. - Grawn Field Office - Interlochen State Park - KJC Traverse City State Park - Leelanau State Park Duties in parks range from camper registration, passport permit sales, visitor contact, custodial and maintenance. Hourly pay rate from $8.15 to $9.41. If interested please send your resume and or an employment application (www.michigan.gov/dnr -- search for Employment App Form #PR-7123e) to the park of your choice: - Grawn Field Office 3730 Mill Rd. Grawn, MI 49637 - Interlochen State Park 4167 M-137 Interlochen, MI 49643 - KJC Traverse City State Park 1132 US-31 North Traverse City, MI 49686 - Leelanau State Park (Same address as KJC TCSP) Questions, please call 231 276-9511 Pre-employment drug testing and criminal history checks conducted. This job listing brought to you by The Traverse City Record Eagle",Camper Registration,Full Time,49643,Agriculture/Forestry/Fishing,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Camper-Registration-Passport-Permit-Sales-Custodial-Job-US-165662387.aspx?ch=newstrcy&mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,618f60d15762156782ea293abe3ea77a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:20:41:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Adolfson & Peterson (AP), one of the nation’s top contractors, has an opening for a Senior Project Manager to join our Pacific Northwest regional team.  This position manages and controls multiple, assigned projects, including safety, budgets, contracts, schedules, and trade contractors and supplier coordination.  The scope of the projects range from small to large and/or complex.  Because safety is paramount to AP and embedded into everything we do, all team members are responsible for working safely within our Incident and Injury Free culture.                                                                                                                                              We are looking for a progressive, client-focused Senior Project Manager with talent, initiative, and drive to join the team and lead higher education construction projects.  Key accountabilities of the role include: Provide exceptional customer service; develop and foster longstanding relationships with clients, architects, engineers, and subcontractors.  Co-lead the process to procure future projects while continually building client loyalty. Provide leadership throughout a project to ensure timely and quality results, to include; understanding the owner’s financial goals, communicating policies, instructions and procedures to all team members, weekly site progress meetings, oversight of job safety and review of drawings, RFI’s, ASI’s and all other project requirements Build and facilitate collaborative team processes among project participants, to include project schedule management. Review project plans for constructability and cost feasibility; complete project risk assessments, scope of work matrices, and the trade contract bidding process. Prepare, analyze and manage project progress, costs, budgets, and cash flows.  Other responsibilities as assigned by regional leadership. Job Requirements:Bachelor’s degree in Construction Management, Architecture, Engineering, or equivalent and 8 – 10 years of construction project management experience.  Proficiency with scheduling, spreadsheets, cost control, and project management software including Prolog, Microsoft Project, P6, and other construction programs.  Solid understanding of value engineering, life cycle costing, and project profit/cost processes.  Ability to read and comprehend building plans and specifications.  Estimating experience including take-offs preferred.  Ability to travel to project work sites. Valid driver’s license with a clean driving record required. Ability to identify talent, create and develop teams, and build trust and engagement. Experience cultivating an active network of relationships, driving collaboration and alignment, relating well to key colleagues and connecting with employees at all levels. **NO PHONE CALLS PLEASE** **NO THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS** Adolfson & Peterson Construction is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Senior Project Manager Job in Tacoma,Full Time,"Tacoma, WA 98424",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Project-Manager-Job-Tacoma-WA-US-165145382.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=1,,,d114f3ad9ad24cbd48ee1cd6e9d1c634
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:20:03:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Off Cycle Release Program Manager is a member of the Program Management team and supports the planning and execution of multiple product release programs including Betas, Prereleases, Service Packs and Patches.  The role involves working with the larger MathWorks community including Development (Engineering, QE, Doc, and Usability), other Program Managers, Release Engineering, Marketing, Operations, eProducts and Services, and Technical Support, to coordinate product releases.  Additionally, release program managers occasionally support product or other programs in Development.  Release Program Managers require outstanding written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work well at all organizational levels.ResponsibilitiesCoordinate, support and execute various release programs from initiation through completion.  Specific activities include: Release schedule and milestone definition, execution, tracking and delivery Working with the Development organization to coordinate, plan, monitor, etc. release programs Effectively communicating release program status to all levels of the organization Assessing risk and manage contingency plans at the release program level Identifying and resolving release program-level conflicts Working with senior management to escalate release program issues in a timely manner Identifying, collecting and monitoring metrics to measure release program success Continuously assessing and improving key aspects of the release lifecycle to creatively address complex problems Performing program analysis, managing risk, influencing necessary course corrections, and communicating program status and activities across multiple levels of management. Minimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 7 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree and 5 years of professional work experience, or a PhD degree) is required.Additional Qualifications Experience implementing change in a large organization Ability to appropriately balance strategic goals with tactical implementation Expertise in providing cross-organizational management  of software development programs from initiation through delivery Hands-on experience with developing and reporting on metrics for engineering development, test development and execution, bugs, issues, risks, and other aspects of Project and Program Management Ability to influence without authority Pluses:  Masters’ degree in engineering, technical or related field Experience in the commercial software product industry Experience with MathWorks Products (MATLAB, Simulink) Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",Senior Release Program Manager Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Release-Program-Manager-Job-Natick-MA-US-165370637.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),96af54acf8051fca8c45598116790290
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:19:56:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60444 # Positions  1 State  TN City  Gallatin Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  3398 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165313988.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=2,,Project/Program Management,6f844d8fdbe3024b6a2599a0cec1fe19
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:19:31:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Product Manager II - San Diego, CA • Diversified technology company looking for a strong Product Manager for a temporary position that is expected to last approximately 3 months.Product Manager II - Job Duties: • Manage rebranding efforts for coronary imaging catheters and systems to align with the brand and bring new attention to the company's market leadership and product benefits.• Generate and prioritize list of materials to update • Gather feedback on desired improvements to key collateral materials • With Creative support from marketing firms, create, review, gain approval for, and distribute new materials • Act as Marketing lead on new packaging sustaining project• Serving as primary marketing core team member for the project, represent the voice of the customer on changes to product packaging • Working with marketing firms, interface with The company's brand desk to develop new artwork • Gather feedback on new design and iterate with team to agree on final artwork • Assist with market analysis or other projects as needed• Salesforce.com customer or sales analysis • Analysis of customer feedback forms from limited market releases Position Requirements: • 3-5 years professional experience• Bachelor's Degree in marketing, business, science, or engineering preferred • Proficient software skills across all standard programs (Excel, Word and PowerPoint); salesforce.com experience is preferred • Graphic design, video editing, audio editing experience is a plus Compensation: $44.93/hourly",Product Manager II - San Diego,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Andover, MA 01810",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Product-Manager-II-San-Diego-CA-Job-Andover-MA-US-165795410.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=10,,Project/Program Management,011fd9c4a4155dfbf4f83e0eeefec5a2
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:19:30:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"The world's largest manufacturer of fiberglass and related products is currently seeking a Production Planning Specialist in the Ladysmith, WI area. This is a 3-month CONTRACT position, with the possibility of extension. Local candidates only; no per diem available.Responsibilities for the PlannerCreating production documents for the manufacturing of products using Excel and AutoCAD programs. Enter Orders & Create Production Documents.Draft and send purchase orders and associated documentation to production facility for manufacturing projects and align on confirmed ship dates. Works with internal and external resources to satisfy customer needs and communicate and coordinate information. Continuous Improvement initiatives.Requirements for the PlannerAssociates Degree in Drafting or other related field required. BS/BA in Supply Chain or other applicable field preferred. 2+ years working in a Supply Chain capacity required, preferably in Production Scheduling / Planning.Prior experience with CAD, Adobe or other drafting / production planning software. Knowledge of Production Scheduling and Demand Planning principles. Experience with scheduling in a multi-plant manufacturing environment.Strong MS Excel skills and experience working directly with outside suppliers required. Knowledge of Production Planning / Scheduling principles preferred. Intermediate skills and experience using AutoCAD and Adobe Acrobat preferred. Must be fluent in reading architectural drawings and be familiar with construction and production planning.Benefits401KHealth InsuranceThis Job is located in Ladysmith, WI -> United States",Planner - Manufacturing/Purchase Orders/Continuous Improvement Job in Ladysmith,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Ladysmith, WI 54848",,http://jobview.monster.com/Planner-Manufacturing-Purchase-Orders-Continuous-Improvement-Job-Ladysmith-WI-US-165828262.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=18,15.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,,64b312796ddfacd8070e0571837a04a6
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:19:17:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a full-time opportunity for iSpace's direct client located in Santa Monica, CA, then moving to El Segundo, CA in June 2016.  This is open to W2 candidates who are able to work for any employer in the U.S. without sponsorship.The Service Delivery Manager will be responsible for leading the Account Management Team, managing day-to-day business needs as well as overseeing long-term projects.  The successful candidate will be a personable self-starter able to exercise sound judgment with excellent project management, communication, and leadership skills.  Responsibilities:·         Provide leadership and direct workflow for up to 4 Account Managers while maintaining collaboration and teamwork.·         Build solid Client relationships and serve as point of contact to Clients to analyze project requirements, enable Client success, and serve as the voice of the Client to internal teams, all while managing day-to-day business needs.·         Work with Clients to gather requests/requirements for system enhancements and new system development.·         Serve as an internal Client ambassador and advocate, capturing and maintaining unique business rules and procedures to provide strategic planning and direction for Client needs.·         Work closely with other business units to ensure smooth transitions in the onboarding of new Clients.·         Manage and drive teams to ensure compliance with contracted obligations including SLA’s and KPIs; provide performance reporting to Clients and internal teams.·         Initiate and perform Root Cause Analyses; report findings and work with cross-functional teams to identify corrective measures as well as provide transparent communication to Clients throughout the process.·         Manage all aspects of Client Business Reviews: schedules, reporting/documentation of key performance metrics, leading discussions.·         Work effectively in a cross-functional capacity to support new initiatives and special projects.·         Communicate timelines and business decisions to internal teams.·         Fulfill analytical reporting requests – must be able to gather and evaluate reports that allow recommendations and adjustments to business rules and practices to be made. Qualifications:·         Minimum 8 or more years’ experience in a client liaison and/or project manager capacity with service-oriented organizations.·         3+ years’ experience as a manager with direct reports.·         Extensive experience managing multi-faceted projects across cross-functional teams including IT is a must.·         Experience with B2C Order Management Systems and/or Direct Marketing is a plus.·         Problem and conflict-solving abilities, influencing people across organizations and levels.·         Excellent written and presentation skills.·         Proven ability to coordinate projects with internal resources, outside vendors and delegate tasks.·         Previous experience or participation in software development or implementation projects is a plus.·         Experience holding sole responsibility for the daily business of assigned accounts.·         Strong analytic and strategic skills, especially as they relate to Order Management processes/systems.·         Demonstrated ability to complete projects under tight deadlines.·         Ability to identify opportunities for business growth and/or cost savings.·         Extensive proficiency with all MS Office applications (including Visio) required.·         Occasional travel may be required. Education: Bachelor’s Degree required.",Service Delivery Manager Job in El Segundo,Full Time,"El Segundo, CA 90245",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Delivery-Manager-Job-El-Segundo-CA-US-165668019.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=1,Salary plus Bonus,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b23dc29974abc8ed55a233bb494e265d
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:51:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60516 # Positions  1 State  NC City  Kill Devil Hills Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  11428 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Full-Time or Part-Time Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Full-Time-or-Part-Time-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165385233.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=5,,Project/Program Management,70a9d0cb2ea76559293d18846e0f1366
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:50:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"A-Line Staffing is seeking a qualified candidate for a direct hire UAT Tester opportunity based in Detroit, MI.  Please review the desired qualifications below and contact Greg Wagner at 586-323-6600 or via email at gwagner@umich.edu with questions or interest.Top Three Skills/Experience·         Previous UAT testing experience (developing test cases, executing test cases, and logging defects) (1-2 years)·         Test case development (1-2 years)·         Health payer experience (1-2 years)·         Ability to write complex SQL queries  Job Details·         With general guidance and coaching, participates in developing and executing test scenarios for unit, process, function, system integration and acceptance testing. Develops test cases, scenarios and scripts to ensure applications quality. ·         Designs and develops usability testing scenarios, and administers portions of testing process. ·         Defines criteria for testing, analyzes results of testing sessions and presents results. Participates in selection of testing tools and approaches. ·         Utilizes appropriate testing tools and testing processes on projects and assists in building test environments. ·         Able to write and execute data queries to data analysis for selecting test data and researching anomalies. ·         Significant creativity is required. Required Skills/Experience ·         Detail oriented·         Strong written, organization, and communication skills·         Comfortable working independently and in a team environment·         Experience in a technical support and/or testing environments·         Ability to conduct defect analysis and reporting·         Capable of multi-tasking and testing various business applications Preferred Skills/Experience·         Minimum 2-4 years related experience preferred. Educational Requirements:·         Bachelor’s degree in related field preferred Greg Wagner – A-Line Staffing – 586-323-6600 – gwagner@alinestaffing.comKeywords: UAT, complex SQL Queries, Toad, Excel, ClearQuest, Jira, Test Case Development, Healthcare, claims, enrollment, waterfall methodology",UAT Tester Job in Detroit,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Detroit, MI 48226",,http://jobview.monster.com/UAT-Tester-Job-Detroit-MI-US-165016118.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=19,,Quality Assurance/Safety,0712913df3e39f8e8024d0471ae79d04
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:47:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: EMCOR Government Services offers an experienced single-source solution for meeting the routine and mission-critical needs of federal, state, local and other government organizations. By combining our expert professional technicians, commercial best practices, extensive facilities knowledge and strong commitment to reliable, responsive service, we enable our government clients to achieve consistently high-performance facilities, on-time projects and long-term value. Job Title: Electrical Planner/Estimator Job Summary: EMCOR Government Services has an immediate need for an Electrical Planner/Estimator based in Washington, DC Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Will provide estimating support to project design and construction contractors. Under the direction of the RWA Project Manager, the Estimator is responsible for estimating all bids and contracts, scheduling and coordinating subcontractors and developing and nurturing client relationships. Will prepare plans and specifications; cost, time and materials estimates for construction, repair, rearrangement and maintenance of facilities. Will manage projects from pre-construction meetings through all phases of construction to final acceptance of work. Qualifications: ·       Journeyman’s license with at least 5 years of specialized experience in the electrical estimating field.·       Must have skills organizing and leading people and be comfortable working independently as well as a team member.·       Knowledge of and demonstrated ability to use R.S. Means construction estimating software and knowledge of the National Electric Code required.·       Experience submitting written proposals, scopes of work, scheduling and coordinating site contractors and other assigned personnel preferred. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",Electrical Planner / Estimator Job in District Of Columbia US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Location:,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Electrical-Planner-Estimator-Job-DC-US-165250823.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=18,,Project/Program Management,5228730b9852a97d5ef6077d9d2952c2
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:17:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fellowship DirectorGraduate School's Office of Diversity, Inclusion, and FundingThis position oversees the administration of various fellowship programs, the development of new venues for offering graduate student support, and supports the recruitment and retention of graduate students, especially those of underrepresented backgrounds. Qualifications include a bachelor's degree in education, communication, counseling, or a related field, two years of work experience in the area of student services, excellent verbal and written communications skills, and an ability to work effectively within and for a diverse community.For the complete position description and qualifications go to:http://www.ohr.wisc.edu/Weblisting/External/PVLSummaryApply.aspx?pvl_num=85866UW-Madison is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. We promote excellence through diversity and encourage all qualified individuals to apply.",Fellowship Director Job in Madison,"Full Time, Employee","Madison, WI",,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Fellowship-Director-Job-Madison-WI-US-165300489.aspx?ch=madison&mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=12,"$36,790.00+ /year",General/Other: Project/Program ManagementProgram Management,1b71a284b7e263e59a91ff0def09240f
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:12:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60896 # Positions  1 State  NC City  Kitty Hawk Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  11429 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Full-Time or Part-Time Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Full-Time-or-Part-Time-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165727749.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=14,,Project/Program Management,c48c20b020f3059b51536b13de7df2b2
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overall Responsibility:Assigned to a field construction project to provide Site Representation.Key Areas of Responsibility1. Review utilization plans for sub-consultants & subcontractors.2. Conduct outreach to local M/WBE Firms3. Draft reports identifying Program trends as it relates to M/WBE, and Section 3 goals4. Provide advice to Senior staff on ways to meet the Programs utilization goals.5. Documenting project outreach efforts.6. Maintaining organized and detailed project records.7. Conduct meeting to update Program staff on progress toward meeting goals.8. Organize and prepare monthly and annual reports.9. Conduct internal M/WBE and Section 3 audits.10. Attend event to promote MWBE, Section 3 and local hiring.11. Assist with special projects as needed.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities1. Ability to analyze data to determine M/WBE, Section 3 and Local hiring  participation.2. Must have strong interpersonal communicating skills.3. Determines the priority of assignments based on critical deadlines that must be met.4. Experience working with multiple teams.5. Good writing abilityWork Experience RequirementsWork experience leading to a thorough understanding of the knowledge described above.",M/WBE & Section  Compliance Coordinator Job in Brooklyn,Full Time,"Brooklyn, NY 11236",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/M-WBE-Section-3-Compliance-Coordinator-Job-Brooklyn-NY-US-165223108.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),38eb8101d3c0a80057ce7951d0716f01
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Gainesville Regional Utilities is looking for qualified applicants for the Water/Waste-water Laboratory Supervisor position. This individual will perform supervisory and technical work directing employees in laboratory testing for permitted analysis from Wastewater Reclamation Facilities and Power Plants. For further info and/or to apply, visit www.cityofgainesville.jobs Closes 4/10/16. EOE/AA/DFWP/VP",Water/Wastewater Laboratory Supervisor Job in Gainesville,Full Time,"Gainesville, FL 32601",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Water-Wastewater-Laboratory-Supervisor-Job-Gainesville-FL-US-165878851.aspx?ch=newsgain&mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=8,,,2eca2223cecb491f1df390a8a2046bb7
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"E2 Consulting Engineers, Inc.Position SummaryThis job provides engineering, project management, and technical support for gas or electrical utility projects. Projects are normally discipline specific and may include upgrades or replacement of gas pipeline systems, governors, large valves, etc.  or improvements to pipeline structure features. Job duties will vary by assignment. Responsibilities may include Privileged and Confidential work. Travel may be required up to maximum approximately 25% of the time. QualificationsRequired:• BS degree in Electrical, Civil, or Mechanical Engineering from an accredited curriculum or equivalent work experience.• At least 18 months of engineering and/or project management experience and demonstrated performance in related industry; or demonstrated skill development and performance in other similar type projects• Valid California driver's license• Proficient business computer skills such as Microsoft Office Suite Programs (Emphasis on Excel, Word, and MS Project). Desired:• Familiarity with gas utility system and installations• 3-5 years of engineering and/or project management experience• PMP or AACE certification ResponsibilitiesDuties will vary by assignment and include, but are not limited to:• Lead and attend Project Coordination Meetings and maintain follow-up list of action items• Coordinate with project stakeholders as required• Track and align costs associated with project• Aid in vendor communication via phone, email, and face-to-face meetings• Ensure project data is maintained in appropriate databases• Coordinate between analytical support, vendors and contract administrators• Own project management, cost tracking, scope implementation and schedule• Obtain management approval as needed• Coordinate with business finance for transfer of costs• Aid in forecasting costs with the help of vendors• Ensure vendors complete assigned projects within company policies and procedures, with assigned resources to meet scope, schedule, cost and quality commitments while reporting to respective department heads• Other duties as assigned as related to Engineering and Project Management",Project Manager Job in San Ramon,Full Time,"San Ramon, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Job-San-Ramon-CA-US-165906618.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=13,,,67d5b3193ea2a9d6c8f3abb50f02a164
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  59115 # Positions  1 State  WA City  Bellingham Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5239 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165548522.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=17,,Project/Program Management,5b0cf07b51d1d57663b4c12ee4fe93b4
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionEaton located in Kings Mountain, NC has a position opening for a Supplier Quality Engineer. The primary function of this position is to engage the external and internal supply base on product conformance and compliance to Eaton Vehicle Group North America supplier quality requirements .  Deploy standardized processes for supplier quality throughout the Kings Mountain facility.   Essential Functions:   A.      WISPER Plant Champion – Monitor Eaton and supplier WISPER system utilization and Eaton Supplier Excellence Manual guidance within the organization. B.      Change Management - Support plant change management system (MCO, ECO, Deviation, etc.) for supplier product readiness including supplier PPAP review, packaging verification to plant requirements, PPAP sample dimensional verification and safe launch trials as appropriate. C.      Supplier non-conforming product – Provide notification, responsiveness, containment, root cause determination, corrective action, and closure of supplier quality issues utilizing the WISPER DMR (Defective Material Report) system.  Support customer focus team with management and closure of supplier responsible issues.  Control scorecard and identify COPQ. D.      Supplier cost recovery – Communicate to Suppliers identification and input of Eaton incurred costs for supplier recovery through requirements of the cost of poor quality process. E.       Supplier Performance Improvement – Capture supplier performance metrics on a monthly basis in line with plant balanced scorecards.  Populate the plant supplier performance matrix monthly as defined in the focus supplier process and review improvement activities with cross-functional team members as appropriate. F.       Quality Management System – Support plant, local, divisional, and group alignment to related supplier quality management procedures.  Ensure plant conformance to corporate PR-6 policy requirements.  Capture, monitor, and report identified plant supplier quality metrics supporting plant balanced scorecards and monthly divisional report. Receiving/Inspection – Identify and implement necessary supplier inspection criteria and frequencies with appropriate plant or contract personnel.Basic Qualifications (Including Educational Requirements)Basic Qualifications:   Bachelor's degree in Engineering or related technical discipline. Minimum 1 year of experience in engineering or manufacturing. Legally authorized to work in the US on an on-going basis without company sponsorship.Eaton is a power management company with 2015 sales of $20.9 billion. Eaton provides energy-efficient solutions that help our customers effectively manage electrical, hydraulic and mechanical power more efficiently, safely and sustainably. Eaton has approximately 97,000 employees and sells products to customers in more than 175 countries. For more information, visit www.eaton.com At Eaton, we see things differently. We see opportunities to innovate, go above and beyond, and we work hard because what we do reflects who we are. If you see things differently—if you’re determined, motivated and focused on improving the world around you—then it’s time to see where a career at Eaton can take you. For more information, visit www.eaton.com/careers Eaton is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Eaton is committed to ensuring equal employment opportunities for all job applicants and employees. Employment decisions are based upon job-related reasons regardless of an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, marital status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",Quality Engineer Job in Kings Mountain,"Full Time, Employee","Kings Mountain, NC 28086",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Kings-Mountain-NC-US-165755434.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=9,,Quality Assurance/Safety,acca3a8de5e13f706540b94c9faaee9c
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"NEED LOCALS ONLYJob Title                                : Scrum MasterLocation                                : Chesterfield MODuration                                : 6-12 Months ContractVisa status                             : Any work status Position OverviewCliet  is looking for a Scrum Master that will provide effective collaboration, facilitation, leadership,and coaching skills supporting the agile/XP development process and delivery of our enterprise applications. As an agile expert, the Scrum Master will be responsible for driving project execution, removing impediments and promoting transparency. You will facilitate daily stand-ups and ensure the integrity of the agile process by capturing team metrics and removing obstacles to drive projects to successful release   Responsibilities1.         Coach the development team and stakeholders on how to use Agile/Scrum practices1.         Act as Scrum master for 1-3 agile teams with a focus on guiding the teams towards project goals while also improving the way they work2.         Facilitate sprint planning, retrospective and sprint demos3.         Assist the product owner with keeping the backlog groomed4.         Ensure cross-team coordination5.         Reach out to the larger company network for impediment removal6.         Maintain relevant metrics that help the team see how they are doing7.         Ensure that our ways of working are consistent across the teams8.         Strengthen the presence of our workgroup as an Agile center of excellence. Actively contribute to the company’s Agile and Lean Community. Keep the rest of the company network aware of our activities.  Requirements1.         Knowledge of the software development life cycle2.         Certified scrum master/scrum practitioner3.         Knowledge and/or experience of lean principles and Kanban4.         Excellent communication skills in English in written and spoken form5.         At least 3 years of hands on experience working in an agile environment, preferably in a variety of situations and rolesPLEASE FILL IN BELOW DETAILS FOR SUBMISSION1.       Full Name                                : 2.       Contact Number                       : 3.       Email ID                                   : 4.       Skype ID                                   : 5.       Interview availability               : 6.       Current Location                     : 7.       Still in project(Y/N)                :       (If yes- please mention reason for change)8.       Notice needed to join               : 9.       Hourly Rate                              : 11.     Visa status                                :Employer details if (H1 Visa)Thanks and Regards,Usha SreeSOVEREIGN TECHNOLOGIES LLCPhone: 513-223-5979usha@sovereigntec.comwww.sovereigntec.com",Need Locals to MO : Scrum Master - Chesterfield MO Job in Chesterfield,Full Time,"Chesterfield, MO 63005",,http://jobview.monster.com/Need-Locals-to-MO-Scrum-Master-Chesterfield-MO-Job-Chesterfield-MO-US-165635684.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fff74528bf36e515f65766edec09ad1a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Document Specialist is a member of the on-site Williams Lea team delivering exceptional customer service at our client locations. Responsibilities include document creation and editing, document repair and recovery, and providing MS Word expertise.Job Responsibilities:Create and edit complex documents to specifications using expert word processing and advanced software knowledge.Transcribe tapes, scan and clean documents, and convert documents to/from different software packages is required.Use document comparison software, red-lining, and general editing to correct documents as directed.Produce financial statements, flow charts, presentations, letters, and other documents as requested.Recover/restore corrupted document files when needed.Handle sensitive and/or confidential documents and information.Communicate with manager and client on job or deadline issues.Job Requirements:High school diploma or equivalent, bachelor’s degree preferred.Minimum two years experience in a document production / word processing environment.Expert knowledge of MS Word, including formatting documents, understanding the Styles function, and the ability to create macros is required.MS Word certification desired.Advanced MS Excel and PowerPoint skills needed.Typing speed of 50 wpm is required.Ability to work in a fast-paced team environment.Attention to detail with emphasis on accuracy and quality.Ability to prioritize work to balance multiple projects and deadlines.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Exceptional customer service skills.Williams Lea offers an exciting and supportive business environment.  We develop our people and reward their contribution.  We work with openness and integrity.  We are an equal opportunity employer.  We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform preemployment substance abuse testing.",Document Specialist Job in Wheeling,"Full Time, Employee","Wheeling, WV",,http://jobview.monster.com/Document-Specialist-Job-Wheeling-WV-US-165283500.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=18,,Project/Program Management,e7eac13a75dab476ad521ed16e74bd85
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Robotic Applications Engineer/Project ManagerKimball Township, MIIf you are interested in this position, the preferred method to apply is to send your resume to (Sam) sberi@nwexs.com You may also text 248.707.1071 with your questions.POSITION DESCRIPTIONThe right candidate must have a strong experience base with 2D layout design, estimation and technical writing (proposal generation). Experience in the material handing industry is a definite plus. Success driven and goal focused, this person thrives in a detail oriented environment where they are known for outperforming their expectations. Reporting to the VP of Applications Engineering, this is an inside sales function for a world class material handling. This person will work with teams from multiple functions (Sales, Project Management, Engineering-Mechanical/Robotic/Electrical, and Manufacturing) to ensure proper costing, scope development and customer satisfaction.If you are interested in this position, the preferred method to apply is to send your resume to (Sam) sberi@nwexs.com You may also text 248.707.1071 with your questions.You can also visit our website for other open positions. We try and keep them current. If it is posted, it is still active.Nationwide Technical & Executive Search, Inc.www.nwexs.com  ",Robotic Applications Engineer/Project Manager # Job in Kimball,Full Time,"Kimball, MI 48074",,http://jobview.monster.com/Robotic-Applications-Engineer-Project-Manager-37054-Job-Kimball-MI-US-165476877.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=7,,,c6f35694d13652a7a6889666088c5bef
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60220 # Positions  1 State  NJ City  Yardville Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  10503 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165276029.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=13,,Project/Program Management,d59eb4df36a8d59eabb6cb7f75b04c63
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Glenview, ILDuration: 3-6 MonthsHourly Rate: 30/hr all Inc Description: Manage all aspects of various projects including; assembling project team, assigning individual responsibilities, identifying appropriate resources needed, and developing schedules to ensure timely completion of project(s).  Must be familiar with the project objectives, as well as the role and function of each team member to effectively coordinate the activities of the team.  Communicates with project leaders and/or sponsors and function and functional area Managers regarding status of specific projects. We are looking to hire a contingent worker beginning immediately through the end of June to assist with the building of presentation-ready folders and binders for the sales organization. This individual would be employed out of the Glenview office, would report to me, and would work full time. Their individual tasks are below: receive requests from Sales on specific presentation folder/binder builds work with Marketing to understand the specifics of the builds in terms of product (physical product, brochures, printed material, etc) and the coordination of the build configuration organize the procurement of the needed materials. This would consist of ordering product from the warehouse using our systems (like SalesForce and Customer Service), purchasing supplies from vendors (like Staples), work with print vendors, et coordinate the inbound receipt of materials assemble sufficient folders according to the specifications received create shipment requests through UPS Campus ship (and track) material to designated location and communicate shipment to requestor document inventory costs and other pertinent information into a shared document to track all aspects of overall project costs Required Skills Superb organizational skills Demonstrated skills of efficiency in the workplace (i.e., managing multiple projects simultaneously) Ability to synthesize data and extract relevant data Excellent computer skills and proficiency, particularly in Excel Must be diligent and persistent in seeking answers or resolving an issue Ability to lift heavy boxes (or seek assistance) Ability to communicate effectively and timely",Project Coordinator Job in Glenview,Full Time,"Glenview, IL 60025",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Coordinator-Job-Glenview-IL-US-165561327.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=19,25.00 - 30.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),494cfc75e1f32fb316ba0e03eb2d4932
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is a global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. Our goal is to maintain a positive candidate and client experience through fitting the best candidates with the best positions.Experis is seeking a Project Manager with in depth experience with Active Directory and ITIL Service management for our client in Austin, Texas. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Project Manager - Active DirectoryLocation: RemoteWork Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US, no visa sponsorships available at this time; ability to pass a drug and background Compensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableExperience:8+ years of Project Management ExperienceRequires previous success managing infrastructure implementation projects with a focus on Active Directory of similar size and scope, facilitating multiple work streams, executive review sessions, and meticulous schedule management.Must Haves:PMP CertifiedActive Directory Migration ExperienceExperience with Active Directory Doman Tree/Forest (Understanding Terminology)Group and User Design and Policies (Understanding terminology)Strong understanding of ITIL Service Management processes and principalsMastery of MS Office and SharePoint toolsBPI and/or quality program experienceExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Project Manager- Active Directory Job in Weir,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Experis is a global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. Our goal is to maintain a positive candidate and client experience through fitting the best candidates with the best positions.Experis is seeking a Project Manager with in depth experience with Active Directory and ITIL Service management for our client in Austin, Texas. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Project Manager - Active DirectoryLocation: RemoteWork Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US, no visa sponsorships available at this time; ability to pass a drug and background Compensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableExperience:8+ years of Project Management ExperienceRequires previous success managing infrastructure implementation projects with a focus on Active Directory of similar size and scope, facilitating multiple work streams, executive review sessions, and meticulous schedule management.Must Haves:PMP CertifiedActive Directory Migration ExperienceExperience with Active Directory Doman Tree/Forest (Understanding Terminology)Group and User Design and Policies (Understanding terminology)Strong understanding of ITIL Service Management processes and principalsMastery of MS Office and SharePoint toolsBPI and/or quality program experienceExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Weir, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Active-Directory-Job-Weir-TX-US-165715564.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,Project/Program Management,fdb2ffab3ce3a853a01530ae7bdbd4eb
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60470 # Positions  1 State  NH City  Merrimack Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  1070 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165385246.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=20,,Project/Program Management,b43f9be5c41beaac756da56ad28d2b25
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"SCOPE OF WORKThe Access DB Migration Project Manager will be responsible for all project management activities from Project Charter through project completion including but not limited to:Report to the  Project Steering Committee on all matters relating to this project including budget, goals, scope, project plan, issues, risks, and milestones;Create and manage project plans, issue/risk logs, and scope change process.Lead large meetings effectively and manage with clear expectations with all assigned resources to ensure successful completion.Facilitate and manage meetings and people, including managing conflict and decision making.Manage all project deliverables such as but not limited to Requirements, Traceability Matrix, Technical Requirements, Architecture, Infrastructure, System Design, Test Strategy, Implementation Strategy, Sunset Strategy, Data Migration Strategy, etc.Manage the expectations of the key stake holders to ensure that the project is tracking towards the expected goals.Manage the triple constraints of quality, schedule and cost to maximize value and meet business objectives.Facilitate and manage joint analysis sessions to ensure an understanding of business goals, requirements, and deliverables.Collaborate with project team members, stakeholders, customers, and sponsors to identify and monitor budget, goals, scope, project plan, issues, risks, and milestones; establishes measures to determine success of projects (e.g., costs, scope, time, intended results).Utilize existing project materials to further develop and implement project documentation such as but not limited to project charter, project management plan, and detail project schedules, which identify the tasks and activities necessary to support the Project.Manage and monitor the progress of analysis, design, program development, testing, reporting, releases, deployments, training, and documentation tasks.Manage and assist the  Information Technology Team to develop technical requirements, design documentation, Technical Review Board (TRB) Presentations, and other technical documentation as needed.Responsible for communicating Program related interests to the Steering Committee and Project Team Leads.Participates with teams responsible for requirements and requirement mapping.Governs project issues and risks working with the Agency Chief Information Officer as an escalation point as well as the Project Steering Committee when necessary.Works with Project Leads and Subject Matter Experts on project planning activities.Assist team members in their duties, tasks, responsibilities and functions related to the project deliverables.Review team member and vendor work products to ensure proper and timely quality.Hosts and facilitates all project status meetings.Responsible for creating the final Project Summary and formal shutdown of the project. .Required Skills/Experience* extensive knowledge and expertise in the use of Project Management methodologies and tools.* large scale and complex project management experience from concept through project completion.*e experience in managing projects supported by multiple team members.* migration project management experience.* data conversion and data migration project management experience.The position will require strong client agency communication skills.* an understanding of Health and Human Services.* familiarity with and a functional understanding of enterprise architecture and infrastructure design.Additional Knowledge and Skills: Effective presentation skillsProficient in Microsoft ProjectAbility to work in a fast-paced environment with multiple prioritiesAbility to adapt to changing business needsProficient in standard software (Outlook, Word, Excel, Business Objects, Access, MS Project)No Agencies Please “US citizens and those authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor H1b candidates at this time.” All responses are confidential. Resumes are not submitted to our clients without your written permission. Skylightsys Strategic Staffing is recognized as a leader in the staffing industry. Our team is experienced, with over 40 years of collective placement experience, specializing in placing professional technology talent in both permanent and contracting opportunities. Our staff has a deep knowledge of our clients’ needs and our candidate’s skill set, making sure to accurately pair the two together. Our mission is to provide lasting value to our clients and candidates through building strong relationships. Our clients are non-vmo, combined with our strong relationships result in quick response time and interviews which lead to job offers. We are a certified NMSDC firm.",Project Manager II Job in Hartford,Full Time,"Hartford, CT 06106",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-II-Job-Hartford-CT-US-165821335.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2f547f79cd49e000e26986d756beb63a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Friends of the Missouri River Breaks is looking for a new executive director. We are looking for an enthusiastic, experienced leader who is excited by the idea of a fast-paced, full-time job leading an effective community-based organization dedicated to the protection of the Missouri Breaks National Monument in north-central Montana. If you are interested please submit a cover letter, resume and three writing samples to info@missouribreaks.org. View the full job description at  http://www.missouribreaks.org/2016/03/09/we-are-hiring-3/  ",Executive Director Job in Helena,Full Time,"Helena, MT 59601",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Executive-Director-Job-Helena-MT-US-165420356.aspx?ch=billings&mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=9,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year","Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",622a49b2b8785af780bacfa459f7bc38
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60223 # Positions  1 State  NJ City  Barnegat Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  2529 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165276022.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=15,,Project/Program Management,466f9e8f4b916d79bd7030b44a4441b9
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"ACG is seeking a senior project manager to work with a Health/Fitness leader in the west metro. As senior project manager, you are responsible for facilitating the development and execution of projects from the launch meeting through the close-out meeting. You work closely with team members to ensure that each department has ample time and sufficient and correct information to complete the project. Your objective is to ensure the project is completed on time, on budget, and meets the quality standards of both the client and accounts.ResponsibilitiesWork with client services lead and client services project contact to understand the scope of each assigned project. Manage all project communications; ensure that communication flow is efficient and appropriately inclusive Create and allocate schedules with the production manager Work with team members to communicate individual responsibilities and deadlines. Monitor and manage the budget during the life of the project. Manage and coordinate project workflow by evaluating project status and collaborating with team members to meet project deadlines. Work with other project managers to reallocate shared team resources and prioritize workloads. Coordinate and facilitate project close-out meetings to analyze project efficiencies and effectiveness. Requirements B.S. or B.A degree required 5 + years’ experience in traffic or project management with an advertising/marketing agency or in-house environment; including strong background with digital projects. Excellent listening and communication skills. Ability to quickly grasp the project objective and deliverables. Quick learner Great attitude: Low drama, positive, team player, flexible Ability to identify, mitigate and manage risks against project schedules and budgets. Can quickly modify plans and reprioritize as circumstances change. Preference for project management experience that includes interactive/web-based projects, print, direct mail, publications Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite",Senior Project Manager Job in Chanhassen,Full Time,"Chanhassen, MN",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Project-Manager-Job-Chanhassen-MN-US-165429284.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a514682dfe4873ac2b91f40589e0e07b
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:33,No,jobs.monster.com," Title: Procurement & Resource Management CoordinatorLocation: Torrance CADuration: 12 Months Contract Summary Our client is seeking a Procurement & Resource Management Coordinator. This role will be responsible for supporting the Procurement Lead and Resource Management within our client’s Program Management Office (PMO) Support Team.  Procurement Coordination (75%)·         Administration & Knowledge Management: Arrange and maintain a fully secure, organized, and indexed library of vendor management documentation. Includes processes & templates, along with supplier-specific contracts, key correspondence, deliverables, acceptance/sign-off documentation, and invoices·         Vendor Reporting & Management: Assist with build-out and regular production of vendor KPI reports.  Includes development of KPIs, documenting & optimizing procedures for their calculation, producing the KPIs, and following up with key stakeholders to implement corrective actions as needed  to address KPIs that fall out of bounds·         Procurement Processing: Assist with submission of contract requests in various procurement systems, ensuring requests are complete, straightforward, and easily processed and approved. Maintain status of contract request and document detailed follow-ups for various participants in the process·         Invoice Processing: Assist with confirmation of supplier work acceptance/sign-off, and processing of invoices for vendor payment·         Capability Development: Use CORE Receivables project-specific Vendor Management experience to tailor, design, and develop broader Vendor Management Capabilities for the enterprise Resource Management Coordination (25%)·         Onsite coordinator for onboarding/offboarding of resources to the program·         Liaison with Client’s Real Estate and Facilities; managing onsite locations for the program·         Resource forecast reporting to leadership·         Create and maintain organizational chart·         Identify and support process improvement initiatives that allow the program to remain flexible and adaptable to the changing needs·         Adhere to and enforce use of defined PMO processes·         Support communication efforts within the assigned program team Must Haves:·         Experience managing or writing vendor service contracts·         Pragmatic, personable with very clear and efficient communication style·         Attention to detail·         Flexibility for quick turn-around on coordination and reporting for leadership·         Coordinating with multiple teams comprised of internal and external resources across program teams simultaneously·         Microsoft Office Suite 2010 (PowerPoint and Visio included) Preferred/ Nice-to-haves:·         Procurement/ Vendor/Supplier Management experience·         Invoice administration, tracking and reporting·         Supporting Compliance/Audit requests and reporting·         Key Performance Indicator (KPI) design, development and measurement·         MS Excel Pivot table experiencAll interested applicants should apply via email by sending a copy of your resume to: Amee.Lord@ispace.com or contact Amee Lord at 310-563-3835  Please remember  the iSpace Referral Policy. If you refer your friends and we place them in any type of position, we will pay you a referral fee. When you refer someone, your names are linked in our data base.  If we place them next week or 5 years from now, we will pay you a referral fee.  There is no expiration date. We find our best people this way, so please assist your friends and make some money at the same time.  iSpace Inc. | 2381 Rosecrans Ave, Suite 110, El Segundo, California 90245Direct Phone: 310-563-3835 | Office Phone: 310) 563-3800 Ext. 235 | Fax:  310-563-3801 ",Procurement & Resource Management Coordinator Job in Torrance,Full Time,"Torrance, CA 90501",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Procurement-Resource-Management-Coordinator-Job-Torrance-CA-US-165484500.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),93689d6bea2ed5921912093ee70ca929
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:18:06:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"  COMPANY INFORMATION Millstone Medical Outsourcing is a fast-growing company in need of motivated individuals to assist in its expansion. We are looking for an enthusiastic individual to join our team as a Quality Associate.  Millstone Medical Outsourcing’s business focus is sterile and non-sterile packaging of medical devices. Millstone also engages in other activities, such as mechanical inspection and assembly, which are designed to meet the outsourcing requirements of medical device manufacturers seeking to reduce costs while maintaining high levels of quality, accuracy and timeliness. Millstone Medical Outsourcing is FDA and ISO registered and employs a detailed internal quality system to ensure ISO compliance.  JOB DESCRIPTION  We are looking for exceptional candidates who are eager to pursue an extremely rewarding career in the medical device industry.  The individual in this position will be primarily responsible for helping to facilitate Millstone’s CAPA system. Additional tasks will include maintenance and development of procedures and will also be asked to perform special projects as needed.   In addition, responsibilities will include fostering teamwork and building effective teams committed to organizational goals.  Each day will provide a variety of challenges along with the opportunity to develop your potential and grow professionally working alongside talented colleagues.  Recent college grads are encouraged to apply! SKILLS REQUIRED -        Strong written and oral communication skills-        Bachelor’s Degree, a plus-        Proficient in the use of Microsoft based applications-        Ability to work in a team environment WHAT YOU CAN EXPECT TO RECEIVE AT MILLSTONE: -        Medical device industry experience-        The opportunity to work with some of the top orthopedic and medical device companies in the world-        ISO 13485 training CONTACT Interested candidates should send resumes to hr@millstonemedical.com or apply in person at 580 Commerce Drive, Fall River, MA 02720.  FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATIONMillstone Medical Outsourcing offers a competitive salary, health, dental and vision benefits, 401(k) with company match and a warm, friendly working environment.  To learn more about Millstone Medical Outsourcing’s opportunities, visit us online at www.millstonemedical.com.  ",Quality Associate Job in Fall River,Full Time,"Fall River, MA 02720",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Associate-Job-Fall-River-MA-US-164417184.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e0152246b888c66d300f4d96cee81f79
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:17:53:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experienced telecom/wireless Construction Manager needed for a National carrier in the Charlotte, NC region. This is a 9-12 month contract assignment. Contractor benefits available. Responsibilities for the Construction ManagerManagement of general contractor job quality, safety standards, and punch lists.Perform cell site audits after site is built to evaluate GC work qualityInteract with outside governmental agencies, consultants and vendors. Coordinate with utility companies for construction work and other situations as they arise.Day to day completion of assigned work orders and trouble ticketsPerform required maintenance on assigned sites & troubleshoot with RF Engineering group. Oversee LTE deployment and integration of new technologies on assigned sites.Requirements for the Construction Manager3-5 years experience in similar role for General Contractor in wireless telecom industry.Advanced software skills (Word, Excel, Outlook and Project). Excellent organizational skills and project management capabilities.Understands and adheres to job site health and safety standards. Benefits for the Construction ManagerContractor benefits, PTO and 401K. This Job is located in Charlotte, NC -> United States",Construction Manager - Telecom / Wireless/Construction/Cell Site Job in Charlotte,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Charlotte, NC 28217",,http://jobview.monster.com/Construction-Manager-Telecom-Wireless-Construction-Cell-Site-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165425483.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=15,48.00 - 55.00 $ /hour,,f9c8434715dec5e1395cd638604b411a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:17:52:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Manager Needed - Entry LevelWe are an innovative company that is transforming the marketing & advertising industry. While we provide advertising at a fraction of the price, compared to others, our success and rapid growth has set new industry standards.We are actively seeking Entry Level Professionals for our sales & marketing teams! These are competitive positions that start at the Entry Level and offer rapid advancement into management. We are looking for fast paced, high energy, competitive minded professionals to cross train in all areas.Marketing and SalesAdvertising and Public RelationsEntry Level ManagementCustomer ServicePromotionsWe are looking for future leaders to grow into a management role with our company while focusing on the following areas:- Development of marketing campaigns and strategies- Customer service and client acquisition- Implementation of product launches- Rigorous leadership training- In-store promotional advertisingRequirementsJob Requirements• You must actually be ENTRY LEVEL (less than 5 years experience and willingness to learn)• You must possess great people skills.• You must demonstrate excellent work ethic and student mentality• You must have a positive business attitude, like the rest of our enthusiastic staff.• You must be confident you'll be successful, just waiting for a career opportunity where you can prove yourself.Please Note: We do conduct our events within the local area; therefore access to personal transportation is required.Entry-Level, Management, Sales, Marketing, Business Development, Customer Service, Sports-Minded, Entertainment, Advertising, Public Relations, Sales Training, Retail, Full-time, Internship, Business, Promotions, Direct Marketing, Promotional Sales, Clients, Account Manager, Campaigns, Direct Advertising, Client Relations, Hospitality, Entry Level Management, College Graduate, Entry Level Marketing, Entrepreneur, Sports, Training, Restaurant, Server, Bartender",Assistant Brand Manager Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL 60018",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Brand-Manager-Job-Chicago-IL-US-165486219.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=10,,,a9113cab188107cdc3918358a64c90de
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:17:17:12,No,jobs.monster.com," JOB SUMMARYThe Project Manager /​Business Analyst will help grow our professional services with Sperian Energy. Lead the planning and implementation of both business and technical projects across multiple departments and business units. Meet with project stakeholders and/ or product managers to determine project scope, including financial, operational and time constraints. Defines project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases, and elements; forming project team; establishing project budget. JOB RESPONSIBLITIES·         Meet with User groups, product managers, and /or project stakeholders to review, define and document the business requirements to facilitate solution development and testing on technical projects.·         Analyze the requirements and work with other team members including business personnel, technical personnel, and vendors to identify potential solutions.·         Review solutions and gather final approval and confirmation of resources from stakeholders and participating teams.·         Develop and document a project plan which includes project tasks, timeline and communication strategy.·         Assemble and coordinate a project staff.·         Manage projects through completion and provide regular updates defining project progress, problems and solutions to applicable parties.·         Provide project evaluations and assessment of results.·         Defines project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases, and elements; forming project team; establishing project budget.·         Maintains user confidence and protects operations by keeping information confidential.·         Prepares technical reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends.·         Uses cloud based project management tools for tracking project requirements, project tasks, and project metrics.REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCEBachelor Degree in a business or a technical discipline such as Information SystemsPreferred PMP or PMI-ACP certified3-5​ years of business analyst experienceProficient in Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word and Outlook).  Familiar with Cloud base technologyAt least 7 years of proven track record of leading and managing IT projects in complex enterprise environments.Prior experience working in the Energy or Utilities industry a huge plus!ABOUT SNH, Inc. and SPERIAN ENERGYSperian Energy is a retail energy provider operating in multiple states across the country. Sperian Energy Corporation is a subsidiary of the SNH Family of Companies, which provide a range of services to large financial institutions, Fortune 500 companies, and consumers nationwide.   www.sperianenergy.com",Project Manager/Business Analyst Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89128",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Business-Analyst-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-165427011.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=13,,,c59dc72225eb32bbf24d741d60dd75ab
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:17:15:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60195 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Healdsburg Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  6029 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165276048.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=7,,Project/Program Management,0089d5c46e18973ba6072eaf6fa01b9e
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:17:08:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60324 # Positions  1 State  PA City  Erie Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  1854 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165314001.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=1,,Project/Program Management,d92430921075c5a7818960dd5ef44a6a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:16:54:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Compliance Specialist-POS_75050760-1DescriptionGenzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on rare diseases and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, which are marketed in countries around the world, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.Sanofi, an integrated global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in the field of healthcare with seven growth platforms: diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and the new Genzyme.Genzyme Corporation (a Sanofi company) and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or any other characteristics protected by applicable lawCompliance SpecialistQuality Assurance (QA) Bulk Operations is responsible for quality oversight of operations at Genzyme’s Allston Landing, a large-scale therapeutic protein manufacturing facility. QA Bulk’s main function is to ensure CGMPs are being adhered to during manufacturing operations. In support of our main function, our additional functions include, issuing production records, log review, review and approval of production records, deviation/CAPA review and approval and final disposition of intermediates.This position is responsible for performing a variety of complex tasks under general guidance and in accordance with current GMP's. Responsibilities include:Performing record review necessary to ensure the compliance of manufacturing procedures to in-house specifications and government regulations on the manufacturing floor Conducting reviews of manufacturing processes to ensure compliance Conducting reviews of testing results in support of release of intermediatesAssisting indeviation/nonconformance identification and resolution May interpret complex, explicit documentation to ensure quality standards and compliance May provide training to new employees QualificationsBasic Qualifications5 years’ experience in Quality and/or Operations experience in a CGMP Manufacturing Environment orBachelor’s Degree and 3 years Quality and/or Operations experience in a CGMP Manufacturing EnvironmentorMaster’s Degree and 1 year Quality and/or Operations experience in a CGMP Manufacturing Environment orPhD and 0 years of experienceKnowledge of CGMP regulations for US, EU and other marketsPreferred QualificationsExperienced with CGMP documentation reviewIndustry bio-pharmaceutical experienceStrong computer, verbal and written communication skillsStrong technical writing skillsEffective time management, detail oriented, organizational skills, teamwork, collaboration Assisted indeviation/nonconformance identification and resolution. Participated in team toinvestigate deviations to determine appropriate root causeand CAPAs or may be responsiblefor CAPA resolutionTrackwise system experienceManagement Inventory system experienceExperienced with Quality database system, ie. CatswebThis shift is a 12-hour rotation weeked day time shift from 7am to 7pmJob:QualityPrimary Location:United States-Massachusetts-AllstonJob Posting:Apr 8, 2016, 12:00:18 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Compliance Specialist Job in Allston,,"Allston, MA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Compliance-Specialist-Job-Allston-MA-US-165913709.aspx?mescoid=1300073001001&jobPosition=8,,Quality Assurance/Safety,ea536c5f90d966555766370402feb6c1
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:16:52:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60827 # Positions  1 State  TN City  Springfield Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  11886 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165727759.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=11,,Project/Program Management,45ef75d01f8ac4fa1df8209b83f38793
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:16:36:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARYEnsures that items related to effective quality assurance are recorded to provide proof of effective quality assurance program. This involves filling out 10-20 forms per day. Many forms require checks at specific intervals during the day; such as hourly, ½ hourly, or intermittently.ROLE AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Maintain time schedule to perform food safety checks in a timely manner.Ensures that any issues are addressed and corrected in a timely manner.Complete paperwork as necessary and in a timely manner.Report any problems or errors to QC Supervisor in a timely manner.Perform other duties as assigned by Plant Manager or QC Supervisor.EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE:High School diploma required.Previous experience is writing and recording technical data is preferred.COMPUTER SKILLS:Basic computer skills (Word and Excel) preferred.Ability to read computer generated reports preferred.WORK ENVIRONMENT:Occasional cold working environment (approx. 37F)Physical hazards of working in and about moving machinery.Must be cognizant of body and limbs so as to not be too close to machinery.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $11.00 /hourRequired experience:food: 1 year",Food Service Assistant ($. per hour) Job in Sacramento,Full Time,"Sacramento, CA 95828",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Service-Assistant-11-00-per-hour-Job-Sacramento-CA-US-165647256.aspx?mescoid=3500616001001&jobPosition=2,0.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,,aad6d74010477d2e5129347344895c8b
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:16:21:15,No,jobs.monster.com,".This role has QA/RA responsibilities throughout North American and global Acute Care (post market surveillance, adverse event reporting, product team support, limited manufacturing and supply chain support, R & D support as required). The role also has responsibility for directing projects/initiatives including directing the activities of cross-functional teams. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: - Other duties may be assigned:Manages complaint workflow and processes complaints within software applications.Manages potentially reportable event workflow and processes potentially reportable events within software applications.Determines MDR and Vigilance reportability based on an understanding of the risks associated with product malfunctionServes as the contact for quality and regulatory related matters once determined there is a quality issue with Hill-Rom product.Communicates with customers to establish a full understanding of the issues.Analyzes data (key metrics) for all product development, manufacturing and distribution operations.Analyzes trends in data for the purpose of initiating corrective actions to resolve or prevent product issuesIdentifies, communicates and tracks high priority issues relating to safety, complaints and systemic customer satisfaction.Enables and recommends rapid and effective correction of quality/regulatory problems in a manner that prevents their recurrence.Need candidates to have the ability to think on their own, have good analytical and decision making skills. Will be reviewing complaints. last people that were hired had medical device experience or closely related background in automotive industryAssociate degree or a minimum of 1-3 years previous related work experience in the medical device or equivalent combination of education and experience.• Must be fluent in both speaking and writing in English.• Good written and verbal skills as well as good interpersonal, analytical and organizational skills.• Experience in resolving issues for internal and external customers.• Ability to work within deadlines, and work on multiple projects accurately and efficiently.• Experience with QSR, Medical Device Directive, and ISO Quality System Standards.• Ability to define problems, analyze data, establish facts and draw conclusions.• Attention to detail and accuracy is required.• Ability to function as an individual contributor within a team.• Proficiency with Microsoft Office Products such as Word, Excel and Power Point or equivalent software. Familiarity with EtQ software is preferred.Working knowledge of Quality System RegulationExperience in resolving issues for internal and external customersQuality/Regulatory ExperienceExperience with QSR, Medical Device Directive, and ISO Quality System StandardsExcellent analytical decision making and problem solving skillsTrack record of business and customer orientationGood computer literacy skillsGood written and verbal communication skills Good interpersonal, analytical and organizational skillsA.S. Degree in a technical field or 3 - 5 years technical experience or equivalent combination of education and work experience in a specific technical disciplineCQA or CQE desire preferredExperience in a medical device environment preferredAbility to define problems, analyze data, establish facts and draw conclusions required Apply Online",Complaint Analyst - QA/RA- Job in Batesville,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Batesville, IN 47006",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Complaint-Analyst-QA-RA-39828-Job-Batesville-IN-US-165899408.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb63bc290dd6af6a9f358c181378ce1d
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:16:20:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; &nbsp; City:&nbsp; MUSKOGEE State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Oklahoma Postal/Zip Code: 74402 &nbsp; APAC Central Inc., is an Oldcastle Materials Company producing and providing crushed aggregate materials, sand, ready-mix concrete, asphalt, and performing&nbsp; as a regional heavy highway/infrastructure construction firm serving Arkansas, Oklahoma, and southern Missouri. APAC-Central, Inc. and its founding companies have been serving our customers since early in the 20th Century and look forward to continued success in the 21st Century! &nbsp; &nbsp; Job Description Summary The selected candidate will be required to work in a team environment with other co-workers and managers. ·&nbsp; Ensure a safe work environment in compliance with all safety policies and procedures using the appropriate tools and equipment for the task. ·&nbsp; Properly follow all company policies and OSHA / MSHA regulations for safe working procedures. ·&nbsp; Report any problems to your manager. ·&nbsp; Follow directions of manager as to daily tasks and expectations for each specific duty. ·&nbsp; Use accepted methods to inspect, sample and test aggregates, asphalt or other materials for the purpose of quality control. ·&nbsp; Sample and test mixtures for compliance with contract specifications and quality control tolerance. ·&nbsp; Monitor and test process functions and materials daily to ensure our products meet or exceed requirements of the appropriate agency or customer. ·&nbsp; Prepare and record accurate information; maintain test results data base. ·&nbsp; Assist internal and external customers in a timely manner ·&nbsp; Obtain required certifications in a timely manner. ·&nbsp; Follow quality control plans or guidelines as assigned. ·&nbsp; Perform general cleaning of work areas. ·&nbsp; Lift, carry and hold materials, tools and supplies. ·&nbsp; Perform other duties as assigned. Work Requirements The ideal candidate will: ·&nbsp; Pass pre-employment drug screen and criminal background check. ·&nbsp; Pass a pre-employment “Fit for Work” physical. ·&nbsp; Be able to provide valid documentation for the I-9 Immigration document. ·&nbsp; Display a professional and courteous attitude to co-workers, supervisors and the general public at all times. ·&nbsp; Be willing to work nights and weekends when necessary. ·&nbsp; Report to work at the designated start time. ·&nbsp; Be able to work overtime when required. ·&nbsp; Be willing to work outdoors in extreme temperatures, both hot and cold. ·&nbsp; Must have valid driver’s license and meet the qualifications of the fleet safety program. ·&nbsp; Strictly adhere to safety requirements and procedures as outlined in the Employee Handbook. ·&nbsp; Have the willingness to work in a team environment and assist co–workers or supervisors with other duties as required. ·&nbsp; Wear personal protective equipment (PPE) in designated operations and production areas as stated by OSHA and / or MSHA. ·&nbsp; Be at least age 18 years of age due to nature of working environment. Education/Experience ·&nbsp; Minimum high school diploma general education degree (GED) required. &nbsp; &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; APAC Central Inc. is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer EOE / M / F / Vet / Disability&nbsp; &nbsp; APAC Central Inc. is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",QUALITY CONTROL TECH - MUSKOGEE,Full Time Employee,"Muskogee, OK",,http://jobview.monster.com/QUALITY-CONTROL-TECH-MUSKOGEE-OK-Job-MUSKOGEE-OK-US-165760064.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=6,,,cddf4f7c93bedb57e9f61c8ecfc033dd
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:16:11:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionEL MONTE RV is seeking full-time Service Coordinators for our Dublin, CA location.Service Coordinators will physically follow thru on progress of units in shop, coordinate movement/ location of units on lot, perform quality control audits, and create repair order. Automotive experience a plus.Must have all of the following: Requirements : * Good organizational skills.* Ability to multi-task and prioritize. * Availability to work weekends. * Good verbal and written communication skills. * Basic computer skills. * Valid California Drivers License and good driving record.* Available to work weekends, as needed.Wage $13.50/hour. Full-time benefits include health and dental insurance, vacation, and 401K.  Company Information:El Monte RV is America's premier nationwide RV rental company. Our company was founded in 1970 in the town of El Monte, California. Since then our company has grown to become one of the largest RV rental companies in the world. El Monte RV has locations throughout the United States, and we are known worldwide for our commitment to quality products and service.TO APPLY:Apply in person and complete an employment application at our store located atEl Monte RV 6301 Scarlett CourtDublin, CA 94568 Or fax your resume to  (925) 803-0778 For more information about El Monte RV visit our website www.elmonterv.com  ",Service Coordinator Job in Dublin,Full Time,"Dublin, CA 94568",,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Coordinator-Job-Dublin-CA-US-159459773.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=4,$13.50+ /hour,,7a5f59eb92cacf0d975b94eaffd90bdf
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:15:55:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for Quality Assurance candidates for a construction company in Grove City, OH. We have 1st, 2nd, and 3rd shift available, but MUST be flexible with schedule and have open availability. Pay is $14 to $16 per hour, and will be based off of experience. Long-term, temp to hire. Essential Duties and Responsibilities:·         Performs all aspects of the pre-pour check, the structural check, the finish check, the jig check, and the testing of the material·         Strips the product off the bed and enters tagged or scrapped material into the computer·         Inspects material and product for meeting quality requirements·         Reports quality problems to production personnel and Quality Assurance Manager ·         Good analytical and math skills·         Detail-oriented·         Good verbal, written, and computer skills·         Ability to read blueprints and/or production drawings * Experience preferred, but will trainPhysical Requirements:·         Must be able to lift up to 60 pounds & be able to climb up and down from equipment in accordance with safety regulations",Quality Assurance Job in Grove City,Full Time,"Grove City, OH 43123",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Job-Grove-City-OH-US-161012032.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=1,14.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),12893a62b228da9c4abcbfb240c786d4
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:15:54:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Boyd Caton Group (bcg), Inc. is seeking a full-time data analyst to work out of our Charlottesville offices. The successful applicant will review, validate and analyze transit industry financial, service, asset, and safety data, and coordinate with industry contacts. Requirements: energetic, self-starter, college degree, MS Office fluency, data manipulation experience, strong written and oral communication skills. Financial/economics, statistics, and/or transit industry experience preferred. Must be able to pass federal government work clearance. Compensation is $42,500, plus benefits, including health and dental insurance, vacation and sick pay, gym stipend, and matching retirement IRA option. Please send your cover letter and resume to employment AT boydcatongroup.com with a subject line of ‘Data Analyst.’ BCG participates in the E-Verify Employment Eligibility Verification Program.",Data Analyst Job in Charlottesville,Full Time,"Charlottesville, VA 22901",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Data-Analyst-Job-Charlottesville-VA-US-165636309.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=20,"0.00 - 42,500.00 $ /year",Entry Level,038ea35ede6c9aafc778a4a2c03bfde5
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:15:54:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Organizational Change Management Lead (Change Agent)The Transformation Change Lead (Change Agent) will be dedicated to the multi-year program focused on aligning people side of change – including changes to business processes, systems and technology, job roles and organization structures. The primary responsibility will be creating and implementing change management strategies and plans that maximize employee adoption, drive faster adoption, usage, greater proficiency of the changes, and minimize resistance to increase benefit realization, value creation, ROI, and the achievement of results and outcomes. The Transformation Change Lead will act as a coach to the project team and other leader stakeholders in helping them fulfill the role of change sponsor. This position may also provide direct support and coaching to front-line managers and supervisors as they help their direct reports through transitions.Responsibilities: ·         Create change management strategy, apply a structured methodology, and lead change management activities·         Identify, analyze, and prepare risk mitigation tactics·         Create actionable deliverables for the change management levers, including communications plan, sponsor roadmap, coaching plan, training plan, resistance management plan.·         Coach managers and supervisors and support training efforts (needs analysis, development and deployment)·         Support and engage leaders·         Manage organizational design and definition of roles and responsibilitiesApply a structured methodology and lead change management activitiesApply a change management process and tools to create a strategy to support adoption of changes require by the Agile TransformationSupport the design, development, delivery and management of communication effortsAssess and conduct change impact analysis, assess change readiness and identify key stakeholdersSupport training efforts and provide input and guidance to design and delivery of any training programsParticipate and lead change management assessments as neededIdentify, analyze and prepare risk mitigation tactics for any areas of change that could detract Agile transformation for any business unitIdentify and anticipate resistance to change and define strategies to addressWhere necessary consult and participate in manager workshopsEvaluate and ensure transformation population change readinessManage and build a Change Agent networkDefine and measure success metrics and monitor change progress·         Coordinate process and systems training for new hires and for any changes/enhancements to existing capabilities  Qualifications: ·         Experience and knowledge of change management principles, methodologies, and toolsA solid understanding of how people go through a change and a change processExperience and knowledge of change management principles, methodologies and toolsExceptional communication skills, both written and verbalExcellent and active listening skillsAbility to clearly articulate messages to variety of audiencesAbility to establish and maintain strong relationshipsAbility to influence others and move toward a common vision or goalAble to work effectively at all levels of the organizationExperience with large-scale organizational change effortsChange management certification or designation desiredKeywords: (""change agent"" or ""change management lead"" or ""transformation change lead"" or ""change management architect"" or ""change management specialist"" or ""change management agent"" or ""change management champion"" or ""change manager"" or ""change consultant"") and organization and process and structure and transformation, ""cm strategy"", “organizational change management"", OCM Please send your MS Word Resume to hr@tivasys.com ",Organizational Change Management Lead (Change Agent) Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95134",,http://jobview.monster.com/Organizational-Change-Management-Lead-Change-Agent-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165312800.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=4,,,a74828e0de9e4e489b9cee1ceb65c8c1
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:15:54:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:Project Manager to deliver IT Infrastructure projects for Real Estate (CRES), Mergers & Acquisitions and other initiatives that require management of multiple infrastructure work groups.  Projects include, Mergers & Acquisitions, Divestments & Outsourcing, Real Estate Technology, High Frequency Trading and Data Center Migrations. This resource will report directly to a manager in the GT Program Management department. Responsibilities:Provide IT infrastructure project management support for designated Corporate Real Estate (CRES), M&A and Global impact projects according to the following scope and deliverables:100% Accountable for management and delivery of IT infrastructure projects according to defined IES project framework including but not limited to:Engaging and managing IES service delivery teamsPreparing and managing timelines/project plansPreparing scope documentsManaging escalations/issues/risks, etc. within projectEnsure communications of project status and key issues to program lead and stakeholdersPreparing and presenting Steering Committee presentationsProvide control and transparency of project by following governance structure:Delivery of project scopeFollow defined methodologyEnsure Governance – working with PMO teamsFinancials – manage/track and report on budget by working w/ CRES and Finance as necessaryManage communications plans for projectsCreate Project roles, responsibilities and project team structurePrepare project approach and work with program lead to presentTechnical, financial and delivery (scope, approach, timeline, cost)Qualifications:Requirements:Strong Project Management skills with proven track record of managing projectsMicrosoft Project/Sharepoint expertiseTechnology expertise and deployment experienceUnderstanding and experience with construction schedules and building fit-outsStrong CommunicationsCommunicate effectively and clearly at every level (up, down and laterally)Identify and effectively communicate with stakeholdersClear and concise communication of ideas, instructions, project statusClear written and verbal communications (presentations)Conflict and influence managementSound understanding of various technologies, IES strategies, technical roadmaps, & product setsAssertive and aggressive in managing timelines, issues and risksStrong problem solving skills (facilitate and drive solutions, options, alternatives)Global financial account experienceClear understanding of change management procedures and processesExperience in managing technology projects that are related to Real Estate initiativesExperience in managing technology integration (through acquisitions), divestiture or outsourcing projects regionally and /or globally",Project Manager (CREZ) Job in Jersey City,Full Time,"Jersey City, NJ 07097",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-CREZ-Job-Jersey-City-NJ-US-165852364.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,,e2e086d3798ef575ca2a63bb3a3d53e3
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:15:35:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bold Concepts, Inc. is in search of a Project Manager with at least 5 years of experience on all types of commercial construction projects.  Experience working with Federal Government Contracting a huge plus! Must be hands on self motivated and ready to work.  The incumbent will be responsible for the following:Ø  Overall safety, quality, profit, schedule attainment and customer satisfaction.  Ø  Ensure that there is an adequate workforce on the job at all times.Ø  Negotiate and communicate all changes to all concerned parties immediately, in writing.Ø  Update and maintain projects construction schedules.Ø  Assist the Superintendents with any technical problems. Ø  Facilitate job site progress meetings with the architect and the Customer. Ø  Throughout the duration of the projects, keep your supervisor informed of the status of the projects as it relates to the profitability and progress according to the jobs predetermined schedules.Ø  Provide leadership to staff through instruction, guidance and discipline (when necessary).Ø  Any other related duties as assigned. Candidates must have:Ø  Minimum of 5 years previous experience in commercial construction.Ø  Ability to follow company standards.Ø  Strong verbal and written communications skills.Ø  Aptitude to build strong relations with customers.Ø  Proficiency in prioritizing and deadline management.Ø  Ability to plan, prepare, and analyze documents. Ø  Computer experience a must.Ø  Scheduling experience a must.Ø  OSHA 30 and QC Certification a plus.Salary is commensurate with experience.  Please submit your resume with salary requirements through Monster, or fax to 301-212-4219. Please also provide best time to contact.  ",Construction Project Manager Job in Gaithersburg,Full Time,"Gaithersburg, MD 20878",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Construction-Project-Manager-Job-Gaithersburg-MD-US-165476895.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),18e02b19dc06c457bdd1d1fa6004358b
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:15:05:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"A North Dallas company is looking to expand their PMO by bringing on a Sr. Level, well seasoned, Project Manager to manage international O&G initiatives.  Qualified individuals will possess the following expertise and experience: • Prior experience in the Oil and Gas Industry including IATA Collection practices.• Manage the day-to-day operational and tactical aspects of multiple and/or large scale projects across multiple groups or divisions. • Ensure that programs are operating within contractual agreed obligations. • Develop and maintain detailed project plans and schedules, identify dependencies and critical paths, and resolve conflicts. • Communicate project progress, timelines, status, schedules, risks, issues, and resolutions to key stakeholders and management via verbal and written status reports. • Facilitate meetings with large groups and drive the project team to accomplish stated goals and objectives. • Gather requirements from internal and external stakeholders and translate them into actionable plans. • Develop metrics and key performance indicators.• Ensure deadlines are met by participating in resource planning, organizing, prioritizing, and delegating assignments to project team members and following up on their individual progress. • Manage subcontractors to ensure adherence to contractual terms, quality and responsiveness. • Track, report and communicate terminal issues and status. • Interface with finance to maintain accurate budget reports and forecasts. • Proactively monitor the performance of the deployed solution, report to stakeholders and take corrective action if necessary. • Attend customer meetings and serve as client liaison. • Provide bid and proposal support for capturing new business. Candidates must have a current PMP Certification and be comfortable with up to 25% domestic and international travel.If this sounds like you, please apply today for immediate consideration!",Project Manger Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manger-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165417131.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,"100,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",Project/Program Management,4e05a8d5c4796f514b4054e2935ccf34
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:14:46:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"TITLE:                        QUALITY ENGINEERINDUSTRY:                 AEROSPACEAREA:                        Kansas CitySALARY:                     $ 65,000+Our client, a leader in specialty manufacturer for the aerospace industry, has asked Sterling St. James, LLP to source, screen and qualify candidates for their Quality Engineer position.  The company is a large conglomerate spanning the United States, Mexico, Asia and Europe that specializes in aerospace manufacturing.  The position is domiciled in Kansas City at their corporate location.OVERVIEW:Performs Quality Assurance & Control activities to ensure plant compliance with the Corporate Quality Program and specific Customer Quality standards, ISO & AS requirements.DUTIES and  RESPONSIBILITIES:·   Promote quality achievements and performance improvements facility-wide through a pro-active and positive approach and belief in Continuous Improvement·   Manage the ISO/AS Document Quality Management System (QMS).·   Manage the Audit Program as the Lead Auditor for Internal Audits and external Supplier Audits as part of Supply Chain.·   Identify the needs for policies and procedures in accordance with the AS9100 / ISO 9001 guidelines and other Quality Management System standards in conjunction with the Quality Assurance Manager (QMS Management Representative).·   Interface with others internal and external to the company and communicate quality challenges in a professional and effective manner, including Customer visits, supplier audits, etc.·   Assist as required in Receiving, Work-in-Progress and /or Final Inspections and Audits to specified requirements when part of a RCCA investigation.·   Assist in the management of the Customer Complaint (CC) and Corrective Action (CAR) System in conjunction with others internal and external to Triumph (as appropriate) to ensure complete Customer satisfaction and to ensure each project reaches conclusion and closure.·   Assist and analyze timely, accurate and adequate data from internal and/or external sources to be able to provide concise, useful and unambiguous reports.·   Assist in the collation of monthly performance data generated from internal defects and customer complaints through SyteLine and other automated services.·   Provide aid and assistance for customer / third party audits in support of Program Management ·   Read, interpret and apply company and customer prints and specifications as the quality criteria.·   Coordinate daily workload promptly and effectively and support others in the department and elsewhere at TSKC.·    Perform other duties as assigned. QUALIFICATIONS and REQUIREMENTS:To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.  The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.  EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:·   2 Years associate degree minimum (4 year Engineering Degree preferred)·   Certified Lead Assessor in ISO 9001:2008 and preferably AS9100C·   3-5 years’ minimum experience in a Quality Assurance Department in a precision manufacturing environment, ideally in Aerospace.·   Basic knowledge of fabrication techniques including, CNC machining,, lathe work, forming, assembly, coating, warehousing and logistics·   Must be able to effectively work independently as well as part of a team,·   Must be well organized and detail oriented.·   Must be able to interface with others in a professional manner.·   Good working knowledge and appreciation of inspection techniques.·   Must have mechanical ability, an eye for abnormalities, and aptitude for detail.·   Ability to read and interpret documents drawings and specifications.·   Ability to write routine reports in a professional manner.·   Confident & self-assured·   Conviction·   Time management skills·   Creative problem solver·   Results oriented REASONING ABILITY:·   Apply common sense understanding to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or diagram form.·   Handle problems involving variables in a standardized situation.·   Ability to make decisions and know when/where to make concessions. COMPUTER SKILLS:·   Intermediate knowledge of Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook.  NEXT STEP:If you meet the requirements and have an interest in being considered send your resume in MS Word format as an attachment for immediate review. RECRUITER’S SIDEBAR:This is a super company with a tremendous future. They are growing worldwide and my experience as a recruiter has taught me that where there is challenges there is opportunity to grow with the company, both personally and professionally. We work on lots of positions at this level, but few are as exciting as this one. This would be a “grooming station” for a higher step in your career path. Call us for more details and to see if you are qualified to possibly be considered. ",Quality Engineer Job in Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, MO 64113",Aerospace and DefenseManufacturing - OtherEngineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-165630879.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,"55,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Quality Assurance/Safety,fb27a5d63c2523371b2714efb0ef5d19
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:14:45:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors. With pro-forma 2014 annualized scope revenues of £5.5 billion and over 40,000 people in more than 55 countries, the company operates across the whole of the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and close to 5,300 employees worldwide. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/commercial, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We offer competitive salaries along with a complete benefits package including: medical, vision, & dental coverage, 401K Matching, Educational Reimbursement, and a variety of Training and Development Programs to help you develop the skills you need to succeed in your chosen career path. Additional information can be obtained from our website at www.amecfw.com.  Overview / Responsibilities Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure is currently seeking a Construction Material Testing Technician to join our Salt Lake City, Utah team to support construction materials testing of mining/commercial/industrial projects.  We are open to training a motivated individual without construction materials testing experience looking to start a career. Key Responsibilities:·         Will work outdoors at mining, commercial or industrial construction sites·         Operate standard construction materials testing equipment and perform routine testing procedures·         Perform analysis or calculations to check accuracy of test data·         Prepare daily reports of observation and test results·         Monitor work procedures for compliance with project specifications·         Interact with client representatives (supervisors, foremen, project managers, engineers, etc.) at project sites Skills / Qualifications Required ·         High School Diploma or equivalent required·         Valid Driver’s License required·         Reliability – must be able to arrive at designated project sites prior to scheduled times·         Ability to prepare reports and documentation·         Ability to read & interpret plans and specifications·         Must pass drug test, background check and must have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company’s driving policy·         Must be able to routinely lift 50 pounds·         Must be able to pass a fit for duty examDesired but not required ·         Current MSHA certification (desired)·         ACI Field Testing Technician Grade 1 (desired)·         Nuclear Testing service training course (desired)·         WAQTC certification for soils, concrete and asphalt (desired) If you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Construction Material Testing Technician / Mining – Heavy Civil Job in Sandy,Full Time,"Sandy, UT",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Construction-Material-Testing-Technician-Mining-%E2%80%93-Heavy-Civil-Job-Sandy-UT-US-165087446.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=14,,Entry Level,b0ebbbfea3a24d4e445214f0d9c02895
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:14:40:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Michael Page is partnering with a global consumer goods company that is looking to grow their QA team with a highly intelligent and engaging engineer. This is an open position for a Sr. New Product Quality Engineer who has APQP experience.Client DetailsMichael Page is partnering with a global consumer goods company that is looking to grow their QA team with a highly intelligent and engaging engineer. This is an open position for a Sr. New Product Quality Engineer - Consumer Goods who has APQP experience.DescriptionThe Sr. New Product Quality Engineer - Consumer Goods will:Function within the quality team and on multi-functional product development teams in matters relating to quality engineering.Support design control and process validation for new and change product efforts.Ensure effective and efficient use of Quality Engineering techniques such as risk analysis, test method development, statistical data analysis, and the development of sample plans.Full knowledge and understanding of APQP functions.ProfileThe Sr. New Product Quality Engineer - Consumer Goods should possess:BS in Engineering6+ years of experienceConsumer goods experienceAPQPJob OfferHighly reputable companyGlobal engineeringdiverse and dynamic teamsMultiple projects and new productsCompetitive compensation package",Sr. New Product Quality Engineer - Consumer Goods Job in Framingham,"Full Time , Employee","Framingham, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-New-Product-Quality-Engineer-Consumer-Goods-Job-Framingham-MA-US-164745143.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=13,"75,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",,d775bd60e09ff93b8cf73ee71afe8f45
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:14:24:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a Project Manager/Coordinator who will be a member of our growing implementation services team. The person in this role will responsible for the management of client related projects and ensuring deliverables are meeting client expectations.This is an ideal role for someone who has been a developer and is looking to move into the direction of Project Management.Why should you be interested?• You will have the ability to play a key role providing analysis and technical leadership • Career growth opportunity (internal staff is small now, but growing rapidly) • Work with committed and intelligent technology team • Recession proof business (slight exaggeration, but not much) • Family centric atmosphereWhat will you be doing?• Manage deadlines and coordination of project team activities • Coordinate upgrades and related testing activities • Define deliverables and milestones with stakeholders and communication to senior management • Prioritize projects and communicate to key stakeholders • Move quickly between varied engineering tasks in a small team • Interact with software, hardware, QA, marketing and other departments • Occasional client facingThe environment is predominantly Microsoft tools, C#, ASP.Net, and SQL ServerIdeal candidates will have: 1. Some leadership or project management experience 2. Software Development background 3. Hands on experience with SQLThere is much more to the role than this. If you are a serious candidate, please let us know and we can provide the full job description with detailed responsibilities and required qualifications.About Resolute: Resolute Technologies is a Chicago-based IT consulting and recruiting firm that helps businesses increase bottom-line results through the successful deployment of software-driven technologies, strategies, and teams. Since 1998, we have built a respected reputation as trusted advisors delivering and supporting SAP and Oracle implementations, application development, and business intelligence solutions. We closely collaborate with our clients to align technology in support of overall business objectives. To learn more, please visit www.ResoluteTech.com",Technical PM/Coordinator (Client Services) Job in Naperville,Full Time,"Naperville, IL 60564",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-PM-Coordinator-Client-Services-Job-Naperville-IL-US-165551767.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=18,"85,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),2a1f1b4296e9a37a72a33e429d2e4312
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:12:02:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60229 # Positions  1 State  NY City  Rochester Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  3597 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165276005.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=20,,Project/Program Management,fe8b6ba3cb72c0028151084676bf920c
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:12:01:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60815 # Positions  1 State  RI City  Cranston Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  10261 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165727771.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=7,,Project/Program Management,4b6ad6a14c86a1b0a8d513e5881ae170
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:11:33:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title – Project CoordinatorLocation – Purchase, NYDuration – Long term  Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Maintain project plans/schedules/deliverables for multiple projects. Ensure that projects adhere       to the SDLC and PMLCTrack status of project activities and budget. Perform follow-ups as needed, coordinate resources and escalate issuesLiaise between developers, architects, business analysts and QA analysts. Foster clear communication between the disciplines.Provide weekly status updates and provide input into portfolio updatesEnsure that projects comply with audit requirementsMaintain relevant metrics to provide transparency on team performanceIdentify and address/escalate conflicting priories in scope, schedule and costFacilitate discussion, decision making and conflict resolutionRemove impediments by engaging the right personnel and or finding the right solutionAdditional projects and assignments as assigned Qualifications:Strong background in IT project coordination or management (2 - 5 years) with detailed knowledge of the software development life cycle methodologies.Background in Specialty Commercial Insurance and Reinsurance desiredProven experience managing multiple small and medium sized projectsDemonstrated ability to plan and manage projects which span both business and IT disciplinesStrong communication and facilitation skills with an ability to effectively lead cross-functional team discussionsAbility to translate business needs into IT deliverablesStrong organizing, prioritizing and analytical skillsDemonstrated ability to successfully apply project management methodologyBroad multi-disciplinary information technology familiarity with proven systems deployment experienceExperience with Microsoft technologies (TFS, Visual Studio) is a plus.Experience using PPM toolsBS Degree/Equivalent (Technology focus preferable)",Project Coordinator Job in Purchase,Full Time,"Purchase, NY 10577",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Coordinator-Job-Purchase-NY-US-165213248.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0356e157d933fd366bf03b51a9e873c2
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:11:31:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60565 # Positions  1 State  GA City  Gainesville Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  11810 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Part-Time Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Part-Time-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165648956.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=4,,Project/Program Management,c62541ea21d40a97269a807a21ab0247
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:11:20:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager Quality Control As the Manager of Quality Control, you will manage the quality control function within Nova Biomedical’s Waltham, MA headquarters.  Using your well developed interpersonal skills and team orientation, you will effectively partner across multiple organizations. Leveraging a hands-on, proactive approach, you will drive continuous quality improvements and maintain Nova’s manufacturing quality systems for clinical, biotechnology and Original End Manufacturing (OEM) Products.  Additional responsibilities will include: driving Nova’s current quality control practices including engineering practices to ensure compliance with the Food & Drug Administration (FDA) and International Organization of Standardization (ISO) requirements.  Collecting, summarizing, and posting data on quality metric performance.  Supporting Manufacturing and R&D engineering and driving quality improvements using data and statistics. Requirements:  BS degree in a technical discipline, preferably in life sciences or medical technology.  3+ years of experience as a Quality Control Manager in an FDA regulated In Vitro Diagnostic (IVD)  or medical device manufacturing company.  3+ years of experience in Quality Engineering or Manufacturing Engineering focused on process validations,  Process Failure Modes Effect Analysis (PFMEA), and Design of Experiments (DOE’s). A strong working knowledge of ISO 13485, IS9001 and FDA Regulations (21 CFR Part820).  A thorough understanding of quality improvement tools, i.e. Six Sigma and Lean Manufacturing.  A strong knowledge of statistical methods, including statistical process control and sampling techniques.  Other requirements include:  demonstrated failure analysis experience, working with cross-functional groups to determine root cause.  Strong MS Office skills.  Candidates with America Society for Quality (ASQ) Certified Quality Manager, Auditing experience and Six Sigma Green Belt Certification are given very strong consideration.   PI93094494Apply Here",Quality Control Manager Job in Waltham,Full Time Employee,"Waltham, MA 02454",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Manager-Job-Waltham-MA-US-164738228.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=17,,Quality Assurance/Safety,7d64a253d8bbc21e8f25d5793422ea5b
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:11:10:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project ControlsWell-respected General Civil/Pipeline Contractor in business over 35 years is actively seeking a professional with two years of Project Controls experience.  We provide our employees a fun and challenging work environment with exciting opportunities. Primary Responsibilities:·         Develop, manage, update and monitor projects.·         Develop monthly report preparation.·         Collect and update data.·         Coordinate with Project Managers in regards to job requirements, job set-up, creating contact lists and Subcontractor contracts.·         Monitor weekly job progress, to include field work such as photos, videos, and collections of materials·         Entry of production, reviewing of invoices and accuracy of reports.·         Handle job close out at completion of projects.·         Work with the project team as well as independently.·         Responsibilities include, but are not limited to those listed above. Job Requirements:·         Safe driving record required.·         Two years of previous Project Controls experience preferred.·         Great Organizational skills and multi-tasking skills.·         Ability to work independently and in a team based environment.·         Demonstrated skills in identifying, analyzing and problem solving.·         Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Office applications.·         Ability to organize and manage data.·         Viewpoint Software knowledge preferred.·         Qualified applicants who are offered a position must pass a pre-employment drug test, e-verification and a criminal background check. This is a full-time position.  We offer a competitive salary and excellent benefits. Email resume to HR@BTConstruction.comFax to 303-460-0731Applications can be completed at:BT Construction, Inc.9885 Emporia StreetHenderson, CO  ",Project Controls Job in Henderson,Full Time,"Henderson, CO 80640",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Controls-Job-Henderson-CO-US-165424635.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=19,"35,000.00 - 40,000.00 $ /yearBonuses",Experienced (Non-Manager),9f9fba308206821bf4b1fc84792c41d7
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:11:10:14,No,jobs.monster.com,Walden's View Senior Living Has An Immediate Opening For ACTIVITY LEADER Flexible Hours. Please Apply In Person: 7990 US 30 - North Huntingdon - 15642,ACTIVITY LEADER Job in North Huntingdon  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,North Huntingdon 15642,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/ACTIVITY-LEADER-Job-NORTH-HUNTINGDON-165437207.aspx?ch=pajobmatch&mescoid=3900662001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8004091d82870ccb50daa7fb0cced56a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:11:09:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description If you are an experienced Operations Manager looking for a position with a leading company, Bartech can help! We are a leading staffing firm and our clients include some of the nation’s biggest companies. Our client has a need for an Operations Manager. This is a direct hire position.. If you have the background we are looking for, and you are interested in an opportunity to get your foot in the door with leading company, we want to talk with you!                                                Operations Manager        Job Responsibilities                                                                                                                         Your specific duties as an Operations Manager will include: Directs the IAC operation, the operation and coordination and management of the injection molding operation, value added manufacturing operation and materials management.Responsible for the strategy and long term planning of the operations to ensure IACs customers, associates and profit expectations are accomplished.Directs and coordinates the activities associated with the materials management functions including planning, purchasing and warehousing.Directs and plans the operational efforts of the manufacturing function to ensure compliance with company policies and practices in areas such as safety, TS and all regulatory agencies.Works with sales and marketing to ensure customer satisfaction relative to delivery, cost and quality.Determines the capital requirements for the IAC operation and effectively manages the capital planning and spending.Develops plans and strategies for ensuring the efficient use of materials, machines and human resources.Works with sales and marketing to create continuous improvement teams with the top four customers.Manage the operations cost to meet all profit objectives established by the IAC Senior Leadership Team.Directly supervise several employees. Carries out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization’s policies and applicable laws.Interviewing, hiring, and training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems.To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily with or without reasonable accommodations.The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required.  Operations Manager      Job Requirements As an Operations Manager you must represent our company well by being responsible, punctual and motivated to go above and beyond the call of duty. You must also be highly detail-oriented and organized with excellent analytic and problem-solving abilities. It is also important that you display excellent verbal and written communication and interpersonal skills.    B.S. degree in business, engineering or related field with advanced degree a plus.Ten years experience in manufacturing management positions or equivalent combination of Education and experience.Must be familiar with plastic injections molding processes and have an understanding of business issues related to the molding industry.Should have a working understanding of MRP and be knowledgeable of TS certification requirements and manufacturing excellent technology.  Operations Manager    Benefits    As an Operations Manager with Bartech, you will be working through an established and respected staffing organization with 35 years of serving as a trusted partner to our client companies. We are dedicated to providing our talent with personal, responsive attention, and will assign an employee care representative to answer any questions or concerns that you might have. Depending upon the client, the assignment and your performance, you can find potential opportunities for direct employment. Your hard work and professional dedication will be rewarded with competitive compensation, including benefits. Available benefits for Operations Manager position include (but are not limited to:                                                                        Exceptional medical, dental, and vision401(k)Paid time off, including holidays                  Life and disability insurance Make the most of your experience!Apply now!  Applicant must be eligible to work in the US for immediate opening. Keywords: Operations, Plant Manager, Production Superintendent, Quality Manager ",Operations Manager Job in Anniston,Full Time Employee,"Anniston, AL",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Manager-Job-Anniston-AL-US-165759440.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=7,"85,000.00+ /year",Project/Program Management,834a7478ef039509dcfe41d13fa209c7
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:10:17:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Junior Project Manager, you will design the communications systems that allow dealerships to exchange data with manufacturers. You will work closely with our programming department in the analysis, design and definition of software products. You will have the opportunity to test new and corrected programs before they are released. You will also work with customers to pilot test new technology and enhance existing products. You may also write documentation and instructions on product features and educate Reynolds and Reynolds associates about upcoming changes. This is a fast-paced and dynamic position where you learn all about our software and stay abreast of all changes. You may handle many projects at any one time requiring a variety of tasks throughout the day. We work with over 60 automobile manufacturers in the US, Latin America, and Europe. Requirements: Bachelor’s degree required Educational background in Business or MIS preferred, but all majors will be considered Able to travel domestically and internationally is helpful, but not required Strong attention to detail Articulate, aggressive, and a quick-thinker Benefits: We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance 401(k) – 100% matching up to 6% of compensation Referral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hire Paid holidays, vacation and sick days Professional development and training through Reynolds University Discounted membership to local area fitness centers On-site medical clinic staffed by a Nurse Practitioner Company-sponsored events and sports leagues including: company picnic, cook-off, softball, volleyball, bowling and many more! Gourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine options Credit Union membership Opportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunities Reynolds and Reynolds promotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment. Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Junior Project Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77040",AllComputer HardwareComputer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Junior-Project-Manager-Job-Houston-TX-US-164865560.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,6a314cb8429e4af4f485bb73a58c7376
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:10:16:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Supplier Quality Engineer Job in Alexandria 56308, Minnesota US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Supplier Quality Engineer Apply Alexandria, MN Full-Time Up to $80,000 Job Details The supplier quality engineer will work with the supply base for all product divisions and commodities to include outsourcing, electrical, hydraulic, plastics, assembly, welding, steel / aluminum, casting, forging, machining, paint and general fabrication. The supplier quality engineer works collaboratively with purchasing, quality and design engineering to support product development and ongoing supplier management. Up to 25% travel is required to domestic and international suppliers and company facilities.Location is 20 minutes south of Alexandria.What You Will Be DoingParticipates in APQP activities with suppliers and internal company resources including design reviews, PFMEA, DMFEA and control plansCoordinates PPAP activities with suppliers and internal quality resourcesPlans and coordinates receiving inspection of purchased goods through quality resourcesPerforms / participates in supplier surveillance activities including initial site evaluations and auditsDirects and analyzes process capability analysisManages and directs corrective actions against supplier non conformance, including leadership on root cause analysis Coordinates responses to supplied product non conformanceLeads limited supplier development activitiesWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:-BS/MS in related technical field- Supplier Quality experience- APQP- PPAP- ISO 9001 working knowledge- ASQ CQE desired but not required- Understanding of manufacturing methods- Functional understanding of GD&TSo, if you are a Supplier Quality Engineer with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Kyle Martin is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: KM3-1274412 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Kyle.Martin@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: KM3-1274412 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Kyle Martin | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Supplier Quality Engineer,,"Supplier Quality Engineer Job in Alexandria 56308, Minnesota US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Supplier Quality Engineer Apply Alexandria, MN Full-Time Up to $80,000 Job Details The supplier quality engineer will work with the supply base for all product divisions and commodities to include outsourcing, electrical, hydraulic, plastics, assembly, welding, steel / aluminum, casting, forging, machining, paint and general fabrication. The supplier quality engineer works collaboratively with purchasing, quality and design engineering to support product development and ongoing supplier management. Up to 25% travel is required to domestic and international suppliers and company facilities.Location is 20 minutes south of Alexandria.What You Will Be DoingParticipates in APQP activities with suppliers and internal company resources including design reviews, PFMEA, DMFEA and control plansCoordinates PPAP activities with suppliers and internal quality resourcesPlans and coordinates receiving inspection of purchased goods through quality resourcesPerforms / participates in supplier surveillance activities including initial site evaluations and auditsDirects and analyzes process capability analysisManages and directs corrective actions against supplier non conformance, including leadership on root cause analysis Coordinates responses to supplied product non conformanceLeads limited supplier development activitiesWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:-BS/MS in related technical field- Supplier Quality experience- APQP- PPAP- ISO 9001 working knowledge- ASQ CQE desired but not required- Understanding of manufacturing methods- Functional understanding of GD&TSo, if you are a Supplier Quality Engineer with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Kyle Martin is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: KM3-1274412 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Kyle.Martin@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: KM3-1274412 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Kyle Martin | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/Supplier-Quality-Engineer-Job-Alexandria-MN-US-165387945.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=14,,,6f15e513f21fe765f450f9f2c27d57cc
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:09:55:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENEWIZ is a leading global genomics service company and trusted provider for DNA sequencing, gene synthesis, molecular biology, next generation sequencing, bioinformatics, and GLP regulatory services.Our customers depend on GENEWIZ to achieve results in a rapid, cost-effective manner through specialized expertise and customizable, scalable services that contribute to the advancement of life sciences and technologies.  GENEWIZ employees have a winning attitude and champion innovation, teamwork and accountability through a results-oriented, customer-centric, and fun culture. We offer various health and financial benefits, learning opportunities, competitive compensation, rewarding bonus programs, and a wide range of work/life benefits designed to make your life easier. Want to be part of a company whose goal is to be the best in the world and the best for the world?Apply today!We are seeking a Scientist Ito join our Project Management team. This is a non-bench role that works closely with customers and the lab in order to effectively manage the customer interaction with GENEWIZ. Title:      Scientist ILocation:     South Plainfield, NJ Responsibilities:Provide customized consultation services based on an intrinsic knowledge of service linesDevelop new operational procedures and improve existing proceduresWork with business units to improve communication and service level to customersEffectively summarize and clearly report on a wide range of service line related tasks Maintain in-depth knowledge of all principles for Molecular Biology services and operationsReview and sign-off on quotes and project reports written by other group members Communicate directly with customers by email, telephone, and in person on all issues, including general custom project inquiries project design, progress reports, technical support/troubleshooting, billing, shippingIndependently design and/or troubleshoot complex issues with gene synthesis, cloning, mutagenesis, PCR-sequencing analysis, mouse genome typing services, custom projects (possibly including GLP), Next Generation Sequencing Qualifications:PhD in Molecular Biology or Life Sciences required0-4 years post-doctoral work experience preferredExpertise in a range of molecular biology techniquesExperience with NGS, multiple expression systems, and in a regulatory environment preferredTeam player with a strong customer orientationDetail oriented, with a strong recordkeeping skills and ability to multi-task and meet deadlinesOutstanding interpersonal skills; both verbal and written are essential Visit our Careers page at www.genewiz.com/careers to view our open positions and apply. Connect with us on LinkedIn and Twitter @GENEWIZCareers South Plainfield, NJ• Boston, MA•Washington, DC Metro•Research Triangle Park, NC•San Diego, CA• Los Angeles, CA•San Francisco, CA•Seattle, WA•London, UK•Langen, DE•Beijing, China•Suzhou, China•Tokyo, Japan",Scientist I,Full Time,"South Plainfield, NJ 07080",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Scientist-I-Project-Management-Job-South-Plainfield-NJ-US-163568942.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9abd0329395ae264230a029c22d5376e
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:09:23:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tanner Industries has an immediate opening in Southampton, PA for a Quality and Regulatory Affairs manager.FULL BENEFIT PACKAGEJob Description:This list is a sampling and is not all inclusive.Maintain compliance with government regulations, OSHA, EPA, DOT, Responsible Distribution Process, Risk Management Program, Emergency Response Plan, Etc.File Tier II reports, form R reports, RMP's, release reports, DOT registrations, etc.Training of personnel internally and externally.Prepare and represent Tanner Industries at quality and regulatory audits.Manage quality program.Manage state tank registrations.Job Requirements:Able to work independently and multitask.Good reading, writing and communication skills.Good computer skills.Knowledge of regulations. OSHA, DOT, EPA etc.Knowledge of Responsible Distribution Process preferred.Note:Individual will work out of our Southampton, PA office but some travel will be required.",Quality & Regulatory Affairs Job in Southampton,Full Time,"Southampton, PA 18966",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Regulatory-Affairs-Job-Southampton-PA-US-163943295.aspx?mescoid=1300079001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),760be5780cc9137110284e01d59492b6
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:09:22:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  59498 # Positions  1 State  AL City  Mobile Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  7185 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165873891.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=6,,Project/Program Management,8e233cc4b9f84092d43d8672f4126a14
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:08:40:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  60816 # Positions  1 State  MA City  New Bedford Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  10209 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Supervisor-Job-Camphill-PA-US-165727768.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=8,,Project/Program Management,4c1250ea04adb37f237ecd50e9e077ed
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:08:06:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"HELP WANTED FAMILY ADVOCATE A 40 hr/wk position at the Head Start/Early Head Start Office in Beatrice to assist families in fostering their childrens development by conducting home visits to prenatal mothers and children 0-5 years of age. Contact BVCA Partnership at 729-2278 or visit the career center page at www.bvca.net for an application and job description. Deadline for returning applications is April 15, 2016, at 9am. EOE",FAMILY ADVOCATE Job in Beatrice,Full Time,"Beatrice, NE 68310",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/FAMILY-ADVOCATE-Job-Beatrice-NE-US-165739472.aspx?ch=lincolnjournal&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,,,7d1b0ccfeb44e6eca300ae5feba206ce
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:08:05:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"DOCUMENTATION SUPERVISOR - PERM - PHARMACEUTICALSA world renowned Pharmaceutical company in McPherson, Kansas is looking for a full-time Documentation Supervisor to add to their Quality Compliance group.This organization's global portfolio includes medicines and vaccines, as well as many of the world's best-known consumer healthcare products. The organization works across developed and emerging markets to advance wellness, prevention, treatments and cures.The primary function for the Documentation Supervisor will be responsible for ensuring all plant changes to documentation are executed appropriately and effectively according to Plant, Corporate, and Regulatory requirements. This individual will be responsible for direct training and supervision of documentation personnel; editing, control, and distribution of all SOPs, TCPs, Monographs, Specification Sheets, Data Sheets and Batch Records for the plant operations.The hiring manager is looking for someone who is a strong leader in order to manage day-to-day activities and who has strong organization skills and is able to remain calm under pressure. The right candidate should also strong technical writing skills in order to create the SOPs and other forms of documentation listed above.Technical Requirements:B.S. DegreeMinimum 5 years of overall experience2 years of leadership or supervisory experienceExperience in a regulated industry (ideally, a minimum of 5 years)Desirable Skillsets:Project management experienceStrong Microsoft Office skillsExperience working from a paper-based system and transitioning to an electronic-based systemThis Pharmaceutical organization employs over 90,000 employees worldwide and has an industry-leading pipeline of new products and medicines. The company provides competitive salary, benefits, and possible relocation assistance.This is an incredible opportunity to work for one of the most successful Pharmaceutical giants in the world and make an impact within a global organization.If this sounds like an interesting opportunity and you meet the requirements above, please apply on-line for consideration.",Documentation Supervisor - Pharmaceuticals Job in Mcpherson,"Full Time, Employee","McPherson, KS",,http://jobview.monster.com/Documentation-Supervisor-Pharmaceuticals-Job-McPherson-KS-US-165826990.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,,31714f31a464b42ef13c4040b9636240
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:07:06:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assoc Director Quality-POS_00470305-1DescriptionGenzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on rare diseases and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, which are marketed in countries around the world, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.Sanofi, an integrated global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in the field of healthcare with seven growth platforms: diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and the new Genzyme.Genzyme Corporation (a Sanofi company) and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.External Manufacturing Quality Assurance (EM QA) is the quality unit responsible for GxP oversight of Contract Manufacturing Organizations (CMOs) and business partners involved in the manufacture, testing, and transport of Sanofi-Genzyme products. EM QA staff interact with functional units within Corporate Quality Operations, Sanofi-Genzyme sites, and other organizations (e.g. procurement, supply chain, finance) to ensure compliance with internal and regulatory requirements, and to disposition intermediate (e.g. API, drug substance) and finished products with minimal risk to quality or product supply.•EM QA has responsibility for CMO activities related to the Rare Disease and Multiple Sclerosis (MS) products.•EM QA is based in Westborough, MA with satellite offices in Haverhill, UK and Frankfurt, Germany.POSITION OVERVIEW/KEY RESPONSIBILTIES*:Position SummaryThe EM QA associate director provides quality leadership and compliance oversight to internal and external customers. Operates within the Sanofi-Genzyme network and provides expert input into quality issues associated with ongoing operations, projects and programs. Drives continuous improvement initiatives within the department and the wider organization.Core ResponsibilitiesStaff Management•Selects, develops, and motivates qualified staff to effectively carry out department functions and provide for the continuity of managerial and specialized skills.•Provides leadership, guidance, and direction to staff consistent with GxP and company quality policy.•Coach and mentor staff in all aspects of their job performance and career development including training, feedback, rewards and disciplinary action.•Develop work plans, assign tasks, and supervise team(s).•Manage staffing requirements based on projects.•Ensure staff has appropriate knowledge of department processes and procedures.Budget•Provide input into the department/cost center budget as required.Department Management•Participates in strategic planning and development activities including compliance, capacity, timelines and corporate direction.•Align department objectives with business objectives.•Collaborate with senior leadership team in meeting corporate and organizational goals.•May establish and report applicable department or organizational metrics.•Sponsor and direct the development of projects and conducts follow-up and reporting.•Represent department or organization in project team meetings related to corporate initiatives.•Interact with project teams and cross functional groups.•Interface with external regulatory agencies as required.Additional Responsibilities•May be assigned a leadership role (e.g. Primary Process Owner or Site Process Owner) in a Community of Practice, e.g. Change Control, Training.* Key Responsibilities may differ among employees with the same job title and may change over time, in accordance with business needsLEADERSHIP QUALIFICATIONS: 1 this position has direct reportsAn ongoing commitment to conducting our global business according to the highest legal and ethical standards, and to continually pursue excellence in the development and delivery of all of our products and services. This includes:•Respecting the laws and operating within the applicable regulations of the places in which we conduct business, as well as our own Company policies and procedures.•Being honest and treating people with respect and courtesy.•Constantly striving to make Genzyme a great place to work, and a company respected for the quality of its people and products.•Acting as role models for our fellow employees by acting responsibly, fairly, and honestly in our dealings and exercising sound judgment in performing our jobs.Leading People•Genzyme's leaders motivate, inspire, build, and retain highly effective manufacturing teams while managing for high performance and developing others. They are versatile learners and courageous decision makers.Leading the Business•Genzyme's leaders are effective operating in an evolving, complex and dynamic environment, providing clear direction and instruction to direct reports, and continuously looking internally and externally for best practices and areas for improvement.Delivering to Customers•Genzyme's leaders understand patient and customer needs and build relationships as required to meet manufacturing goals while continuously improving operations by setting high standards for the team so they may perform to a level of excellence.QualificationsBASIC QUALIFICATIONS:•Bachelor’s degree and 10+ years of experience working in a cGXP or other regulated environment.•5+ years of experience working in a Quality role.•5-10 years supervisory and/or management experience.PREFFERED QUALIFICATIONS:•Familiarity with global cGMP and ISO regulations relating to medicinal products; Understands principles, concepts, practice and standards for Quality Assurance function and experienced in evaluating and applying compliance guidelines to new and real-life situations•Experience with data analysis, trending, and presenting material within multi-functional environment.•Demonstrated ability to perform work that consistently requires independent decision making and the exercise of independent judgment and discretion.•Strong communication skills and ability to work with varying levels of personnel within the organization.Job:QualityPrimary Location:United States-Massachusetts-WestboroughJob Posting:Mar 10, 2016, 7:57:35 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Assoc Director Quality Job in Westborough,,"Westborough, MA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Assoc-Director-Quality-Job-Westborough-MA-US-164788262.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=1,,Quality Assurance/Safety,472bfb93703a0fbb61e3e79afaa3dc31
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:07:05:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"FactSet’s Content Development group develops proprietary content, which is critical in supporting the product requirements of our sell-side clients. To meet an increase in demand for Capital Market Transactions content, FactSet is currently seeking to add a resource to the Public Equity Offerings and Private Placements (PIPEs) Content team. The successful candidate will manage and support the collection team(s) in the maintenance of existing content development processes and expanding the market coverage based on client demands. Duties include data research, modeling, managing the collection team(s), identifying content and application enhancements and working closely with software engineers on the implementation. Responsibilities include: Research any new data items for collection and new markets for coverage based on the Internal and External FactSet clients’ demands. If deemed feasible, create methodology and process to support the new collection efforts Be an expert of the Content Set, aka have a very deep understanding of the methodology, workflows and processes (including collection and QA practices), and interactions and dependencies with other content sets Provide ongoing support in methodology and workflow for the Content Collection team(s) Oversee and guide the effort of creating and maintenance of quality Training Manuals and Data Dictionaries for new markets, data items and application functionalities Collaborate with other content sets on standardizing data points/methodology/establishing workflows to support effective discrepancies resolution Understand feeds and how the data is presented and used in FactSet Products, be aware of client use cases and needs for the Content Set(s) responsible Focus on Quality by adding application validations and building QA Reports to capture data inconsistencies and/or errors Create new or improve existing workflow(s) that optimizes daily work for the Collection team(s) Focus on timeliness of new deals and updates, optimize workflows that incorporate timely deals collection and updates throughout the day for each market depending on the time zone Work with engineers to implement new features and enhancements into the collection application by providing clear specification documents and testing upon completion Timely respond and resolve questions and issues from internal and external clients Create effective team performance metrics for Productivity, Accuracy, Timeliness and review/adjust when necessary Be a direct manager of Research Analysts and Associate Content Managers onshore, and Business Analysts and Senior Business Analysts in off-shore locations; and indirect manager of Assistant Manager of Operations off-shore for the respective Content Set Job Requirements: University degree, preferably in Finance or Accounting Must be able to understand and interpret financial terminology Solid knowledge of financial instruments (Debt and Equity) Strong research, analytical and problem solving skills Excellent written and communication skills Quick learner, ability to apply skills and past experiences in new situations Ability to work independently Managerial experience is highly desirable SQL knowledge is a plus For Consultants, at least 2 years of FactSet experience in a client-facing role is required to apply for an interview Job Code : 4344 Click Here To Applyhttps://factset.tms.hrdepartment.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=2055&site_id=35",Content Manager – Public Equity Offerings and Private Placements (PIPEs),Full Time Employee,"Norwalk, CT 06851",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Content-Manager-%E2%80%93-Public-Equity-Offerings-Private-Placements-PIPEs-Job-Norwalk-CT-US-165269041.aspx?mescoid=2700439001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,cef526bf8f291d3230119a8fe6b26e30
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:06:29:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"$3B division of major international manufacturer is seeking a Quality Manager who will provide expert advice, direction, and problem solving to unique, broad-based quality issues, ensuring Vendor Certification, Customer Certification and recognized international standards such as ISO standards. Is responsible to act as the Management Representative for the plant or to nominate a suitable designee to ensure system performance/adherence is a key driver in our business performance. Position will support of $150M revenue stream with multiple product lines and large diverse customer base. Reports to the Plant Manager and have up to 5 direct reports including Quality Engineers and Quality Technicians. The QM will act as the voice of the customer to ensure outgoing product quality exceeds customer expectations and internal processes are held to tighter capability than that required by our customer specifications. To achieve this, the incumbent must ensure that internal systems monitor process capability and we adopt the use of SPC in all applicable areas to ensure our statistical capability remains tighter than that of our customers’ requirements. (tolerance) In the event of a customer complaint this individual is responsible to manage the incoming complaint, aggressive correction action process and resulting feedback to the customer. In order to ensure customer satisfaction the complaint management process needs to be closely monitored to ensure a reliable root cause is defined and permanent corrective action is implemented in a timely manner to ensure satisfactory customer feedback Responsible to lead the facility World Class Manufacturing implementation/output to ensure improvement targets (financial and metric based) are being achieved and the facility culture migrates toward a lean manufacturing model. In addition to leading the facility WCM activity, the incumbent will be expected to also initiate improvement events (Projects, Kaizens) to deliver improved operational performance through waste elimination and variation reduction. Develop and support WCM training curriculum for WCM Black Belts, WCM Green Belts and WCM Yellow Belts, train and coach the Black Belts and Green Belts at the plants.    Principal End Results:1.            Provide oversight and management to all quality systems ensuring that all parties follow specified processes/procedures and there is a continuous improvement effort to ensure system performance is driving improved customer satisfaction2.            Effectively implement all critical elements of the TS16949 system that are appropriate to the business to strive for a risk based, metric driven quality system.3.            Acts as the voice of the customer to ensure that any complaints are dealt with aggressively and that root cause is accurately defined, followed by the implementation of permanent corrective actions that sustainable4.            Initiates and implements necessary problem solving training for engineers and operators to assure effective use of the PDCA cycle to permanently correct defects or customer escapes.5.            Audits manufacturing process adherence to specified controls and notifies Value Stream teams/Plant Manager to out of control situations.  6.            Provides acceptance specifications for all new products entering the business to ensure we have GR&R, process capability and adequate manufacturing instructions to support ongoing needs.7.            Implements (training too) statistical process controls as needed to ensure critical characteristics are monitored/controlled on an ongoing basis.  8.            Monitors operational statistical capability to ensure manufacturing processes are under control and operating within specified tolerance limits.9.            Supports purchasing activity to qualify new vendors and assigns corrective actions to suppliers for quality/supply deviations.10.          Identifies unique and complex quality issues and evaluate potential opportunities. Define scope and approach to investigation and resolution of problems. Apply special skills and innovative approaches to the development of new or improved processes and procedures having broad application.11.          Effectively supports the plant in all aspects of World Class Manufacturing, Business Excellence program achieving budgeted savings in manufacturing costs reduction and other business KPIs through selection of strategic projects and Kaizen events and continuous monitoring.12.          Provide expert direction to WCM pillars and support Plant Manager in effectively leading the steering team to pursue the milestones established on the plant roadmap including the pursuit of WCM Bronze and ultimately WCM Silver13.          Provide expert direction and advice to other professionals in their areas of accountability.Train and coach the site management, Black Belts and Green Belts, project teams in various WCM topics.14.          Collaborate with other Quality and WCM managers in the company to identify best practices and opportunities for streamlined improvements.15.          Administer the Document Control System. Nature and Scope:·         Drive continuous improvement in quality performance and customer satisfaction through the aggressive approach to World Class Manufacturing·         Strive for best in class Corrective Action processes to ensure quality is a top priority for the business and for day to day operations. We should not see the same complaint twice…·         Manage the ongoing capability (Cpk) of the site to ensure manufacturing processes remain suited to the products being made and the specifications required by our customers.·         Deliver significant operational, quality improvement and financial benefit across the manufacturing plant·         Align World Class Manufacturing initiatives and project objectives to business strategy, and prioritize projects.·         Support the recruitment of talent to develop and deliver training and certify WCM Black Belts. ·         Train, coach and develop Black Belt, Green Belt, Yellow Belt resources assigned to projects related to WCM methodology. ·         Provide leadership and coordination to major improvement projects. Ensure benefits are realized. ·         Provide problem resolution point of contact for project leaders to offer technical or professional expertise. ·         Collaborate with the peers to share best practices. Integrate best practices into WCM training curriculum.·         Coach site management in various WCM topics·         Lead multiple process improvement teams towards safety, risk prevention, low cost maintenance, manufacturing cost reduction, defect reduction, cost avoidance, loss reduction or revenue enhancement ·         Partner with WCM leaders at the sites to develop, install and monitor a business process management system, including measurement tracking, reporting and correlation analysis ·         Facilitate quality and change management processes; identify customer needs and key drivers to reach customer satisfaction goals with financial benefit ·         Offer technical expertise and guidance in project reviews. ·         Ensure open communication throughout all levels of the organization.·         Active member of the plant steering committee and QPC pillar owner A Bachelor’s degree is required with a minimum of 8 years professional level experience with discrete manufacturing. Prefer experience with tight tolerance products that have been manufactured in a ISO or TS quality system environment·         5 years of experience in Lean or Six Sigma, ·         Working knowledge of WCM Pillar Management System and Efeso project routes also desirable ·         Completion of multiple operational and/or transactional-related projects with demonstrated success and financial results manufacturing or service·         Technical competency in problem solving skills:  8D, VSM, 5 why, standard and advanced kaizen, Lean and Six Sigma concepts·         Experience coaching and delivering training at all levels of an organization·         Strong Lean experience·         Travel Required: 10%Excellent opportunities for advancement. ",Quality Manager-WCM Job in Worcester,Full Time Employee,"Worcester, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Manager-WCM-Job-Worcester-MA-US-163754595.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=1,,Quality Assurance/Safety,36ad0376ff02f91b1ba6e5e8e93b9e5a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:06:27:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Team Elmer's seeks to fill an opening for a~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~SAFETY DIRECTORTeam Elmer's seeks to fill an opening for a Safety Director out of the Corporate office in Traverse City, Michigan. Will oversee and direct all aspects of the safety program including accident prevention, site inspection, DOT compliance, accident scene and claim management, program development, reporting, audits, risk assessments, safety committee coordination and planning and safety training. Bachelor's Degree, knowledge of ANSI, DOT, OSHA, MIOSHA and MSHA regulations, OSHA and MSHA certifications, excellent written and oral communication skills, strong computer skills and strong presentation skills.Please submit letter of interest andresume to jflick@teamelmers.com EEO/AAThis job listing brought to you by The Traverse City Record Eagle",Safety Director Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,49684,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Safety-Director-Job-US-164879914.aspx?ch=newstrcy&mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),880bc0083be0442296db62daacf467cb
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:05:47:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality Documentation Specialist needed for a contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in Framingham,MA. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Quality Documentation - Knowledge of SOP's - Working Knowledge of cGmps or Gmps is a plus What You'll Be Doing: - Tracking and reviewing change control documentation. Assist with the editing of quality documents (SOP's, guidelines, validation master plans, etc.) to ensure compliance with regulator requirements. - Must be able to work quickly with a high degree of accuracy. - Must possess sound interpersonal and information gathering skills, being able to relate well to others at all levels throughout the organization and have the ability to work in a team environment, effectively interacting with others. What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Bachelor's degree preferred, but not required. cGMP Training a Plus . - Demonstrate SME level understanding of functional area electronic business systems and adaptability to learn new systems/processes. - Critical thinking skills are a must in order to develop strategies and/or enhance business practices and desired outcomes. - Peer to peer and upward communication professional business communication skills required. What's In It For You? - Here is your opportunity to work with a major pharmaceutical lead! Opportunity is Calling, Apply Now! Recruiter: Jerome Adams Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: CLINICAL; J2W: SCIENTIFIC; MONJOB TAX TERM: CON_W2 J2WNECLINRef: 1070692SFSF: PROFNearest Major Market: FraminghamNearest Secondary Market: BostonJob Segment:Pharmaceutical, Quality, Science#TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Quality Documentation Specialist Job Job in Framingham,Full Time Employee,"Framingham, MA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Documentation-Specialist-Job-Job-Framingham-MA-US-165879711.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=9,,Quality Assurance/Safety,3331c3f68c1fff2a5f0431b267603bca
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:05:31:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Primary Purpose of Position:Responsible for developing/executing/maintaining/improving an effective and comprehensive Quality Management System to include: specifications and standards control, change control, manufacturing and supplier quality, training, communication, product & process monitoring and control, internal audits. Leads/supports overall continual improvement of Quality through teamwork, disciplined methods, sampling, experimentation, project management, data analysis, team reviews, communication and reporting. Essential Functions and Responsibilities:Provides quality expertise and leadership in the following areas:Develop, apply, and maintain quality requirements and standards for manufacturing products/processes. Serve as Quality Assurance resource for problem identification, resolution, loss reporting and continuous improvement. Support engineering efforts by participating in development projects. Monitor and manage process change/improvement efforts.  Design experiments to validate the efficacy of these improvements and to ensure the integrity of finished products.Design and implement methods for process control, process improvement, testing and inspection. Promote and execute quality standards, inspection processes, test methodology, quality plans, documents and reports. Participate in vendor/process certification; re-certification. Review customer purchase orders, contracts and change requests and ensure that the necessary criteria and provisions are included in quality and process plans. Develop, execute, and analyze quality-reporting measures. Report to management on quality issues, trends and losses. Identify issues with current processes, conduct comprehensive root cause analyses, and implement robust corrective and preventive actions in a timely fashion.Review supplier’s purchase orders and establish supplier quality requirements. Participate in/lead internal and external quality audits. Interface with supplier and customer quality representatives concerning problems with quality assurance and assure that effective corrective action is implemented/communicated. Compile, write and deliver training material on quality standards and activities. Remain current on technology through research and training.Poses no direct threat to the health or safety of himself/herself, of others, or to property. Defined as a significant risk of substantial harm that cannot be eliminated or reduced to an acceptable level by reasonable accommodation. Requires regular attendance to perform essential element as contained herein between the assigned start and end times for work. Performs such individual assignments as management may direct.  Establishes and maintains effective work relationships within the department, the Corporation and the community; and maintains the professional competence, knowledge and skill necessary for the satisfactory performance of all assigned responsibilities.   BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:EducationBachelors’ Degree in Engineering, Manufacturing Technology, Quantitative Analysis or equivalent.Experience/KnowledgeMinimum 3 years of experience as a Quality Engineer working in a manufacturing environment.Certifications/Licenses/RegistrationsCertified Quality Engineer, Green Belt / Black Belt preferred PREFERRED EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS:Experience as leader of a Quality Assurance team in manufacturing environment.Experience leading improvement projects (Six Sigma, Lean)Training in Lean Manufacturing and Six Sigma methodologies. TECHNICAL ROLE COMPETENCIES:Comprehensive knowledge of Quality methodologies to include, but not limited to, Failure Mode Effect Analysis, Measurement Systems Analysis, Production Part Approval Process, Quality Systems Assessment, Advanced Product Quality Planning, Statistical Process Control, Root Cause Analysis, as well as the application of said quality methodologies to include supplier quality/supplier development.Demonstrates a high concern for detail, accuracy, and compliance to Company and Corporate policies and procedures.Strong skills in Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel and PowerPoint. Knowledge of Minitab or JMP statistical software a plus. Ability to work with and lead cross-functional groups.Ability to develop and implement programs for continuous improvement.General knowledge of verbal and written communications for maintaining effective working relationships with all employees. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS & WORK ENVIRONMENT:Ability to lift 25lbs. occasionally.   Sitting at a desk or workstation approximately 50 percent of the work time.  Standing and walking approximately 50 percent of the work time.  25-50% travel is required (some foreign travel).Ability to work extended hours and/or travel with short notice; occasionally on weekends.Normal office, manufacturing, and laboratory environments and travel by automobile and commercial transportation.",Quality Engineer Job in Peabody,Full Time,"Peabody, MA 01960",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Peabody-MA-US-165167619.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5261ba74cf0692ca9c242659adbb7b3b
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:05:30:54,No,jobs.monster.com," MARION COUNTYinvites applications for the position of:Environmental Services Division ManagerSALARY:$2,715.20 - $3,638.40 Biweekly$5,882.93 - $7,883.20 Monthly OPENING DATE: 03/18/16  CLOSING DATE: 04/04/16 11:59 PM   GENERAL STATEMENT OF DUTIESResponsible for the management and coordination of providing solid waste disposal, construction and monitoring of landfills, ashfills, waste to energy facilities and transfer stations, as well as waste reduction, reuse, recycling, composting and special waste programs.  Supervises personnel engaged in environmental matters, such as monitoring and control of invasive species, permitting and monitoring of non-point-source water pollution, the provision of the County's water quality program, and coordination with weed boards and watershed councils.  Manages county park system. Performs other related duties as assigned. SUPERVISION RECEIVED Works under the general direction of the Public Works Director who establishes goals, assigns general areas of responsibility, and maintains the degree of control necessary to the successful accomplishment of the work. SUPERVISION EXERCISED Exercises direction and supervision over a varying number of professional, paraprofessional, and technical personnel; participates in the selection of new personnel, training, evaluating performance and responding to grievances.  TYPICAL DUTIES - DUTIES INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO THE FOLLOWING:Prepare studies, reports, plans, specifications, and contracts related to solid waste management facilities and parks facilities and programs, as well as develop programs and procedures.Supervise, and coordinate department personnel (environmental engineering associates, waste reduction and recycling coordinators, environmental specialists, and parks coordinator, including preparation of performance evaluations for said personnel.Oversee budget and project timelines for engineering, waste reduction/recycling, parks operations and maintenance, and computer related activities.Schedule and monitor waste flow within Marion County, including coordination with franchised haulers and disposal operators.Participates in basic through advanced incident command training and drills to maintain proficiency in EOC operations.  Assumes any position as assigned in the EOC, up to and including command staff.  Emergency Management duties may require working long hours outside normal business hours, weekend/holiday work, and may occur with little or no advance notice.Responsible for assuring crew leaders and lead workers are aware of the safety rules applicable to a specific work activity. Responsible for taking corrective action, up to and including ordering a work stoppage when unsafe conditions or practices occur.  REQUIREMENTS FOR THE POSITION:EXPERIENCE AND TRAINING Bachelor's Degree in Civil Engineering or Business Management or a recognizable equivalent education and knowledge; OR Five (5) years of progressively responsible experience in solid waste management; AND Five (5) years management experience with progressively responsible supervisory duties; ORAny satisfactory equivalent combination of education, training and/or experience relevant to the position.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITY Thorough knowledge of state and federal laws and programs relative to solid waste management facilities, parks, and water quality; specific knowledge of state laws and county ordinances relating to waste flow control and franchising of haulers; ability to plan and supervise varied types of professional and sub-professional engineering activities; ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with employees, citizens, county officials, volunteer organizations and contractors on a daily basis to solve difficult problems; ability to prepare clear and concise reports and recommendations; ability to make presentations before the public and county officials.PHYSICAL FUNCTIONSOperates a motor vehicle; sees using depth perception; stands; sits; moves about the work area; bends forward; climbs one floor of stairs; lifts, pushes, pulls, and carries items; operates a keyboard; uses rapid-mental/hand/eye coordination; speaks clearly and audibly; reads 12pt font; hears a normal level of speech.  EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY: All qualified applicants will be considered without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, mental or physical disability, or sexual orientation. To ensure the broadest range of services to individuals with disabilities, Marion County is prepared to make necessary arrangements. Please call at least two (2) working days in advance for services.This announcement is meant only as a descriptive recruitment guide and is subject to change. Further, it does not constitute either an expressed or implied contract.PO BOX 14500Salem, OR 97309(503) 566-3949APPLY ONLINE AT:http://www.co.marion.or.us/BS/HR/Pages/jobs.aspxWe do not accept resumes in lieu of applications.Position #354-1 ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICES DIVISION MANAGER   ",Environmental Services Division Manager Job in Salem,Full Time,"Salem, OR 97305",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/Environmental-Services-Division-Manager-Job-Salem-OR-US-165649131.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,"5,882.93 - 7,883.20 $ /month",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),dbbf8b613436432f186df75f582f166a
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:05:29:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title         : Project Manager Location         : Basking Ridge, NJ 07920   Duration         : 3 months          Job Description: Lead and structure naming and identity development programs in partnership with integrated marketing and business leads. Accountable for the alignment of objectives and successful end-to-end project stewardship. Brand architecture and Naming Oversight to Standards. Identity Project Briefing, Scoping, and Planning. Naming and strategy agency liaison. TM process management and Legal team liaison Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of various factors. Exercises judgment within broadly defined practices and policies in selecting methods, techniques, and evaluation criteria for obtaining results. Frequently makes decisions based on policies and practices. Works independently and receives little to no guidance on assignments. Acts independently to develop appropriate methods and procedures. Decisions are made independently and affect the work of others. Work is reviewed and measured on meeting objectives and schedules.  Bachelor's degree, or equivalent. Significant project management or team leadership experience is required. Thanks & Regards,Sevantha Kumar Sr.Technical Recruitervaltech_Valtech Services |4975 Preston Park,| Suite 550 West| Plano, TX | 75093 Direct: 925-399-4706Fax: 469-251-7241Email  : sevantha.kumar@valtech.com",Project Manager Job in Basking Ridge,Full Time,"Basking Ridge, NJ 07920",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Job-Basking-Ridge-NJ-US-165854381.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=1,,,86470bda082c121daa9175d03cb03595
United States of America,US,07/Dec/2015:05:27:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Press Room Tool & Die MakerBirmingham, AL If you are interested in this position, the preferred method to apply is to send your resume to (Sam) sberi@nwexs.com You may also text 248.707.1071 with your questions.Job IntroductionThe Press Tool & Die Maker (Class ""A"") is responsible for overseeing the day-to-day activities of Class ""A"" tooling improvements and troubleshooting draw and surface issues along with advising and knowledge sharing with Class ""A"" Toolmakers, Press Line Supervisors and Press Line Lead Hands, and developing draw die recipe standards. The Press Tool & Die Maker will also train Tool & Die Apprentices in their Class ""A"" skill development. Expertise in formability, surface, dimensional, circle grid analysis, forming limit diagrams, and tornado line/character line quality maintenance is required. Along with these responsibilities, the Press Tool & Die Maker (Class ""A"") will also build, fabricate, and repair dies, tooling, fixtures, and other components and troubleshoot production part quality issues as necessary to ensure the support of the plant production.Major ResponsibilitiesFollow and enforce all safety policies and proceduresUnderstanding of work-hardening in aluminumUnderstanding of flange die radius requirements for flat hem and modified tope of aluminum panelsProven ability in aluminum trim die setup including steel entry standards and trap pointsDemonstrate expertise in Class ""A"" formability, thinning analysis, circle grid analysis, draw bead configuration, binder development punch opening changes and implement into tooling.100% spot of tornado/character line expertiseProven ability of Class ""A"" punch finishingDemonstrate expertise on Class ""A"" surface, punch finishing, fine spotting, trouble shooting surface quality issues and implementing corrections, stoning, highlighting and perform changes to meet customer expectations in tooling.Demonstrate expertise on Class ""A"" dimensional changes, reading and interpretation of dimensional reports, understanding customer requirements and implementing surface dimensional changes.Demonstrate expertise in Class ""A"" aluminum production, formability, trimming and maintenance on aluminum tools.Services, maintains, and tests new or changed dies, capable of implementing and maintaining a preventative maintenance program on Class ""A"" tooling.Performs scheduled preventative maintenance on all tooling and follows up on PM and tracking sheets.Capable to perform Class ""A"" die design reviews, direct tooling changes, and review A/B layouts for compatibility.Understanding of draw die development including requirements for die tip, initial punch contact and spring backTravel to outside toolshops for die buy-off dutiesExperience in Class ""A"" Die build follow up and die buy-offs at suppliers.Proficiently operates a variety of small machines, tools and equipment.Troubleshoots for problems during production on all production lines.Modifies dies and tooling to conform to engineering changes.Maintain good housekeeping practices.Responsible for all in-house tooling, coordinating all new tooling equipment.Responsible for interim and long-term problem solving involving tandem press line, dies, and press line automation.Coordinating all customer engineering activities as it relates to tooling, engineering quotations, schedule change in die shop, follow up, tracking time used for cost-effectiveness, and record keeping for all such changes.Responsible for working with customers on all product improvements and product concerns.Lead and direct toolmakers on day-to-day work to be performed on tools.Lead and direct Apprentices in Class ""A"" tooling skills development.Promote good housekeepingPerform all other duties as requiredKnowledge and EducationA 4 Year apprentice trade certificate in Tool & Die making (or 8 years equivalent combination of education and experience in Class ""A"" tooling build and development.)Experience as describedWork ExperienceBIW experienceSkills and CompetenciesCOMMUNICATION SKILLSThe ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.The ability to write routine reports and correspondence.The ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of organization.MATHEMATICAL SKILLSAbility to work with mathematical concepts such as probability, and statistical inference, and fundamentals of plane and solid geometry and trigonometry.Ability to apply concepts such as fractions, percentages, ratios, and proportions to practical situationsREASONING ABILITYAbility to apply mechanical aptitude to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral or diagram form.Ability to deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situations.Work EnvironmentManufacturing Environment:80% Standing, and walking20% Stooping, Kneeling, crouching, crawling, climbing, and balancingMust be able to lift heavy loads (50 lbs)Additional InformationMust successfully meet benchmark of skill evaluationMust Participate in additional skill development programIf you are interested in this position, the preferred method to apply is to send your resume to (Sam) sberi@nwexs.com You may alsotext 248.707.1071 with your questions.You can also visit our website for other open positions. We try and keep them current. If it is posted, it is still active.  Nationwide Technical & Executive Search, Inc.www.nwexs.com  ",Press Room Tool & Die Maker # Job in Birmingham,Full Time,"Birmingham, AL 35215",,http://jobview.monster.com/Press-Room-Tool-Die-Maker-37373-Job-Birmingham-AL-US-165871208.aspx?mescoid=5100947001001&jobPosition=19,23.00 - 29.00 $ /hour,,11f4ce13a14dcc10253aa09adbd325a5
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:22:22:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, MS 38851",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-houston-ms-us-176574385.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,b03a32a3790fc5d0f4842307868413ec
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:22:22:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Construction Surveillance Technician Responsibilities:Understand and assess security practices/procedures for various levels of securityProduce written reports or document activities/processes, investigations/anomalies/deficiencies, incidents, etc.Identify unauthorized materialsUnderstand and assess methods used to place technical penetrations or unauthorized materialsUnderstand technical security devices, systems, and other monitoring devicesReport suspicious behaviorWorking knowledge of construction safety Required Qualifications:Construction KnowledgeActive Top Secret Clearance (REQUIRED to be considered for position)Willing to work Overtime/Flexible HoursLocal Candidate (Required) Preferred Qualifications:Former Access Control KnowledgeMilitary ExperienceOCONUS ExperienceTop Secret clearance with Polygraph",Construction Surveillance Technician Job in Falls Church,Full Time Employee,"Falls Church, VA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureAerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-surveillance-technician-job-falls-church-va-us-175626555.aspx?mescoid=4900864001001&jobPosition=7,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,6b97a609d703a91ce8004fc489a16b49
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:22:04:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client in south Dayton, Ohio is seeking a CONCEPTUAL / HARD BID ESTIMATOR. This individual will provide and/or coordinate full estimating services for assigned conceptual and hard bid complex work, for all types of contracts.Job responsibilities:Review proposal specifications, drawings, attend pre-bid meetings, etc. to determine scope of work and required contents of estimate.Provide complete conceptual, hard bid, and final estimating input on complex projects.Provide technical support to personnel preparing specific specification division estimates for assigned bids.Review and incorporate historical data from purchase orders, subcontracts, productivity analysis reports, etc. into unit and man hour figuresEnsure all working documents and data are maintained to back-up estimate figures.Assist operations department during preparation of inquiries and final evaluation of submitted bids as required.Assist preconstruction department during preconstruction phasePerform additional assignments per supervisor’s direction.Participate in client's company training and development.Assist in the training/orientation of employees when needed.Assist in the employment processes as requested.Promote teamwork and positive communication among employees.Attend and participate in miscellaneous site meetings, sharing knowledge, information, and ideas when needed.Participate in related trade associations and organizations.Thorough understanding of industry practices, processes, standards, etc. and their impact on project activities.Ability to estimate the following types of projects/contracts: hospitals/healthcare facilities, corporate, university, assisted living, data centers, high tech, institutional, hotel, major retail, water and wastewater, and industrial.Conceptual estimating with ability to visualize needs and do quantity take-off work/pricing, without strictly relying on cost per square foot of building.Ability to know and price out general conditions.Self-perform, at-risk GC/CM background.Working knowledge of computer estimating and pricing systems, experience with MC2 Estimating Systems is a plus.Proven strong conceptual and hard bid estimating abilities.Critical thinker/planner.Ability to prepare complex proposals with minimum supervision.Ability to coordinate and effectively supervise group work effort.Excellent communication and relationship-building skills.Excellent organizational and planning skills.REQUIREMENTS;Four-year Civil Engineering, CM or other Construction Related Degree or equivalent combinations technical training and/or related experience.Minimum 5 years experience estimating projects with values up to $75 MM.Minimum 5 years experience in the commercial Construction industry with both operations (at least 3 years) and estimating experience.Thorough knowledge of estimating techniques, all engineering disciplines, cost control systems, and accounts required._______________________________Belcan is a leading provider of qualified personnel to many of the world's most respected enterprises. We offer excellent opportunities for contract/temporary, temp-to-hire, and direct assignments in the technical, IT, professional, clerical, and light industrial fields.",Commercial Construction Estimator Job in Miamisburg,"Full Time , Employee","Miamisburg, OH 45342",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-construction-estimator-job-miamisburg-oh-us-176485206.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=17,"65,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Engineering,d21f161b1db206355f8057d5f66ad3a8
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:21:54:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"CTE Teacher- Auto Technician Regular Substitute teacher to replace teacher from Dec 2016-Dec 2017. Certified NYS CTE Auto Tech teacher or eligible to acquire certification with 4+ years of auto tech experience. Full contract salary and benefits. Apply online at e1b.org, Jobs, Certified, Posting #1116-0001.",CTE Teacher - Auto Technician Job in West Seneca,Full Time,"West Seneca, NY 14224",All,http://jobview.monster.com/cte-teacher-auto-technician-job-west-seneca-ny-us-175924435.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=10,,,797dbbfc022e0f6a1a9a8f7751822afa
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:21:44:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Direct the daily education program and the implementation of the Head Start goals to the fullest extent possible for each child in conjunction with the teacher. 1.         Associates degree in Early Childhood Education or BA, BS in related field, plus one year             teaching  experience preferred.2.         Demonstrate an aptitude for accurate record keeping, reporting and writing.3.         Maintain flexibility in meeting job responsibilities.4.         Show the ability to function effectively and appropriately with various community  agencies,            programs and professionals. Maintain a professional image while     representing Head Start.5.         Demonstrate flexibility, willingness and commitment to attend professional meetings and training.6.         Exhibit the ability to communicate and remain courteous and professional with children, parents and staff.7.         Demonstrate a sincere commitment to the philosophy of Head Start and to the objectives of an early childhood intervention program. Report","Muskingum County Head Start Job Application for Associate Teacher | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Pamela Bryan Phone 740-454-6251 ext. 114 Fax 740-454-7369 Address 1580 ADAMS LNZANESVILLE, OH 43701",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-teacher-job-zanesville-oh-us-176264204.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=1,,,584494e2bc3577904c6fc9eabb05cdd7
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:21:09:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are working exclusively with our client in identifying an Instructional Designer to create engaging, innovative, and effective learning experiences for employees. In this role, you will constantly innovate with an eye towards content quality, reusability, and accessibility. Your responsibilities will include but are not limited to:Design, remix, elevate, and invigorate learning materialsBuild eLearning, mobile learning, learning games, micro learning, performance support, instructor-led training, virtual training, and moreLeverage appropriate instructional strategies based on content type, learner attributes, delivery platforms, and business needCreate prototypes, storyboards, and design documentation that effectively communicate designAuthor course content, simulations, scenarios, formative and summative assessments, scripts, etc.Continually research, identify, and apply emergent approaches for the design and delivery of meaningful, enlightening learning experiencesPartner effectively with subject matter experts and key stakeholdersEffectively utilize design models such as ADDIE, SAM, and design thinkingProficiently use authoring tools (e.g. Articulate Storyline, Camtasia, Captivate, etc.)Design for not just accessibility, but inclusivityAbility to clearly articulate rationale for learning approaches based on sound learning science, adult learning principles, interoperability standards, and web accessibility standardsBuild templates, coaching guides, etc. for facilitators, colleagues, and business partnersStart Date: ASAPDuration: 3+ monthsLocation: Onsite in Austin, TX with flexibility for telecommuting up to 3 days per week. Experience Required:Master’s Degree in Instructional Design and Technology, Learning Sciences, Adult Education, or other related field or equivalent education and experienceExperience in instructor-led training and eLearning (samples will be shown via WebEx interview)Experience using Articulate StorylineExperience with Camtasia is a plus, but not requiredAbility to create high quality, effective, innovative instructional materialsStrong communication skills, both written and verbal About Us:Clarity Consultants is the leading provider of corporate learning and development, and creative consultants. For nearly a quarter century, organizations have turned to Clarity to staff their mission critical projects with elite consultants. Our nationwide network of over 35,000 highly skilled consultants offers deep knowledge, low management overhead, and flexibility to scale according to an organization’s unique project needs. Our experts work with clients on a project basis, supplementing the talents of their internal staff until goals are achieved, ensuring project success. If the above opportunity is not a good fit for you and you are a learning and development or creative professional, visit www.clarityconsultants.com/how-to-join to join our talent network.  Follow Us for tips, trends, and industry insights:LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/company/clarity-consultants Blog: http://www.clarityconsultants.com/blog Twitter: https://twitter.com/ConsultClarity Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/ClarityConsultants Report","Clarity Consultants Job Application for Instructional Designer – Storyline (Telecommuting up to  days per week) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","We are working exclusively with our client in identifying an Instructional Designer to create engaging, innovative, and effective learning experiences for employees. In this role, you will constantly innovate with an eye towards content quality, reusability, and accessibility. Your responsibilities will include but are not limited to:Design, remix, elevate, and invigorate learning materialsBuild eLearning, mobile learning, learning games, micro learning, performance support, instructor-led training, virtual training, and moreLeverage appropriate instructional strategies based on content type, learner attributes, delivery platforms, and business needCreate prototypes, storyboards, and design documentation that effectively communicate designAuthor course content, simulations, scenarios, formative and summative assessments, scripts, etc.Continually research, identify, and apply emergent approaches for the design and delivery of meaningful, enlightening learning experiencesPartner effectively with subject matter experts and key stakeholdersEffectively utilize design models such as ADDIE, SAM, and design thinkingProficiently use authoring tools (e.g. Articulate Storyline, Camtasia, Captivate, etc.)Design for not just accessibility, but inclusivityAbility to clearly articulate rationale for learning approaches based on sound learning science, adult learning principles, interoperability standards, and web accessibility standardsBuild templates, coaching guides, etc. for facilitators, colleagues, and business partnersStart Date: ASAPDuration: 3+ monthsLocation: Onsite in Austin, TX with flexibility for telecommuting up to 3 days per week. Experience Required:Master’s Degree in Instructional Design and Technology, Learning Sciences, Adult Education, or other related field or equivalent education and experienceExperience in instructor-led training and eLearning (samples will be shown via WebEx interview)Experience using Articulate StorylineExperience with Camtasia is a plus, but not requiredAbility to create high quality, effective, innovative instructional materialsStrong communication skills, both written and verbal About Us:Clarity Consultants is the leading provider of corporate learning and development, and creative consultants. For nearly a quarter century, organizations have turned to Clarity to staff their mission critical projects with elite consultants. Our nationwide network of over 35,000 highly skilled consultants offers deep knowledge, low management overhead, and flexibility to scale according to an organization’s unique project needs. Our experts work with clients on a project basis, supplementing the talents of their internal staff until goals are achieved, ensuring project success. If the above opportunity is not a good fit for you and you are a learning and development or creative professional, visit www.clarityconsultants.com/how-to-join to join our talent network.  Follow Us for tips, trends, and industry insights:LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/company/clarity-consultants Blog: http://www.clarityconsultants.com/blog Twitter: https://twitter.com/ConsultClarity Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/ClarityConsultants",,http://jobview.monster.com/instructional-designer-%E2%80%93-storyline-telecommuting-up-to-3-days-per-week-job-austin-tx-us-176487952.aspx?mescoid=2500399001001&jobPosition=7,,,c9a5a347dfe2fde0760bb7f5a130b492
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:21:08:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Penn Cambria School District is seeking a Business Administrator for permanent 12-month position available 2017. Student enrollment: 1,700. Budget: $24,000,000. Required: Bachelorâ s degree or higher in accounting, finance, or related field. Must have extensive experience in business management with direct program responsibility and be able to demonstrate potential for fiscal management and staff supervision as documented by successful work in business administration; school business administration preferred. Successful candidates must possess excellent oral & written communication skills, and possess the ability to facilitate communication between administration, staff, and public. The Business Administrator is responsible for a fiscal management program which provides for sound accounting of all District resources. Experience in fiscal activities including: fiscal planning & budgeting, analysis, financial accounting, payroll, employee benefits, purchasing, contract administration, cash management & investments, state and federal subsidies, tax administration, collective bargaining, insurance & risk management, debt service & capital fund management, construction, Plancon process and bond issuance.Knowledge of business operations & office management, auditing, transportation, child accounting and food service. Human Resources experience a plus.Send letter of interest, credentials, 3 letters of reference, Act 168 Disclosure Release, and current Acts 34, 114 & 151 clearances to Mr. William Marshall, Superintendent, Penn Cambria SD, 201 6th St., Cresson, PA 16630. DEADLINE: December 16, 2016. EOEThis job listing brought to you by The Johnstown Tribune Democrat",Business Administrator Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,16630,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/business-administrator-job-cresson-pa-us-176601206.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),985871a1b7d9d62bba7c90ba71f18458
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:28:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Williston,Full Time Employee,"Williston, ND 58801",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-williston-nd-us-176574203.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=14,,Entry Level,5ad9c2d812dae76e14661363a6b265ef
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:26:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"DC-based Commercial General Contractor seeking an Assistant Superintendent to add to the team.Client DetailsThis DC-based General Contractor has established itself as a leader in the markets of aviation, biotech, education, government, and hospitality. Headquartered in Fairfax, VA, this General Contractor is known for providing excellent service to clients, which has led to over 75% percent of their work being repeat business. With a focus on work-life balance, employee and client satisfaction, and quality work, the company is growing quickly and looking to add an Assistant Superintendent with commercial experience to the team.DescriptionThe Assistant Superintendent will:Assist the Superintendent, Project Manager, and Project Engineer as requiredAssist with project layoutAssist with scheduling of projectAssist with monthly billings and processing change ordersRequisition of equipment and material deliveries as requiredAssist with project closeoutMaintain project documentation, daily reports and job-site photosEstablish the safety plan and be directly responsible for overall safety of the projectMonitor subcontractor progress, prepare CPM schedules, and prepare look ahead schedules to ensure completion dates are metAssist in developing the site plan including; public safety measures; site security; truck routing (inbound and outbound); plan and develop logistics for and overall personnel and material movement within the site.Establish and maintain regularly scheduled daily and weekly project team meetings as appropriate for the project.ProfileThe Assistant Superintendent should have:Bachelor's degree in Project Engineering, Architecture, Construction Management, or related field3+ year(s) of experience in constructionStrong communication skillsStructured and organizedProficient with construction apps and technologyHave strong relationship building skillsAbility to prioritize and lead othersAbility to lead meetingsJob OfferThe Assistant Superintendent will be offered:Competitive compensation based on experiencePerformance based bonusComprehensive benefits package available",Assistant Superintendent- Commercial Construction Job in Fairfax,"Full Time , Employee","Fairfax, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-superintendent-commercial-construction-job-fairfax-va-us-176494238.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=10,,,ae46b1ee03c0dc95c89585151204b1b5
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:16:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Engineer with experience, please read on!Job Title: Project Engineer Salary: $50-90k base + bonus, truck, phone etc..Location: Peninsula We have been steadily growing our presence in the Bay Area over the years and have created an excellent reputation for getting projects done on time and within budget. We are based on the Peninsula and have a focus in Commercial Construction. With weekly lunches and team events, we strive to promote interaction between our employees in a lively, laid-back environment so they can thrive both inside and outside of work. Only with this close-knit and friendly companionship within our company do we believe that our mission can be achieved.What You Will Be Doing- Over 90% of our clients return to us for their next projectWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 1 Year of experience and a college degree required. - Commercial Construction- Subcontractor coordination- Project Engineer- MS Office/MS Project- Project EstimatingWhat's In It for You- 401K program- Car allowance- Full medical/dental plan- Paid vacation, sick days, and holidays- Highly competitive base salary with bonus - Our newly remodeled offices provide a great working environmentSo, if you are a Project Engineer with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Engineer - Commercial Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","If you are a Project Engineer with experience, please read on!Job Title: Project Engineer Salary: $50-90k base + bonus, truck, phone etc..Location: Peninsula We have been steadily growing our presence in the Bay Area over the years and have created an excellent reputation for getting projects done on time and within budget. We are based on the Peninsula and have a focus in Commercial Construction. With weekly lunches and team events, we strive to promote interaction between our employees in a lively, laid-back environment so they can thrive both inside and outside of work. Only with this close-knit and friendly companionship within our company do we believe that our mission can be achieved.What You Will Be Doing- Over 90% of our clients return to us for their next projectWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 1 Year of experience and a college degree required. - Commercial Construction- Subcontractor coordination- Project Engineer- MS Office/MS Project- Project EstimatingWhat's In It for You- 401K program- Car allowance- Full medical/dental plan- Paid vacation, sick days, and holidays- Highly competitive base salary with bonus - Our newly remodeled offices provide a great working environmentSo, if you are a Project Engineer with experience, please apply today!",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-commercial-construction-job-redwood-city-ca-us-176447564.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=4,,,c14b25045944f0bb4931920dffd7b5e7
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:16:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Candidates for this full-time fall internship must be a current student pursuing an undergraduate or graduate degree or recent graduate student in Marketing, Management, Finance or Economics with at least two years of course work completed toward a degree, or a recent graduate.Job Responsibilities:Internship will involve conducting market analysis focused on contact center strategy, customer service channels, and customer relationship management tools. This intern will support the strategy group by benchmarking best-in-class companies, providing a detailed analysis of best practices, and analyzing the voice of the customer information to align strategy with our organizational goals. This will include:Conduct market analysis focused on contact center strategy, customer service channels, and customer relationship management tools through secondary sourcesIdentify best practices in customer service experiencesAnalyze voice of the customer information and define customer pain points in our customers' journeysReport findings including a gap analysis and detailed customer expectationsThe Ideal Candidate will have/be: Self-starter with the ability to stay focused on complex tasksPragmatic thinker with the ability to integrate information from a wide array of sources into a cohesive strategyAbility to organize and synthesize informationExcellent communication skills (verbal and written)Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite with an emphasis on PowerPoint and ExcelMarket research experience including both primary and secondary sourcesAble to work 30-40 hours a week January 9, 2017 – May 5, 2017 UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Strategy Intern Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA 30328",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-strategy-intern-job-atlanta-ga-us-176108270.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=20,,Education/Training,fe969e764ba6db56a53fc3aadb231e78
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:16:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Jamestown,Full Time Employee,"Jamestown, ND 58402",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-jamestown-nd-us-176574212.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,0c39acc7f2dfaa92bbcc16a2376b13ef
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:16:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job High School Teacher Cardinal Newman High School is seeking Interim positions in Biology, Math and World History beginning January, 2017. Teachers must have a degree in the designated area and hold a Florida Professional or Temporary Certificate. Resume may be faxed to 561-683-7307 or emailed to principal@cardinalnewman.com keywords professor instructor Report","Cardinal Newman High School Job Application for High School Teacher | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name - -,All,http://jobview.monster.com/high-school-teacher-job-west-palm-beach-fl-us-176374575.aspx?mescoid=2500379001001&jobPosition=18,,,ed4b5be13f4a002a83648430eb2f9f06
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:15:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position Description:SOFTWARE TRAINING CONSULTANT - - Tax Software Position Location: Virtual work-from-home when not traveling. Prefer candidates located near Wolters Kluwer hub cities of Dallas, Atlanta and Chicago. Candidates from other cities will be considered provided they live within commuting range of a major airport. Wolters Kluwer Job #15-15523ABOUT WOLTERS KLUWER Tax & Accounting U.S.Wolters Kluwer Tax & Accounting U.S. (CCHGroup.com) is a leading provider of tax, accounting and audit information, software and services, and is a division of Wolters Kluwer, a market-leading global information services company. It has served tax, accounting and business professionals since 1913. Among its market-leading solutions are The CCHÂ® ProSystem fxÂ® Suite, CCH Axcessâ„¢, CCHÂ® IntelliConnectÂ®, CCHÂ® IntelliConnect Direct, CCHÂ® Accounting Research ManagerÂ® and the U.S. Master Tax GuideÂ®. Wolters Kluwer Tax & Accounting US is based in Riverwoods, IL with key office locations in Dallas, Wichita, New York, Washington, D.C., Chicago and Torrance. The digital future has arrived and the tax and accounting professions are changing rapidly. Professionals today have different needs, expectations and capabilities. In addition to accuracy, they need greater mobility, simplicity and speed. These needs place a premium on access to active intelligence, agile systems and integrated workflow solutions â€” in short â€œBest in Processâ€ solutions. This is precisely the value that Wolters Kluwer, Tax & Accounting US delivers to professionals.POSITIONWe are seeking a self-motivated, goal-oriented software trainer to provide on-site and web-based customer training and consulting services with a focus on CCH ProSystem fx and CCH Axcess Tax related software solutions, including Scan with AutoFlow. This will appeal to someone with 2-5 years of public accounting and tax compliance experience who enjoys learning and teaching and would like to take their career in a new direction. - Conduct training and consulting services via the Internet or at customersâ€™ locations.- Design, author and refine content and materials for software training courses and consulting services.- Provide internal training on Tax related software products.- Assist sales team with software demonstrations.- Provide customer support as needed and when available.- Assist with product enhancement suggestions and design based on input from customers.- Youâ€™ll be assigned special projects as work load allows. - 30% travel at peak times. Qualifications:QUALIFICATIONS- Bachelor's Degree (preferably in Accounting)- Minimum 2 years in public accounting with a focus on tax compliance, specialized industry or audit experience preferred.- Public speaking and group training experience strongly preferred.Experience using CCH ProSystem fx Tax and/or CCH Axcess Tax preferred.- Experience using CCH ProSystem fx Scan or Scan SaaS with AutoFlow Technology preferred.- Proven leadership and time-management skills essential. - Enthusiastic approach to helping others and problem-solving.- Excellent verbal and written communication skills.- Working knowledge of accounting and accounting systems.- Ability to plan and schedule travel independently. Available for overnight travel. Able to travel by air. Must have valid driver's license.To Apply, go to: https://www.wolterskluwer.apply2jobs.com/ProfExt/index.cfm?fuseaction=mExternal.showJob&RID=15523&CurrentPage=1 ABOUT WOLTERS KLUWERWolters Kluwer N.V. (AEX: WKL) is a global leader in information services and solutions for professionals in the health, tax and accounting, risk and compliance, finance and legal sectors. We help our customers make critical decisions every day by providing expert solutions that combine deep domain knowledge with specialized technology and services. Wolters Kluwer reported 2015 annual revenues of â‚¬4.2 billion. The company, headquartered in Alphen aan den Rijn, the Netherlands, serves customers in over 180 countries, maintains operations in over 40 countries and employs 19,000 people worldwide. Wolters Kluwer shares are listed on Euronext Amsterdam (WKL) and are included in the AEX and Euronext 100 indices.For more information about our solutions and organization, visit www.wolterskluwer.com, follow us on Twitter, Facebook, LinkedIn, and YouTube.EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITYWolters Kluwer U. S. Corporation and all of its subsidiaries, divisions and customer/business units is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.INFORMATIONFor any assistance with your application for this job opening, please call the HR Source at (888) 495-4772 or email HRSource@WoltersKluwer.com TTY is also available at (888) 495-4771. Report","Wolters Kluwer Job Application for Software Training Consultant - -Tax Software / - | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Position Description:SOFTWARE TRAINING CONSULTANT - - Tax Software Position Location: Virtual work-from-home when not traveling. Prefer candidates located near Wolters Kluwer hub cities of Dallas, Atlanta and Chicago. Candidates from other cities will be considered provided they live within commuting range of a major airport. Wolters Kluwer Job #15-15523ABOUT WOLTERS KLUWER Tax & Accounting U.S.Wolters Kluwer Tax & Accounting U.S. (CCHGroup.com) is a leading provider of tax, accounting and audit information, software and services, and is a division of Wolters Kluwer, a market-leading global information services company. It has served tax, accounting and business professionals since 1913. Among its market-leading solutions are The CCHÂ® ProSystem fxÂ® Suite, CCH Axcessâ„¢, CCHÂ® IntelliConnectÂ®, CCHÂ® IntelliConnect Direct, CCHÂ® Accounting Research ManagerÂ® and the U.S. Master Tax GuideÂ®. Wolters Kluwer Tax & Accounting US is based in Riverwoods, IL with key office locations in Dallas, Wichita, New York, Washington, D.C., Chicago and Torrance. The digital future has arrived and the tax and accounting professions are changing rapidly. Professionals today have different needs, expectations and capabilities. In addition to accuracy, they need greater mobility, simplicity and speed. These needs place a premium on access to active intelligence, agile systems and integrated workflow solutions â€” in short â€œBest in Processâ€ solutions. This is precisely the value that Wolters Kluwer, Tax & Accounting US delivers to professionals.POSITIONWe are seeking a self-motivated, goal-oriented software trainer to provide on-site and web-based customer training and consulting services with a focus on CCH ProSystem fx and CCH Axcess Tax related software solutions, including Scan with AutoFlow. This will appeal to someone with 2-5 years of public accounting and tax compliance experience who enjoys learning and teaching and would like to take their career in a new direction. - Conduct training and consulting services via the Internet or at customersâ€™ locations.- Design, author and refine content and materials for software training courses and consulting services.- Provide internal training on Tax related software products.- Assist sales team with software demonstrations.- Provide customer support as needed and when available.- Assist with product enhancement suggestions and design based on input from customers.- Youâ€™ll be assigned special projects as work load allows. - 30% travel at peak times. Qualifications:QUALIFICATIONS- Bachelor's Degree (preferably in Accounting)- Minimum 2 years in public accounting with a focus on tax compliance, specialized industry or audit experience preferred.- Public speaking and group training experience strongly preferred.Experience using CCH ProSystem fx Tax and/or CCH Axcess Tax preferred.- Experience using CCH ProSystem fx Scan or Scan SaaS with AutoFlow Technology preferred.- Proven leadership and time-management skills essential. - Enthusiastic approach to helping others and problem-solving.- Excellent verbal and written communication skills.- Working knowledge of accounting and accounting systems.- Ability to plan and schedule travel independently. Available for overnight travel. Able to travel by air. Must have valid driver's license.To Apply, go to: https://www.wolterskluwer.apply2jobs.com/ProfExt/index.cfm?fuseaction=mExternal.showJob&RID=15523&CurrentPage=1 ABOUT WOLTERS KLUWERWolters Kluwer N.V. (AEX: WKL) is a global leader in information services and solutions for professionals in the health, tax and accounting, risk and compliance, finance and legal sectors. We help our customers make critical decisions every day by providing expert solutions that combine deep domain knowledge with specialized technology and services. Wolters Kluwer reported 2015 annual revenues of â‚¬4.2 billion. The company, headquartered in Alphen aan den Rijn, the Netherlands, serves customers in over 180 countries, maintains operations in over 40 countries and employs 19,000 people worldwide. Wolters Kluwer shares are listed on Euronext Amsterdam (WKL) and are included in the AEX and Euronext 100 indices.For more information about our solutions and organization, visit www.wolterskluwer.com, follow us on Twitter, Facebook, LinkedIn, and YouTube.EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITYWolters Kluwer U. S. Corporation and all of its subsidiaries, divisions and customer/business units is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.INFORMATIONFor any assistance with your application for this job opening, please call the HR Source at (888) 495-4772 or email HRSource@WoltersKluwer.com TTY is also available at (888) 495-4771.",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/software-training-consultant-tax-software-16-15523-job-all-cities-nj-nj-us-175977246.aspx?mescoid=1300091001001&jobPosition=18,,,6ead6c3b8172d6e58b68b8a33c073517
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:20:15:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Manager with restaurant and retail construction with experience, please read on! The main role of this position will be to identify and resolve problems with subcontractors, owners, architects and building department officials to ensure a smooth turnover on every project. They will also be responsible for project schedules and weekly to biweekly job site evaluations. and monitoring the overall progress of job and work closely with Supers and other PMs. Beacuse of the nature of our business this position may require heavy travelWhat You Will Be Doing- Manage project s and superintendents- Manage various retail and restaurant construction projects - Prepare the bid to send to the owner - Negotiate with subcontractors- Preparing subcontracts- Prepare project schedules- Coordinate owner-supplied items- Review subcontractor pay requests- Initiate owner and subcontractor change orders- Process requests for information and change orders- Monitor schedules- Initiate owner pay requests- Prepare and submit close out packages for final invoice- Visit the construction sites ( some domestic travel required)- Reconcile work-in-progress costs- Monitor jobs and job costs on a regular basis- Supervise the day-to-day activities and productivity of the project managers and project superintendents- Monitor work of subcontractors and hiring/firing subcontractors as necessary.What You Need for this Position- Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in the construction management field. - Must have 3-5 years of experience in the management of construction projects. - Must have 3-5 years experience in retail construction- Must have good organizational, interpersonal, negotiation and customer relations skills.- Must have attention to detail and mental concentration for accurately performing tasks and handling constant interruptions. - Must be able to work within tight deadlines.So, if you are a Project Manager with retail and restaurant construction experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager - Restaurant/Retail construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Paul Miller,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-restaurant-retail-construction-job-boca-raton-fl-us-176531021.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,,7e38492c519d343e631fe5f5fc480b25
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:19:47:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Multiple openings for Superintendents and Traveling Superintendents with one of the largest Multifamily Developers in the country with a strong project pipeline for the Southern region of the United States. Client DetailsMy key client is a leading multifamily developer that has their own construction arm. They have expanded their book of business, and are well on track to doubling in size over the next two years. The organization have a strong pipeline of projects across North Carolina and the Southeastern region of the United states, ranging from $25m-$50m the company is actively looking for a lead superintendent. DescriptionKey responsibilities for the Multifamily Superintendent will include:Establish and develop professional relationships with on-site staff, providing leadership to themDevelop a thorough understanding of each subcontract, drawings and specificationsIdentify construct-ability issues, design deficiencies, code violations and any other issuesDevelop, refine, and update project schedules to ensure all milestones are identified and trackedCommunicate schedule updates to all subcontractors and vendorsEnsure that subcontractors regularly communicate and enforce their safety programs in order to meet OSHA safety standardsReview the subcontractor's daily progress of work completed and deliver daily reports to the project teamConsistently lead projects through comprehensive completion by establishing aggressive dates and schedulesMentor, train and develop junior employees that are running smaller jobsProfileGround up experience with multifamily is requiredAbility to engage professionally with clients, subcontractors and skilled tradesStrong knowledge of construction terms, reading plans and planning and scheduling conceJob OfferFantastic compensation packageOpportunity to fast track your career and build a team beneath you",Traveling Superintendent- Multifamily Construction Job in Orlando,"Full Time , Employee","Orlando, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/traveling-superintendent-multifamily-construction-job-orlando-fl-us-176554366.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=6,"100,000.00 - 130,000.00 $ /year",,78b8799e0b627de4cb2bc7072b785cec
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:19:32:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Program/Project Manager with Commercial (High Rise OR BioTech OR Healthcare preferred) experience, please read on!We are an Elite Construction team with over 30 years of experience in the Seattle market! We provide construction solutions which include High Rise construction, Multi-Family, and Mixed Use Commercial Projects. We’re more than a commercial construction firm – we are your partner every step of the way. From the genesis of the design process to our clients’ occupancy, we respect the great value that taking the time to build and develop relationships with our colleagues in the architecture and design industry can mean to our shared clients.We hand pick our team for each and every project to ensure our clients are receiving the absolute best project managers, superintendents and sub-contractors in the industry. Each member of our top-notch team brings to the table a unique project background which we pair to each job based on their knowledge and experience. We excel in ground-up construction, and will exceed even the most detail-driven client’s expectations.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Leading growth Company!2. 30+ years experience3. UNMATCHED Funding level!What You Will Be DoingWe are seeking a highly creative; well organized, proactive and energetic candidate to join our team as a Program Manager. The ideal candidate will possess the following skills and experience:This self-starter is responsible for successfully managing pre-development through construction and completion. This candidate must demonstrate strong leadership, organization and time management skills as well as having strong communication and client service skills.Qualifications, Experience & Responsibilities:More than 5+ years of recent Commercial Construction ExperienceProject & Subcontractor quality assurance that construction meets or exceeds the plans, specifications codes, approved shop drawing and submittals.Have a good understanding in Project Cost vs. Budget on all general conditions, clean-up and all cost-plus itemsHave the ability to meet or exceed project objectives in scheduling, sub-compliance, quality, customer satisfaction, safety and profitHave the ability to forecast potential jobsite problems and concerning issuesHave a good understanding in General Contract Terms & ConditionsProject Quality Control and Quality Assurance that construction meets or exceeds the plans, specifications, codes, and approved shop drawingsMust be able to read construction plans, specifications, submittals, shop drawings, latest project changesJob site organizationField records/reports and other documentationWhat You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Construction Program Management- High-rise construction- Project Management- Construction Management- Commercial Projects- Industrial- $30M value or higher is ideal*Some Travel requiredSo, if you are a Program Manager with commercial experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager - Commercial | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Eric Shaner,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-commercial-job-kirkland-wa-us-176451525.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=12,,,c62adf997e27a27a697db3567543fd69
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:19:30:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Davenport,Full Time Employee,"Davenport, IA 52806",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-davenport-ia-us-176575642.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,373fd0766ee210faf36c2b8fb728ebfb
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:19:26:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Columbia,Full Time Employee,"Columbia, MS 39429",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-columbia-ms-us-176574413.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,6154433fdd4672165938ae2a067449bb
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:19:24:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Glennville,Full Time Employee,"Glennville, GA 30427",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-glennville-ga-us-176575711.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,6120a29f460deed18d33a9adf76ff4d1
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:18:59:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a General Superintendent with experience, please read on!Top Reasons to Work with UsWe have been in business since for over 30 years!. We primarily do large commercial, institutional, and multifamily electrical construction projects. We are based in Northeast Florida and our area of operations is the Southeastern U.S. We have a solid reputation within the industry which is the direct result of the hard work and dedication of our employees.What You Will Be Doing-Primary focus to be safety, quality control and labor budgets in that order of importance.-Hire field employees.-Distribute manpower based on project needs.-Communicate schedule status, updates and changes to project team and other trade contractors.-Coordinate and manage job site logistics.-Oversee project quality plan and implement necessary changes.-Meet weekly with the project management team for project status meetings-Enforce quality control polices.-Maintain excellent customer service.-Report directly to the Operations Manager-Oversee and direct all job Superintendents and Foremen.-Supervise the construction of multiple projects.-Manage the project labor budgets.-Develop, document and communicate the work plan regarding changes made in the field.-Maintain a thorough understanding of contract documents to be able to coordinate with other trades, plan ahead and anticipate potential -problems before they arise.-Monitor safety performance and verify safety compliance; act as primary safety representative in the field.-Attend meetings, oversee daily reports and documents.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Commerical Construction- Superintendent- Interview and Selection Process for field talent- Construction Documents and drawings- Scheduling- Electrical Design- OSHA 30- Electric CompanySo, if you are a General Superintendent with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for General Superintendent - Commerical Construction,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Marty Mastro,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/general-superintendent-commerical-construction-superintendent-job-fort-lauderdale-fl-us-176372101.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,,8250bc7a13d4935b68a8a525023d2073
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:18:45:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are now accepting applications for the following positions: • Adjunct Instructors• Assistant Professor, Fire Fighter Program• Assistant Professor, Nursing• Executive Director, Office for Resource Development (Revised and Re-Advertised)• Kitchen Staff, Part-time• Office Assistant, Part-time (Dixie Center)• Staff Assistant II Position details and applications available online at: www.fgc.edu or visit Human ResourcesFlorida Gateway College149 S.E. College PlaceLake City, FL 32025-2007Phone (386) 754-4314Fax (386) 754-4814Email: human.resources@fgc.edu FGC is accredited by the Southern Association ofColleges and SchoolsCommission on Colleges. VP/ADA/EA/EO College in Education and Employment Report","FLORIDA GATEWAY COLLEGE Job Application for ADJUNCT INSTRUCTORS | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name RESOURCE HUMAN Phone 386-754-4314 Address 149 SE COLLEGE PLACELIVE OAK, FL 32025",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/adjunct-instructors-job-lake-city-fl-us-174960387.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=9,,,420157db66773146c84297c3bc5db8d8
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:18:24:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a family-owned company that is strategically structured as an entrepreneurial small team that prides itself on taking a hand’s on approach to each aspect of a project’s acquisition and/or development with a focus on quality work at the best possible pricing.What You Will Be DoingThe Project Manager will be responsible for handling subcontractor identification, monitoring, and contract formulations for new construction projects. The PM will be involved in projects from Pre-Construction through final ‘wrap up’ of a project by working with the project consultants and subcontractors in the value engineering process, subcontractor contracting, management of subcontractors in the field, and supporting of each project’s Superintendent. These projects will be comprised of different real estate types, including multifamily apartments and self-storage. The PM will be responsible for the daily tasks associated with construction progress monitoring and supporting both the office and the field in the needs that arise throughout the project’s life cycle.• Construction Document Management – The PM will assist in the management of project consultants and communication of project timeline expectations.• Project Budgeting – Assist in the development of up-to-date project budgets.• Purchasing – The PM will handle the monitoring and communication with subcontractors during the value-engineering and contract negotiations process in order to organize proposals and identify any discrepancies within them. They will be responsible for contract drafting with the sub-contractors, including Scope of Work, scheduling, etc.• Construction Management – The PM will be assisting in the management of the construction permits, the onsite project Superintendent, sub-contractor coordination, and overall construction activity by being a resource to the field Superintendent on special needs that might arise.• Multiple Project Capability – PM will have multiple construction projects at various stages of the development process. This will require the PM to have multi-tasking capability and the ability to monitor many parallel tasks.What You Need for this Position• At least 5 (five) years of experience as a Project Manager in construction and/or real estate; preferably in multifamily and self-storage projects• Ability to learn new tasks and responsibilities quickly• Ability to be self-motivated and identify work that needs to be completed preemptively• Superior attention to detail and ability to focus on a variety of tasks simultaneously• Proven capabilities in project budgeting, cost management, and scheduling; requires the ability to work proficiently with Microsoft Excel and project scheduling software• Willingness to negotiate and work to identify the best possible pricing and structure for opportunities• Demonstrated track record of integrity and honorable dealings with all partiesSo, if you are a Project Manager with multifamily construction experience, please apply today or directly e-mail your resume to Ben.Black@CyberCoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager - Multifamily Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Ben Black,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-multifamily-construction-job-irvine-ca-us-176447527.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=5,,,1f8ebc135f6e7a712d0c033f92b2f951
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:18:14:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:MUST HAVE COMMERCIAL CONSTRUCTION EXPERIENCE Responsibilities include:Manage all aspects of the project during the construction phase including contractual, planning and budget management. Provide strong leadership and guidance to field and site superintendents.Develop and maintain positive working relationship with the project owners, architects, engineers, clients and others to ensure overall client satisfaction. Initiate and maintain liaison with client/owner/and A/E contracts to facilitate construction activities.Lead and manage various project teams including superintendents, project coordinators, subcontractors and others to ensure all work is completed on time, with budget and in accordance with development and contract agreements.Prepare and submit monthly, weekly progress reports and cost reports.Manage project finances. Review and approve all purchases and ensure Purchase Order/Buy Out process is followed.Coordinate and obtain necessary permits required for commencement of construction, review design documents for conflicts and completeness and participate in developing/negotiating contract agreements.Manage and administer the Construction Phase of the project including reviewing, analyzing and executing Bid Analysis, monitor submittal review and process and monitor Request for Information review and process.Monitor contractor performance. Ensure adherence to terms and conditions of agreements.Coordinate construction efforts through in-house and contract labor for new construction and rebuild projects.Skills/Qualifications:3-5 years of construction experience and/or training in construction management; Hands on commercial construction experience is a must.Strong verbal and written communication skills a must.Proficiency with the Microsoft Office Suite (e.g., Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook).Must be able to multi-task, prioritize, and work with minimal supervision and have strong attention to detail and excellent time management skills to ensure all established deadlines are met. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1093556 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Construction Project Manager - K Job in Orlando,Full Time Employee,"Orlando, FL 32809",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-85k-job-orlando-fl-us-176562126.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c92df58336456f299378c39343ede634
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:18:13:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Mankato, MN | Commercial Construction Superintendent | Full-timeA leading Minnesota design/build commercial contractor, is seeking for experienced Superintendents for our Mankato/Southern Minnesota office. Position includes competitive wages, full benefits, profit sharing, and travel time.Superintendent's role includes:-Coordinating subcontractors and trades-Controlling project schedule and flow-Maintaining a clean and safe jobsite-Managing/supervising Brennan employees and subcontractors-Keep Project Manager informed on all issues or jobsite questions-Attend weekly/bi-weekly Owner/Architect and Subcontractor meetings-General purpose carpentry workWhat You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Commercial Construction- OSHA- ArchitectureSo, if you are a Commercial Construction Superintendent with experience, please apply today or submit resumes to jon.lopez@cyberocoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Commercial Construction Superintendent -k! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jon Lopez,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-construction-superintendent-95k!-job-mankato-mn-us-176573703.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=17,,,1ef6a72c1955b17a5d56fd7242e277da
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:17:38:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details: Superintendent Commercial Construction Salary - Depends on experience My client a growing General Construction company in the MD and NoVA market is seeking to add a Superintendent to their growing team!  Candidates must have experience managing the field operations for ground-up and rehab projects. We are looking for experience with Commercial base building and tilt up construction!  Must be able to handle the scheduling, scope, budget.  Great communication is essential as you will be the liaison  with owners of the project.  Candidates must be able to handle the project from cradle to grave.  My client offers competitive salary and benefits!   Qualified candidates send resumes to Chris Coneys: cc@libertyjobs.com",Superintendent Commercial Construction Job in Front Royal,"Full Time, Employee","Front Royal , VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-commercial-construction-job-front-royal-va-us-176314664.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d4308a020d1ed4a43edb116e5236743c
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:17:38:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a family-owned company that is strategically structured as an entrepreneurial small team that prides itself on taking a hand’s on approach to each aspect of a project’s acquisition and/or development with a focus on quality work at the best possible pricing.What You Will Be DoingThe Project Manager will be responsible for handling subcontractor identification, monitoring, and contract formulations for new construction projects. The PM will be involved in projects from Pre-Construction through final ‘wrap up’ of a project by working with the project consultants and subcontractors in the value engineering process, subcontractor contracting, management of subcontractors in the field, and supporting of each project’s Superintendent. These projects will be comprised of different real estate types, including multifamily apartments and self-storage. The PM will be responsible for the daily tasks associated with construction progress monitoring and supporting both the office and the field in the needs that arise throughout the project’s life cycle.• Construction Document Management – The PM will assist in the management of project consultants and communication of project timeline expectations.• Project Budgeting – Assist in the development of up-to-date project budgets.• Purchasing – The PM will handle the monitoring and communication with subcontractors during the value-engineering and contract negotiations process in order to organize proposals and identify any discrepancies within them. They will be responsible for contract drafting with the sub-contractors, including Scope of Work, scheduling, etc.• Construction Management – The PM will be assisting in the management of the construction permits, the onsite project Superintendent, sub-contractor coordination, and overall construction activity by being a resource to the field Superintendent on special needs that might arise.• Multiple Project Capability – PM will have multiple construction projects at various stages of the development process. This will require the PM to have multi-tasking capability and the ability to monitor many parallel tasks.What You Need for this Position• 5 (five) or more years of experience as a Project manager in construction and/or real estate; preferably in multifamily and self-storage products• Ability to learn new tasks and responsibilities quickly• Ability to be self-motivated and identify work that needs to be completed preemptively• Superior attention to detail and ability to focus on a variety of tasks simultaneously• Proven capabilities in project budgeting, cost management, and scheduling; requires the ability to work proficiently with Microsoft Excel and project scheduling software• Willingness to negotiate and work to identify the best possible pricing and structure for opportunities• Demonstrated track record of integrity and honorable dealings with all partiesSo, if you are a Project Manager with multifamily construction experience, please apply today or directly e-mail your resume to Ben.Black@CyberCoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager - Multifamily Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Ben Black,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-multifamily-construction-job-irvine-ca-us-176447639.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=1,,,f385999d6ec26082a3b9e231e3b676be
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:17:31:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Public Relations intern will be assigned to the PR function of UPS. The intern will support the Public Relations Department, helping increase brand awareness through various opportunities including, media coverage, content creation, special projects, and measuring the success of PR initiatives. Other DutiesAssist with the development of materials (blogs, case studies, fact sheets, press releases, media pitches, briefing documents)Research information for media requests and special projects; respond to media inquiries or send media pitches as directed by the PR managerHelp update UPS Pressroom media kitsWork with the measurement tools to compile reports using data from multiple sources or blog measurementCreate and/or update executive biosUpdate the document management systemLoad, schedule, create blog post and tweet cards, and manage inventory of blog content using Buffer and Twitter toolsResearch and catalog blogs/publications to pitch articles toCreate and edit printable versions of articles for distribution using InDesignPreferred CompetenciesDemonstrate strong creative thinking ability, excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skillsAbility to manage multiple projects and initiatives while maintaining a strong sense of urgencyBe a self-starter with ability to work independently in a cross-functional environment where tight deadlines existBe able to work full time (40 hours a week)MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSA minimum GPA of 3.0 cumulative - PreferredCurrently pursuing a Master’s degree or prior internship experience - Preferred Pursing a degree in Communications or a related field of study - PreferredUPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Public Relations Intern Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA 30328",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-public-relations-intern-job-atlanta-ga-us-174530038.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=5,,Education/Training,28a4fe2f4151504277b4c4bad6cd7b60
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:17:30:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Manager with solid experience in commercial projects from cradle to grave in the greater DC area, this job is for you!We are a growing regional commercial construction company and growing! We are looking for an exceptional Project Manager who is well rounded in managing commercial project developments. This includes previous experience bringing in new clients, bidding, and working on construction buildouts. You will be responsible for the full cycle project administration including working with potential clients, working with the project teams, and overseeing the construction process. If you want to grow in the construction side, we want to hear from you! We are interviewing this week! This is an immediate position, so apply today!Top Reasons to Work with Us- Growing company- Room for growth - Exciting career opportunityWhat You Need for this Position3+ Years of: - project management experience in the commercial space- the bidding and buying process- estimatingNice to haves:- book of businessWhat's In It for You- Competitive compensation - Rich benefits- Room for growthSo, if you are a Project Manager with solid experience in commercial projects from cradle to grave in the greater DC area, this job is for you! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager - Commercial Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Sophia Koo,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-commercial-construction-job-washington-dc-us-176526891.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=6,,,2787b5de2e9007e01fcabd230def0f09
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:17:07:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Leitchfield,Full Time Employee,"Leitchfield, KY 42754",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-leitchfield-ky-us-176575282.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,f43f68c22e2cbee00a701997eee94a26
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:16:55:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Manager / Senior Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill be the owner’s representative on site for transportation construction projectsReport project status, needs and issues to the client engineer dailyProvide oversight and construction inspection on DOT / CFLHD and related transportation projectsPerforms inspection of civil engineering projects in regard to compliance to project plans and specificationsProvides review for RFI, COC’s, CTR’s and submittals for projects and makes recommendations regarding suitabilityUnderstand and interpret plans and specificationsReviews contractor change order requestsReviews / audits contractor health and safety plans, contractor payroll, traffic control and erosion control measures on projectsVerifies quantities for contractor paymentIndentifies non-conformance issues with construction work and helps develop potential resolution of non-conformance issuesDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experienceLicensed Professional Engineer (PE) preferred10+ years transportation construction related experienceRelevant certifications are a plusDemonstrated understanding and experience with DOT and / or CFLHD related infrastructure projectsProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerExperience related to materials testing and inspection of general earthwork and site grading, utilities, retaining walls, structural concrete, bridges, utilities and pipelines, paving (asphalt and concrete) and pedestrian facilitiesThorough knowledge and understanding of federal documentation requirements and contract requirementsStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work within project team environment to help deliver successful projectsAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable. Report",Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure,"Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Manager / Senior Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill be the owner’s representative on site for transportation construction projectsReport project status, needs and issues to the client engineer dailyProvide oversight and construction inspection on DOT / CFLHD and related transportation projectsPerforms inspection of civil engineering projects in regard to compliance to project plans and specificationsProvides review for RFI, COC’s, CTR’s and submittals for projects and makes recommendations regarding suitabilityUnderstand and interpret plans and specificationsReviews contractor change order requestsReviews / audits contractor health and safety plans, contractor payroll, traffic control and erosion control measures on projectsVerifies quantities for contractor paymentIndentifies non-conformance issues with construction work and helps develop potential resolution of non-conformance issuesDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experienceLicensed Professional Engineer (PE) preferred10+ years transportation construction related experienceRelevant certifications are a plusDemonstrated understanding and experience with DOT and / or CFLHD related infrastructure projectsProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerExperience related to materials testing and inspection of general earthwork and site grading, utilities, retaining walls, structural concrete, bridges, utilities and pipelines, paving (asphalt and concrete) and pedestrian facilitiesThorough knowledge and understanding of federal documentation requirements and contract requirementsStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work within project team environment to help deliver successful projectsAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure; Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manager-senior-inspector-on-call-job-los-angeles-ca-us-174612131.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=15,,,e029de1475776e07f1984348c593fc3d
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:16:41:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details:Our client is a Highly Reputable Construction Firm, specializing in the construction of office buildings, shopping malls, retail centers, multifamily, condo, hotel, and similar projects.  We are seeking to assist them in the hiring of Project Managers.  An ideal candidate will have a minimum of the following: Several years of experience on large office buildings Able to work on Site in all conditions Strong Problem Solving skills Highly organized and Strong leadership skills Person of integrity and pride in work OSHA certified Send resumes in word format to: Your resume will be kept completely confidential.  I will not forward your resume until we discuss details regarding both the client and position available Matt Bergin Liberty Personnel mb@libertyjobs.com 484-238-1980 www.linkedin.com/in/mattbergin (Key Words:eningeer, engineering, GC, retail, mini-mall, shopping, shopping center, apartments, apt, mulit-family, multifamily, mixed use, condo, Hotels, High-Rise, construction, superintendent, high-end, bling, penthouse, luxury, MEP, project manager, Safety Management, Analyzing Information, Informing Others, Written Communication, Legal Compliance, Judgment, Integrity, DOT Compliance, Presentation Skills. Microsoft Word & Excel.)Code: liberty123",Construction Project Manager - Commercial Experience - Ground Up Job in Quakertown,"Full Time, Employee","Quakertown , PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-commercial-experience-ground-up-job-quakertown-pa-us-176447707.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3de3d4b18d9d9a6448ae60fb2ca6ce91
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:16:03:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Winchester,Full Time Employee,"Winchester, IN 47394",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-winchester-in-us-176575397.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,b5844eeca9c377f3f61ac206aaec5083
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:16:03:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Fallon,Full Time Employee,"Fallon, NV 89406",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-fallon-nv-us-176574082.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,faba4033d3c6f4883c1537772205a668
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:15:00:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jump-start your career as an Intern with the #1 car rental company in the world! Hertz offers a fun, energetic, fast-paced team environment where no two days are the same. If you are an aggressive individual with an enterprising spirit, you can move into the fast lane at Hertz and advance your career more rapidly than you ever dreamed.An Intern opportunity with Hertz Local Edition will give you the chance to:- Gain marketable skills and learn about all aspects of management, customer service, and sales.- Attain valuable experience reviewing profit statements.- Enjoy a fun, team-oriented workplace.- Earn competitive pay and qualify for incentives.If you are interested in working in an entrepreneurial atmosphere and you want more than just sitting behind a desk all day, we would love to hear from you!Upon earning your degree, you will have the chance to be considered for Management Trainee, Manager Associate, or Assistant Branch Manager.To be eligible for consideration, you must:Be currently enrolled in college and have completed two years of college credit.Be at least 20 years of age and have a valid driver's license with a good driving record.Work hours not to exceed 24 hours per week.  Weekend work hours are required.The successful candidate must demonstrate exceptional leadership and communication skills.All college majors considered.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Manager Trainee Intern Job in Fort Myers,Full Time / Employee,"Fort Myers, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-trainee-intern-job-fort-myers-fl-us-176488929.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,,Education/Training,1ad15c9b0830c03835a29f3254a0c319
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:14:58:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a grant-funded 100%, 12-month position housed on the NOC-Tonkawa campus for a five-year period beginning in FY 2016-2017 and ending in 2020-2021. The position is responsible for collaborating with NOC's Instructional Designer and with NOC's IT Department to provide technical support and assistance in integrating technology within the College's overall IT infrastructure. The Distance Learning Specialist will also oversee the establishment of the six new tribal access sites. The position ends post-grant at the end of five years. Essential duties include: Coordinate QM certification process for targeted online courses. Oversee pilot of targeted online/ITV courses. Lead development/pilots of online courses. Coordinate the acquisition and integration of technology to support project initiatives. Train faculty/staff in delivery of new and redesigned online services. Oversee establishment of pilots at new access sites. Assist Project Manager, External Evaluator and IMT in ongoing evaluation efforts. Assist in institutionalizing new practices, revised online courses, and services. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily including learning and utilizing changing technology. The individual must preserve confidentiality of privileged and sensitive information; use independent judgment and initiative in the planning, organization, and performance of duties; and establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with those contacted in the course of work. Initiative, creativity and teamwork are essential as well as strong organizational, management, customer service, and written and oral communication skills. The ideal candidate will be able to work well with students, faculty, administration, and staff members, as well as external stakeholders and supporters; work well under pressure; meet deadlines, and set priorities while maintaining professional relationships when dealing with individuals; he or she must also value the significance of collaborative inclusiveness with a diverse employee and student population. Subject to satisfactory Fair Credit Reporting Act Disclosure which includes a criminal background check. Hire is also contingent upon Federal agency approval. Weekend and evening work may be required with a flexible 40-hour work week schedule. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, sit, push, lift, haul, pull, reach, carry, grasp, squat or stoop, bend and twist the body while performing essential duties, use hands to operate controls, reach with hands and arms, climb stairs, talk or hear. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. A minimum educational level of a Master's degree in Education or related field. A minimum of 3 years experience in higher education distance instruction or services. Must have demonstrated expertise with Blackboard LMS and Civitas or other comparable data management systems. Familiarity with best practices in distance education, Quality Matters preferred. Must have ability to work collaboratively and have excellent leadership and communication skills. Experience working with disadvantage, low-income, at-risk students preferred. Applicants will need to submit an application which is available online at www.noc.edu/prospective-employee, a letter of application, a resume, Official college transcripts, and three letters of professional recommendation to Northern Oklahoma College, Human Resources, P. O. Box 310, Tonkawa, OK 74653. EEO This job listing brought to you by The Enid News & Eagle",Distance Learning Specialist Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,74653,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/distance-learning-specialist-job-tonkawa-ok-us-176398537.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),836e4795a33f6a649bad47ff33d297bb
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:14:27:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job The Poplarville Special Municipal Separate School District, 302 South Julia Street, Poplarville, MS 39470, is now taking applications for the position of Agriculture and Environmental Science Technology Instructor.Applicants must hold a valid Mississippi Educator License with Endorsement #301 - Vocational Agriculture Education Programs or #302 - Agriculture.Applications will be received at the central office through November 30, 2016. Application may be downloaded at www.poplarvilleschools.org Applicants with questions should contact Dr. Marlene Cole, CTE Director, at 601-795-8343 or mcole@poplarvilleschools.org The Poplarville School District does not discriminate on the basis of Sex, Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Age, or Handicap. Report","Poplarville School District Job Application for Agriculture Science Instructor | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Full Time,"Contact name Dr. Marlene Cole Phone 1-601-795-8477 Address 302 South Julia St.poplarville, MS 39470",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/agriculture-science-instructor-job-poplar-bluff-mo-us-176524183.aspx?mescoid=2500341001001&jobPosition=6,,,aa7e79df4ddcd5f530f4ff1545f5673a
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:14:26:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Early Head Start Teacher To provide education, developmental training and support to infants and toddlers (0-3 years) in a classroom setting using a comprehensive family services approach. Requires minimum of a CDA credential in infant/toddler or AA in Early Childhood. View job description and apply by November 30, 2016 at www.iacommunityaction.org $13.45 per hour with excellent benefits, including IPERS state retirement and possible student loan forgiveness. EOE",Early Head Start Teacher Job in Davenport,Full Time,"Davenport, IA 52803",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/early-head-start-teacher-job-davenport-ia-us-176399342.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,fa8fa583b98b225f1b60dd9fce7f1fa1
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:14:25:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENERAL DESCRIPTION: Oversees programs, staff, and services at each property in an assigned region in accordance with the mission and core values of Mercy Housing and the national program model for Resident Services. JOB FUNCTIONS/RESPONSIBILITIES 1. Implement core program/service components as outlined in the Mercy Housing resident program model and oversees progress toward program outcomes at all assigned sites. 2. Supervise all assigned Resident Services staff in the delivery of programs/services and the evaluation of outcomes according to the Mercy Housing program model. 3. Use program data reported through the Mercy Measurement Initiative as a tool for program supervision and improvement. 4. Locate, develop and maintain networks and partnerships with relevant service providers, community and religious organizations, business and educational institutions and assist Resident Services staff to do the same. 5. Facilitate effective working relationships between Resident Services and Property Management staff. 6. In collaboration with other regional and national Resident Services staff, assist in the development and implementation of Resident Services policies and procedures. 7. Recommend, develop and/or provide Resident Services related training and other staff development resources for site and Resident Services staff. 8. Prepare and submit all required reports in a timely manner. 9. Provide requested information and assistance to Resource Development staff for the preparation of grant proposals, reports and in support of general fundraising efforts. 10. Track and meet grant compliance requirements. 11. Collaborate with housing development staff working on new projects or acquisitions to determine plans for Resident Services and to provide input on physical plan decisions. 12. Lead the annual Resident Services and/or grant budget process for the assigned portfolio. 13. Actively participate in national and regional meetings related to Resident Services and Property Management as necessary. 14. Recruit, orient, manage and evaluate other assigned resident services staff. 15. Participate in Affordable Housing advocacy. Job Requirements:Education: Bachelor degree in a related field preferred. Experience: 3 years prior work experience in community development or social service program development and 2 years in program and staff management required. Must have experience working with seniors and people with disabilities. Abilities: * Able to work collaboratively with others in a team environment, respecting and valuing the perspectives and contributions of others. * Able to develop effective working partnerships with religious, education and community groups and institutions * Able to function effectively in an environment with diverse cultures and multiple perspectives and lines of authority * Must demonstrate a commitment to recognizing residents’ knowledge and experience as a valuable resource  * Able to motivate individuals and groups to actively participate and take leadership in efforts to improve the community and increase self-determination * Able to effectively facilitate meetings and community gatherings * Must demonstrate a high level of verbal, writing and listening skills * Able to perform basic computer functions using Microsoft Word, Excel and Outlook * Must demonstrate knowledge in data collection and analysis. * Able to effectively motivate and supervise other staff  * Able to develop staff skills in support of resident and community programs and initiatives through training and mentoringDivision/Department : Mercy Housing Open Date : 2016-11-04 13:00:00",Resident Services Manager I Job in San Rafael,Full Time,"San Rafael, CA 94901",,http://jobview.monster.com/resident-services-manager-i-job-san-rafael-ca-us-175457347.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=9,,Education/Training,dd8fc2c2841de45e6f283349bc3a230a
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:14:24:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Based near beautiful Rock Island, IL we are an award winning and fast growing General Contractor who has been in business for over 75 years. We offer Industrial Construction, Demolition services, Construction Management, Asphalt Paving, and Commercial Construction services. We are looking for a talented Commercial Construction Engineer or Project Manager for our Commercial Building Division to start ASAP.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Great company culture!2. Fantastic internal growth opportunity!3. Competitive salaries!What You Will Be Doing- You will have involvement with various job site assignments. - Daily responsibilities will include: reviewing installation drawings, dimensional checking, and material compliance.- Prepare and maintain schedules with the assistance of the project superintendent and coordinate scope of work for all trades. - Prepare and execute owner and subcontract labor contracts and preliminary lien notices.What You Need for this Position- General Contracting - Commercial Building Projects- Technical Experience including: installation drawing review, dimensional checking, and material compliance- MEP Systems Coordination- Experience with the following: Revit, Bluebeam, Suretrak, SharePoint is a plusWhat's In It for YouMedicalPrescription DrugDentalVisionHealth Care Reimbursement AccountDependent Care Reimbursement AccountWellness ProgramsEmployee Assistance PlanPaid Holidays and Vacation401(k) with Company matchingPensionSalary Continuation – Short-Term DisabilityLong-Term Disability OptionsEmployee Life InsuranceSpouse & Dependent Life InsuranceSo, if you are a Project Manager or Project Engineer with Commercial Construction experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Commercial Construction Engineer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Daniel Nadruz,Architectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-construction-engineer-job-rock-island-il-us-176529484.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=18,,,b93ef06eb82eef010e7aea860cb1f759
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:14:24:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID 18027BR Job Title Intermediate Construction Representative Job Site Location Illinois - Chicago Home Office Location Chicago, IL Why CDM Smith? CDM Smith provides lasting and integrated solutions in water, environment, transportation, energy and facilities to public and private clients worldwide. As a full-service consulting, engineering, construction, and operations firm, we deliver exceptional client service, quality results and enduring value across the entire project life cycle. Job Description CDM Smith is one of the world's top program management and construction (CM) firms, providing innovative and creative solutions for our clients and assisting them in achieving successful outcomes on their most important programs. We currently provide PM/CM services around the world with over 300 working full-time professionals who use world-class program controls processes, and tools.Our Construction Management team is seeking an Intermediate Construction Representative at a wastewater treatment plant to join our established team of accomplished professionals. As a member of this team, you would contribute to CDM Smith's mission by: Ensuring construction work is being done in accordance with plans and specifications Recommending solutions to complex construction problems Acting as a liaison between contractor and client Implementing directives, instructions, and policies received from home office and//or client Maintaining accurate records of construction via log books, record drawings and preparation of related reports. The objective of this position is to direct, supervise and coordinate resident inspection/engineering activities and acts as client representative at complex construction sites Performing administrative and managerial tasks related to field office and personal procedures Reviewing and approving contractor change orders Minimum Qualifications A.S. or B.S. degree in engineering or construction preferred. Basic knowledge of construction techniques, standards and applications. 8-10 years of related experience. Must have strong client skills and a good understanding of other technical interface activities. Must have valid driver's license Preferred Qualifications Job is at a construction site in which you may face environmental factors such as a continuous climbing, exposure to loud noise, seasonal weather, and driving. Assignment Category Fulltime-Regular Amount of Travel Required 10% EEO Statement We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Agency Disclaimer All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.",Intermediate Construction Representative Job in Chicago,,"Chicago, IL",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/intermediate-construction-representative-job-chicago-il-us-176454104.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=9,,,b0794e358837641b6a6f1b0440aa976b
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:13:59:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job WEST VIRGINIA DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION VACANCIES. An Equal Opportunity Employer. GENERAL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION INSTRUCTOR, ANTHONY CORRECTIONAL CENTER, NEOLA, WV. Holds or qualifies for West Virginia licensure for General Building Construction. SALARY: $39,810.00 - $73,196.40 (2016-2017 Greenbrier County Salary Schedule commensurate with educational level and years of experience). CLOSING DATE FOR RECEIVING OF APPLICATION: November 17, 2016 at 4:00 p.m. Application: https://wvde.state.wv.us/hr/wvde-vacancies/ . Can be mailed or e-mail: wvde.hr@k12.wv.us Attn: Liz Bryant, WV Dept. of Ed., Building 6, Room 264, 1900 Kanawha Blvd., E., Charleston, WV 25305-0330. Phone: 304-558-2702This job listing brought to you by The Register Herald Report","WV DEPT. OF EDUCATION Job Application for GENERAL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION INSTRUCTOR | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Address 25801,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/general-building-construction-instructor-job-east-beckley-wv-us-175490335.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=5,,,0e3c51154f070a5478d6b749c889efa5
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:13:59:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Project Manager with experience, please read on!Located in the Cleveland, OH area we are a family owned and operated Commercial Construction company that has built a solid reputation of providing excellent work on projects ranging from small renovations to complex multi-million dollar design builds.We are currently looking for an experienced Construction Project Manager with preferably a background in commercial concrete work.*****Please apply today if interested or you can send your resume to me directly: rachael.rockefeller@cybercoders.com Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Upward Career Growth 2. Excellent salary and benefits!3. Great working environmentWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Construction Management- Project Management- Commercial Construction- Estimating- Scheduling- Concrete preferred - Customer Management- Excellent communication skillsWhat's In It for You- Competitive salary- Bonuses - Medical- Dental- Vision- 401(k) and more!So, if you are a Construction Project Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager - Concrete | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Rachael Nugent Rockefeller,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-concrete-job-cleveland-oh-us-176530927.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=16,,,701c9c5dacd98331480df789a8cf0c42
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:13:32:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Job ID:  93289 Oldcastle SurePods is the leading manufacturer of fully outfitted, modular building components in North America with over 15,000 bathroom pods and over 100,000 total modules manufactured and installed (security, telecom, educational, bathrooms, shelters). Oldcastle SurePods is part of Oldcastle Inc., the largest building materials company in North America. We are a proud reflection of hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies, and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Position Overview Oldcastle SurePods is searching for a proactive, analytical, and results-oriented Chief Estimator to optimize and leverage project cost projections for our modular bathroom category of products. Reporting directly to the company President in this critical role you will be a driving force in our ability to strategically bid jobs and drive growth in this innovative space. Interfacing with various internal and external partners you will be tasked with developing protocols, procedures, and best practices. In this fast-paced, growing organization those that are highly motivated and driven to results will have the opportunity to succeed and advance. Requirements 360° Partner with demonstrated history of building and maintaining strong relationships with customers, vendors, and internal associates5+ years of demonstrable, successful estimating experience in construction / project environmentsHigh analytical threshold with a passion for details, organization, and planningHigh character, honesty, and work ethicInnovative spirit to work cross-functionally in developing organizational growth concepts and ideas What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! SurePods is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. SurePods is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Sr. Estimator - commercial construction - Orlando,Full Time Employee,"Orlando, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-estimator-commercial-construction-orlando-fl-job-orlando-fl-us-175596676.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=16,,,b1b5d900d6f7212d93ba86b90707880a
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:12:42:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Baraga,Full Time Employee,"Baraga, MI 49908",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-baraga-mi-us-176574639.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=19,,Entry Level,bdd7c5e7504d2646942eeceb041088e0
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:12:20:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a premier Multi-Family construction company offering the finest in general contracting and construction management services. We have completed thousands of units ranging from condominiums and garden-style apartments to complex, high-density developments. We also build assisted living facilities and student housing projects. Seeking Superintendents for multiple locations (Atlanta, Charlotte, Vienna). Candidates must have Multi-family construction experience.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Well established stable company- Track record of success- Competitive pay and performance based incentives- Health insurance and 401k plansWhat You Will Be DoingThorough knowledge of drawings and compliance with project documentsSupervise, coordinate and schedule all work at the siteMaintain an atmosphere of quality and proper job executionSchedule and coordinate surveys and layoutSupervise accuracy and quality of installationsAssist in expediting submittals and shop drawingsLead jobsite subcontractor coordination and safety meetingsScheduling of project activities, phases, access and impact on surrounding areasMaintain positive and pleasant owner/architect/subcontractor/employee relationshipsSafe working environment programWhat You Need for this PositionCollege degree preferred but not required3+ years High Density Multifamily or Commercial Construction experienceSo, if you are a Project Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Superintendent (Multi-family construction) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Kyle Martin,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-superintendent-multi-family-construction-job-charlotte-nc-us-176372353.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=8,,,1a3ddc52e51f30a379807ffc78718597
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:12:20:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Construction Service Company in search for an IMMEDIATE Prevailing Wage Payroll Assistant with HR experience. Necessary skills and experience to be successful in this company: * Full charge Payroll processing - Prevailing Wage * Understanding of State and Federal laws pertaining to sick leave, FMLA and payroll. * We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1093599 Job Experience:,, Working experience in MS Office Outlook, Word, Excel * SAGE software experience is a HUGE PLUS for Cost Accounting * 1 -2 years of experience in Construction industry.Years of Experience Required:",Payroll/HR Coordinator for Construction Co. Job in Escondido,Full Time Employee,"Escondido, CA 92029",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-hr-coordinator-for-construction-co-job-escondido-ca-us-176572766.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),93f59a53b9d203605b671882a2166095
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:12:10:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Construction Dispatcher/Purchasing Agent position In Cypress! Busy, fast-paced general contractor seeking a Dispatcher / Purchasing Agent.Assist dispatcher w/ o Callso Ordering concrete and getting quotes o Coordinating with Project Managers and Field Requires:o Flexible work hourso Bilingual (English/Spanish)o Excellent communication skills If this sound like you APPLY today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1092612 Job Experience:,, construction, data entry, attention to detail,Years of Experience Required:",Construction Dispatcher/Purchasing agent needed in Cypress! $+/hr Job in Cypress,Full Time Employee,"Cypress, CA 90630",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-dispatcher-purchasing-agent-needed-in-cypress!-20-hr-job-cypress-ca-us-176371489.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),02ac09074672aff9aa90945919fda402
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:12:09:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job This is to announce that a vacancy for UniServ Director/Union Representative exists with the Lincoln Education Association in Lincoln, NE. LEA serves the public schools members of Lincoln, NE. To apply for the LEA UniServ position, please submit a letter of application to LEA Executive Director, Dan Studer. The letter must include the following: 1.      A letter addressing the reason why a UniServ/Union Representative position with  LEA is of interest to you.   2.      An up to date resume.3.      A detailed summary of Association/Union activities and involvement.4.      Three current references.  Materials may be sent to:Dan Studer, LEA Executive Director c/o the Lincoln Education Association4920 Normal Blvd. Lincoln, NE 68506 FAX: 402-489-1221 dan.studer@nsea.org Please send items by mail or apply directly through monster.com All materials need to arrive at LEA no later than December 2, 2016, to be considered. Qualifications:1. A Master’s Degree and five years of teaching experience is preferred.2. Association staff experience is preferred.3. Members rights assistance (from counseling to advocacy to grievance processing), political organizing, and negotiations experience is preferred. LEA UniServ Director Job Description(Highlights, Only)The UniServ Director shall:1. Assume primary responsibility for providing member rights services to LEA members. This includes both advocacy with regard to grievances and contract maintenance and providing counsel and services for members at all stages of job security issues. 2. Respond to members’ concerns and questions brought forward by members via e-mail, phone, or other means and keep the President and Executive Director informed of member concerns and questions and the responses given to them.3. Serve as lobbyist for LEA and coordinate the LEA Government Relations program with the state association and serve as the LEA staff liaison to the LEA political action committee coordinating all activities related to the LEA School Board and Legislative Contact Teams with the Executive Director.5. Be available to serve on or advise the LEA Negotiations Team, the LEA/LPS Professional Committee (ProCom), other joint LEA/LPS Committees, and LEA committees as deemed appropriate. 6. Must be able to work well with a small staff and approximately 2400 members with good, timely communication and writing skills.Salary and Benefits:The entry level salary is $72,450. Credit for experience will be considered for placement on the salary schedule. Benefits include health and dental insurance and a contribution to a SEP IRA Retirement Plan. LEA is an Equal Opportunity Employer Report","Lincoln Education Association Job Application for Teacher Union Representative | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Dan Studer Phone 402-489-7500 Address 4920 NORMAL BLVDLINCOLN, NE 68506",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/teacher-union-representative-job-lincoln-ne-us-176098833.aspx?mescoid=1300083001001&jobPosition=9,,,5f4365b638238d5c1c757e1cd4168ae6
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:11:33:02,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  94748Exempt  Oldcastle Precast is the leading manufacturer of precast concrete, polymer concrete, and plastic products in the United States. Our products range from utility vaults, reinforced concrete pipe, catch basins, drainage and septic tanks, to retaining walls, storm shelters, wall panels, concrete barriers, a variety of prestressed concrete products and more.   With more than 80 locations nationwide and 3,000 plus employees, Oldcastle Precast is committed to upholding core values of reliability, quality, and service in cutting edge ways. Summary Plans, directs, and coordinates activities of designated project to ensure that goals or objectives of project are accomplished within prescribed time frame and funding parameters by performing the following duties personally or through subordinate supervisors. Essential Duties and Responsibilities Collaborates in reviewing project proposal or plan to determine time frame, funding limitations, procedures for accomplishing project, staffing requirements, and allotment of available resources to various phases of project.Partners with PM in establishing work plan and staffing for each phase of project, and arranges for recruitment or assignment of project personnel.Works in partnership with PM conferring with project staff to outline work plan and to assign duties, responsibilities, and scope of authority.Collaborates with PM in directing and coordinating activities of project personnel to ensure project progresses on schedule and within prescribed budget.Reviews status reports prepared by project personnel and collaborates with PM in modifying schedules or plans as required.  Prepares project reports for management, client, or others.Reviews and distributes project documents.  Maintain project records and ensure documents are correctly processed and approved.Confers with project personnel to provide technical advice and to help resolve problems.Coordinates project activities with activities of government regulatory or other governmental agencies.Directly supervises aspects of the project and works together with other team members on the project.  Carries out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization's policies and applicable laws.Responsibilities include training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; addressing complaints and resolving problems.Other duties as assigned. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education Bachelor's degree (B. A.) from four-year college or university; or one to two years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America's largest corporations.  We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family.  Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle Precast is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle Precast is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Field Construction Manager I (precast) - Telford,Full Time Employee,"Telford, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-construction-manager-i-precast-telford-pa-job-telford-pa-us-175601142.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=11,,,55a7837691447841b704e071a0f0bdda
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:11:32:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jump-start your career as an Intern with the #1 car rental company in the world! Hertz offers a fun, energetic, fast-paced team environment where no two days are the same. If you are an aggressive individual with an enterprising spirit, you can move into the fast lane at Hertz and advance your career more rapidly than you ever dreamed.An Intern opportunity with Hertz Local Edition will give you the chance to:- Gain marketable skills and learn about all aspects of management, customer service, and sales.- Attain valuable experience reviewing profit statements.- Enjoy a fun, team-oriented workplace.- Earn competitive pay and qualify for incentives.If you are interested in working in an entrepreneurial atmosphere and you want more than just sitting behind a desk all day, we would love to hear from you!Upon earning your degree, you will have the chance to be considered for Management Trainee, Manager Associate, or Assistant Branch Manager.To be eligible for consideration, you must:Be currently enrolled in college and have completed two years of college credit.Be at least 20 years of age and have a valid driver's license with a good driving record.Work hours not to exceed 24 hours per week.  Weekend work hours are required.The successful candidate must demonstrate exceptional leadership and communication skills.All college majors considered.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Manager Trainee Intern Job in Naples,Full Time / Employee,"Naples, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-trainee-intern-job-naples-fl-us-176488932.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=4,,Education/Training,824b1990727a6257978f70632e7df2c6
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:11:32:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Bogalusa,Full Time Employee,"Bogalusa, LA 70427",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-bogalusa-la-us-176575234.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,7330063085a8fdb235d30bf57f7ba6ba
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:11:31:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Korean Immersion Middle School Teacher (Multiple Openings) JOB DUTIES: Responsible for providing instruction to middle school students in Korean language immersion charter school. Specific duties include: (1) developing instructional plans in Korean for all subjects based on established curricula; (2) providing developmentally-appropriate and differentiated instruction; (3) evaluating student learning using multiple forms of assessment; (4) promoting cooperation, assertion, responsibility, empathy, and self-control among students through conflict resolution strategies and developmentally-appropriate behavioral expectations; (5) collaborating with classroom teachers to develop and collaborate on subject standards; and (6) attending staff meetings and serving on staff committees. MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Education; knowledge of Korean culture; and Minnesota 5-8 teaching license or other eligibility to teach. Korean Immersion Teacher JOB DUTIES: Responsible for teaching elementary school students in Korean immersion charter school. Specific duties include: (1) developing instructional plans based on established curricula; (2) providing developmentally-appropriate and differentiated instruction for diverse learners; (3) promoting students' comprehension of Korean; (4) evaluating student learning using multiple forms of assessment; (5) promoting conflict resolution strategies and developmentally-appropriate behavioral expectations; (6) promoting family involvement to support student learning; and (7) participating in school activities and attending staff meetings. MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Education; proficiency of educated Korean speaker; and Minnesota K-6 license. Pre-Kindergarten Teacher - Korean Immersion School JOB DUTIES: Responsible for serving as bilingual Korean-English Pre-K classroom kindergarten teacher in Korean immersion charter school. Specific duties include: (1) developing instructional plans in Korean; (2) providing developmentally-appropriate and differentiated instruction for diverse learners in Korean; (3) promoting comprehension of and interaction in Korean and English; (4) establishing developmentally-appropriate behavioral expectations for students; (4) communicating with families in making educational decisions and promoting family involvement to support student learning; and (5) attending staff meetings and serving on school committees. MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Education; proficiency of educated Korean speaker; and Minnesota K-6 license with pre-K endorsement. APPLICATION PROCEDURES: Send a resume, cover letter, and three letters of recommendation to Brad Tipka at btipka@sejongacademy.org Report",SEJONG ACADEMY Job Application for Teachers - Middle School,"Full Time, Employee","Contact name Not Given Address -ST PAUL, MN 55104",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/teachers-middle-school-pre-k-korean-immersion-job-st-paul-mn-us-176400036.aspx?mescoid=2500377001001&jobPosition=2,,,fb2a46014a64b24b733f129f4e2e69d5
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:11:15:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in Vista, CA is looking for a Project Manager with a background in electrical to manage small to medium commercial electrical projects.Responsibilities for the Project ManagerProject manage small ($100 K) to medium (1 million) commercial electrical projectsResponsible for making decisions in such a way that risk is controlled and uncertainty minimized.Responsible for all assigned projects to ensure budget, schedules, materials, sub-contractors and crews are on target and profitable.Provides guidance and direction to the billing department as needed; e.g. provides schedule of values, answer questions on applied costs or billing requirements per the contract.Requirements for the Project ManagerMinimum 4 years working in the commercial electrical industry actively managing projects Accubid, and scheduling programs preferredA high school diploma or GED equivalent required.BenefitsThis Job is located in Vista, CA -> United States",Project Manager - Construction/Electrical/Commercial Job in Vista,Full Time Employee,"Vista, CA 92081",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-construction-electrical-commercial-job-vista-ca-us-175584496.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=8,"120,000.00 - 130,000.00 $ /year",,473257fede0aca8bfcca902c281fdf3c
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:10:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Clarksdale,Full Time Employee,"Clarksdale, MS 38614",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-clarksdale-ms-us-176574416.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,122f310e12be8b2204de2004004ec33a
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:10:47:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is currently working with a client in New Haven, Connecticut (CT) who is looking to bring on a Validation Specialist. This candidate will conduct or coordinate performance testing and perform or oversee the validation of facilities, equipment, utilities, laboratories, equipment, and processes. The Engineer will be involved in validation monitoring activities, which will include audits with the system owner and review of operational documents. Also involved in development and process validation which includes cleaning, shipping, and continued process verification.Principal Responsibilities:Creating and Reviewing the following for LIMS applications: SOP's Validation Master Plans Requirements and Risk Analysis Traceability Matrix IQ/OQ/PQ protocols and reports Testing Documents and reports Data Migration Plans and reports Test Plans Test Scripts Discrepancy resolutionREQUIREMENTS: 6+ years of experience as validation engineer in the Life Sciences industry 6+ years of experience writing user requirements specification as a validation Engineer 6+ years of experience writing IT/VAL summary reports The candidate should have excellent understanding of 21 CFR Part 11, ICH standards, EMEA, GLP, GCP, GMP, GDP regulations, GAMP Methodologies and general Software Development Standards Ability to review Validation Deliverables Experience validating within GLP (Good Lab Practice) Test Design and Test Development experience Validation of Lab Equipment for Bioanalytical Experience with Watson LIMS would be a plusKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Validation Specialist Job in New Haven,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","New Haven, CT 06501",,http://jobview.monster.com/validation-specialist-job-new-haven-ct-us-176556315.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),400b1ec0604e2a9a52d0fa2da865027c
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:10:27:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Ishpeming,Full Time Employee,"Ishpeming, MI 49849",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-ishpeming-mi-us-176574609.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,1388a16c9652c02bd867487fa4c447ba
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:10:19:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Superintendent with Commercial Construction experience, please apply!Top Reasons to Work with UsBased out of Woodbine, we believe in teamwork and dedication to our work. When you become an employee, you’ll be part of a team that is dedicated to giving our clients the best quality service possible. We always have a need for skilled, reliable individuals to join our family and help us achieve that mission. Benefits include competitive wages, healthcare, vision, dental, 401K, vacation, holidays and a great family atmosphere.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Supervising job sites as a PM or Sup- Commercial Construction- concrete and anchoring in steel fabrication- Safety measures- Reading and interpreting blue printsPreferred Experience:- HVAC- Electrical- Hilti Rack Systems and Roxtec experience We will run a background check and we are a Drug free employer!So, if you are a Construction Superintendent with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Superintendent - Commercial Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Sam Velasquez,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-commercial-construction-job-woodbine-md-us-176447768.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=19,,,269dad13f85d211b389a8f38e5120510
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:10:18:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"CCE Healthcare Department Head(State Title: AG45 – Training and Development Director II)                The Healthcare Department Head in the Corporate and Community Education Division of TCTC specifically manages health-related certification training in many areas including Certified Nursing Assistant, Phlebotomy, EKG, Health Systems, Medical Coding, and Basic EMT. Anticipated Hiring Range:  $48,622 - $67,108 Minimum Qualifications:  Bachelor’s Degree and 4 years related training and development experience. Preferred Qualifications:   Experience as a Registered Nurse and/or a candidate with minimum of 2 years of programmatic/administration experience in Healthcare or Healthcare Education role. Close Date:  11/13/2016 For more information and to apply visit http://jobs.tctc.edu  (Req# 16E2004).  Tri-County Technical College is an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to creating a learning environment that fosters inclusion, respect for differences and cultural awareness. View our 10 year vision for our challenging future as a Community College that is Transforming Lives, Shaping the Community at our website: www.tctc.edu  You can play a visible part in the future of our College, have the ability to collaborate across the College, work and think strategically, and positively impact the lives and success of students and our community in dramatic fashion.    Our benefits include: -State benefits of health insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, life and dependent life insurance, long term care insurance, supplemental long term disability, MoneyPlus-The South Carolina Retirement System, Optional Retirement Plans, Deferred Compensation Program-Paid Faculty Non-work days or Annual Leave, Sick Leave, and Holidays-The College closes at 2pm on Fridays-Professional Development Opportunities-Wellness Center located at the Pendleton Campus-Unique collaborative learning environment on beautiful campuses located in upstate of South Carolina The Upstate of South Carolina is home to more than 200 international companies, the I-85 ""boom belt,"" and a vibrant quality of life, it's easy to see why the Upstate is one of the fastest growing regions in the Nation. The College is nestled in the foothills of the scenic Blue Ridge Mountains, and Atlanta, GA and Charlotte, NC are each only two hours away, while South Carolina's coastal towns and beaches are three to four hours travel. The Tri-County Technical College service area includes Anderson, Oconee, and Pickens counties. The College is also part of a state-wide system of sixteen technical colleges. More than 7,000 students enroll at the College each year in more than 70 major fields of study, including engineering technology, industrial technology, business, computer and information technology, public service, human services, healthcare, and university transfer programs. Developmental courses are offered for those who need to brush up on basic academic skills. The Continuing Education Division also offers personal and professional development non-credit classes in technical, business, healthcare, and personal interest areas to more than 10,000 community members each year. The main campus is located in historic Pendleton, South Carolina. The College currently has two branch campuses in the nearby cities of Anderson, Easley, and Seneca. ",CCE Healthcare Department Head Job in Pendleton,Full Time Employee,"Pendleton, SC 29670",,http://jobview.monster.com/cce-healthcare-department-head-job-pendleton-sc-us-175547640.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=15,,Education/Training,19177469ee48cb8b41526965acac35dc
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:10:09:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Graphic Designer IThe Institute for Teaching & Learning Excellence (ITLE) is accepting applications for a Senior Graphic Designer. Minimum qualifications include: Bachelor's degree in computer graphic or related field of study; 3 years related experience; advanced skills with Macintosh computers in creating graphics, publications, illustrations, and web design. full job description and duties go to https://jobs.okstate.edu/ Apply online at https://jobs.okstate.edu/ or for assistance go to Oklahoma State Human Resources, 106 Whitehurst Stillwater OK. OSU is an AA/EEO/E-Verify Employer.This job listing brought to you by The Stillwater Newspress",Senior Graphic Designer I Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,74078,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-graphic-designer-i-job-stillwater-ok-us-175686395.aspx?mescoid=2700410001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a151d283b0df4046cc656661ef108fe8
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:09:57:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jump-start your career as an Intern with the #1 car rental company in the world! Hertz offers a fun, energetic, fast-paced team environment where no two days are the same. If you are an aggressive individual with an enterprising spirit, you can move into the fast lane at Hertz and advance your career more rapidly than you ever dreamed.An Intern opportunity with Hertz Local Edition will give you the chance to:- Gain marketable skills and learn about all aspects of management, customer service, and sales.- Attain valuable experience reviewing profit statements.- Enjoy a fun, team-oriented workplace.- Earn competitive pay and qualify for incentives.If you are interested in working in an entrepreneurial atmosphere and you want more than just sitting behind a desk all day, we would love to hear from you!Upon earning your degree, you will have the chance to be considered for Management Trainee, Manager Associate, or Assistant Branch Manager.To be eligible for consideration, you must:Be currently enrolled in college and have completed two years of college credit.Be at least 20 years of age and have a valid driver's license with a good driving record.Work hours not to exceed 24 hours per week.  Weekend work hours are required.The successful candidate must demonstrate exceptional leadership and communication skills.All college majors considered.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Mgmt Trainee Intern Job in Fort Myers,Full Time / Employee,"Fort Myers, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/mgmt-trainee-intern-job-fort-myers-fl-us-176486872.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Education/Training,614ca39165876037f493721f52189148
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:09:39:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Would you like to work for one of the most progressive companies in the career education industry? Are you excited about giving committed students the skills they need to be successful? Then consider joining us at the Golf Academy of America.Minimum Job Requirements:Bachelor’s degree or diploma in Culinary Arts or two years documented work experience as food beverage director/manager.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities Required:Ability to evaluate, design, and implement curriculum, testing, and/or teaching methodologies. Ability to make administrative and procedural decisions and judgments on sensitive, confidential issues. Ability to work effectively with diverse populations. Ability to communicate effectively, both orally and in writing. Knowledge of teaching methods, curriculum, and education programs. Teaching and facilitation skills. Ability to teach and control the behavior of students. Knowledge of academic and/or vocational education curricula. Knowledge of and ability to apply relevant current education methodologies and techniques.Ability to gather data, compile information, and prepare reports.             Preparing students for a future in golf is what the Golf Academy of America (GAA) is all about. Founded as San Diego Golf Academy in 1974, GAA is the oldest and largest two-year golf management and instructional college in the United States. Today, there are campuses in five of the country's top golf capitals:Golf Academy of America in Dallas, Texas Golf Academy of America in Myrtle Beach, S.C. Golf Academy of America in Orlando, Fla. Golf Academy of America in Phoenix, Ariz. Golf Academy of America in San Diego, Calif. We keep education relevant by employing staff and instructors with real-world experience in the field, who bring their career backgrounds to the classroom. Our programs are continually assessed by faculty, staff and members of the business and education communities to help ensure students studies align with their career goals. GAA provides the practical skills students need to be successful in dynamic environmental careers and a student experience unparalleled by other golf schools. ",Instructor - Adjunct - Food and Beverage Job in Myrtle Beach,"Part Time, Employee","Myrtle Beach, SC",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/instructor-adjunct-food-beverage-job-myrtle-beach-sc-us-175782519.aspx?mescoid=3500619001001&jobPosition=18,,Education/Training,68704501968fec809ad2f3dd0cba5d58
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:09:23:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a well respected general contractor in the Seattle marketplace that is looking for and Assistant Superintendent to join our team. You will be surrounded by a great team and have a real chance for advancement. You will be well compensated, get to work on great projects, and really enjoy coming to work every day.What You Will Be Doing- Support the superintendent with the setup and management of the daily activities of an assigned project resulting in an on-time, profitable completion that is of award winning caliber.- Support responsibility for safety on the project. Success is defined as including zero safety incidents, client referrals resulting in repeat business opportunities, projects completed on schedule with a project gross margin which meets or exceeds target, and project quality that is worthy of an award nomination.- Helping to manage projects within our base building line of business.- Assist in developing the site plan including; worker and public safety measures; site security; site and office staging, temporary water and power; truck routing (inbound and outbound); traffic control and street use; crane selection and location; hoist selection and location when applicable; plan and develop logistics for and overall personnel and material movement within and around the site; sanitation and communication provisions; T.E.S.C. provisions and permits.- Assist with developing and maintaining the project master schedule.- Develop and maintain labor projections including field supervision and employed trades people.- Help to identify labor and skills required and participate in the selection and staffing of jobsite roles and responsibilities.- Help to identify opportunities for improvement and plan, manage, and implement associated changes as necessary throughout the project.- Maintain complete and accurate daily logs for the project.- Establish and maintain regularly scheduled daily and weekly project team meetings as appropriate for the project.What You Need for this Position-Bachelor's Degree in Engineering, Construction Management or related field, or equivalent combination of education and/or experience in a related area. - 4+ years of experience applying construction experience specific to commercial construction. People with specialization in high-rise commercial office, high-rise residential, healthcare, or real complex projects preferred.If you are a assistant superintendent with experience in high rise commercial and residential buildings or healthcare projects, we need to talk. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Assistant Superintendent - Commercial Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Paul Miller,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-superintendent-commercial-construction-job-seattle-wa-us-176450709.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=14,,,9a4f9cd501f569bae81f5060324eef21
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:09:22:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job I have an owner/builder client that specializes in new Multifamily projects in California and they are currently looking to add to their Senior Management team.This company builds a diverse set of multifamily projects that include market rate, affordable rate, and student housing. This is a successful and thriving company with a very healthy project pipeline.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Competitive Compensation- Health/Dental/Chiropractic Benefits- Life Insurance- 401(k)- Generous Vacation Time- Paid holidays- Discretionary BonusWhat You Will Be Doing* Primary job responsibilities will be related to the preconstruction management of multifamily projects throughout CA* Preconstruction Work* On site and off site managing of construction project* Assist in the supervision of employees and materials* Budgeting and forecasting* Monitor project quality control* Permitting Process* Subcontract Bidding* Construction Scheduling* Construction Job Tracking - Conception through Finish* Display a positive attitude and maintains a co-operative working relationship with the client, vendors, subcontractors and employeesWhat You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Preconstruction Management (Required)- Multifamily Construction (Required)- Ground up Construction (Required)- Direct Owner/Builder Construction Experience (Required)- California Construction Experience (Required)- Podium Mixed Use- Scheduling- PermittingWhat's In It for You- Established company that rewards success- Great culture and working environment- Stability and career developmentIf you are a qualified candidate with the requisite experience, you should apply ASAP or email your qualifications and/or resume in MS Word format directly to Christian@CyberCoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Pre-Construction Director at Reputable Multifamily Builder | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Christian Caravia,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/pre-construction-director-at-reputable-multifamily-builder-job-agoura-hills-ca-us-176372178.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=12,,,bb2fea2c60d7834823c40e4d28b9b34b
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:09:20:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Click To ViewHONEOYE CENTRAL SCHOOL DISTRICT is currently seeking candidates to fill the following position:Full Time Teacher Assistant Teacher Assistant Certification preferred. Application deadline is December 2, 2016Please send letter of interest, resume, and completed application which can be found on line at:www.honeoye.org To Jennifer Green Honeoye Central School PO Box 170, Honeoye, NY 14471 (585) 229-4125 • EOE  $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report","Honeoye Central School Job Application for Teaching Assistant | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Green Jennifer Address PO Box 170Honeoye, NY 14471",All,http://jobview.monster.com/teaching-assistant-job-honeoye-ny-us-176348793.aspx?mescoid=2500400001001&jobPosition=11,,,bbcb6955c6e07df29c06300185051d36
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:08:54:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"***Multiple Positions Available***GENERAL FUNCTIONUnder the supervision of a school principal, department director and/or classroom teacher, the Instructional Assistant Ill FT assists with the physical, emotional and educational needs of students with disabilities. The incumbent implements Individualized Education Plans (IEP) and provides input into establishing the IEP. Collects and provides educational data to the teacher for IEP development and conduct school/classroom activities as directed. Assists in training part-time instructional assistants as needed.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONSAssist with the physical, emotional and educational needs of students with disabilities.Assist with implementation of the student's IEP, including implementing behavior management plans. Provide information to the teacher as appropriate in the development of IEP’s.Assist the teacher in adapting lesson plans to meet the needs of individual students.Tutor students individually or in groups under the direction of the teacher.May perform one or more of the following specific duties as assigned (e.g.; instruct students by following lesson plans in the absence of the teacher; toileting needs, including diapering; feeding students, including G-Tube feeding; supervise students on the playground, field trips or job site; assist students in the use of technology, including computers, braille notes, communication devices, adaptive devices, tablets or other devices; assist students with mobility and adaptive physical equipment; perform testing and assessment; assist in administering medications or other medical assistance to students after extensive training; assist students on/off buses; intervention with, and management of, students who may be aggressive, self-abusive, angry, emotional, have infectious diseases and/or have been subjected to pemonal physical abuse; clean and disinfect classroom, equipment and other items as needed; teach life skills; swim with students; etc.).Assist classroom teacher by preparing materials/facilities for classroom instruction as directed (e.g. make copies, data collection, assemble materials and/or assist the teacher with general clerical duties).Maintain effective and positive communication with teachers, students, patrons, volunteers and District employees.Maintain confidentiality of student or District information by following district policies regarding confidential information.Assist in training part-time instructional assistants.This position requires punctual and regular daily attendance.NON-ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONSOther duties as assigned.QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTSIncumbent must be fingerprinted and clear a criminal background check.  Minimum Job Qualifications:Requires High School diploma, GED or equivalent ae reviewed by the Department of Human Resources.  Verification may be required.Requires one year of prior successful work experience in working with individuals withdisabilities.Within one year of hire, incumbent will be required to complete three courses (six hours) designed to provide training in working with students with disabilities. This training is a condition of employment.Completion of two project-based blended classes (10 hours) and MANDT certification preferred.Assistants working in a Title I school must be Highly Qualified and provide proof to Human Resources prior to working in a Title I school.Requires strong interpersonal skills. May have interaction with parents, staff, District administrators and other professionals regarding specific student needs (e.g., psychologists, physical therapists, speech therapists, etc.).Must demonstrate competence in reading, writing and math.Requires ability to exercise emotional control in difficult situations.Requires ability to solve a variety of problems relating to individual student needs and behaviors. Problem solving is guided by policies and procedures set by administration and the licensed teachers.Requires basic computer technology skills, including Microsoft Office products.Requires effective problem solving, organizational, multi-tasking and time management skills. Knowledge of basic First Aid preferred. Requires ability and willingness to assist students withmedical issues or procedures with appropriate training.Must be self-motivated and proactive in completing tasks with minimal direction.Machines, Tools Equipment Used:Incumbent may be trained to operate a variety of Special Education equipment (e.g. office equipment, therapeutic equipment, adaptive devices, wheelchairs, physical education equipment, medical equipment lifts, language board and electronic communication devices, etc.).Physical Requirements — Not limited to the following:Frequent, continuous standing and sitting (chair and floor), walking, climbing stairs, talking and awkward positions, to/from ground without upper extremity support.Occasional balancing on slick surfaces, gripping 50 pounds, pinching 10 pounds, sustained bending, squatting, kneeling, sustained bending, stooping and running.Occasional push/pull 100+ pounds, isometric lifting 20 pound static hold (5-8 Min.), single-arm lifting of up to 20 pounds to shoulder level, floor to waist lift up to 75 pounds and awkward lift up to 75 pounds.Occasional hearing, near/far visual acuity and depth perception.",Instructional Assistant III - Special Education (Multiple Positions) Job in West Jordan,Full Time Employee,"West Jordan, UT 84084",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/instructional-assistant-iii-special-education-multiple-positions-job-west-jordan-ut-us-175458494.aspx?mescoid=2500401001001&jobPosition=8,,Education/Training,ec6ac720c96d3aac807703f248325695
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:08:54:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Customer Engineer in Minneapolis, Minnesota (MN).Essential Functions: Perform on-site installations, break fix, customer training, and configuration Diagnose and resolve problems related to hardware, software and workflow on customer sites Perform on-site customer training for the operation and proper maintenance Proactively and reactively look for solutions to prevent problems from occurring at customer sites Perform machine-specific calibrations on customer sites including voltage uniformity tests, color registration and print head calibration Educate customers on proper settings, file formats, etc. in graphics software for compatibility Analyze customer workflows and advise them on improvements that can be made to increase efficiency Perform maintenance and troubleshooting on equipment Prepare weekly reports for management regarding visits to customer sites and work performed thereREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Mechanical/Electronic Engineering and/or Associates degree in a related field 2+ years' experience with digital printing equipment or in the digital printing industry High computer literacy (PC required, Macintosh a plus) Strong customer support skills, effectively dealing with conflicts Excited about technology and has the desire to learn new tasks and technologies Working knowledge of industry standard prepress/design software preferred Ability to work independently on assigned tasks Customer service oriented, punctual and reliable Strong communication skills both verbal and written Ability to perform while under high-pressure situations Ability to manage complex customer problemsKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Customer Engineer Job in Minneapolis,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Minneapolis, MN 55401",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-engineer-job-minneapolis-mn-us-176492294.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f1b495fae504285e8070f47ceeb0cb6e
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:08:44:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Wedgewood is currently seeking a full-time Project Manager Manager to join our team in Tampa! Our company specializes in the purchase, rehab, and resale of single family homes (acquiring and selling REOs, foreclosures, and other distressed properties). Founded in 1985, Wedgewood has grown into a diversified, vertically integrated company, expanding its business footprint to also include  non-performing notes, property management, lending, home warranty, brokerage, escrow, and more. As the industry leader in the western United States, we are experiencing significant national growth, and seeking candidates that are capable of thriving in a fast-paced environment. The Project Manager oversees rehab projects - exceptional organization and time management skills are a must as this position works under minimal supervision. This is an exciting opportunity for candidates who have a particular interest in the flip industry! Job responsibilities include, but are not limited to:Drive-by properties (single family) to conduct inspections prior to acquisitionDetermine rehab plan/best exit strategy for each property; exhibit confidence and make decisions independently Work with our Interior Design team to establish design concept for each projectManage about 30 single family renovation projects at any given time Select and manage contractors/subcontractors/vendors; consistently pursuing and cultivating additional relationships Collect estimates, submit bidsRegularly drive inventory to conduct property checks throughout the Inland Empire area to ensure projects remain on schedule Work with city inspectors/planners and HOA to clear violations and permitsInterface with upper management as neededCommunicate with other departments to ensure properties are moved through the pipeline quickly, correctly and efficientlyThe most important traits for a successful candidate are: intelligence, diligence, attention to detail, problem solving skills and a positive attitude.Other Requirements/Qualifications:2+ years experienceBachelor’s Degree strongly preferred; Construction Management or related major is a plus Experience with single family remodels Valid driver’s licenseAptitude with computers and mobile devices, i.e. iPads, etc.Ability to work at a fast pace under minimal supervisionAbility to cultivate relationships with contractors/subcontractorsStrong attention to detailWedgewood offers a competitive salary as well as excellent benefits which include medical, 401k, employee investment programs, vacation properties, and other unique perks.",Construction Project Manager Job in Tampa,"Full Time, Employee","Tampa, FL 33601",Real Estate/Property ManagementConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-job-tampa-fl-us-176547601.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=17,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,92226b6f0cf81e09a051dddb81b01942
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:08:29:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jump-start your career as an Intern with the #1 car rental company in the world! Hertz offers a fun, energetic, fast-paced team environment where no two days are the same. If you are an aggressive individual with an enterprising spirit, you can move into the fast lane at Hertz and advance your career more rapidly than you ever dreamed.An Intern opportunity with Hertz Local Edition will give you the chance to:- Gain marketable skills and learn about all aspects of management, customer service, and sales.- Attain valuable experience reviewing profit statements.- Enjoy a fun, team-oriented workplace.- Earn competitive pay and qualify for incentives.If you are interested in working in an entrepreneurial atmosphere and you want more than just sitting behind a desk all day, we would love to hear from you!Upon earning your degree, you will have the chance to be considered for Management Trainee, Manager Associate, or Assistant Branch Manager.To be eligible for consideration, you must:Be currently enrolled in college and have completed two years of college credit.Be at least 20 years of age and have a valid driver's license with a good driving record.Work hours not to exceed 24 hours per week.  Weekend work hours are required.The successful candidate must demonstrate exceptional leadership and communication skills.All college majors considered.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Mgmt Trainee Intern Job in Fort Myers,Full Time / Employee,"Fort Myers, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/mgmt-trainee-intern-job-fort-myers-fl-us-176486511.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=11,,Education/Training,318874244aff22b9ea96ae178088e2b5
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:08:16:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Project Manager with Healthcare experience, please read on!With offices throughout the Southeast, we are a top ENR contractor that has become one of America's most influential contractors, a leader in sustainable construction, and a top design-builder. Due to exponential growth, we are currently seeking an experienced Healthcare Construction Project Manager to add to our team in Greenville, SC. The ideal candidate will have 5+ years of experience as a PM on Healthcare Projects.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Competitive Salary- Full Benefits- PTO- Car Allowance- Cell Phone Allowance- So much more!What You Need for this PositionRequirements: - 5+ years of experience as a PM on Healthcare ProjectsSo, if you are a Construction Project Manager with Healthcare experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager - Healthcare Projects | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Mason Carrico,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-healthcare-projects-job-greenville-sc-us-176449698.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=18,,,ea809e72f953ec41b80d5f1606f01208
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:08:15:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Superintendent - Civil Construction with experience, please read on! We were incorporated in September 2005 in the state of Florida. Our primary work consists of excavation, underground utilities, sewer, water and reclaimed, storm drainage, road paving, striping and street signage for residential, commercial, and apartment communities. We do not construct buildings, but we do offer our services for townhouses, apartments, timeshares, condos, hotels, roads, DOT, and several other types of work. We pride ourselves on providing quality work in all jobs that we are involved in.Top Reasons to Work with UsWe offer competitive pay packages including 401K, Benefits, Paid Vacation.What You Will Be DoingRole and ResponsibilitiesProvide leadership and oversight of designated projects to ensure that goals and objectives of projects are accomplished within prescribed time frame and budget parameters by performing the following duties through subordinate project superintendents.Reviews and enforces project proposal and project schedule.Assists in plan to ensure time frames are met and project budgets are maintained.Determines by observation if staffing requirements are sufficient and assists in allotment of available resources between other CSD projects.Determines project superintendent for projects and assists in assignment of project site personnel.Confers with project staff to ensure a work plan has been outlined which assigns duties, responsibilities, and scope of authority to best meet schedule and budget.Ensures project progress is on schedule and within prescribed budget.Review daily reports, field conditions, manpower, short term schedules, progress and conditions impacting the project.Review field as-builts to ensure accuracy with plans and specifications.Quality Control all operations of construction to ensure compliance with plans and specifications.Maintain good relationships with project site personnel as well as ensuring communication with client, owner representatives, engineer, and local authorities.Monitor labor time, equipment and material.Authorize any overtime hours required.Ensure proper coordination with equipment manager.Assist with problem solving.Communicate and enforce at all times safety and health management programs.Demonstrate commitment to an Injury-Free Environment through own actions and mentoring of others.Notify safety team immediately of any incidents, accidents, or insubordination.Ensure daily sub-contractor meetings are occurring.Attend when able client project meetings to ensure communication between project superintendent and client.Look for ways to improve and promote quality.What You Need for this PositionQualifications and Education RequirementsOSHA certification, Trench safety, Confined space, MOT, First aid / CPR Certification.Required SkillsComputer knowledge and efficiency.Broad understanding of industry.Familiarity with requirements of drawings and specifications and with terms and conditions of contracts and purchase orders.Strong written and verbal communication skills.Good math skillsStrong management skills.Functions effectively as part of a team.Exhibits strong leadership qualities.Ability to maintain discretion and confidentiality at all times.Delegates work appropriately.Strong decision making / problem solving skills.Excellent time management and organizational skills.Must be cost conscious.So, if you are a Superintendent - Civil Construction with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Superintendent - Civil Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Aaron Wilks,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-civil-construction-job-orlando-fl-us-176317387.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=14,,,322c1bfd2b7e993b3ba2c753f20ac305
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:08:11:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Health Educator and Alcohol & Other Drugs CoordinatorFor position details and application process, https://jobs . plattsburgh.edu View Current Openings^SUNY College at Plattsburgh is a fully compliant employer committed to excellence through diversity.This job listing brought to you by The Press-Republican",Health Educator and Alcohol & drugs Coordinator Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,12901,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/health-educator-alcohol-drugs-coordinator-job-plattsburgh-ny-us-176398456.aspx?mescoid=2100319001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d8465b26b86bba17e37a211747d7ce62
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:07:46:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a stable and growing company located in beautiful Seattle, WA. We are a leader in the industry and are experiencing record breaking growth. We are looking for a Project Manager that enjoys the freedom of decision making to get the job done. We value our employees and understand that you need to be in complete control of the project, in order to work at your full potential. All of our projects are in the Pacific Northwest. We specialize in renovation of multi-family, commercial and hospitality builds.Top Reasons to Work with Us-Excellent Compensation Package-Equity in the Company-Great Support System in place-Work Exclusively on $40 million + Commercial ProjectsWhat You Will Be DoingManage and control multiple projects in various stages of development.Lead and participate in business development efforts. Lead project pursuits in partnership with marketing.Direct estimating and preconstruction efforts for projects.Develop and mentor skilled management and technical staff.Candidates must have the minimum qualifications:10 to 15 years of general contracting project management experience with proven performance on negotiated GMP commercial building projects.A bachelor’s degree in construction or engineering.Demonstrated experience leading and mentoring teams.Experience leading preconstruction and estimating efforts.Creative problem solving skills, flexibility and leadership.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- 10+ years Project Mgmt exp in commercial building- Preconstruction- Commercial Construction- leadership- Project Management- Commercial High Rise- GMP- Estimating- experience in construction project schedulingWhat's In It for YouExcellent compensation, including benefits, bonus and time off Stable company that is growing and offers growth potentialFreedom to make decisions to get the job done - no corporate red tape around hereSo, if you are a Senior Project Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Senior Project Manager - Commercial Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Daniel Nadruz,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-manager-commercial-construction-job-seattle-wa-us-176528253.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=20,,,d0b495d2ec64f65d46c2fe247b5dc6d2
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:07:08:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a well-respected Commercial Construction firm that has been in business for over 30 years. As our company continues to grow we are in need of a Project Engineer for our LA office. Our company has a reputation for excellence, we treat our employees well and have strong tenure.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Excellent company culture with long term employees2. Competitive salaries and bonuses3. Medical, dental, PTO, vacation, retirement and more!What You Will Be DoingPreparing complete, accurate and timely submittal logs.Accountable for receiving approved submittals from A&E.Manage RFI logs and distribute responses.Assist project team in managing punch list.Assist Project Manager by preparing all necessary back up relating to change requests.Responsible for timely completion of all required project close-out documents per contract.Distribute contract documents to subcontractors.Schedule all required construction meetings with required personnel, subcontractors, architects and owners.Take accurate and complete meeting minutes and distribute.Attend Owner/Architect pre-bid, project and closeout meetings.Solicit subcontractors and suppliers for proposals.Prepare correspondence with Owner, Architect, Engineers, Subcontractors, Suppliers, etc.Proactively manage project to achieve quality, schedule, budget and safety.Maintain customer relations and conduct project meetings.Perform quantity take off’s.What You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 years of experience and knowledge of:- Bachelor's degree in Construction Mgmt or related- LEED certification a plus- Ability to read blueprints and shop drawings- Must be a leader.- Possess strong negotiation, organizational and problem solving skills.- Display strong written and oral communication skills and employ effective listening skills.- Strong ability to problem solve and make decisive decisions in a timely and efficient manner.- Tactful and mature demeanor with well developed interpersonal skills including the ability to work well with diverse personalities.So, if you are a Project Engineer with 3+ years of commercial construction experience, please send your resume to leesa.purtzer@cybercoders.com today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Engineer - Commercial Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Leesa Purtzer,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-commercial-construction-job-los-angeles-ca-us-176314805.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=16,,,0ced87cc4e84463e834a1dcac34642af
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:07:07:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Manager / Senior Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill be the owner’s representative on site for transportation construction projectsReport project status, needs and issues to the client engineer dailyProvide oversight and construction inspection on DOT / CFLHD and related transportation projectsPerforms inspection of civil engineering projects in regard to compliance to project plans and specificationsProvides review for RFI, COC’s, CTR’s and submittals for projects and makes recommendations regarding suitabilityUnderstand and interpret plans and specificationsReviews contractor change order requestsReviews / audits contractor health and safety plans, contractor payroll, traffic control and erosion control measures on projectsVerifies quantities for contractor paymentIndentifies non-conformance issues with construction work and helps develop potential resolution of non-conformance issuesDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experienceLicensed Professional Engineer (PE) preferred10+ years transportation construction related experienceRelevant certifications are a plusDemonstrated understanding and experience with DOT and / or CFLHD related infrastructure projectsProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerExperience related to materials testing and inspection of general earthwork and site grading, utilities, retaining walls, structural concrete, bridges, utilities and pipelines, paving (asphalt and concrete) and pedestrian facilitiesThorough knowledge and understanding of federal documentation requirements and contract requirementsStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work within project team environment to help deliver successful projectsAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable. Report",Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure,"Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Manager / Senior Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill be the owner’s representative on site for transportation construction projectsReport project status, needs and issues to the client engineer dailyProvide oversight and construction inspection on DOT / CFLHD and related transportation projectsPerforms inspection of civil engineering projects in regard to compliance to project plans and specificationsProvides review for RFI, COC’s, CTR’s and submittals for projects and makes recommendations regarding suitabilityUnderstand and interpret plans and specificationsReviews contractor change order requestsReviews / audits contractor health and safety plans, contractor payroll, traffic control and erosion control measures on projectsVerifies quantities for contractor paymentIndentifies non-conformance issues with construction work and helps develop potential resolution of non-conformance issuesDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experienceLicensed Professional Engineer (PE) preferred10+ years transportation construction related experienceRelevant certifications are a plusDemonstrated understanding and experience with DOT and / or CFLHD related infrastructure projectsProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerExperience related to materials testing and inspection of general earthwork and site grading, utilities, retaining walls, structural concrete, bridges, utilities and pipelines, paving (asphalt and concrete) and pedestrian facilitiesThorough knowledge and understanding of federal documentation requirements and contract requirementsStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work within project team environment to help deliver successful projectsAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure; Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manager-senior-inspector-on-call-job-elko-nv-us-174612003.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=16,,,a1d434c441889f989e9e0a21c8d159ed
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:06:29:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Time Solutions is currently seeking a Senior Training Specialist to provide technical training support to DOE/NNSA's Livermore site. Specifically, this individual will support the FTC (Federal Technical Capability) Program driven training areas, which may include: Technical Qualification Program, Safety System Oversight, Facility Representative, and Senior Technical Safety Manager programs.Work location is Livermore, CA. FT, salaried, exempt position. DOE -Q or Top Secret (unexpired) required. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: (Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position) · Provide technical and training subject matter expertise support to the FTC Panel when requested. · Perform administrative tasks such as preparing reports, providing information, producing copies, preparing presentations, and producing budget data and cost estimates.· Distribute correspondence to TQP candidates regarding recertification requirements and qualification standards.· Develops TQP site-specific qualification standards.· Revise and/or develop reference guides, examination questions, and other training materials to assist U.S. Department of Energy personnel to meet qualification requirements in the functional areas within the TQP.· May proctor exams when required.· Develop a Competency to Training Matrix (Database) that provides courses and vendors for all of the competencies the 33 functional area qualification standards.· Generate individual TQP continuing training progress trackers (CTPTs).· Maintain TQP matrix to monitor participant progress within the organization.· Perform administrative tasks such as preparing reports, providing information, producing copies, preparing presentations, data entry, data analysis and producing budget data and cost estimates.· Review methods of automating the systematic approach co training and develop new systems and tools to automate, enhance and make training and qualification processes more efficient. Minimum Qualifications :( To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.) MS/MA and a minimum of 5 years of experience or a BS/BA and minimum of 10 years of experience preferred.Minimum of 10 years' direct work experience in training development or training program coordination.Must hold an active (unexpired) DoE Q or Top Secret clearance Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Native preference under PL 93-638. We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",Senior Training Specialist-TS Job in San Francisco,"Full Time , Employee","San Francisco, CA",Energy and Utilities Education,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-training-specialist-ts-job-san-francisco-ca-us-176193977.aspx?mescoid=1300091001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bc8e1f04fd8508662ef6bb3d69bf7e0e
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:06:27:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Superintendent position for this company and its principals have a diverse range of experience providing General Contracting. The ability to adapt and overcome defines this company as a company that is flexible, proactively communicates with project participants, and delivers value. The construction team possesses expertise and experience in general contracting, coupled with the knowledge and business acumen of credentialed professionals. During pre-construction and construction phases we assist owners, developers and institutions to better manage their multi-family projects.Responsibilities for the SuperintendentCoordinates and supervises all construction activities including directing all field personnel to achieve completion of the project on schedule, within budget, with quality workmanship that conforms to original plans and specifications. Orders materials and schedules inspections as necessary throughout the process and maintains positive relationships with customers, contractors, suppliers inspectors, architects, and other employees.Help establish strategies and action plans to beat the budge along with planning and record keeping including: daily reports, logs, weather reports, photographic records, critical path forecast, RFI's.Promotes job site safety, encourages safe work practices and rectifies job site hazards immediately along with conducting safety meetings that are required.Working closely with the Project Manager on the scheduling of materials, equipment, subcontractors, and all potential change orders along with reviewing and adjusting construction methods that may involve great cost or risks to safety.Requirements for the Superintendent5+ years experience as a full charge Superintendent in Residential or Multi-family construction.Clean Driving Record.Experienced in scheduling, ordering, field supervision, quality control, and production of all phases of residential construction.Computer Skills: Outlook, Excel, Word, and Project Scheduling Program (MS Project, Primavera, SureTrak, etc.)Benefits for the SuperintendentMedical Benefits401k options 7 paid holidays and PTOThis Job is located in Glendale, CA -> United States",Superintendent - Construction/Multi-family/Residential Job in Glendale,Full Time Employee,"Glendale, CA 91201",,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-construction-multi-family-residential-job-glendale-ca-us-175584500.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=7,"120,000.00 - 140,000.00 $ /year",,1939a9a5476896f6244d196f40ff64fd
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:06:23:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Blanding,Full Time Employee,"Blanding, UT 84511",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-blanding-ut-us-176575024.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,be82970e04d95b2b28aead001ea6a741
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:06:11:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in La Plata,Full Time Employee,"La Plata, MD 20646",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-la-plata-md-us-176574690.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=18,,Entry Level,fb23d3caaeb2ac4273f6c2e365fa2322
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:05:54:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job HIRING Oklahoma Department of Transportation 410 Kremlin St. Enid, OK Bridge & Roadway Construction Inspector Please apply in person with resume and references in hand. Position will be held as a temp w/ the possibility to become permanent. Please call 580-234-3223 with any questions. No experience necessaryThis job listing brought to you by The Enid News & Eagle Report","Oklahoma Department of Transportation Job Application for Bridge & Roadway Construction Inspector | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name J Hoover Phone 5802343223 Address 410 Kremlin StEnid, OK 73703",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/bridge-roadway-construction-inspector-job-enid-ok-us-176374320.aspx?mescoid=4700828001001&jobPosition=7,,,48cc5c66fb40eb4d9ff7aecd7f19086a
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:05:28:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a leading industrial construction contractor in the energy space, working with the Oil & Gas, Chemical, and the Refinery & power market. Our work takes us into most of the 50 states. As we grow we are looking for a seasoned business development professional to join our team. We are looking for people who really want to make money and are very knowledgeable about the energy industry. If that sounds like you, we'd love to talk.What You Will Be Doing• Develop, coordinate and implement marketing plans designed to maintain and increase existingbusiness and capture new opportunities• Develop construction business & sales in the Oil & Gas, Chemical, Refinery & Power market segment • Maintain customer relations with existing customers as well as develop new customers by calling on owners, engineering firms, EPCs, OEMs• Travel nationally/regionally to meet with customers, determine their needs• Actively participate in trade associations and improve awareness of our services in marketplace• Create and establish weekly call routes to maximize region coverage• Identify opportunities in both traditional and non-traditional markets• Generate 40-50 calls a day, and schedule 10-15 meetings a weekWhat You Need for this Position• Ability to drive develop new customers and drive new business in the • Customer and Vendor relationship building• Strong knowledgeable of energy industry and have real “Market Intelligence”.• Deep knowledge of construction and commitment to learning our service offerings.• Strong problem solving skills• Excellent communication and interpersonal skills• Ability to learn new skills on the job quickly• Organizational Skills• Maintain positive work environment and image in marketplace• Time management and computer skills for efficient productivity• Basic computer skills• Accurately provide quotes and support to customer requests• Ability to tow equipment safely and maneuver in tight spaces if requiredSo, if you know our market and know construction, and are eager to earn a lot of money, we really need to talk...and soon ! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Business Development Manager- Energy Construction Industry | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Paul Miller,Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-manager-energy-construction-industry-job-houston-tx-us-176552274.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=8,,,ef2bbe79fee35c9cbe6c2792ffd32ffc
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:05:26:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Manager with High Rise/Apartment or Healthcare experience, please read on!We are an Elite Construction team with over 30 years of experience in the Seattle market! We provide construction solutions which include High Rise construction, Multi-Family, Apartment complex and Mixed Use Commercial Projects. We’re more than a commercial construction firm – we are your partner every step of the way. From the genesis of the design process to our clients’ occupancy, we respect the great value that taking the time to build and develop relationships with our colleagues in the architecture and design industry can mean to our shared clients.We hand pick our team for each and every project to ensure our clients are receiving the absolute best project managers, superintendents and sub-contractors in the industry. Each member of our top-notch team brings to the table a unique project background which we pair to each job based on their knowledge and experience. We excel in ground-up construction, and will exceed even the most detail-driven client’s expectations.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Leading growth Company!2. 30+ years experience3. UNMATCHED Funding level!What You Will Be Doing- The successful candidate will have expert knowledge of commercial construction methods, processes and management practices- Excellent analytical and problem solving skills; good communication skills;and be organized, efficient and responsive to the needs of internal and external clients alike. - The right candidate will be well versed in maintaining a Tight Job Control Program and will have demonstrated ability to work effectively with owners, subcontractors, Superintendents, and Safety.- The right candidate for this job will have demonstrated interpersonal skills with a variety of individuals and groups, owners and owner’s representative, architects, engineers, subcontractors, individual employees, jobsite teams, and company executives.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Bachelor Degree in related field- 7+ years of progressive Construction Project Management- Experience in High-rise, Multi-family, apartment, healthcare and/or bio construction- Excellent Project Management skills- Experience with podium construction project- Should completed recent $30M+ commercial construction project- Proven record of successful completion of projects timely and cost effectively.- LEED AP and OSHA 10 certifications preferred- Proven written and verbal communication abilities; proficiency with computer applications,including Microsoft Office and Project. Utilizes leading-edge technologies such as BIM, Lean principals*Some Travel requiredSo, if you are a Project Manager with High Rise/Apartment or Healthcare experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Huy Tran,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-job-seattle-wa-us-176527446.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=2,,,e26be6771b2041cbcdf4cd2cc205858b
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:04:49:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Superintendent (!REMOTE!) with pool and Water Feature / Fountain construction experience, please read on!Located in Yorba Linda, CA. We are one of California’s fastest growing Design, Engineering, Construction and Service firms, specializing in recreational aquatics. We are aggressively hiring experienced construction professionals in our field of fountains, water features, swimming pools, splash pads, lakes, streams, rockwork and other aquatic features. Our existing team consists of knowledgeable and reputable designers, engineers, estimators, project managers and repair managers who specialize in design, value engineering, construction and post construction maintenance services. We have multiple full-time positions available now.WE HAVE MULTIPLE OPENINGS STATEWIDE RIGHT NOW FOR SUPERINTENDENTS.Our main office is in Yorba Linda in Orange County, CA, but our work and the job sites you will manage are located statewide. Relocation assistance available for highly qualified candidates. Candidates from across California, Arizona and Nevada are encouraged to applyWhat You Will Be DoingThe Project Superintendent is a critical position within our organization. Project Superintendents are responsible for the supervision and management of all aspects of each construction project from mobilization through punch list and demobilization, including communication and interaction with project management staff members regarding the project’s production schedule and budget, all while managing client relations.KNOWLEDGE AND SKILL REQUIREMENTS:- Working knowledge of all trades and crafts.- Strong organizational skills, flexible, and contains the ability to prioritize work assignments.- Excellent people skills with experience in collaborating in a multi-disciplinary, diverse and dynamic team.- Ability to handle multiple small to medium sized projects at the same time.- Must be able to deliver under pressure and meet project deadlines.- Ability to interpret submittal packages and ensure quality control processes on the jobsite.- A clear understanding of how RFI’s and COR’s are identified, issued, processed, tracked, and recorded.- Familiarity with local, state and federal building codes and regulations.- Extreme attention to detail.- Leadership abilities and the ability to motivate others.- Excellent written and oral communication skills.- Ability to communicate using electronic mail effectively.- Availability to work extended hours as required by weather conditions or urgent circumstances.- Ability to travel throughout all areas of construction sites during all phases of a project.- Ability to lift heavy objects as encountered in the work environment.- Ability to raise, lower and climb various types of ladders.- The applicant must display strong math and analytical skills.- The applicant must be highly proficient at reading and understanding blueprints, specifications and statements of work related to each project.- Intermediate level of creating and understanding Gantt style project scheduling.- Bilingual (Spanish & English) is a major plus but not required.What You Need for this Position- 10+ years of experience in the construction industry in a supervisory role- Pool and Water Feature / Fountain construction experience- Commercial and Public/Municipal experience- Experience in mechanical, concrete, forming, trenching, plumbing, and electrical- Must be able to read plans and take-offs- Must be proficient in Microsoft office suite of products (Excel, Project, Power Point, and Word) and Adobe Acrobat- Working knowledge of Bluebeam a plus but not required- OSHA 30 hour training certification along with CPR and First Aid certification- Clean driver’s licenseWhat's In It for YouWe offer a casual atmosphere with a driven agenda for quality, where excellence is rewarded with advancement and compensation. Highly competitive salary DOE, with medical, dental, life insurance, bonuses, paid personal time off, paid holidays, 401(k) with 8% Company Match, company cell phone, company truck and gas card, and more.Must be experienced, be able to lift 50 lb over your head, pass drug test and physical screening post-offer before starting work, have full documentation for right to work and have a valid driver’s license.So, if you are a Project Superintendent (!REMOTE!) with Pool and Water Feature / Fountain construction experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Superintendent (!REMOTE!) - Commercial Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Dylan Gourd,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-superintendent-!remote!-commercial-construction-job-yorba-linda-ca-us-176372085.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=15,,,dd6a4d844762ab26eb7209facbcfd71e
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:04:36:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Superintendent (Schools) with experience, please read on!Based in beautiful Torrance, CA, we are the leading commercial construction company in the nation. We just received a new round of funding, from our multiple awards including ""Fastest growing company of 2016"", ""Best Place to work in 2016"", and ""Innovation Award"". Currently we are looking for an innovative Commercial Construction Superintendent with School Construction experience to supervise our next project and play a key role in our project. This is a once in a lifetime opportunity, and the position just opened up. Don't pass this up, and I guarantee you will love the work environment and facility!What You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Commercial Construction- School/Education Construction- OSHA CertifiedWhat's In It for YouVery Competitive CompensationFlexible working schedule and hoursGreat working culture (low bureaucracy, great team)Innovative work environmentTeam outings!Vacation and HolidayMedical and Dental Coverage401(k) planSo, if you are a Construction Superintendent (Schools) with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Superintendent (Schools) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Kevin Young,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-superintendent-schools-job-torrance-ca-us-176531600.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=12,,,b12b13793e91bf5ab9a389b0e1a47220
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:03:18:35,No,jobs.monster.com," City:  WhartonState:  New JerseyPostal/Zip Code: 07885 “Safety, Integrity, Quality are the foundation or core values on which Tilcon New York Inc., an Oldcastle Materials Company operates.  Located in New York and New Jersey, Tilcon New York Inc. is an integrated materials company with multiple quarry locations, water terminals, heavy highway construction division, asphalt and recycle plants.  Tilcon manufactures sells and ships, made in the USA, products of crushed stone, asphalt, sand, gravel and recycled materials throughout New York, New Jersey, and some areas of Pennsylvania.  Growth opportunity, professional development and a culture of support and resources are provided to each employee for their personal growth and success within Tilcon New York Inc., and the Oldcastle Materials Group.  Position Overview Supervise asphalt paving crew and milling operations for highway and road constriction and execute daily tasks. Key Responsibilities (Essential Duties and Functions) Lead and uphold TNJ valuesReinforce and lead by example on TNJ safety culturePromote and enforce TNJ and OMG Safety PracticeManage multiple paving and milling crewsProject budget review and plans to improve cost/scheduleDaily 2 week and 90 day schedule development and communicationMaterial and truck scheduling /coordinationTrack/manage daily quantities and cost – Infield reviewsSchedule equipment moves and subcontractors/ traffic controlCommunication with customer/ project representatives, R.E., etc.Weekly progress and cost reviews Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Education/Experience High School or equivalent  Work Requirements 3 or more years of construction paving industry experienceExperience with grade control electronicsExperience with NJDOT, Port Authority and Turnpike Authority projects Knowledge/ Skills Requirements  Working knowledge of English and Math, office practice and proceduresAbility to maintain records and filesAbility to communicate effectively with and work well with other personnelAbility to carry out simple oral and written instructions and deal with simple problemsAbility to deal effectively with questions or problems, seeking assistance when needed Physical Requirements The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. This chart outlines the physical requirements necessary to perform the duties of this job.  Continuous Frequently Occasionally NotApplicableBend  X Kneel  X Squat  X Climb   XStand  X Walk  X Sit  X Reach  X Drive X  Fine motor   XRepetitive Motion   X Right     Left     The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 100 pounds.  Continuous Frequently Occasionally NotApplicable 0 – 10 lbs.  X 10 – 25 lbs.  X 25 – 50 lbs.  X 50 – 100 lbs.  X  Work EnvironmentThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently exposed to irritants and chemicals and occasionally exposed to noise, dust, vibration, and irritating atmospheres at or around the operating sites.  Employee is frequently exposed to existing weather conditions. Employee must perform numerous tasks indoors and throughout a site.           The noise level in the work environment is usually loud to very loud. This chart outlines the potential work environment the employees may be exposed to while performing the duties of this job.  ContinuousFrequentlyOccasionallyNot ApplicableHot Weather X  Cold Weather X  Wet Weather  X Exposed to Noise X  Exposed to High Heat X  Moving EquipmentX   Working with OthersX    The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive.  They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job.  Other duties may be assigned as required.  Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Tilcon New York Inc. proudly supports Affirmative Action, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and is committed to workforce diversity.  Tilcon New York  Inc. is a drug-free work environment What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! !LinkedIn and WordPress (Career Blog), Pinterest, Google+, Instagram, Twitter, Facebook to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Talent CommunityJoin our  Tilicon New York Inc. is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Tilicon New York Inc. is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Asphalt Construction Superintendent- Wharton,Full Time Employee,"Wharton, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/asphalt-construction-superintendent-wharton-nj-job-wharton-nj-us-175595402.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=17,,,70ecddb02ad7d75bb920f393b0566c32
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:03:17:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"PT Openings for Spring 2017:Biology Technical AssistantBiology InstructorCollege NurseMedical Assisting InstructorNursing InstructorPhlebotomy InstructorReference LibrarianPlease see web site www.niagaracc.suny.edu for information, qualifications, and application instructions. NCCC is a SUNY AA/EOE Institution.This job listing brought to you by The Niagara Gazette",College Instructors Job in  function wrap(EL,Part Time,14132,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/college-instructors-job-pendleton-ny-us-176311800.aspx?mescoid=2500373001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c49b36f31941e283caa5a70279cea824
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:03:16:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Lucedale,Full Time Employee,"Lucedale, MS 39452",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-lucedale-ms-us-176574360.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,1ed8a229d2d49fe2461e3197a25777b8
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:03:07:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Admissions Evaluator III; The Montana Tech office of Enrollment Services is seeking a customer service specialist to serve students in all matters related to enrollment. A successful candidate will have a history of proven customer service experience in a fast-paced environment, excellent written and oral communication skills, proficiency in Microsoft Office, and the ability to multitask. A background in the IT system BANNER, a bachelor's degree, and previous experience at an institution of higher education are preferred. For more information visit www.mtech.edu/employment Submit a cover letter addressing qualifications, resume', and contact information for 3 professional references to Montana Tech Personnel Office, 1300 West Park Street, Butte, MT 59701. ADA/EO/AA/Veterans Preference",Admissions Evalator III Job in Butte,Full Time,"Butte, MT 59701",All,http://jobview.monster.com/admissions-evalator-iii-job-butte-mt-us-176606886.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=4,,,f3c736aa9f270d0c2013b642a9a8531a
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:03:07:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a grant-funded 100%, 12-month position housed on the NOC-Tonkawa campus for a five-year period beginning in FY 2016-2017 and ending in 2020-2021. This position will become absorbed by the institution beginning in Year 3 and will be retained by NOC post-grant period. The Native American Student Success Specialist (NASSS) will lead the development of the new Cultural Engagement Center, overseeing the development /pilots of student services and faculty development to be housed there. Essential duties include: Supervise Tutors and Tribal Leader/Faculty Coaches. Lead establishment of Cultural Engagement Center, including renovation and equipping, in coordination with NOC IT and facilities staff. Oversee development/pilots of tutoring and coaching for Native American students. Facilitate professional development for NOC faculty/staff on strategies to support Native American student success. Coordinate with NOC faculty/staff and Tribal Access Site Facilitators to integrate Cultural Engagement Center services within institutional/tribal center structures. Assist in evaluation data collection/analysis. Coordinate with project staff and NOC staff/faculty to ensure institutionalization of new initiatives. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily including learning and utilizing changing technology. The individual must preserve confidentiality of privileged and sensitive information; use independent judgment and initiative in the planning, organization, and performance of duties; and establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with those contacted in the course of work. Initiative, creativity and teamwork are essential as well as strong organizational, management, customer service, and written and oral communication skills. The ideal candidate will be able to work well with students, faculty, administration, and staff members, as well as external stakeholders and supporters; work well under pressure; meet deadlines, and set priorities while maintaining professional relationships when dealing with individuals; he or she must also value the significance of collaborative inclusiveness with a diverse employee and student population. Subject to satisfactory Fair Credit Reporting Act Disclosure which includes a criminal background check. Hire is also contingent upon Federal agency approval. Weekend and evening work may be required with a flexible 40-hour work week schedule. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, sit, push, lift, haul, pull, reach, carry, grasp, squat or stoop, bend and twist the body while performing essential duties, use hands to operate controls, reach with hands and arms, climb stairs, talk or hear. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. A minimum educational level of a Master's degree in Education or related field with a minimum of 3 years experience in higher education distance instruction or services. Demonstrated expertise with Blackboard LMS and Civitas or comparable data management systems. Familiarity with best practices in distance education, Quality Matters preferred. Ability to work collaboratively with excellent leadership and communication skills. Experience working with disadvantaged, low-income, at-risk student preferred. Applicants will need to submit an application which is available online at www.noc.edu/prospective-employee, a letter of application, a resume, Official college transcripts, and three letters of professional recommendation to Northern Oklahoma College, Human Resources, P. O. Box 310, Tonkawa, OK 74653. EEOThis job listing brought to you by The Enid News & Eagle",Native American Student Success Specialist. Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,74653,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/native-american-student-success-specialist-job-tonkawa-ok-us-176398540.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),aae0b866d3ccdf8bf77a85357440383a
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:02:33:04,No,jobs.monster.com,Job Details:My client is a well regarded General Construction/ Construction Management firm in the city of Philadelphia.  They are seeking an Assistant Project Manager with strong general construction experience.   This person will be responsible for assisting Project Managers on multiple projects or leading small-scale projects from pre-construction through construction and closeout.   My client is very busy and growing!  Call Dan Gallagher at 484 567 2084 and/or email Dan a word document of your resume to dg@libertyjobs.com Please submit!  ,Assistant Project Manager - General Construction Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia , PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-project-manager-general-construction-job-philadelphia-pa-us-176314716.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c156660d1983915c99a6bd13d571a384
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:02:29:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jump-start your career as an Intern with the #1 car rental company in the world! Hertz offers a fun, energetic, fast-paced team environment where no two days are the same. If you are an aggressive individual with an enterprising spirit, you can move into the fast lane at Hertz and advance your career more rapidly than you ever dreamed.An Intern opportunity with Hertz Local Edition will give you the chance to:- Gain marketable skills and learn about all aspects of management, customer service, and sales.- Attain valuable experience reviewing profit statements.- Enjoy a fun, team-oriented workplace.- Earn competitive pay and qualify for incentives.If you are interested in working in an entrepreneurial atmosphere and you want more than just sitting behind a desk all day, we would love to hear from you!Upon earning your degree, you will have the chance to be considered for Management Trainee, Manager Associate, or Assistant Branch Manager.To be eligible for consideration, you must:Be currently enrolled in college and have completed two years of college credit.Be at least 20 years of age and have a valid driver's license with a good driving record.Work hours not to exceed 24 hours per week.  Weekend work hours are required.The successful candidate must demonstrate exceptional leadership and communication skills.All college majors considered.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Mgmt Trainee Intern (HLE.Mgmt Trainee Intern..Operations.Nonex) Job in Santa Cruz,Full Time / Employee,"Santa Cruz, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/mgmt-trainee-intern-hle-mgmt-trainee-intern-operations-nonex-job-santa-cruz-ca-us-176490653.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Education/Training,d02e502cc10f3ff0e3b1fa065bdf5d97
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:02:28:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill perform field inspections and observations for transportation projects in the Western USWill provide daily reports of observation and test resultsWill monitor work procedures for compliance with project specificationsWill interact with client representative (supervisors, foremen, project managers, engineers, etc.) at project sitesPerform analysis or calculations to check accuracy, applicability and reasonableness of testing dataDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experience2 to 15+ years of transportation construction experienceRelevant certifications are a plusAbility to read and comprehend basic plans and specificationsAbility to prepare reports and documentationProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerStrong written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work with a teamReliability – must be able to arrive at designated project sites prior to scheduled timesAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and must have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable. Report",Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure,"Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill perform field inspections and observations for transportation projects in the Western USWill provide daily reports of observation and test resultsWill monitor work procedures for compliance with project specificationsWill interact with client representative (supervisors, foremen, project managers, engineers, etc.) at project sitesPerform analysis or calculations to check accuracy, applicability and reasonableness of testing dataDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experience2 to 15+ years of transportation construction experienceRelevant certifications are a plusAbility to read and comprehend basic plans and specificationsAbility to prepare reports and documentationProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerStrong written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work with a teamReliability – must be able to arrive at designated project sites prior to scheduled timesAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and must have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure; Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-inspector-on-call-job-los-angeles-ca-us-174610861.aspx?mescoid=4700828001001&jobPosition=18,,,fe0c4c68ea9c66e0840f2af268b7c745
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:01:08:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a family-owned business with a rich history. We have over six decades of success and we continue to grow! Our future is bright and we are looking to add an experience Construction Project Manager to assist us with our growth.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Outstanding benefits2. Competitive pay3. Stable companyWhat You Will Be Doing- Planning- Tracking- Managing all aspects of construction projects- Organizing pre-construction meetings- Coordinating with subcontractors- Negotiating contracts- Change orders- Key point of contact for all clients- Read and interpret all drawings, contracts and leases- Occasional weekend and evenings required as deadlines need to be metWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Project Management- Highway Construction- Construction ManagementWhat's In It for You- Vacation/PTO- Medical- Dental- Vision- 401(k)So, if you are a Construction Project Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager - Project Management,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Elle Daniels,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-project-management-highway-cons-job-louisville-ky-us-176573704.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=16,,,4407e0307c62ba678ac4e016187404b4
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:00:24:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Manager with 5+ years related supervisory experience and local to the greater Asheville NC area, please read on!We are a small, design oriented design and construction firm with offices in Asheville, NC and Memphis, TN. Our team of architects, designers and construction professionals focus on highly crafted, detail oriented projects that include both residential and light commercial buildings and interiors. We are seeking to add to the leadership of our construction team with a seasoned superintendent that can direct the day to day operations of each construction project in Asheville, NC.What You Will Be Doing1.The Construction Manager coordinates all site construction activities and supervises all field personnel as required to successfully complete the project on schedule and within budget. This includes maintaining the highest quality, supervising all trade and field personnel, while administering good construction safety practices with all on-site activities.2.The project supervisor will communicate the quality standards expected of the sub-contractors throughout project duration specifically including a pre-construction conference and daily quality control standards to ensure the quality of construction is consistent with the Owner’s and Architect’s expectations for the project.3.Maintain onsite drawings and documentation.4.Scheduling of daily and weekly activities while also documenting all progress made.5.It is the supervisor’s responsibilities to turn in any invoices he may receive on a daily basis as well as code invoices based on company standard practice.6.A time log must be kept of the Supervisor’s time and submitted daily along with notes. This is to be done electronically.7.Focusing on client relationship building, they place high value in exceeding expectations with their superior workmanship and devotion to be the best.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:Minimum of 10 years in the residential construction industry.Minimum of 5 years as a full-time project supervisor.Ability to motivate staff and subcontractors, to lead by example, and stay on schedule.Bachelor’s degree a plus but not requiredAre leaders who prefer to work in a team-oriented atmosphere.Develop relationships with owners, designers, subcontractors and other trade partners.Are willing to learn new approaches and tools.Stay on the cutting edge of industry technology and have strong computer skills.What's In It for YouPaid HolidaysPaid VacationHealth Insurance ReimbursementSimple IRA retirement planDirect DepositSo, if you are a Construction Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Lindsay Effler Nichols,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manager-job-asheville-nc-us-176372184.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=11,,,8d543dfabc51349b3e24aec16105a87b
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:00:23:58,No,jobs.monster.com," Harrison Construction Company Job Requisition ID: 94631Job Type: OtherWork Time: Internship City:  KnoxvilleState:  Tennessee (US-TN)Postal/Zip Code: 37914TN-NC________________________________________________________________________________________________________ Construction Management Intern-TNTired of browsing the classifieds? Job searches unsuccessful? Look no further, Harrison Construction has the perfect career opportunity waiting for you!  Job Description Summary We are seeking a qualified, safety minded, highly motivated individual to work as entry level intern to be involved with and learn about various aspects of our company. The intern will be exposed to all lines of business and will follow a 12 week program during the summer months as listed below: Weeks 1-3      North Carolina/Highland Sand    Plant Process/Quality Control/Sales/EnvironmentalWeeks 4-6      Ready-Mix Concrete                 Plants/Quality Control/Dispatch/Sales/OperationsWeeks 7-9      Asphalt                                      Plants/Quality Control/Estimating/LaydownWeeks 10-12  Construction                              Current projectsFinal day - The Experience Presentation            Powerpoint/Overview/Evaluation of program/Harrison Overview   RequirementsIn addition to learning those aspects of the assigned division, the selected individual will be required to perform general labor duties and work long hours with the crew which could include some night work.   Travel required throughout eastern Tennessee and western North Carolina dependent on schedule. A valid drivers license with a good driving record is mandetory.The selected individual must display a courteous and professional attitude when dealing with co-workers, customers and the public.  Long hours, nights, travel overnights and weekends may be required.   Education/ExperienceCurrently enrolled in a college or university majoring in Civil and/or Construction Management Engineering is required. What Oldcastle offers youCompetitive Wages Comprehensive medical, dental, and disability benefits programs Retirement savings plan with company match Health and wellness programs Opportunities for growth, development, and promotionAbout OldcastleHarrison Construction, a division of Oldcastle Materials, is one of the hundreds of businesses that comprise the Oldcastle family. As the leading vertically integrated supplier of aggregates, asphalt, ready mixed concrete, and paving services, Oldcastle is one of North America’s largest corporations. Oldcastle’s decentralized, diversified structure, allows employees to work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Whether we’re safely paving miles of interstate, building two thousand-foot-long bridges or constructing roads through national parks, Oldcastle Materials’ continued investment in people, performance and communities has positioned us as an industry leader.Oldcastle Materials is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Through the use of various tools, including our online applicant tracking system, which allows you to view and to track your application status 24 hours a day, Harrison Construction leverages itself to recruit the most dependable, qualified and experienced job seekers in the market!Harrison Construction an Equal Employment Opportunity employer Harrison Construction Company is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer Harrison Construction Company is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.  ",Construction Management Intern-TN Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-management-intern-tn-job-knoxville-tn-us-175603019.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=2,,,620301b392bb4e97fa5392b14ad7bda4
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:00:04:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Olney Central College seeks part-time Child Psychology instructor for Spring 2017. Class meets 9-9:50 a.m. Monday, Wednesday and Friday. Master's degree in psychology required. For more information or to apply, call 618-395-7777, ext. 2004.",Child Psychology Instructor Job in Olney,Part Time,"Olney, IL 62450",All,http://jobview.monster.com/child-psychology-instructor-job-olney-il-us-176552768.aspx?mescoid=2500353001001&jobPosition=5,,,e3d565057b0e5ae33307be37edec2937
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Austin ID  85251 Posted Date  8/23/2016 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cook- Freescale Ed Bluestein,"Part Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-freescale-ed-bluestein-job-austin-tx-us-171271262.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,fd294ad0a1f9f53d465fa7752bb08c6d
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition/Vacancy No. 136071BR Position Title Superintendent - MEP Systems - Hunt Construction Group Job Category Construction Management Business Line Construction Services Country United States of America State/Province/Region USA - Texas City Austin Why Choose AECOM? AECOM is a premier, fully integrated professional and technical services firm positioned to design, build, finance and operate infrastructure assets around the world for public- and private-sector clients. With nearly 100,000 employees — including architects, engineers, designers, planners, scientists and management and construction services professionals — serving clients in over 150 countries around the world, AECOM is ranked as the #1 engineering design firm by revenue in _Engineering News-Record_ magazine’s annual industry rankings, and has been recognized by _Fortune_ magazine as a World’s Most Admired Company. The firm is a leader in all of the key markets that it serves, including transportation, facilities, environmental, energy, oil and gas, water, high-rise buildings and government. AECOM provides a blend of global reach, local knowledge, innovation and technical excellence in delivering customized and creative solutions that meet the needs of clients’ projects. A _Fortune 500_ firm, AECOM companies, including URS Corporation and Hunt Construction Group, have annual revenue of approximately $19 billion. More information on AECOM and its services can be found at www.aecom.com About the Business LineConstruction Services Our talented experts are dedicated to managing the complexity inherent in construction projects, catering to each client’s unique needs. We provide services such as program management, construction management and owner’s representation to our clients around the globe. Job Summary The Hunt Construction Group team spans across the entire country, and comprises of over 800 employees including skilled trades professionals. Whether located in a Hunt regional office or on a jobsite, our relationship-oriented work environment shines through; every Hunt employee is valued, appreciated and treated with respect. Hunt Construction Group has been in the construction industry for nearly 70 years with tangible, positive results that we do the job right. The Hunt team works to create strong client-relationships, and we emphasize quality and skill-utilization in every aspect of construction, no matter the type of project. We strive to bring a relational aspect to the job as well, and we take pride in the loyalty and dedication given to each project and every client. Hunt employees have a strong commitment to their clients, because we recognize that solid, long-term relationships enhance the value of our services. Our primary focus is to help our customers in their building and construction needs. Hunt Construction Group excels because we are abundant with the right people producing the right results, every time. Reporting to the Field Operations Manager, the MEP Superintendent will provide overall on-site administrative and technical management for all MEP activities at the project. + Manage and lead MEP subcontractors throughout the duration of the project. + Review Contract Documents and make suggestions as they relate to the MEP scopes of work. + Assist Scheduling department with development of CPM schedules for all MEP installation activities, including weekly updates. + Work with General Building Superintendent on project logistics and temporary facility plans. + Review and approve material and equipment for MEP systems prior to installation. + Monitor the installation and startup of MEP systems and commissioning of the project with the Engineer & Owner. + Coordinate and supervise the field inspection process for all MEP systems. + Work closely with the QA/QC department to insure all inspections and follow-up are taken to completion and all issues are closed. + Coordinate activities, materials procurement and other related activities with Project Manager and Field Staff. + Communicate progress and prepare appropriate reports as needed for various parties. + Serve as Hunt’s MEP Representative at weekly Owner’s meetings. + Review and coordination of submittals and shop drawings. + Supervise, develop and mentor MEP Project Engineers, if applicable. Minimum Requirements + Minimum of 5 years experience in MEP Supervision. + Thorough knowledge of all mechanical, plumbing and BMS systems. + Experience dealing with MEP subcontracts and subcontractors. + General understanding of Mechanical Codes, Electrical Codes and Plumbing Codes as they relate to construction of project. + Proven track record as a Project Manager or Superintendent on large commercial or healthcare projects (with values above $20M for Mechanical and Electrical portions of contract). + Knowledge of building construction, means and methods, scheduling and cost control procedures, general contract, subcontract documents, drawings and specifications. + Strong management, leadership and interpersonal skills with the ability to communicate well both verbally and in writing. Preferred Qualifications + Bachelor’s degree in Engineering or Construction Management preferred. + General understanding of Building Codes preferred. + Knowledge of BIM utilization and BIM computer applications preferred. + Knowledge of Primavera scheduling preferred. What We Offer AECOM is a place where you can put your innovative thinking and business skills into high gear and work alongside other highly intelligent and motivated people. It's a place where you can apply your skills to some of the world's most challenging, interesting, and meaningful projects worldwide. It's a place that values the diversity of our areas of practice and our people. It's what makes AECOM a great place to work and grow. AECOM is an equal opportunity employer and Minorities, Females, Veterans, and Disabled persons are encouraged to apply. For further information, please click here at http://www.aecom.com/deployedfiles/Internet/Careers/Diversity%20and%20Inclusion/EEO%20is%20the%20Law%20Poster%20Supplement.pdf to view the EEO Is The Law poster.",Superintendent - MEP Systems - Hunt Construction Group Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-mep-systems-hunt-construction-group-job-austin-tx-us-170862923.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7a78fb9adc97c628f7177af649f490a5
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-TimeBrookdale Dunwoody 1460 S Johnson Ferry Rd NE Atlanta, GA 30319 Job #: 065656Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Assist activities coordinator with developing and implementing recreational programs* Provide hands-on involvement in programs during the residents' scheduled times* Assist in the planning, orientation and supervision of volunteers * Support the activities coordinator in exploring opportunities for resident socialization and engagementRequired skills and qualifications:* High School diploma or GED* One year related experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Activity Assistant Job in Atlanta,Part Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30319",Education Healthcare Services Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/activity-assistant-job-atlanta-ga-us-170738623.aspx?mescoid=3900662001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,caf71f06da395ea4e623f438da836eb1
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Director of Nursing DescriptionSummaryAssists the Director of Nursing (DoN) in providing, planning, coordinating or managing nursing care, nursing services and health education to residents and patients.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesAssists in ensuring nursing staff is providing quality and appropriate resident / patient care that meets or exceeds company and regulatory standards.May assist with recruiting, hiring, providing orientation/training, and retaining a sufficient number of qualified staff to carry out the responsibilities of nursing services. Ensures employee performance meets or exceeds expectations and periodic performance appraisals are conducted on a timely basis.Assists with scheduling and performing rounds to monitor and evaluate the quality and appropriateness of nursing care.Assists in maintaining administrative authority, responsibility and accountability for the proper charting and documentation of care and of medications and treatments.May be responsible for quality assurance, infection control, and the development of staff as determined by the Director of Nursing.Helps develop and implement the written staffing plan and nursing schedule that reflects the needs of the resident population.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Adheres to scope of practice limitations based on qualifications.May occasionally be required to perform patient care duties.In the absence of the Director of Nursing, the duties and responsibilities of the DoN may be delegated to this position.Performs other duties as assigned. Assistant Director of Nursing RequirementsQualificationsMinimum of licensed Practical or Vocational Nurse or Registered Nurse with experience in long-term care or geriatric nursing. Management or supervisor experience in long-term care or geriatric nursing preferred.Proficient in the use of a personal computer.Physical Demands & EnvironmentMay occasionally be required to work non-standard hours. Employee is frequently required to stand, walk, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, see, talk and hear. Employee is occasionally exposed to blood or other body fluids, fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. In compliance with applicable law, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the position. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Assistant Director of Nursing RN - Bastrop Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-director-of-nursing-rn-bastrop-job-austin-tx-us-170347852.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=14,,,58e929735cad8b8ec266672fd623ddb3
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Austin ID  41673 Posted Date  8/12/2015 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES:  Prepare a daily report that verifies transactions Be able to work quickly and concisely under pressure Understand what is inclusive of a reimbursable meal Ensure storage of food in a proper and sanitary manner Organize and assist in major cleaning of refrigerators, freezers, and cooking and serving equipment at the regularly scheduled intervals Ensure food items and supplies are checked in as they arrive Ensure daily cleaning and sterilization of all dishes, silverware, and cooking utensils Promote good public relations Attend in-service meetings as scheduled by the General Manager/Lead Proper utilization of leftovers as required Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all HACCP regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Adhere to the uniform policy Communicate with the Kitchen Manager daily to understand and properly prepare menu for the day Serve food at proper portions as requested Adjust thermostat controls to regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, roasters, steam kettles, and all other cooking and serving equipment Measure and mix ingredients according to standardized recipes using blenders, mixers, grinders, slicers, and other preparation equipment to prepare entrees, soups, salads, sandwiches, gravies, desserts, sauces, casseroles, and other food items Bake, roast, broil, boil, and steam meats, fish, vegetables, and other foods Observe and test food being cooked by tasting, smelling, and taking temperature to assure it is cooked May wash, peel, cut, and shred vegetables and fruits to prepare them for use May bake bread, rolls, cakes, and pastries Other related duties as assigned MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Work with client(s) with tact and diplomacy Perform work that is routine and organized PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, fingering, feeling, seeing, standing, walking Inside Job (defined as spending approximately 75% or more of the time inside) Temperature changes: variations in temperature, which are sufficiently marked and abrupt to cause noticeable bodily reactions. GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES:  Prepare a daily report that verifies transactions Be able to work quickly and concisely under pressure Understand what is inclusive of a reimbursable meal Ensure storage of food in a proper and sanitary manner Organize and assist in major cleaning of refrigerators, freezers, and cooking and serving equipment at the regularly scheduled intervals Ensure food items and supplies are checked in as they arrive Ensure daily cleaning and sterilization of all dishes, silverware, and cooking utensils Promote good public relations Attend in-service meetings as scheduled by the General Manager/Lead Proper utilization of leftovers as required Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all HACCP regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Adhere to the uniform policy Communicate with the Kitchen Manager daily to understand and properly prepare menu for the day Serve food at proper portions as requested Adjust thermostat controls to regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, roasters, steam kettles, and all other cooking and serving equipment Measure and mix ingredients according to standardized recipes using blenders, mixers, grinders, slicers, and other preparation equipment to prepare entrees, soups, salads, sandwiches, gravies, desserts, sauces, casseroles, and other food items Bake, roast, broil, boil, and steam meats, fish, vegetables, and other foods Observe and test food being cooked by tasting, smelling, and taking temperature to assure it is cooked May wash, peel, cut, and shred vegetables and fruits to prepare them for use May bake bread, rolls, cakes, and pastries Other related duties as assigned MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Work with client(s) with tact and diplomacy Perform work that is routine and organized PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, fingering, feeling, seeing, standing, walking Inside Job (defined as spending approximately 75% or more of the time inside) Temperature changes: variations in temperature, which are sufficiently marked and abrupt to cause noticeable bodily reactions. QUALIFICATIONS: Foodservice Sanitation Certificate as needed Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Food Service Worker - University of Texas Towers Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/food-service-worker-university-of-texas-towers-job-austin-tx-us-170444565.aspx?mescoid=3500611001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,f0d5692e8887546e5db1d3a0ad07e275
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE - Perform advanced, diversified, and confidential executive-level secretarial duties requiring broad and comprehensive experience, skill and knowledge of organization' s policies and practices. MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES - Identifies needs and initiates projects independently. Sets priorities and procedures for accomplishing work, delegating responsibility as needed. Collects and compiles information, and analyzes data and displays in appropriate form for officer. Receives and reviews highly sensitive correspondence for officer. Maintains confidentiality and recommends solutions or actions required. Responds independently to routine correspondence under own signature or drafts response for officer' s review on more complex correspondence. Screens telephone calls and visitors, and resolves routine and complex inquiries. Meets independently with or screens people before meeting with the officer. May supervise a single or group of non-exempt support secretary staff, including hiring, training, and performance appraisal. Controls calendar closely, with authority to determine who may be scheduled. Authorizes approval for travel expense reports for officer. Reviews and questions where necessary expense reports of officer' s direct reports. Approves invoices and purchase requisitions under own signature. Makes complex domestic or international travel arrangements. Operates a variety of office equipment, such as a personal computer, printer, photocopier, transcriber, facsimile, scanner, or calculator. Progressively uses the features of one or more standard business software packages.  NATURE AND SCOPE - Provides primary support to assigned Senior Officer/Officer. Direct reports may include one or more Administrative Assistants, as well as one or more Clerks. Typically requires frequent persuasion or influencing of others. Usually assigns and reviews work of others. Typically procedures for analyzing situations and making conclusions are very diverse Typically considers among a few options and past practice when solving problems. Typically there is some leeway for changing the order of assigned tasks. Prior approval is required before dealing with unassigned tasks.  ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS - Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS - Must be eighteen years of age Must pass the Drug Test Must pass pre-employment tests if applicable EDUCATION REQUIRED - The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED. YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 3 PHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS - Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles. KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES - PC skills, knowledge and proficiency in Microsoft Office tools (Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Access), Lotus Notes and the Internet. Ability to work independently with minimal direction, strong written/verbal communication skills, strong organizational skills and attention to detail, ability to handle multiple tasks at once. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Administrative Assistant/Officer Pro Business Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-officer-pro-business-job-atlanta-ga-us-170811166.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),7e4bd478fe2a0ced72c04ec25405ce62
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is a global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. Our goal is to maintain a positive candidate and client experience through fitting the best candidates with the best positions.Our client, a Fortune 500 company, seeks a candidate with the below qualifications:Tri-lingual (Spanish/Portuguese/English) Service Desk/Customer Service Advisors""The successful candidate will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States""Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Tri-lingual Customer Service Job in Austin,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Tri-lingual Customer Service,"Austin, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/tri-lingual-customer-service-job-austin-tx-us-171311170.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,5c2c7568ffae7e0f427717f018198489
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Austin ID  82580 Posted Date  8/3/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Responsible for execution of the meal and understanding the timing of food production and to have all components of ready for consumption Responsible for expediting and maintaining the amount of food produced based on forecasted demand during peak and non-peak service times Communicate with the management to maintain the level of food quality that is expected Ensure daily communication between the day and night shifts regarding items that require long cooking times and planning for upcoming meals Communicate any issues to the staff which could affect the service before each meal period Ability to cook and prepare food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to insure food is prepared in prescribed manner Cuts, trims, bones and carves meats and poultry for cooking Evaluate food quality and preparedness by tasting Ensure food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Evaluate front-of-house presentation and make changes to food displays as needed Sets up/Breaks down work station Maintains a clean, safe and sanitary work station, equipment, and utensils Must be trained to safely operate all kitchen equipment (choppers, slicers, ovens, steamers, a variety of knives, etc.) Responsible for training servers on use of correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Maintain production results of each meal Communicate with management regarding food product that needs to be ordered for upcoming production plans Report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Serve Safe certified Work in other areas as needed Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Responsible for execution of the meal and understanding the timing of food production and to have all components of ready for consumption Responsible for expediting and maintaining the amount of food produced based on forecasted demand during peak and non-peak service times Communicate with the management to maintain the level of food quality that is expected Ensure daily communication between the day and night shifts regarding items that require long cooking times and planning for upcoming meals Communicate any issues to the staff which could affect the service before each meal period Ability to cook and prepare food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to insure food is prepared in prescribed manner Cuts, trims, bones and carves meats and poultry for cooking Evaluate food quality and preparedness by tasting Ensure food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Evaluate front-of-house presentation and make changes to food displays as needed Sets up/Breaks down work station Maintains a clean, safe and sanitary work station, equipment, and utensils Must be trained to safely operate all kitchen equipment (choppers, slicers, ovens, steamers, a variety of knives, etc.) Responsible for training servers on use of correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Maintain production results of each meal Communicate with management regarding food product that needs to be ordered for upcoming production plans Report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Serve Safe certified Work in other areas as needed Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal and communication skills Ability to work in a team environment and demonstrate excellent customers service Must have the ability to manage and support the kitchen staff Minimum 2 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Must be able to understand verbal and written instructions Desired Qualifications: Culinary training or degree 3 or more years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Lead Cook - Salvation Army Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-cook-salvation-army-job-austin-tx-us-170494956.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=9,,Food Services/Hospitality,551fa362fac8c6a1cf283cb1197c5ae5
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-atlanta-ga-us-170857265.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b55fe1e50480986b22ba4f1cf87f7b28
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Reporting to the VP of Operations the HR Manager will help build and establish the HR function for the business. This is an exciting opportunity and chance to work in a fast-paced sector with a talented team of real estate investment professionals. Client DetailsNational real estate investment firm. Very entrepreneurial environment. DescriptionReporting to the VP of Operations the HR Manager will help build and establish the HR function for the business. This is an exciting opportunity and chance to work in a fast-paced sector with a talented team of real estate investment professionals. With autonomy to build out the HR function and all related policies, documentation and procedures, this role will require someone with exposure to a wide variety of HR responsibilities. The successful candidate will be responsible for:Employee relations, performance management, onboarding, policy implementationOverseeing Payroll processManaging the company Benefits plan for employees. This will include finding the best providers and implementing any changesManaging the annual performance review processManaging the full recruitment process, including online websites, university co-op boards and negotiating recruiter ratesUpdating company policy and procedures with revisions when needed to ensure compliance with employment guidelines/laws.ProfileThe qualified candidate must have:Minimum of 3 years of management experience in an equivalent HR role;A track record of successfully establishing partnerships and providing professional human resources services in an effort to positively influence organizational performance and results;Strong experience recruiting staff in a real estate/property management or similar environment;Strong organizational and time management skills;Strong communication, both written and oral;Experience managing/overseeing payroll processing a plus.SPHR certification preferredJob OfferStrong base salary and bonus based on performance. Great upward mobility and visibility with the leadership team. A chance to see an immediate impact!",HR Manager (Property Management) Job in Austin,"Full Time , Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-manager-property-management-job-austin-tx-us-170787385.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=7,"75,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",,971ca623c9eb770c2e2e4d3089139559
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:The Senior Analyst Capacity Planning is responsible for building, maintaining and managing the capacityplanning program for medium and high incumbent Home Services’ field teams such as 100% commissionsales consultants and HDMS operations including calculations, resolutions, payments, and other supportteams. This individual will develop forecasts, analyze productivity, understand and layer branch and regionalvariations into their projections along with scheduling responsibilities for some teams. The Senior Analyst willcollaborate and consult with other functional areas that could impact staffing requirements such asMarketing, Finance, Recruiting, HR, Operations etc. They will be expected to develop models and scenariosfor projecting business process changes including recommendations to senior leadership on benefits andobstacles for various options. They will regularly communicate with the leaders for field and non-contactcenter teams to advise on hiring, retention, attrition, productivity and other performance statistics.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:40% - Develop, Maintain and Manage capacity model for all branches, markets and teams assigned –including alignment of upcoming resource needs, projections of attrition and communication with field andnon-contact center leadership on specific requirements for each business/branch/market/team.30% - Create long-range (2 yr) and mid-range (6 m) term rolling forecasts of workload (appointments,measures, jobs, tasks etc.) including influences from seasonality, marketing events, promos, sales plans &growth etc. Develop schedules and time off pools and administration for some teams (primarily HDMSoperations teams)10% - Collaborate and communicate with leadership; to deliver results of forecasting and capacity planning,including ensuring understanding of inputs, influences and drivers of results; conduct regular reviews ofhistorical trending and forward-looking outlooks10% - Model ad-hoc ‘what-if’ scenarios to understand potential process changes; develop illustrative decks,models and dashboards to enhance understanding and deliver recommendations to leadership.10% - Monitor & analyze weekly/monthly productivity and compensation to ensure maximized utilization ofresourcesNature and Scope:This position reports to Senior Manager Strategic Workforce Planning.This position has 0 direct reports.Environmental Job Requirements:Environment: Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and notobjectionable.Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time.Standard Minimum Qualifications:Must be eighteen years of age or older.Must pass the Drug Test.Must pass pre-employment test if applicable.Additional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED.Work Experience Required: 3 yearsMinimum Age Override: 0Certifications & Licenses:Physical Requirements: Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles.Additional Qualifications:Preferred Qualifications: Typically requires interpersonal skills for dealing with sensitive or controversial situations.Typically faces situations that are unstructured and require original approaches.Typically considers new approaches within general policies and short-term goals when solving problems.Typically expected to provide status reports to management.Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies:- Financial Planning exp- Forecasting exp- Statistical Modeling exp- High Proficiency in excel, PowerPoint required- Proficiency in SQL, tableau preferred- Self-starter, independent, project oriented- Ability to influence without authority- Strong interpersonal and communication skills $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",HDE Senior Analyst Capacity Planning Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/hde-senior-analyst-capacity-planning-job-atlanta-ga-us-171136740.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=5,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),9eac0aa2dd596c723422afd2da04eeac
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Associates in Office/Store Support positions are responsible for a variety of functions including administrative services, safety and environmental program compliance, cash management, financial record reporting, pricing regulation compliance, labor and pricing adjustments and maintenance, and theft prevention. They work closely with store management, keeping them informed on compliance or risk issues, scheduling activities, and store operational and financial transaction reports. They must demonstrate a high level of integrity at all times, respond to operational concerns of all associates and remain focused on store specific business objectives while supporting key operational responsibilities. Specific Office/Store Support positions may include: Office Associate, Pricing Associate, Pricing Change Associate, and Schedule Writer.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Ensuring that all accounting transactions are complete and error freeHandling troubleshooting issues quickly, accurately and professionallyFacilitating the maintenance and repair of certain computer system related equipment such as cash registers, scanners, scan guns, monitors, signature capture pads, computer room equipment, store network (LAN) equipment, electronic article surveillance (EAS) equipment, time clocks, phone hardware, store PCs, printers, fax machines and copy machinesOrdering supplies and spare parts for common equipment problemsIdentifying possible product knowledge (PK) training needs for AssociatesBuilding associate scheduling to optimize customer service ratings using the Scheduling system softwareMaintaining associate data in automated system to record associate default department assignments and the days and time they are regularly available to workProducing and interpreting performance graphs from the Labor Management system to review recent scheduling effectiveness on a department by department basisActively monitor and price any unpriced merchandise requiring individual item pricingMonitor and correct signage to accurately display the description of a product and its price Conduct audits to ensure price accuracy of scanners, if available, shelf labels and individual price tagsDrive execution of store safety programs and validate compliance with company standards and policies. Validate environmental compliance to company standardsDrive execution of the Company's internal and external theft and fraud strategy. Identify and process customers and suppliers who commit theft and fraud. Maximize merchandise recoveries. Adhere to all Company policies governing apprehensions. Minimize risk of injuries during apprehensionsNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements:Environment:Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odorsTravel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or older Must be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-20 pounds) Additional Qualifications:Physical Job RequirementsBending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items- Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessaryResponding to public address system announcements Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Attention to Detail: Concentrates for an extended period of time; catches errors before completing assignments; maintains high quality standards for his/her work Customer Driven: Provides outstanding customer service (to both internal and external customers); follows through on responsibilities to customers; recovers from any errors made and leaves customer satisfied Gets Things Done: Demonstrates the ability to get results despite a large workload, competing demands and a fast-paced environment Acts with Integrity: Demonstrates responsible and honest behavior in all Home Depot roles",Office/Store Support Job in Riverdale,Full Time,"Riverdale, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/office-store-support-job-riverdale-ga-us-170920182.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2a3bde028fe514391c9de3f07eb9f226
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Project Manager / Heavy Civil Construction Managers Needed for Global, Leading Construction & Engineering Firm – Multiple Texas Locations – Road & Highway Exp. a Plus! Relocation Provided.  Our client is actively seeking Project Managers with experience in the transportation construction sector, and a desire to lead a progressive team.  The hiring organization is a leading company providing critical civil engineering solutions to corporations and government organizations worldwide.  Roles are based in Austin, San Antonio, and Houston areas - relocation assistance provided. This position provides support services during the pre-construction and construction phases and works closely with the Area Manager.  The key Project Managers direct the company’s construction activities as the senior onsite representative, maintaining client expectations and ensuring compliance with contractual obligations on large com projects or multiple small projects.  Primary Responsibilities:·         Responsible for controlling the costs and maintaining profitability for the project(s), utilizing extensive heavy construction experience.·         Manage field construction activity, engineering, and other field project(s) support activities.·         Oversees the development of project(s) schedules and monitors production to assure timely project(s) completion.·         Collaborates with Engineers, Inspectors, and Clients/Owner Representatives to assist in developing solutions.·         Regularly conducts safety meetings and provide assistance to supervision in addressing areas and conditions requiring attention.·         Determines the necessity of construction equipment and assures equipment is properly maintained. Primary Requirements:·         5+ years previous construction management experience.·         Medium to Large project experience ($10M+) is required.·         Bachelor’s Degree in Civil Engineering, Construction Management, or similar discipline is preferred·         Strong leadership skills.·         Strong problem solving and analytical skills.·         Strong prioritization and organizational skills; detail-oriented.·         Experience with highly technical and design-build projects is a plus. Report",Monster,,"Project Manager / Heavy Civil Construction Managers Needed for Global, Leading Construction & Engineering Firm – Multiple Texas Locations – Road & Highway Exp. a Plus! Relocation Provided.  Our client is actively seeking Project Managers with experience in the transportation construction sector, and a desire to lead a progressive team.  The hiring organization is a leading company providing critical civil engineering solutions to corporations and government organizations worldwide.  Roles are based in Austin, San Antonio, and Houston areas - relocation assistance provided. This position provides support services during the pre-construction and construction phases and works closely with the Area Manager.  The key Project Managers direct the company’s construction activities as the senior onsite representative, maintaining client expectations and ensuring compliance with contractual obligations on large com projects or multiple small projects.  Primary Responsibilities:·         Responsible for controlling the costs and maintaining profitability for the project(s), utilizing extensive heavy construction experience.·         Manage field construction activity, engineering, and other field project(s) support activities.·         Oversees the development of project(s) schedules and monitors production to assure timely project(s) completion.·         Collaborates with Engineers, Inspectors, and Clients/Owner Representatives to assist in developing solutions.·         Regularly conducts safety meetings and provide assistance to supervision in addressing areas and conditions requiring attention.·         Determines the necessity of construction equipment and assures equipment is properly maintained. Primary Requirements:·         5+ years previous construction management experience.·         Medium to Large project experience ($10M+) is required.·         Bachelor’s Degree in Civil Engineering, Construction Management, or similar discipline is preferred·         Strong leadership skills.·         Strong problem solving and analytical skills.·         Strong prioritization and organizational skills; detail-oriented.·         Experience with highly technical and design-build projects is a plus.",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-heavy-civil-construction-managers-needed-for-leading-construction-engineering-co-job-austin-tx-us-171272721.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,,18e1814fca69f5f91bdf227f38109d0e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE - Day-to-day management of the store processes for their area of responsibility. Manage projects focusing on process improvement required to respond to and support the Loss Prevention needs of the stores/field.MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES - Develop and implement changes that improve overall store shrink and profit processes that are likely to add value to the stores bottom line.Manage/drive core store operations projects focusing on systems integration or process improvementsManage day to day processes related to their areas of responsibility. Create and maintain project work plansManage issues and roadblocks that arise related to their area of responsibility.Proactively respond to unanticipated store needs arising out of a variety of inputs Manage action steps necessary for successful execution of both strategic projects/initiatives and process improvement Prepare and deliver high-level insights and recommendations based on multiple analyses of industry/ business, competitive landscape, consumer data for their areas of expertise. Hire, train and develop multiple Business analysts Provide guidance and training specific to area of expertise Assist in collaborating findings from data and making verbal/written recommendations Demonstrate proficiency/understanding of specific processesMaintain knowledge base regarding specific operations and processes within store operations Responsible for appropriate selection, terminations, performance appraisal and professional development of support team. NATURE AND SCOPE - Direct and indirect reports typically include 2-5 Business Analysts. Typically requires frequent persuasion or influencing of others.Usually assigns and reviews work of others. Typically procedures for analyzing situations and making conclusions are very diverse. Typically considers among many different options or procedures when solving problems.Typically, once given general assignments, determines priorities and defines what should be done and how to do it. ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS - Under constant pressure to continuously meet tight deadlines, demanding quotas and/or must regularly deal with difficult situations.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS - Must be eighteen years of ageMust pass the Drug TestMust pass pre-employment tests if applicable EDUCATION REQUIRED - The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a bachelor's degree program or equivalent degree in a field of study related to the job. YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 5 PHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS -Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about.On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles. KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES - Business, functional and/or store knowledge for their area of responsibility Strategic thinking skills Quantitative skills $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",LOSS PREVENTION PROCESS MGR Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/loss-prevention-process-mgr-job-atlanta-ga-us-171161882.aspx?mescoid=1100061001001&jobPosition=3,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),8bd8403285de22f0d63266ea13121b62
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hospital Medical/Surgical Registered Nurse (RN) - Atlanta, GA2 years of recent Med/Surg Hospital experienceContract to HireFull time, 7p-7a, or 7a-7p, 36 hours per weekActive GA RN LicenseActive BLSMust be able to pass a drug screenPrestigeRNKeywords: Med/Surg, Medical/Surgical, BLS, RN, Registered Nurse",RN - Medical/Surgical Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-medical-surgical-job-atlanta-ga-us-170701937.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=20,34.00+ /hour,Medical/Health,ea06729578e271c2c0492a5d776c3af0
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,000 stores and 12 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others."" GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a part-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses. DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned. KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer. 12032",LEAD SALES ASSOC-PT,Full Time,"Decatur, GA 30035",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-assoc-pt-2552-wesley-chapel-rd-decatur-ga-job-decatur-ga-us-170684896.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f88f3e2193b4a5d9907e030fd57f553a
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Our Environmental Field Laborers CBPP (Environmental Technicians) are responsible for the performance of tasks associated with hazardous waste clean-up, site-remediation, equipment decontamination and handling of hazardous materials. Why work for Clean Harbors? Health and Safety is our #1 priority and we live it 3-6-5!  We offer all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including: Competitive Competency Based Pay Programs Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion Comprehensive Health, Dental and Life Insurance 401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off Company paid certifications, licenses and training.  What does it take to work for Clean Harbors? High School Diploma or equivalency 6 months construction or general labor experience Willingness to obtain both Confined Space Entry (CSE) and OSHA (40 hour) Certifications Clean Motor Vehicle Record and Valid Driver’s License Safety oriented mindset with the determination to follow all procedures and policies Ability to work on an on-call basis Physically fit To learn more about our company visit us at www.cleanharbors.com. We would like to thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those who complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability. Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company. *SK *CH Potential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Environmental Technician CBPP Job in Tucker,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/environmental-technician-cbpp-job-tucker-ga-us-170805383.aspx?mescoid=1900302001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,28e219e9c654ee462b5ca9f89fbd77e1
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-GA-Atlanta ID  78686 Posted Date  7/7/2016 Category  Customer Services Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Aramark Uniform Services (AUS) provides uniforms and related products to more than 400,000 customers nationwide, in virtually every industry.  From designing and manufacturing to laundering and delivering, AUS works with local and national clients to create and maintain a total uniform solution that promotes teamwork and establishes a professional identity.  AUS operates from over 200 locations nationwide and has an immediate opportunity for Route Sales Support in Atlanta, GA.   Builds solid, positive working relationships with customers and is highly motivated to exceed their expectations and requirements.  AUS operates in a very competitive environment and successful RSRs must be able to balance exceptional customer service with meeting and exceeding individual sales growth goals.  As advocates for the organization, RSRs strive to generate goodwill and loyalty for the organization while performing their work in a professional manner at all times.     Duties and Responsibilities Essential duties and responsibilities of the position include but are not limited to: Safely operates a company step van in designated area to provide products and service to a variety of clients. Verifies daily preventative maintenance of vehicle and maintains proper operator documentation. Manages daily route independently to ensure accurate and timely delivery of product. Loads/unloads product per company policies, procedures, and guidelines. Reviews invoices daily for complete and accurate information and makes corrections as needed. Meets sales goals and promotes overall route growth to enhance profitability.  Develops leads/prospects, calls on prospective customers to solicit business, prepares service agreements, and installs new accounts.  Assists the sales organization with the procurement of additional new business. Understands services, policies, and pricing methods and clearly explains the same to the customer.  Monitors customer feedback and handles customer issues in a prompt and courteous manner. Take responsibility for your personal safety and watch out for the safety of others.  Use safe precautions, proper tools, and equipment, and adhere to all safe work practices and policies. Perform other duties as required or assigned which are reasonably within the scope of the activities enumerated above. Aramark Uniform Services (AUS) provides uniforms and related products to more than 400,000 customers nationwide, in virtually every industry.  From designing and manufacturing to laundering and delivering, AUS works with local and national clients to create and maintain a total uniform solution that promotes teamwork and establishes a professional identity.  AUS operates from over 200 locations nationwide and has an immediate opportunity for Route Sales Support in Atlanta, GA.   Builds solid, positive working relationships with customers and is highly motivated to exceed their expectations and requirements.  AUS operates in a very competitive environment and successful RSRs must be able to balance exceptional customer service with meeting and exceeding individual sales growth goals.  As advocates for the organization, RSRs strive to generate goodwill and loyalty for the organization while performing their work in a professional manner at all times.     Duties and Responsibilities Essential duties and responsibilities of the position include but are not limited to: Safely operates a company step van in designated area to provide products and service to a variety of clients. Verifies daily preventative maintenance of vehicle and maintains proper operator documentation. Manages daily route independently to ensure accurate and timely delivery of product. Loads/unloads product per company policies, procedures, and guidelines. Reviews invoices daily for complete and accurate information and makes corrections as needed. Meets sales goals and promotes overall route growth to enhance profitability.  Develops leads/prospects, calls on prospective customers to solicit business, prepares service agreements, and installs new accounts.  Assists the sales organization with the procurement of additional new business. Understands services, policies, and pricing methods and clearly explains the same to the customer.  Monitors customer feedback and handles customer issues in a prompt and courteous manner. Take responsibility for your personal safety and watch out for the safety of others.  Use safe precautions, proper tools, and equipment, and adhere to all safe work practices and policies. Perform other duties as required or assigned which are reasonably within the scope of the activities enumerated above. High school degree or equivalent. Must be a minimum of 21 years of age, have a valid driver’s license, and excellent driving record. Customer service experience with a wide variety of consistent customer contact. Strong math and basic computer skills. Demonstrated experience selling services/products and generating new business preferred. Excellent customer service and verbal communication skills required. Ability to work independently, exercise sound judgment, and think quickly to identify/solve customer concerns.  Working Conditions Exposure to adverse and varying weather conditions which may include extreme hot/cold temperatures depending on geographical location. Fast-paced environment requiring irregular and long hours.   Physical Requirements Must be able to routinely lift and maneuver a minimum of 25 lbs. and load/unload product from truck without assistance. Must be able to occasionally lift and maneuver 50+ lbs. Requires bending, squatting, climbing, and reaching.   Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Route Sales Support - AUS - Atlanta Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/route-sales-support-aus-atlanta-job-atlanta-ga-us-170770382.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=13,,Food Services/Hospitality,fce2cae0fa093a7388efdb9ec4396b61
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Austin ID  83238 Posted Date  8/5/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Responsible for execution of the meal and understanding the timing of food production and to have all components of ready for consumption Responsible for expediting and maintaining the amount of food produced based on forecasted demand during peak and non-peak service times Communicate with the management to maintain the level of food quality that is expected Ensure daily communication between the day and night shifts regarding items that require long cooking times and planning for upcoming meals Communicate any issues to the staff which could affect the service before each meal period Ability to cook and prepare food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to insure food is prepared in prescribed manner Cuts, trims, bones and carves meats and poultry for cooking Evaluate food quality and preparedness by tasting Ensure food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Evaluate front-of-house presentation and make changes to food displays as needed Sets up/Breaks down work station Maintains a clean, safe and sanitary work station, equipment, and utensils Must be trained to safely operate all kitchen equipment (choppers, slicers, ovens, steamers, a variety of knives, etc.) Responsible for training servers on use of correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Maintain production results of each meal Communicate with management regarding food product that needs to be ordered for upcoming production plans Report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Serve Safe certified Work in other areas as needed Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Responsible for execution of the meal and understanding the timing of food production and to have all components of ready for consumption Responsible for expediting and maintaining the amount of food produced based on forecasted demand during peak and non-peak service times Communicate with the management to maintain the level of food quality that is expected Ensure daily communication between the day and night shifts regarding items that require long cooking times and planning for upcoming meals Communicate any issues to the staff which could affect the service before each meal period Ability to cook and prepare food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to insure food is prepared in prescribed manner Cuts, trims, bones and carves meats and poultry for cooking Evaluate food quality and preparedness by tasting Ensure food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Evaluate front-of-house presentation and make changes to food displays as needed Sets up/Breaks down work station Maintains a clean, safe and sanitary work station, equipment, and utensils Must be trained to safely operate all kitchen equipment (choppers, slicers, ovens, steamers, a variety of knives, etc.) Responsible for training servers on use of correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Maintain production results of each meal Communicate with management regarding food product that needs to be ordered for upcoming production plans Report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Serve Safe certified Work in other areas as needed Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal and communication skills Ability to work in a team environment and demonstrate excellent customers service Must have the ability to manage and support the kitchen staff Minimum 2 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Must be able to understand verbal and written instructions Desired Qualifications: Culinary training or degree 3 or more years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Lead Cook - University of Texas Towers Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-cook-university-of-texas-towers-job-austin-tx-us-170567394.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=19,,Food Services/Hospitality,c914c5ff5aacae65a2d9d3d52d0c5818
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition/Vacancy No. 132820BR Position Title Project Engineer - Hunt Construction Group Job Category Construction Management Business Line Construction Services Country United States of America State/Province/Region USA - Georgia City Atlanta Why Choose AECOM? AECOM is a premier, fully integrated professional and technical services firm positioned to design, build, finance and operate infrastructure assets around the world for public- and private-sector clients. With nearly 100,000 employees — including architects, engineers, designers, planners, scientists and management and construction services professionals — serving clients in over 150 countries around the world, AECOM is ranked as the #1 engineering design firm by revenue in _Engineering News-Record_ magazine’s annual industry rankings, and has been recognized by _Fortune_ magazine as a World’s Most Admired Company. The firm is a leader in all of the key markets that it serves, including transportation, facilities, environmental, energy, oil and gas, water, high-rise buildings and government. AECOM provides a blend of global reach, local knowledge, innovation and technical excellence in delivering customized and creative solutions that meet the needs of clients’ projects. A _Fortune 500_ firm, AECOM companies, including URS Corporation and Hunt Construction Group, have annual revenue of approximately $19 billion. More information on AECOM and its services can be found at www.aecom.com About the Business LineConstruction Services Our talented experts are dedicated to managing the complexity inherent in construction projects, catering to each client’s unique needs. We provide services such as program management, construction management and owner’s representation to our clients around the globe. Job Summary This position will work for Hunt Construction Group in Atlanta, GA on the Mercedes-Benz Stadium. Overview: The Hunt Construction Group team spans across the entire country, and comprises of over 800 employees including skilled trades professionals. Whether located in a Hunt regional office or on a jobsite, our relationship-oriented work environment shines through; every Hunt employee is valued, appreciated and treated with respect. Hunt Construction Group has been in the construction industry for nearly 70 years with tangible, positive results that we do the job right. The Hunt team works to create strong client-relationships, and we emphasize quality and skill-utilization in every aspect of construction, no matter the type of project. We strive to bring a relational aspect to the job as well, and we take pride in the loyalty and dedication given to each project and every client. Hunt employees have a strong commitment to their clients, because we recognize that solid, long-term relationships enhance the value of our services. Our primary focus is to help our customers in their building and construction needs. Hunt Construction Group excels because we are abundant with the right people producing the right results, every time. Responsibilities: This position will have a focus in quality control and assessment. Provides technical engineering information to company supervision and specialty contractors to ensure the project complies with all engineering standards, codes, specifications and design instructions. Reviews, analyzes and resolves field construction problems, discrepancies and interferences with architect/engineer, owner and/or specialty contractors. Performs all functions and responsibilities in partnership with the company’s culture, corporate vision, ethics and code of conduct. + Document Control, submittals, Cost Engineering, quality control and safety observations. + Timely, complete and accurate generation of selected subcontract agreements and purchase orders. + Assist in the solicitation of proposals and selection of specialty contractors. + Time and accurate interpretation of design documents to facilitate problem solutions. + Research and recommend solutions to design document problems, including conflicts, interferences and errors/omissions. + Monitor field work contract work to ensure compliance with company standards, procedures and specifications and codes. + Responsible for continuous updating and accurate generations of as-built documents and contract documents. + Research and preparation of change requests to resolve design issues for approval. + Prepare and implement quality control procedures such as instructions, inspection programs, control measuring and testing equipment. + Responsible for clear and tractable document control in accordance with established policies and procedures, including utilizing management systems to create/track RFI’s, transmit/track submittals, compose agreements and maintain project expediting list. + Attend and actively participate in project coordination and owner/contractor/architect/engineer meetings as requested or required. + Coordinate periodic job-related photographs for records. + Actively assist junior Project Engineer’s in gaining on-the-job training and counsel them on the skills and competencies they must acquire to be successful in the pursuit of their personal development goals. + Responsible for continuously expanding and updating professional knowledge and honing skills and competencies to enhance individual and team innovation and productivity. + Perform additional duties and assignments as assumed or directed by supervision. Minimum Requirements Four year construction or engineering degree or equivalent training and experience. + Minimum of 2 years construction engineering experience in the field as Assistant Project Engineer, including co-op or intern experience. + Working knowledge of assigned discipline design and overall engineering standards is necessary. + Must be proficient in MS Office. Ability to read plans required. + Experience with QA/QC Preferred Qualifications . What We Offer AECOM is a place where you can put your innovative thinking and business skills into high gear and work alongside other highly intelligent and motivated people. It's a place where you can apply your skills to some of the world's most challenging, interesting, and meaningful projects worldwide. It's a place that values the diversity of our areas of practice and our people. It's what makes AECOM a great place to work and grow. AECOM is an equal opportunity employer and Minorities, Females, Veterans, and Disabled persons are encouraged to apply. For further information, please click here at http://www.aecom.com/content/wp-content/uploads/2016/01/EEO-is-the-Law-poster-supplement.pdf to view the EEO Is The Law poster.",Project Engineer - Hunt Construction Group Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-hunt-construction-group-job-atlanta-ga-us-170864180.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8af89af6ce41e0e49a8a642a558716c3
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE - Reduce costs and improve service to stores by taking control of and managing specific assigned areas of Logistics management,Own Channel Management responsibilities for certain merchandising departments’ flow across RDCs/BDCs/SDCs/DTS networksOnboard suppliers to appropriate network flow path, negotiate discounts to drive Supply Chain P&L and continuously manage supplier level business cases for assigned merchandising departmentsInterface with Merchandising as Supply Chain representative. Support their buying and sourcing strategies by optimizing Supply Chain flow of their productsLead onboarding efforts to Supply Chain Optimization/Synchronization for domestic and import phasesEngage vendors, manage internal relationships with Merchandising & IPR and drive alignment to the engineered flow scheduleTransition a sustainable supplier onboarding implementation to IPR and drive continuous improvement throughout Synchronization effortsDrive supplier level business case and performance for Sync to include utilization of truckloads, on-time shipping and overall executionRepresent Supply Chain during PLRs / BRsIdentify opportunities to improve margin or drive turns through analytics, scenario analysis and tradeoff reviews for PLRs/BRs within assigned Merchandising departmentsProvide recommendations to Merchandising for import/domestic buys, network flow path, Supply Chain financial impacts, etcMaintain an end to end view of opportunities across all Supply Chain disciplines (inventory, transportation, distribution)MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES - Provide support and direction for area's efforts. Manage all aspects of assigned area's of operations and programs. Participate in strategic planning and facilitate action on these plans for the assigned area. Provide technical logistics expertise on assigned area as well as store/retail expertise as needed.. Plan resources in order to complete competing priorities within the provided timeframe. Prepare project design and timelines. Select, develop, and motivate assigned staff. May have limited authoirty to negotiate transportation costs for in-bound and/or outbound freight. NATURE AND SCOPE - Typically reports to Supply Chain Management. May have Direct and indirect reports Typically requires highly developed interpersonal skills for dealing with sensitive or controversial situations. Typically faces situations that have a variety of interpretations and require careful evaluation. Typically considers new approaches within general policies and short-term goals when solving problems. Typically, once given general assignments, determines priorities and defines what should be done and how to do it. ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS - Under regular pressure to meet deadlines, quotas and/or must frequently deal with difficult issues related to people or situations.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS - Must be eighteen years of age or older.Must pass the Drug Test.Must pass pre-employment test if applicable.EDUCATION REQUIRED - The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a bachelor's degree program or equivalent degree in a field of study related to the job. YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 6 PHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS - Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles. PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS - Nine to twelve years of experience is preferred. Experience in the Logistics field preferred Management experience preferred KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES - Experience in the Logistics field Management experience $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",SR MGR LOGISTICS Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-mgr-logistics-job-atlanta-ga-us-171174709.aspx?mescoid=1100026001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),c326f783da4e67cf0817989fb35f1fdd
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Comcast brings together the best in media and technology. We drive innovation to create the world's best entertainment and online experiences. As a Fortune 50 leader, we set the pace in a variety of innovative and fascinating businesses and create career opportunities across a wide range of locations and disciplines. We are at the forefront of change and move at an amazing pace, thanks to our remarkable people, who bring cutting-edge products and services to life for millions of customers every day. If you share in our passion for teamwork, our vision to revolutionize industries and our goal to lead the future in media and technology, we want you to fast-forward your career at Comcast. Job Summary:Responsible for acting as Lead Analyst in the daily operations of theBilling Systems department. Assists in the standardization of policiesand procedures. Implements software upgrades, software conversions, newtechnologies roll outs in the markets, process of testing procedures for new and modified applications, and software enhancements to thereporting system. Provides support during implementation of newtools/technologies including: InfoDDP, Data Warehouse, DAC, DNCS, COMET, SQL, SRS Reporting, COGNOS, Oracle, and billing system softwarereleases. Develops, maintains, and utilizes external databases forrequests that cannot be accomplished through the billing system.Integrates knowledge of business and functional priorities. Acts as akey contributor in a complex and crucial environment. May lead teams orprojects and shares expertise.Core Responsibilities:- Develops and evaluates strategies for existing reporting personnel.- Applies extensive knowledge of Billing Systems database to meetreporting requests and helps other departments improve efficiencies.- Analyzes reports and billing systems.- Monitors all data output to assure validity to the user, as well asmaintain integrity of the database.- Reviews and evaluates existing workflow of the department and makesrecommendations to help improve processes.- Researches new projects and the impact of those projects for alldepartments.- Serves as a point person for Billing Systems department in projectplanning meetings.- Trains and provides guidance to others regarding any reportingprocesses.- Provides timely written and verbal communication on updates ofprojects.- Consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in mattersof significance.- Regular, consistent and punctual attendance. Must be able to worknights and weekends, variable schedule(s) as necessary.- Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.Job Specification:- Bachelors Degree or Equivalent- Information Sciences, Technology, Computer Science-- Generally requires 7+ years related experience Comcast is an EOE/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer",Analyst,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30339",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/analyst-4-finance-job-atlanta-ga-us-170197859.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),56bfef739d0a8af7afa6a194ff04e604
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,000 stores and 12 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others."" GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a part-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses. DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned. KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer. 12309",LEAD SALES ASSOC-PT,Full Time,"Morrow, GA 30260",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-assoc-pt-5220-jonesboro-rd-ste-b-morrow-ga-job-morrow-ga-us-170752049.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3ec534a91c7f71e34a90c844cd87ab20
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition/Vacancy No. 139248BR Position Title Project Manager - MEP Systems - Hunt Construction Group Job Category Construction Management Business Line Construction Services Country United States of America State/Province/Region USA - Texas City Austin Why Choose AECOM? AECOM is a premier, fully integrated professional and technical services firm positioned to design, build, finance and operate infrastructure assets around the world for public- and private-sector clients. With nearly 100,000 employees — including architects, engineers, designers, planners, scientists and management and construction services professionals — serving clients in over 150 countries around the world, AECOM is ranked as the #1 engineering design firm by revenue in _Engineering News-Record_ magazine’s annual industry rankings, and has been recognized by _Fortune_ magazine as a World’s Most Admired Company. The firm is a leader in all of the key markets that it serves, including transportation, facilities, environmental, energy, oil and gas, water, high-rise buildings and government. AECOM provides a blend of global reach, local knowledge, innovation and technical excellence in delivering customized and creative solutions that meet the needs of clients’ projects. A _Fortune 500_ firm, AECOM companies, including URS Corporation and Hunt Construction Group, have annual revenue of approximately $19 billion. More information on AECOM and its services can be found at www.aecom.com About the Business LineConstruction Services Our talented experts are dedicated to managing the complexity inherent in construction projects, catering to each client’s unique needs. We provide services such as program management, construction management and owner’s representation to our clients around the globe. Job Summary This position will work for Hunt Construction Group in Austin, Texas. Company Overview The Hunt Construction Group team spans across the entire country, and comprises of over 800 employees including skilled trades professionals. Whether located in a Hunt regional office or on a jobsite, our relationship-oriented work environment shines through; every Hunt employee is valued, appreciated and treated with respect. Hunt Construction Group has been in the construction industry for nearly 70 years with tangible, positive results that we do the job right. The Hunt team works to create strong client-relationships, and we emphasize quality and skill-utilization in every aspect of construction, no matter the type of project. We strive to bring a relational aspect to the job as well, and we take pride in the loyalty and dedication given to each project and every client. Hunt employees have a strong commitment to their clients, because we recognize that solid, long-term relationships enhance the value of our services. Our primary focus is to help our customers in their building and construction needs. Hunt Construction Group excels because we are abundant with the right people producing the right results, every time. Responsibilities Provides overall management administration to project and assists in establishing project specific objectives and policies. Provides technical direction and guidance to subordinate managers, enforces company and project policies, maintains close client interface, and ensures all facets of the project are constructed in accordance with design, budget and schedule through subordinate manages and supervisors. Position has significant profit/loss responsibility for assigned construction project. Performs all functions and responsibilities in partnership with the company’s culture, corporate vision, ethics and code of conduct. + Implement corporate policies, procedures and organizational structure for assigned operating segments within the framework of corporate policy. + Reviews project proposal or plan to determine and establish time frame, work plan, funding limitations, procedures for accomplishing project, staffing requirements and allotment of available resources to various phases of the project. + Plan, organize and staff key field positions through construction manager and contract manager. + Oversee/control construction through administrative direction of on-site superintendents to ensure project is built in accordance with design, budget and schedule. Includes interfacing with client representatives, A/E representatives and subcontractors. + Review all bid packages prior to distribution to bidders and review all correspondence/proposals prior to submission to client to insure accuracy and completeness. + Plan, coordinate and/or manage activities of all company personnel on assigned project(s). + In collaboration with other project leaders, authorize/approve project personnel transactions (hiring, transfers, wages, etc.) purchase requisitions, change requests, etc. + Manage financial aspects of contract including fee payment, rental equipment, income/expenses, etc. to protect company’s interests and simultaneously maintain good relationship with client. + Ensure all company, client and project policies/procedures are adhered to as specified. + Provide advice, guidance, mentoring and direction to subordinates and other junior personnel toward the achievement of their personal development goals. + Responsible for continuously expanding and updating professional knowledge and honing skills and competencies to enhance individual and team innovation and productivity. + Accommodate additional responsibilities as assumed through personal initiative or assigned by higher authority. We become greater by sharing in and embracing the richness of our differences. Each of us brings new perspectives, experiences, skills, abilities and knowledge to our everyday tasks. Although we may be different in race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status or other protected status, we believe the presence of these differences to be representative of a strong and positive team. At no time do we consider these differences in any employment opportunity or condition, and all candidates that are qualified for any opportunity which we have currently available are encouraged and welcomed to apply through our established application processes without concern regarding their differences. Our organization embraces and welcomes diversity, is a drug-free environment and actively participates in E-Verify to verify employment eligibility. Equal Opportunity Employer – Minorities, Females, Disabled and Veterans Minimum Requirements + Educational and experience includes a four year construction, engineering or related degree or equivalent experience. + 5 or more years construction experience including advance knowledge of mechanical, electrical, Instrumentation & Controls, risk management and field operations required. + Excellent organizational, leadership, communication and analytical skills are necessities with a strong focus on preconstruction services, program management and application. + Strong ability to budget, schedule (P6 experience a plus) and possess an understanding of commissioning process. Preferred Qualifications Oracle/CMiC experience a plus. .LI-BB1 What We Offer AECOM is a place where you can put your innovative thinking and business skills into high gear and work alongside other highly intelligent and motivated people. It's a place where you can apply your skills to some of the world's most challenging, interesting, and meaningful projects worldwide. It's a place that values the diversity of our areas of practice and our people. It's what makes AECOM a great place to work and grow. AECOM is an equal opportunity employer and Minorities, Females, Veterans, and Disabled persons are encouraged to apply. For further information, please click here at http://www.aecom.com/deployedfiles/Internet/Careers/Diversity%20and%20Inclusion/EEO%20is%20the%20Law%20Poster%20Supplement.pdf to view the EEO Is The Law poster.",Project Manager - MEP Systems - Hunt Construction Group Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-mep-systems-hunt-construction-group-job-austin-tx-us-170861335.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b458654b8fc0b9b9c98a8fc6632fc696
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENERAL SUMMARY OF DUTIES - The Office Administrator provides technical, administrative, and front office reception assistance to the field office. Responsibilities of this position include: personnel file maintenance, preparing materials for orientation, annual update, or other educational forums. Greets customers, answers telephone and screens calls, takes messages, and provides information to callers and walk-ins. Under the direction of the Regional Operations Director or Director of Staffing, the Office Administrator provides local Human Resource and Employee Relations functions, ensuring staff compliance with regulatory and corporate directives, policies and procedures, credentials and competency requirements of clinical staff, recruitment activities, and collaboration with facilities and management staff. SUPERVISOR -Regional Operations Director or Director of Staffing; dotted line to Area Vice President or Regional Vice President SUPERVISES - None ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO:Overall responsibility for compliance with current Federal, State and Local Standards, HCA Corporate guidelines, and JCAHO regulations that govern the human resources functions.Manages and maintains pre-placement testing and clinical assessments annually.Manages employee credentialing process and ensures that employees meet pre-placement requirements.Maintains various systems used for maintaining employee records (Lawson, StaffPM)Ensures all Human Resources data requirements are met and in employee files.Coordinates new employee orientations for all employees and facilitates and/orprovides training and education programs to the workforce.Manages annual open enrollment and communicates benefit changes to employees.Investigates employee grievances as needed.Ensures the communication and implementation of new or updated HR policies and procedures and corporate directives to employees and Vendors.Ensures compliance with Fair Labor Standards in administration of all compensation practices.Ensures completion and recordkeeping of OIG/GSA reports along withprocesses requests in Lawson (leave of absences, address changes, one time payments, etc.)Prepares various reports (new hire, inactive nurse report etc.)Participates in HR conference calls with Corporate PWS HR team as needed.Participates in vendor and HR audits as required.Other duties as assigned. KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, & ABILITIES - This position requires the following minimal requirements:Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Ability to manage stress appropriately and make decisions under pressure.Ability to handle multiple priorities.Ability to work independently and within a team environment.Ability to manage conflict resolution.Proficiency with Microsoft office products, Outlook.Ability to learn new software programsMaintains working area and equipment in accordance with environmental and safety regulations EDUCATION -High school or GED Equivalent; 2 yr Associate Degree preferred EXPERIENCE -1-2 years experience in Human Resources preferred CERTIFICATE/LICENSE - None PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORKING CONDITIONS -Exert up to 20 lbs force occasionally, and/or up to 10 lbs frequently.Requires prolonged sitting some walking, standing, repetitive tasks/ motions and stretching.Requires clarity of vision, eye-hand-foot coordination and manual dexterity sufficient to operate a keyboard, photocopier, telephone, and other office equipment.Requires the perceiving the nature of sounds at normal speaking levels with or without correction; ability to receive detailed information through oral communication, and to make the discriminations in soundRequires normal eyesight to record, prepare, and communicate appropriate reports.Requires dexterity to type",Office Administrator Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-administrator-job-austin-tx-us-171339790.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,e41c3c3d76ce7cc3784f6b74598d6a73
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Prospects for new customers via phone, interactively and in-person within relevant industries to present and close on commercial pest control services and products. Creates new business at the local and regional levels, and follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction, increase existing business and obtain referrals. Collaborates with internal departments to deliver solutions and provide quality service to new and existing customers. Responsibilities 1. Prospects for new customers via phone interactively through tip groups, networking, cross-selling and referrals, and by canvassing for large potential customers in industries such as food grade, food processing, distribution/logistics, healthcare, manufacturing, and companies with multiple physical locations. 2. Presents commercial pest control services and products to potential customers through in-person presentations and electronic communications. 3. Creates new business at the local and regional and national levels through creative calls, leads, prospecting, networking, cross-selling and referrals. 4. Follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction of service and products and to obtain referrals for new business. 5. Collaborates with the National Accounts department to deliver solutions to multi-unit locations assigned as contract leads. 6. Works with Branch Managers, Sales Managers, Service Managers, Region Managers and service professionals to ensure quality service delivery to new and existing customers; assists in resolving customer issues. Education and Experience Requirements • High School Diploma or GED equivalent • Associate’s or Bachelor’s degree preferred, or equivalent combination of education and experience • Two or more years experience in business-to-business (B2B) sales; proven sales history with increasing sales amounts year after year Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Demonstrated knowledge of selling techniques (prospecting, overcoming objections, presentation skills, gaining commitment, negotiation) • Skill in taking independent action and being a self-starter • Skill in written and verbal communication • Ability to build customer relationships and provide appropriate levels of customer service • Business acumen and the ability to calculate numbers and amounts • Skill with Microsoft Office software applications (Word, Outlook, Excel, PowerPoint) • Skill in adapting to new company software and using the internet to research target industries and specific businesses • Ability to travel locally on an extensive basis Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Business Development Rep / BB Sales / Outside Sales Job in Doraville,"Full Time, Employee","Doraville, GA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-rep-b2b-sales-outside-sales-job-doraville-ga-us-170809508.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=17,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,4dd32402042a344e88c11c4cf544251b
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Paramount Staffing is currently seeking a full time Recruiting Assistant to join our dynamic team of professionals! This position entails providing administrative support to one of our top legal recruiters. The ideal candidate will possess excellent communication skills, ability to multitask fluidly, and a passion for expanding their knowledge and experience of recruiting and sales. This is a great opportunity for an entry level candidate to get their foot in the door of recruiting and HR! Job Duties: -       Scheduling candidate interviews, both in house and with client sites-       Reference checking-       Resume conversions-       Candidate follow up-       Generate and post all job postings on career websites-       Maintain candidate relationships-       Sourcing candidates using social media outlets-       Research target markets  Required Education:A Bachelor’s Degree is required!  Required Years of Experience:1+ years of office experience  Required Technical/Functional Skills: -       Ability to perform general business skills using MS office-       Ability to effectively and professionally present information and respond to questions by recruiters, clients, prospects and candidates-       Ability to assist in building client relationships-       Adaptable and flexible-       Strong organizational skills-       Ability to see the “big picture” in recruiting-       Internet experience using job boards or other social media outlets to recruit candidates  Paramount Staffing benefits:-Competitive salary-Annual raises based on company productivity-Company matched 401K program-Full medical, dental and vision benefits-Generous PTO accrual",Entry Level Recruiting Assistant Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30305",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-recruiting-assistant-job-atlanta-ga-us-171220864.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=13,$14.00+ /hour,Entry Level,6837b5729ee10c70662701e16f66baa0
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-austin-tx-us-170857781.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6e2ccb5a4bb421d67ba53825ba64128f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition/Vacancy No. 133066BR Position Title Senior Architect Job Category Architecture and Design Business Line Architecture Country United States of America State/Province/Region USA - Georgia City Atlanta Why Choose AECOM? AECOM is a premier, fully integrated professional and technical services firm positioned to design, build, finance and operate infrastructure assets around the world for public- and private-sector clients. With nearly 100,000 employees — including architects, engineers, designers, planners, scientists and management and construction services professionals — serving clients in over 150 countries around the world, AECOM is ranked as the #1 engineering design firm by revenue in _Engineering News-Record_ magazine’s annual industry rankings, and has been recognized by _Fortune_ magazine as a World’s Most Admired Company. The firm is a leader in all of the key markets that it serves, including transportation, facilities, environmental, energy, oil and gas, water, high-rise buildings and government. AECOM provides a blend of global reach, local knowledge, innovation and technical excellence in delivering customized and creative solutions that meet the needs of clients’ projects. A _Fortune 500_ firm, AECOM companies, including URS Corporation and Hunt Construction Group, have annual revenue of approximately $19 billion. More information on AECOM and its services can be found at www.aecom.com About the Business LineArchitecture We help shape the world around us — from high-rise buildings to educational, cultural, research and transportation facilities. Our design process is based on energy-efficient building systems, and appropriate selection of materials and form to maximize environmental conditions and long-term performance. Job Summary AECOM is actively seeking a creative, highly talented Senior Architect for immediate employment in the Atlanta office. Responsibilities may include, but are not limited to: + Identifying potential clients and work + Securing and managing clients and work + Assisting Business Line Manager in the development of new business, and marketing efforts + Leading the A/E design efforts on major projects + Providing technical and professional guidance for junior staff + Preparing studies and providing peer reviews + Organizing and planning projects and preparing man-hours estimates + Assisting in the development of architectural standards and procedures + Providing quality control reviews + Providing advice and consultation to clients on architectural matters, including compliance with codes and regulations Minimum Requirements + Bachelor's degree in Architecture + Licensed as a Registered Architect + 10+ years of related experience with Architectural or A/E firm + Extensive experience in developing and prepare construction documents for institutional, commercial and federal projects + Strong technical skills related to planning, and architectural design and detailing + Experience coordinating work, civil, structural and MEP disciplines + Field experience with observing construction progress and capable of providing construction administration services + Experience in mentoring and supervising junior staff architects and interior designers + Ability to clearly communicate with Clients and peers + Proficiency in Revit, AutoCad and Microsoft Office Applications + Diversified knowledge of architectural principles and practices in broad areas of assignments and related fields + Project Management and Client management skills + Valid driver's license Preferred Qualifications + Active in professional societies + US Citizenship preferred + Ability to obtain a clearance if needed + Federal project experience + FAA project experience + Strong presentation skills + Strong communication skills + Positive attitude + Vision for career growth What We Offer AECOM is a place where you can put your innovative thinking and business skills into high gear and work alongside other highly intelligent and motivated people. It's a place where you can apply your skills to some of the world's most challenging, interesting, and meaningful projects worldwide. It's a place that values the diversity of our areas of practice and our people. It's what makes AECOM a great place to work and grow. AECOM is an equal opportunity employer and Minorities, Females, Veterans, and Disabled persons are encouraged to apply. For further information, please click here at http://www.aecom.com/deployedfiles/Internet/Careers/Diversity%20and%20Inclusion/EEO%20is%20the%20Law%20Poster%20Supplement.pdf to view the EEO Is The Law poster.",Senior Architect Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-architect-job-atlanta-ga-us-170864170.aspx?mescoid=1700157001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2f3151221a4c32d6d814ab8d42121f5f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Austin ID  85277 Posted Date  8/24/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cook - The Summit Cafe / Starbucks at Summit Cafe Job in Austin,"Part Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-the-summit-cafe-starbucks-at-summit-cafe-job-austin-tx-us-171317926.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=7,,Food Services/Hospitality,82129b2f36ebc72a53c240ba20b12015
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Development Program Manager in Austin, Texas (TX). The Development Manager must have experience creating work breakdown structures and development of program schedules and assigning software development team personnel to tasks. Must have experience in the tracking resources and expenditures and in ensuring program success. Summary: In this position, you will manage a portfolio of software development projects for both new applications and enhancements and bug-fixes for existing applications. Will oversee the development, implementation and execution of project plans for all development projects; ensure scope and schedule are established for projects, ensure resource allocation and prioritization and staff deployment. Ensure team adheres to applicable government and enterprise policies, processes, and architecture. Manage several development teams which are generally each composed of Developers and Business Analysts who must work closely with our business customers. This role will work closely with the Enterprise Architecture team and the Project Management Office (PMO). Responsibilities: Manages an application, software development unit and/or portfolio of applications and ensures system, technical and product architectures are aligned with business objectives Ensures application or portfolio of applications are enhanced and maintained to meet business functional need and vendor product maintenance remains current Oversees the development, implementation and execution of project plans; ensures scope and schedule are established for projects and assignments Works with customers and technical staff to ensure service level agreements are met, problems are resolved in a timely manner, application enhancements are completed and process and technical improvements are identified and implemented to improve overall operational efficiencyREQUIREMENTS: Bachelors or Master's degree in Computer Science, Engineering Management or other Engineering or Technical discipline is required At least eight years' experience in Software Development in a leadership role Demonstrated success in application development and in managing a portfolio of enterprise-level applications Requires excellent analytical ability, consultative, communication, presentation and management skills, strong judgment and ability to work effectively with business customers, IT Management and supporting technical and project staff Requires strong negotiation, facilitation and consensus building skills; In-depth knowledge of project planning methodologies and tools and IT standards and guidelines; knowledge of management concepts, practices and techniques In-depth knowledge of IT concepts, strategies, and methodologies; thorough knowledge of business functions and operations, objectives and strategies Experience with multiple SDLCs and industry best practices Experience with the VA's PMAS/ProPath methodology also a plus Proven experience delivering production-quality server side applications in a professional software engineering role, developing in C#, C++, or Java Experience with SQL, big data paradigms, web technologies, and SOA (Service Oriented Architecture) highly desired",Development Program Manager Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX 73301",,http://jobview.monster.com/development-program-manager-job-austin-tx-us-170874088.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),41c045a3d62ee7fc234557304b407630
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Commercial Construction Superintendent Needed to Deliver Projects 1-20 million, Austin, TX Our clients are General Contractors and are involved in a number of high profile Commercial Construction Projects in a number of states. They work in the general commercial and retail sectors fulfilling both ground-up and interiors project work and currently and are expanding rapidly. Having secured a large number of projects throughout the US, they are now looking to find an experienced Construction Superintendent to join the team and deliver complex, high quality ground up construction and interior projects in the range of $1m to $20m. Working as a Superintendent you will provide support to the Project Managers on construction projects taking responsibility for the day to day management of construction site based activities. You will be an experienced Superintendent or Senior Superintendent with 3+ years' experience working on commercial construction projects and be comfortable with high pressure and time sensitive complex building projects. An eye for detail, strong communication skills and familiarity on retail/ commercial ground up construction and interior remodels will be essential to succeed in this role.",Commercial Superintendent Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-superintendent-job-austin-tx-us-171078805.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=3,"70,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,6b1e16378eb01dcf9327bd5caf8d6d9f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:04:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for a .NET Support Lead in Atlanta, Georgia (GA).Essential Functions: Engages in developing proof of concepts (POCs) for new programs and conducts peer code reviews Handles customer business requirement elicitations independently Develops high level functional and technical design specifications into design Coordinates in resolving highly complex software development issues that arise in production environments Understands the entire Project context, and demonstrates the knowledge of end-to-end application architecture; awareness on hardware, operating systems software, application programs, or network Mentors and train technical Associates Drives the software development Life Cycle (SDLC) concept and software development methodologies framework for structuring, planning, and controlling the process of developing an information system Leads customer interaction on technical issues and contributes on proposal writing Builds solution design for support and maintenance work for moderate to complex service environment Impact is on multiple areas, functions or processes Responsible for multiple applicationsREQUIREMENTS: Candidates for this role must have relevant experience and skills to perform the tasks above Any relevant education and/or training will be considered a plus",.NET Support Lead Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/net-support-lead-job-atlanta-ga-us-171253401.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0b2d6b9c23bbcbde30739e02c292cd7a
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:09:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title Shipping and Receiving Coordinator Auto Req ID 40478BR Job Description Overview: This position is responsible for overseeing shipping and receiving duties, asset tracking, and general facility tasks for both VMware Austin locations. Primary Location: Austin – River Place Job Title:  Shipping and Receiving Coordinator  Main Roles and Responsibilities:  Process all incoming and outgoing mail/shipmentsEnsure all incoming mail is sorted correctly and ensure effective distribution to intended recipientsResponsible for asset tracking and documentation according to company policyHelpNow dispatch and service within regionCorrectly log incoming packages with company software/online toolsDeliver between 2 Austin locationsResponsible for meeting department SLAs and providing excellent customer service Manage related vendors, maintain/order supplies, expense tracking and budget related activities, as required Assist with special projects (moves, audits, etc)Demonstrate leadership, responsiveness and creativity in finding solutions for service areaRespond promptly and courteously to all business communications and requests (via phone, email, service tools, etc)Perform basic REW related tasks at both locationsResponsible for fulfilling basic maintenance and manual labor requestsEnsure organization and cleanliness of mailroom, shipping and receiving areasEnsure adherence to any site specific building regulations for incoming/outgoing deliveriesProvide support for facilities team, manager, and regional manager, as neededParticipate in ERT and fire warden program Act as back up support for technical issues onsite (IT, AV, Building, etc)Assist with meeting room configuration, as requested  Requirements: Valid Texas Driver’s License and valid proof of insurance 3+ years of shipping and receiving, facilities, and/or related experienceHigh School diploma or equivalent  Strong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to multitask and work without direct supervisionHighly organized with attention to detail Aptitude with technology devices, programs and applications Proficient in MS Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint)Ability to interact well with all levels of employees and staffCreative, high energy, team playerMust be able to lift 50 lbs   Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $58.3 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for’ in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years •America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive yearsThis partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com Information Security StatementEmployees are expected, at all times, to perform their responsibilities in accordance with the JLL Code of Business Ethics and the firm’s corporate policies. Employees granted access to the firm’s information technology are expected to follow the firm’s guidance designed to promote best practices for information security, data privacy and the appropriate use of technology systems. EEO Statement JLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",Shipping and Receiving Coordinator Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-coordinator-job-austin-tx-us-171212261.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),678cb6a8eb4670978776ef4185708f05
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:12:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Department Supervisors train, coach and develop associates in each department to ensure customers receive excellent service and can easily find the merchandise they need. In addition they provide valuable input into merchandising decisions to the Store Management Team and Operations Team. Department Supervisors have strong product knowledge and the ability to lead and develop others. Specific store departments may include Building Materials, Décor, Electrical, Flooring, Gardening, Hardware, Kitchen & Bath, Lumber, Millwork, Paint, Plumbing, Pro Account Sales, Tool Rental, Front End, Freight, Receiving, Associate Support, Special Services, and Merchandising Execution.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Supervise the work activities of Associates within his/her areaCommunicate store objectives to Associates using the appropriate programs and toolsTrain and develop Associates within the work team, through the management of training calendar and curriculumEngage in coaching for the development of AssociatesParticipate in the interview process for hiring of new Associates and partner with store management on recommendationsProvide input into appropriate discipline decisions related to AssociatesProvide input to the Associates on performance appraisals and make recommendations on promotion of associates in his/her areaNature and Scope:Accountable for direct supervision of the work activities of subordinates, which requires planning, monitoring and review of workDirect supervision of a shift or the coordination of multiple work groupsMakes recommendations concerning selection, termination, performance appraisal and professional developmentDue to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service: Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge: Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions: Seeks to fully understand the customers needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed; until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills - Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customers concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Department Supervisor Job in Riverdale,Full Time,"Riverdale, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/department-supervisor-job-riverdale-ga-us-170848588.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),20a1162e5f30871e3d10eb16a48e9ef6
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:14:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Role : Project Manager with BenchmarkLocation : Atlanta, GA(Need Locals)Primary Skills : Benchmark, Pioneer Court Cause Management, Project ManagementExperience Level : 8+ YearsDuration : 12-15 MonthsPosition Type : Contract Job Description and Required Skills : · 8+ years Project/Program Management experience· Recent experience working with Benchmark by Pioneer Court Case Management Software· Experience implementingBenchmark by Pioneer Court Case Management Software Report",Hire IT People Job Application for Project Manager with Benchmark | Monster.com requirejs.config({ baseUrl: 'http://jobview.monster.com/v/Assets/release/js' }); var DYNAMIC_S_ACCOUNT = 'newjobsProdSeekerUS'; var DYNAMIC_S_CURRENCYCODE = 'USD'; requirejs.config({ paths: { //'amc': '//media.monster.com/js/sc/sitecatalystLL' 'amc': '//securemedia.newjobs.com/mm/rainbow/coda/ubd/js/siteCatalystLL' } }); require(['at'],,"Role : Project Manager with BenchmarkLocation : Atlanta, GA(Need Locals)Primary Skills : Benchmark, Pioneer Court Cause Management, Project ManagementExperience Level : 8+ YearsDuration : 12-15 MonthsPosition Type : Contract Job Description and Required Skills : · 8+ years Project/Program Management experience· Recent experience working with Benchmark by Pioneer Court Case Management Software· Experience implementingBenchmark by Pioneer Court Case Management Software",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-with-benchmark-job-atlanta-ga-us-171085198.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,,dc4c8fa8e7f5fc9986f0df24257a2c73
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:19:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Data Engineer sought by Cardlytics, Inc. in Atlanta, GA. Req BS in CS or a rltd fld +5yrs in Data manipultn, data QA & montring. Req exp docmtng & undrstng data flws. Req exp w/ BI tols & in Data Warhosng. Req exp in MS SQL. Auth to wrk in US. Aply @ www.jobpostingtoday.com #73785",Senior Data Engineer Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30308",All,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-data-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-171175773.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),507bf69e3aa52df685ddc5115d45e11a
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:00:27:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales AgentWhile a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings.Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers.Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team.Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today.About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30312",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-atlanta-ga-us-170579149.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=18,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,93a3ef0876b432822d7e242147d5d9ac
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:01:46:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales AgentWhile a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings.Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers.Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team.Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today.About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30311",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-atlanta-ga-us-170579148.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=3,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,8ae00b9e8f016204781ffb0d0c7319ee
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:01:47:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:    Mission: This position focuses on the coaching, implementation, and setup of material flow lineside implementations.     The Solutions Engineer will develop creative, yet implementable solutions to our customer's day to day problems, leveraging knowledge of transportation, warehousing, and manufacturing logistics engineering.  This position will be a change agent, using a process oriented, data driven, and customer focused approach.  The successful candidate will be team oriented with strong organization, problem solving, and communication skills, as well as the ability to support multiple tasks autonomously.  The Solutions Engineer will be a leader that can manage change, relationships, and technical problem solving.  Travel will be required to Menlo and customer locations.    Expected Outcomes: Promote and live the Menlo values of Safety, Leadership, Integrity, Commitment, and Excellence Customer relationships: interact daily with internal and external customers to ensure expectations are being met and to review progress.  Explain/train/educate others on lean principles, logistics concepts, and cost drivers for activities within scope. Develop and implement standard line side replenishment methods and processes Contribute to standardizing material flow processes across the assembly plants Develop and implement standardized processes Provide guidance to plants on developing their site specific material flow handbooks Coordinate and work with 3PL warehouse providers on replenishment changes Teach and provide training on new and current processes Analytical rigor: able to solve complex problems while clearly documenting the assumptions, logic, work steps, etc.  Provide guidance and assistance with process documentation and provide training to process operators, as well as continued updating of documentation as needed to meet changes in customer requirements, and/or changes in processes defined by Menlo Project and business case analysis:  identifying, analyzing, and delivering project based results to support new initiatives and/or continuous improvement opportunities in operations Provide timely, accurate and concise communication to the customer and cross functional groups. Identify and escalate project issues appropriately through Core Team and other management reviews Transfer process improvements to the operations group. Build trust and communicate change to Operations. Lean:  learn, apply, and demonstrate lean concepts such as A3s, value stream maps, kaizen events, and 5S. Competencies: o    Core Values:  Safety, Leadership, Integrity, Commitment, Excellence o    Strong Communication Skills (Written & Verbal) o    Excellent Problem Solving Skills o    Attention to Detail o    Highly Motivated o    Autonomous o    Team Orientation                 o    Conflict management and resolution TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION, PLEASE ACCESS THE FOLLOWING WEBSITE:  http://xpo.com/jobs-former-con-way-and-menlo-logistics  Please scroll down to “Operations” (the 5th icon on the left of the page), and click “management”.  This will bring you to the actual page to apply for the position. Click ""Show Criteria"",  type in the requisition number, (ENG000549), and the job will populate.      Qualification Requirements:Background:   Must have a Bachelor's Degree and 1-3 years of Experience Experience in Lean Manufacturing/ Lean Warehousing Ability to handle multiple projects in fast paced warehouse logistics environment Must be able to drive change Candidates will analyze processes, identify gaps, and drive improvements Candidates must have excellent data analysis skills. Knowledge of SQL queries a plus. Utilize Six Sigma/ Lean tools and methodologies to reduce waste and improve efficiencies Candidate will be responsible for analyzing the workflows and capital resources to determine the most effective way to meet customers’ requirements Work with Systems Engineering and Reporting Groups to develop dashboards and tools that assist daily operations Create standardized work processes Must be able to develop 2-D layout renderings utilizing AutoCAD Education Required - Bachelor's Degree in Industrial Engineering or related field   Technical Skills Strong analytical and problem solving skills are required Excellent oral/written communication skills, experience in preparing and presenting presentations. (MS Word and/or MS Powerpoint) Spreadsheet/Data analysis savvy Understanding of Transportation, Warehousing, Supply Chain Management, Manufacturing Logistics principles Knowledge of Lean Methodologies preferred Firm understanding of lineside and replenishment setup in an automotive environment TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION, PLEASE ACCESS THE FOLLOWING WEBSITE: http://xpo.com/jobs-former-con-way-and-menlo-logistics Please scroll down to “Operations” (the 5th icon on the left of the page), and click “management”.  This will bring you to the actual page to apply for the position. Click ""Show Criteria"", type in the requisition number, (ENG000549), and the job will populate.      Physical Demands and Work Environment: Physical Demands:  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands or finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk and hear.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.   Work Environment:  The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a light industrial environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and industrial equipment.   Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 10%",Industrial Engineer Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30301",,http://jobview.monster.com/industrial-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-171024265.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,1a8964b4dd23a6e810d98f47022807f7
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:01:57:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Comcast brings together the best in media and technology. We drive innovation to create the world's best entertainment and online experiences. As a Fortune 50 leader, we set the pace in a variety of innovative and fascinating businesses and create career opportunities across a wide range of locations and disciplines. We are at the forefront of change and move at an amazing pace, thanks to our remarkable people, who bring cutting-edge products and services to life for millions of customers every day. If you share in our passion for teamwork, our vision to revolutionize industries and our goal to lead the future in media and technology, we want you to fast-forward your career at Comcast. Job Summary:Responsible for tracking administrative tasks within a warehouseenvironment. Handles work orders and customer accounts as necessary.Coordinates processing of equipment and materials. Ships and receivespackages and inventories equipment and materials.Core Responsibilities:- Coordinates and oversees the inspection, preparation, and distributionof customer equipment, including conducting initial inspections, movingand organizing equipment in and out of the warehouse, issuing equipmentto field personnel, and assisting in inventory reconciliation.- Handles shipping and receiving responsibilities such as packing andpreparing items for shipment, loading and unloading trucks, andinspecting and documenting received materials.- Conducts regular equipment inventory counts and generates and submitsappropriate reports.- Accurately inputs CPE and inventory transactions into appropriatedatabases, spreadsheets, billing systems, and/or information managementsystems.- Performs exceptional customer service to internal and externalcustomers.- Regular, consistent and punctual attendance. Must be able to worknights and weekends, variable schedule(s) and overtime as necessary.- Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.Job Specification:- High School or Equivalent--- Generally requires 0-2 years related experience Comcast is an EOE/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer",REP,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA 30084",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rep-1-warehouse-materials-job-tucker-ga-us-170332182.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,138b4183ae4e1fa804c52a27023c40c1
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:01:57:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Description:Provide project management expertise for the Supply Chain Modernization initiative, allowing us to implement faster so we can improve Operator satisfaction, service and Restaurant capacity. Supply Chain Modernization allows us to create Restaurants orders, deliver at night, more often and scan all products at delivery. Project Manager RoleThe Project Manager has primary leadership responsibility for planning, organizing and directing project activities for the Supply Chain Modernization initiative. The Project Manager engages collaboratively throughout the project life cycle with cross-functional project teams, project sponsors and key project stakeholders. The Project Manager reports to the Director, Distribution, Logistics & Inventory and partners with the Supply Chain team members, Restaurant Operators, and Distribution partners to coordinate and execute all objectives of the project.Major tasks include:Coordinate opening 4 new Distribution Centers, transition business out of 4 DCs to 4 new DC's and roll out increased services in 7 current DC's. Tasks to includeEnsure inbound supply Integration of data management (inventory files, inbound files, ASN, pricing files, ordering, EDI,etc..)Communication activities internal and externalLiaison for sourcing, food safety / quality and inventoryCross function communication and project updates. Rollout Suggested Ordering programManage requests for proposal processes for potential vendorsSupport the selection and implementation processWork with corporate and new partners on testing and implementing a limited suggested order test role responsibilities:Ensure projects are completed on time and within budget.Plan and track projects, including milestones and resources needed in form of staff, hours, budget, and technology, following established project management methodology and best practices.Define project scope, goals and deliverables that support business goals in collaboration with project team, project sponsor, key stakeholders and senior managementDevelop and maintain full-scale project plans, project schedules, and all associated communications and tracking documentsDevelop, submit and monitor project budget and manage subsequent budget changes as necessary.Identify, track and manage issues, action items, schedule/timeline, major milestones, dependencies, risks, assumptions, and constraints using appropriate project management toolsDevelop and deliver project status/progress reports, including necessary presentations, to project team members, project sponsors and key stakeholders on a regular and on-going basis throughout the project life cycleProactively manage changes in project scope, identify potential crises, and devise and execute appropriate contingency plans minimum qualifications:3-5 years proven project management experienceExcellent communication skills including verbal, written and presentationProficient in all Microsoft Office applications including MS Project or similar softwareAbility to work effectively both independently and in a team based environmentStrong multi-tasking and organizational skillsAbility to influence stakeholders throughout the organization in groups settings and one-on-oneAbility to work collaboratively at all levelsAbility to resolve conflict and problem solveStrong interpersonal relationship skillsWillingness to be flexible and adaptable to changing priorities",Project Manager (no PMP required) Job in College Park,Full Time Employee,"College Park, GA",Restaurant/Food ServicesFood and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-no-pmp-required-job-college-park-ga-us-171216571.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Project/Program Management,474fe13af44891be02e2103e33b2dadf
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:01:58:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-GA-Atlanta ID  43163 Posted Date  8/15/2015 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Parttime-Temporary About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Provide the guests with prompt quality service Keep your clearing stations neat and clean Always use clean towels and premixed bleach water      to wipe down tables Wipe down all tables prior to club in sports bar      if applicable Preset all dining side tables with clean linens      and table wares if applicable Always use a tray when clearing a table Reset tables to standard set up at all times Act with a sense of urgency at all times Wipe down all sports bar tables at the end of      your shift if applicable Ensure all dining side tables are preset at the      end of your shift if applicable Remove all trash from dining areas to trash receptacles      in kitchen for proper disposal Notify management of your task completion Provide superior service to the guest Other duties as assigned by direct report, such as opening and closing duties. Provide the guests with prompt quality service Keep your clearing stations neat and clean Always use clean towels and premixed bleach water      to wipe down tables Wipe down all tables prior to club in sports bar      if applicable Preset all dining side tables with clean linens      and table wares if applicable Always use a tray when clearing a table Reset tables to standard set up at all times Act with a sense of urgency at all times Wipe down all sports bar tables at the end of      your shift if applicable Ensure all dining side tables are preset at the      end of your shift if applicable Remove all trash from dining areas to trash receptacles      in kitchen for proper disposal Notify management of your task completion Provide superior service to the guest Other duties as assigned by direct report, such as opening and closing duties. EDUCATION:                      High school diploma or equivalent.   KNOWLEDGE:                   Basic knowledge of restaurant operations.   EXPERIENCE:                    Minimum of one year experience in a restaurant or stadium setting preferred.   SKILLS:                                Strong communication and organizational skills, ability to reach, push, pull, bend, stoop, walk up and down stairs and stand for long periods of time. Have the ability to work in a fast-paced environment while balancing food on a tray and stressful situations simultaneously. Be a minimum of 18 years of age to ring alcoholic beverages in the state of Georgia. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Server Assistant - Braves Stadium Club,"Part Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/755-server-assistant-braves-stadium-club-610863700-job-atlanta-ga-us-170444421.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=7,,Food Services/Hospitality,184285c1516dc96a1629d0b3b6945f09
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:02:15:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you searching for an opportunity to be a part of a team? Do you find it important to pay close attention to detail while still being able to meet production goals? If you are a team-oriented person who appreciates quality work and follows procedures then you have found the right position as a Vehicle Service Attendant. If you think you have what it takes then apply with us to be a Hertz Vehicle Service Attendant! Candidate must have a clean driving record and possess a valid US driver's license. This is an hourly paid position and pay is based on current scale. Nominal overtime required as needed. As a Hertz VSA... You'll be responsible for vehicle preparation to ensure vehicle is ready for customer pick-up.Drive and park vehicles on-lot as needed.Check for vehicle damage and ensure features of the vehicles are operational.Check vehicle status. (rentable/non-rentable)Ensure interior of vehicle is clean. (windows, door jams, trunk, vacuum, etc)Fill gasoline tank and check fill levels of all fluidsClean the exterior of vehicle. (debug and wash)Meet processing and standardization quotas.Perform related tasks as directed by managers.Able to work outdoors in all types of weather conditions. Mandatory Requirements: Must have a valid driver's license and excellent driving recordAbility to drive multiple types of vehiclesEffective verbal communication skills with customers, co-workers and managementMust be able to carry out additional duties and responsibilities as assigned by management due to operational needs.Must be able to work days, nights, weekends and holidays.Must be at least 20 years of age.Must be able to work outside year-round. Applicant must possess all auditory, speaking and communicating capabilities necessary to complete the responsibilities detailed above. The essential functions of this position include, but are not limited to, the following: sitting, standing, walking, bending and twisting, climbing, driving, pushing and pulling, hearing, writing, lifting, typing, seeing, reading and the ability to use a computer and telephone. Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening. EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Vehicle Service Attendant Job in Austin,Full Time / Employee,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/vehicle-service-attendant-job-austin-tx-us-171073702.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=16,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,e8467066c72d78af8dffcb05c69beba7
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:02:15:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Department Supervisors train, coach and develop associates in each department to ensure customers receive excellent service and can easily find the merchandise they need. In addition they provide valuable input into merchandising decisions to the Store Management Team and Operations Team. Department Supervisors have strong product knowledge and the ability to lead and develop others. Specific store departments may include Building Materials, Décor, Electrical, Flooring, Gardening, Hardware, Kitchen & Bath, Lumber, Millwork, Paint, Plumbing, Pro Account Sales, Tool Rental, Front End, Freight, Receiving, Associate Support, Special Services, and Merchandising Execution.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Supervise the work activities of Associates within his/her areaCommunicate store objectives to Associates using the appropriate programs and toolsTrain and develop Associates within the work team, through the management of training calendar and curriculumEngage in coaching for the development of AssociatesParticipate in the interview process for hiring of new Associates and partner with store management on recommendationsProvide input into appropriate discipline decisions related to AssociatesProvide input to the Associates on performance appraisals and make recommendations on promotion of associates in his/her areaNature and Scope:Accountable for direct supervision of the work activities of subordinates, which requires planning, monitoring and review of workDirect supervision of a shift or the coordination of multiple work groupsMakes recommendations concerning selection, termination, performance appraisal and professional developmentDue to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service: Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge: Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions: Seeks to fully understand the customers needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed; until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills - Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customers concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Department Supervisor Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/department-supervisor-job-atlanta-ga-us-170851897.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),72f812151dd50cb2ab6e1bd94d93ec77
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:02:40:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30312",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-atlanta-ga-us-170587231.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=14,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,1883d22a1342862718cc017ae7df6d4d
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:02:55:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-atlanta-ga-us-170857424.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),eea0469d305fe928ffdb649a2328f695
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:02:57:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Austin ID  45274 Posted Date  9/2/2015 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cook - University of Texas Towers Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-university-of-texas-towers-job-austin-tx-us-170444204.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=5,,Food Services/Hospitality,4d12c6ee90dbffbf69b209cf891bec8f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:02:57:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Hertz, our Location Manager Trainees are the new wave direction to our Multi Brand future. Our LMT's are highly motivated, career seeking individuals eager to develop leadership skills and learn every aspect of rental car operations. If you are searching for an entry level position with new challenges and rewards, Hertz offers exciting career opportunities to help get your career started. Responsibilities: In your position as a Location Manager Trainee, you will participate in our vigourous training and immersion program as you begin your journey with Hertz. You will rotate between the key areas of operations, learning the function and responsibilities of each, with an on-going focus on developing your people management skills. At the completion of your initial training program, you'll be given an opportunity to showcase your strong management foundation and knowledge of the business at a new location, as you prepare to journey on with Hertz! What We Need: Career and long term goal oriented professionalsPolished/professional appearanceDriven and motivated personally and operationallyIndividuals looking for career growthIdeal candidate maybe required to relocate upon completion of programIndividuals who thrive and lead by exampleMinimum Associates DegreeExcellent Oral and Written Skills What We Offer: Full benefits after probationary period (Medical, Dental, Vision, Vacation, 401K)Room to grow within mulit branded corporation - Hertz, Dollar, Thrifty, Firefly Car RentalProfessional and Publicly respected environmentOnce program is completed your eligible to function as a full location manager which includes a complimentary company vehicle for personal use Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening. EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Manager Trainee Job in Austin,Full Time / Employee,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-trainee-job-austin-tx-us-171073276.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,4ce399e0a90f31d0068cdb55ab35b83c
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:03:23:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Department Supervisors train, coach and develop associates in each department to ensure customers receive excellent service and can easily find the merchandise they need. In addition they provide valuable input into merchandising decisions to the Store Management Team and Operations Team. Department Supervisors have strong product knowledge and the ability to lead and develop others. Specific store departments may include Building Materials, Décor, Electrical, Flooring, Gardening, Hardware, Kitchen & Bath, Lumber, Millwork, Paint, Plumbing, Pro Account Sales, Tool Rental, Front End, Freight, Receiving, Associate Support, Special Services, and Merchandising Execution.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Supervise the work activities of Associates within his/her areaCommunicate store objectives to Associates using the appropriate programs and toolsTrain and develop Associates within the work team, through the management of training calendar and curriculumEngage in coaching for the development of AssociatesParticipate in the interview process for hiring of new Associates and partner with store management on recommendationsProvide input into appropriate discipline decisions related to AssociatesProvide input to the Associates on performance appraisals and make recommendations on promotion of associates in his/her areaNature and Scope:Accountable for direct supervision of the work activities of subordinates, which requires planning, monitoring and review of workDirect supervision of a shift or the coordination of multiple work groupsMakes recommendations concerning selection, termination, performance appraisal and professional developmentDue to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service: Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge: Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions: Seeks to fully understand the customers needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed; until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills - Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customers concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Department Supervisor Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/department-supervisor-job-austin-tx-us-170854124.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f7513b76c22a1b5a0546456207bee7be
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:03:24:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Basic entry level data entrygeneral phone and computer skillsPAY is $8.75/hr. This is a full time job working 40 hours /week in Tucker, GA.general phone and computer skillsreliability and can show up to work on time when scheduled",Basic Entry Level - data entry Job in Tucker,Full Time,Location:,Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/basic-entry-level-data-entry-job-tucker-ga-us-170419369.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative/Clerical,2cbf455d6f14c9e5eb7a40dcc759e6f8
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:04:23:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-austin-tx-us-170856981.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f7c0624201794ce239e7654ccb80363a
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:04:24:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,000 stores and 12 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others."" GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a part-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses. DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned. KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer. 13079",LEAD SALES ASSOC-PT,Full Time,"Tucker, GA 30084",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-assoc-pt-4351-hugh-howell-rd-tucker-ga-job-tucker-ga-us-171155290.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cf42799344d6d9d71e3c9b9c1661e0be
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:05:48:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"City: AustinState: TexasPostal/Zip Code: 78745 Jewell is a division of the Oldcastle Architectural Products Group (APG). APG is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Job Description Summary Transport construction material to job site in a safe and timely manner Assist and supervise loading of truck to ensure proper order and weight distribution Receive from dispatcher invoice for materials, directions to job site and any special instructions and follow them to the detail Maintain complete and accurate records such as DOT drivers' daily logs, fuel receipts, delivery documentation and any other required documents according to state and federal regulations Build and maintain good customer relationships Perform pre-trip inspections of assigned vehicle and report immediately any concerns or problems Obtain shipping bills and necessary signatures and return completed paperwork to the shipping department Provide and document proper routine maintenance of assigned truck and loading/unloading equipment Survey job site and unload cargo in the best area available in a safe manner Develop very good knowledge of inventory, sizes, types, colors and pallet package Monitor and immediately report problems with assigned product quality, customer satisfaction and traffic Requirements High school diploma / equivalent Experience with moffett CDL A required Must have at least 2 years of experience Detailed oriented and good communication skills a plus Must be at least 24 years of age Must have a clean driving record Forklift certified a plus What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join ourTalent Communityto receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers onFacebook,Twitter,Instagram,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Jewell is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Jewell is part of theOldcastlecareers™network. #CBG #MAPG",Flatbed Driver / Truck Driver / CDL A - Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/flatbed-driver-truck-driver-cdl-a-austin-tx-job-austin-tx-us-170432303.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=8,,,d81619e6468d0dd12032889f4a5e8ea1
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:05:50:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:The Senior Analyst Capacity Planning is responsible for building, maintaining and managing the capacityplanning program for medium and high incumbent Home Services’ field teams such as 100% commissionsales consultants and HDMS operations including calculations, resolutions, payments, and other supportteams. This individual will develop forecasts, analyze productivity, understand and layer branch and regionalvariations into their projections along with scheduling responsibilities for some teams. The Senior Analyst willcollaborate and consult with other functional areas that could impact staffing requirements such asMarketing, Finance, Recruiting, HR, Operations etc. They will be expected to develop models and scenariosfor projecting business process changes including recommendations to senior leadership on benefits andobstacles for various options. They will regularly communicate with the leaders for field and non-contactcenter teams to advise on hiring, retention, attrition, productivity and other performance statistics.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:40% - Develop, Maintain and Manage capacity model for all branches, markets and teams assigned –including alignment of upcoming resource needs, projections of attrition and communication with field andnon-contact center leadership on specific requirements for each business/branch/market/team.30% - Create long-range (2 yr) and mid-range (6 m) term rolling forecasts of workload (appointments,measures, jobs, tasks etc.) including influences from seasonality, marketing events, promos, sales plans &growth etc. Develop schedules and time off pools and administration for some teams (primarily HDMSoperations teams)10% - Collaborate and communicate with leadership; to deliver results of forecasting and capacity planning,including ensuring understanding of inputs, influences and drivers of results; conduct regular reviews ofhistorical trending and forward-looking outlooks10% - Model ad-hoc ‘what-if’ scenarios to understand potential process changes; develop illustrative decks,models and dashboards to enhance understanding and deliver recommendations to leadership.10% - Monitor & analyze weekly/monthly productivity and compensation to ensure maximized utilization ofresourcesNature and Scope:This position reports to Senior Manager Strategic Workforce Planning.This position has 0 direct reports.Environmental Job Requirements:Environment: Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and notobjectionable.Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time.Standard Minimum Qualifications:Must be eighteen years of age or older.Must pass the Drug Test.Must pass pre-employment test if applicable.Additional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED.Work Experience Required: 3 yearsMinimum Age Override: 0Certifications & Licenses:Physical Requirements: Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles.Additional Qualifications:Preferred Qualifications: Typically requires interpersonal skills for dealing with sensitive or controversial situations.Typically faces situations that are unstructured and require original approaches.Typically considers new approaches within general policies and short-term goals when solving problems.Typically expected to provide status reports to management.Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies:- Financial Planning exp- Forecasting exp- Statistical Modeling exp- High Proficiency in excel, PowerPoint required- Proficiency in SQL, tableau preferred- Self-starter, independent, project oriented- Ability to influence without authority- Strong interpersonal and communication skills $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",HDE Senior Analyst Capacity Planning Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/hde-senior-analyst-capacity-planning-job-atlanta-ga-us-171136740.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),af119756a7242e1296388f26e5a3e75f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:05:52:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Project Manager in Austin, TX. The PM position is responsible for but are not limited to: authoring all project management artifacts following the practices and guidelines from the PMI's PMBOK, developing the detailed project budget, master schedules with activities, planning and developing all required project documentationEssential; Functions: Develop and assist with detailing the strategic, roadmap and implementation plans for the Enterprise Business Management (EBM) Initiating and planning Developing and conducting the formal presentations to leadership Captures and documents metrics for the business processes and procedures Coordinating project activities with project stakeholders, team members and leadership Compiling and distributing project information and status reports Ascertains business area readiness for change to new business processes and identifies appropriate implementation measures Establishes performance targets and measures results through comparative analysis This position will be responsible for working with senior-level business executives, IT, and business program resources to plan and execute the project and manage stakeholder expectations The selected candidate must be a results-oriented individual with a very strong work ethic and must be able to demonstrate excellent Project Management, negotiation, communication and problem-solving skills Shows integrity and ethical behavior; respects confidentiality, business ethics and organizational standards Exercises logic and reasoning to define problems, establish facts and draw valid conclusions; makes decisionsREQUIREMENTS: Excellent communication skills both written and oral with all levels of staff Skill in guiding large projects teams with internal and varied level of management involvement Skilled in managing competing interests from various project stakeholders and reaching consensus for appropriate next actions Experience developing project and work plans and leading stakeholders through project activities Skilled in delivering projects on time and within budget for projects with a large number of stakeholders Skilled in change management and change readiness practices Experience with Strategic, Roadmap and or Implementation Plan among complex organizationsPreferences: Demonstration of creative thinking and business process analysis to solve business issues Strong experience with Microsoft toolset - Word, Project, Visio, Excel Experience with state government, federal or complex private sector organization Experience managing cross-agency, enterprise initiatives, Enterprise Information Management Experience with Information Technology and Information Management projects Certification - Project Management Professional (PMP) certification",Project Manager Job in Austin,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Austin, TX 78701",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-austin-tx-us-171034712.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0d24c968ba24b824337f1f799b33388e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:06:03:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,000 stores and 12 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others."" GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a part-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses. DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned. KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer. 13043",LEAD SALES ASSOC-PT,Full Time,"Decatur, GA 30032",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-assoc-pt-3900-glenwood-ave-decatur-ga-job-decatur-ga-us-171155125.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),951086ae660750bc3fd376674ab3307e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:06:18:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Requisition # R0487.7 Location Austin, TX 73301 USFort Worth, TX 76137 US (Primary)San Antonio, TX 78218 US Job Type Full-time Job Description The Job Engineer assists and acts as a liaison between contractors, superintendents, foreman, estimators, and engineers for a specific project until the completion of the project. The Lane Construction Corporation is looking for experienced talent in the heavy civil construction arena to join our team. Responsibilities:Including but not limited to:• Understand project specifications and verify compliance• Review and code timesheets• Review, understand and use project cost report as a tool• Review, understand and use project CPM as a tool• Manage minor subcontracts and input quantities in JDE & quantity book• Prepare pay estimate for minor subcontractors• Prepare project submittals as required• Draft RFIs as questions/discrepancies arise• Participate in the preparation of the project construction schedule & work plans Job Requirements Qualifications:• BS in Civil Engineering or Construction Management• Minimum 3 years of engineering experience in heavy/highway construction• Familiar with grading, drainage, paving (asphalt and concrete), bridge construction, retaining walls, and all other highway construction scopes• Strong prioritization and organizational skills; detail-oriented• Excellent verbal and written communication skills• Strong working knowledge of Excel and Word• JDEdwards experience is preferred The Lane Construction Corporation is a leading U.S. construction company specializing in the transportation, infrastructure and energy industries. Lane’s unique combination of capabilities includes public-private partnerships/innovative financing and joint ventures; large, complex design-build and bid-build projects; and the ability to produce and install asphalt, aggregates and concrete. Report",Monster,,"Requisition # R0487.7 Location Austin, TX 73301 USFort Worth, TX 76137 US (Primary)San Antonio, TX 78218 US Job Type Full-time Job Description The Job Engineer assists and acts as a liaison between contractors, superintendents, foreman, estimators, and engineers for a specific project until the completion of the project. The Lane Construction Corporation is looking for experienced talent in the heavy civil construction arena to join our team. Responsibilities:Including but not limited to:• Understand project specifications and verify compliance• Review and code timesheets• Review, understand and use project cost report as a tool• Review, understand and use project CPM as a tool• Manage minor subcontracts and input quantities in JDE & quantity book• Prepare pay estimate for minor subcontractors• Prepare project submittals as required• Draft RFIs as questions/discrepancies arise• Participate in the preparation of the project construction schedule & work plans Job Requirements Qualifications:• BS in Civil Engineering or Construction Management• Minimum 3 years of engineering experience in heavy/highway construction• Familiar with grading, drainage, paving (asphalt and concrete), bridge construction, retaining walls, and all other highway construction scopes• Strong prioritization and organizational skills; detail-oriented• Excellent verbal and written communication skills• Strong working knowledge of Excel and Word• JDEdwards experience is preferred The Lane Construction Corporation is a leading U.S. construction company specializing in the transportation, infrastructure and energy industries. Lane’s unique combination of capabilities includes public-private partnerships/innovative financing and joint ventures; large, complex design-build and bid-build projects; and the ability to produce and install asphalt, aggregates and concrete.",,http://jobview.monster.com/job-engineer-r0487-7-job-austin-tx-us-170528563.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=3,,,aec2690bee067a61989d0bfcef65a253
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:06:25:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Department Supervisors train, coach and develop associates in each department to ensure customers receive excellent service and can easily find the merchandise they need. In addition they provide valuable input into merchandising decisions to the Store Management Team and Operations Team. Department Supervisors have strong product knowledge and the ability to lead and develop others. Specific store departments may include Building Materials, Décor, Electrical, Flooring, Gardening, Hardware, Kitchen & Bath, Lumber, Millwork, Paint, Plumbing, Pro Account Sales, Tool Rental, Front End, Freight, Receiving, Associate Support, Special Services, and Merchandising Execution.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Supervise the work activities of Associates within his/her areaCommunicate store objectives to Associates using the appropriate programs and toolsTrain and develop Associates within the work team, through the management of training calendar and curriculumEngage in coaching for the development of AssociatesParticipate in the interview process for hiring of new Associates and partner with store management on recommendationsProvide input into appropriate discipline decisions related to AssociatesProvide input to the Associates on performance appraisals and make recommendations on promotion of associates in his/her areaNature and Scope:Accountable for direct supervision of the work activities of subordinates, which requires planning, monitoring and review of workDirect supervision of a shift or the coordination of multiple work groupsMakes recommendations concerning selection, termination, performance appraisal and professional developmentDue to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service: Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge: Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions: Seeks to fully understand the customers needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed; until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills - Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customers concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Department Supervisor Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/department-supervisor-job-austin-tx-us-170852134.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8b2f8205d7b2093f64f05f6506aa143c
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:06:27:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose: The Sr. Web Designer is responsible for delivering exceptional online design solutions for Homedepot.com. As a highly creative problem solver, the Sr. Designer will need to carefully construct detailed online design solutions with proficient speed and exceptional quality. This position will maintain and provide ongoing design of Homedepot.com, promotions, seasonal events and redesign projects. This role also partners cross functionally with content, user experience and business teams. The Sr. Web Designer will be expected to guide and mentor other designers and serve as a subject matter expert for the design team. On the talent/technical skills side, this position should have a solid eye for typography, composition and color, an ability to both handle smaller tasks as well as larger projects and be proficient in the ""Big 3"" – InDesign, Photoshop and Illustrator. Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities: - 30%-Create interactive design concepts, layouts, comps, moodboard explorations and production as assigned.- 30%-Collaborate and drive new ideas with content, user experience and engineering teams to create innovative experiences that meet strategic objectives for Homedepot.com - 20%-Work cross functionally with creative team, merchandising, user experience, content and photographers to ensure optimal design solutions for the Homedepot.com customer. - 10%-Provide quality assurance on creative deliverables - 10%-Contribute to the development of the online creative culture and quality standards Nature and Scope: - This position reports to Manager, Online Creative - This position has no Direct Reports Environmental Job Requirements: Environment: Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable. Travel: Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time.Standard Minimum Qualifications: - Must be eighteen years of age or older. - Must pass the Drug Test. - Must pass pre-employment test if applicable. Education Required: - The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a bachelor's degree program or equivalent degree in a field of study related to the job. Work Experience Required: 5 Physical Requirements: - Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles. Preferred Qualifications: - Previous design and interactive work experience in a retail environment or advertising agency preferred.- Solid working knowledge of the latest version of applicable programs -- Mac OS, Photoshop, Illustrator, InDesign.- Understanding of motion design and the strengths and limitations of AfterEffects, Ajax, Flex, and other emerging platforms.- Comprehensive understanding of interactivity and the Web and the fundamentals of information architecture.Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: - Hands on design and production knowledge across multiple channels from concept through completion - Ability to articulate and present creative ideas to a variety of audiences - Demonstrated passion for design and eagerness to collaborate with other creative team members - Mature appreciation for the balance between creative design and business objectives - Effective organizational approach and superb interpersonal skills - Ability to multi-task and work effectively under pressure with careful attention to detail $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Sr. Designer Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-designer-job-atlanta-ga-us-170889807.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),005cbcf1eb3e0ec575551f53c9212edc
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:07:10:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-GA-Thomasville ID  38611 Posted Date  8/14/2015 Category  Facilities Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. ESSENTIAL FUNC TIONS: Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties. ESSENTIAL FUNC TIONS: Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties. Requires educational achievement equivalent to a High School Diploma.   Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Custodian Service Worker - Flowers Thomasville - Sanitation Job in Thomasville,"Full Time, Employee","Thomasville, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/custodian-service-worker-flowers-thomasville-sanitation-job-thomasville-ga-us-170445004.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=19,,Food Services/Hospitality,c9d52ed8ce5005197674adac1c802201
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:07:11:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition/Vacancy No. 134619BR Position Title Outreach Specialist Job Category Marketing Business Line Transportation Country United States of America State/Province/Region USA - Georgia City Atlanta Why Choose AECOM? AECOM is a premier, fully integrated professional and technical services firm positioned to design, build, finance and operate infrastructure assets around the world for public- and private-sector clients. With nearly 100,000 employees — including architects, engineers, designers, planners, scientists and management and construction services professionals — serving clients in over 150 countries around the world, AECOM is ranked as the #1 engineering design firm by revenue in _Engineering News-Record_ magazine’s annual industry rankings, and has been recognized by _Fortune_ magazine as a World’s Most Admired Company. The firm is a leader in all of the key markets that it serves, including transportation, facilities, environmental, energy, oil and gas, water, high-rise buildings and government. AECOM provides a blend of global reach, local knowledge, innovation and technical excellence in delivering customized and creative solutions that meet the needs of clients’ projects. A _Fortune 500_ firm, AECOM companies, including URS Corporation and Hunt Construction Group, have annual revenue of approximately $19 billion. More information on AECOM and its services can be found at www.aecom.com About the Business LineTransportation We provide professional services in areas such as aviation, transit, freight rail, highways and bridges, planning, and ports and marine. Our global network of top-tier specialists delivers comprehensive services over the full life cycle of a project to benefit clients in government and private industries. Job Summary This position is contingent on the award of contract. AECOM is actively seeking a creative, highly talented Outreach Specialist for immediate employment in Atlanta. Responsible for carrying out project operations, including but not limited to: + Performs a range of transportation demand management, marketing, and planning-related projects, aimed at enhancing opportunities for individual travelers, commuters, and/or students to utilize non-drive-alone means of transportation, including carpooling, vanpooling, public transit, bicycling, walking, teleworking, and other options + Develop, promote, and/or implement a range of worksite and/or schools-based operational programs aimed at improving business operations and/or reducing on-site pollutants, to improve overall air quality and mitigate traffic congestion + Determines the appropriate sources and methods for the accumulation of research related to assignments + Provides TDM services to employers, travelers, students, and others + Summarizes TDM information and prepares draft presentation papers or research reports + General office environment; will require visits to project sites Minimum Requirements + Bachelor degree in Marketing, Business, Education, Public-health, or related field + Or demonstrated equivalent combination of education, skills, knowledge, abilities and experience + 2+ years of related experience, or demonstrated equivalent combination of education, skills, knowledge, abilities and experience + Graduate degree in a related discipline without any work experience may enter at this level + Must have excellent writing and interpersonal communication skills and experience in handling multiple tasks in an organized and efficient manner + Some heavy lifting (Preferred Qualifications + Excellent writing and interpersonal communication skills and experience in handling multiple tasks in an organized and efficient manner + Experience in sales (non-commissioned) is a plus + Good public speaking skills are needed for this position What We Offer AECOM is a place where you can put your innovative thinking and business skills into high gear and work alongside other highly intelligent and motivated people. It's a place where you can apply your skills to some of the world's most challenging, interesting, and meaningful projects worldwide. It's a place that values the diversity of our areas of practice and our people. It's what makes AECOM a great place to work and grow. AECOM is an equal opportunity employer and Minorities, Females, Veterans, and Disabled persons are encouraged to apply. For further information, please click here at http://www.aecom.com/deployedfiles/Internet/Careers/Diversity%20and%20Inclusion/EEO%20is%20the%20Law%20Poster%20Supplement.pdf to view the EEO Is The Law poster.",Outreach Specialist Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/outreach-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-170863244.aspx?mescoid=2100323001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0045d32711dd24cc0a82520c49303046
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:07:33:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Junior - Mid Level iOS Developer in Atlanta, Georgia (GA).REQUIREMENTS: Bachelors in Computer Science or equivalent Entry-Level or 1-4 years' experience out of college Objective C required",Junior - Mid Level iOS Developer Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30318",,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-mid-level-ios-developer-job-atlanta-ga-us-170939345.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,0ffa6c0d48b868a7986bd9dda4077646
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:08:17:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"“Want to know what it’s like to work in IT at The Home Depot?” https://vimeo.com/70037824 POSITION PURPOSE - The Associate Systems Specialist is an advanced level of troubleshooting support for the IT Operations team. These associates may monitor a phone queue, alerts, and team inboxes in an effort to ensure teams are at a high state of readiness, and team metrics are being met. MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES -20%:Investigate, diagnoses, and takes prescribed actions on all operational events, alarms and incidents escalated from level 1 support technicians based on mean time to recover service levels and incident severity.10%: Participates on business impacting incidents and problem management (high number of repeat incidents) support activities with the main goal of assisting in the diagnostics of the error logs in order to recover services quickly.20%: Develop, implements and operate all network\system infrastructure and procedures; Perform scheduled Preventive maintenance such as (file system cleanup, rack realignment, support tools client upgrades, backup job failure remediation.10%: Ensure that all routine maintenance tasks (security patch management, firmware updates, etc.) are completed on all operational infrastructures.10%:Monitor and manage batch schedules to ensure service levels is being delivered on a daily basis Maintains all operational documentation, processes, and (management and diagnostic) tools ensuring that spares are maintained at the agreed service10%: Ensures that all infrastructure equipment is maintained according to policies and recommendations and perform regular checks on infrastructure.10%: Develop automation tools using standard scripting languages Powershell(Windows), Kornshell (Linux), TcL (Cisco) and REXX(MVS) to improve stability and increase efficiency of system10%: Implement Low Impact infrastructure\application changes such as upgrades and patching of operating systems and non-business critical applications. NATURE AND SCOPE - Position Reports to: IT Supervisor No direct responsibility for supervising others. ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS - Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS - Must be eighteen years of age or older.  Must pass the Drug Test.  Must successfully complete any required training or orientation courses. EDUCATION REQUIRED - The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED. YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 1 PHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS - Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles. ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS - Bachelors Degree is preferred. Knowledge of Network Switches, Routers, Firewalls, and Access Points Knowledge of Operating Systems (Windows, UNIX, and IOS) Knowledge of Server Hardware Knowledge of Host Systems Knowledge of Storage Area Networks (SANs) PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS - Associate' s degree or higher in a technical field of studyTwo years of experience in an IT support call center environmentTechnical Certifications such as A+Working knowledge of MS Office and Windows OSOther technical knowledge or experience with technical systems which could include; supporting end users through PC, Network, Software or server supportExperience in handling incidents that have a large scope of impactGood verbal and written communication skillsProblem solving and analytical skillsAbility to multi-task KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES - Maintaining a high degree of technical competence and knowledge that involves the understanding of concepts and facilities utilized in support of computer and network systems. Ability to communicate effectively with all levels of personnel, both verbally and in writing. Ability to quickly analyze and resolve systems problems as they occur. Ability to utilize operational experience and knowledge to effectively write methods, standards and procedures in a clear and concise manner to ensure ease of use. Ability to verbally communicate with all levels of associates within the organizations.",ASSOCIATE SYSTEMS SPECIALIST Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-systems-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-170897803.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),7104dd897a9e80cae31ad9a1f4816512
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:08:18:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Department Supervisors train, coach and develop associates in each department to ensure customers receive excellent service and can easily find the merchandise they need. In addition they provide valuable input into merchandising decisions to the Store Management Team and Operations Team. Department Supervisors have strong product knowledge and the ability to lead and develop others. Specific store departments may include Building Materials, Décor, Electrical, Flooring, Gardening, Hardware, Kitchen & Bath, Lumber, Millwork, Paint, Plumbing, Pro Account Sales, Tool Rental, Front End, Freight, Receiving, Associate Support, Special Services, and Merchandising Execution.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Supervise the work activities of Associates within his/her areaCommunicate store objectives to Associates using the appropriate programs and toolsTrain and develop Associates within the work team, through the management of training calendar and curriculumEngage in coaching for the development of AssociatesParticipate in the interview process for hiring of new Associates and partner with store management on recommendationsProvide input into appropriate discipline decisions related to AssociatesProvide input to the Associates on performance appraisals and make recommendations on promotion of associates in his/her areaNature and Scope:Accountable for direct supervision of the work activities of subordinates, which requires planning, monitoring and review of workDirect supervision of a shift or the coordination of multiple work groupsMakes recommendations concerning selection, termination, performance appraisal and professional developmentDue to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service: Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge: Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions: Seeks to fully understand the customers needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed; until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills - Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customers concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Department Supervisor Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/department-supervisor-job-austin-tx-us-170853978.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7126f51f4a8c7dbada05a0e986dd6cbd
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:09:22:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"The HT Group is hiring Customer Service Representatives for a client in North Austin. This position is contract/temp for 1-3 months.Interviews will be conducted 8/15-8/17 with final interviews on 8/18.Are you?Tech-savvy?Smooth talker?Problem solver?Friendly, helper?Come use your phone and technical skills to provide great customer service for a fast-growing, energetic company!Temp (1-3 Month Assignment)Start Date: 8/22/2016$15/hourDay, Evening, Weekend, and Overnight Shifts Available - Open Availability Preferred!!Customer Service-ResponsibilitiesProvide first call resolution for customer concernsAccurately Log Calls in CRM systemMake technology simple and fun for customersCustomer Service-QualificationsExcellent communication skillsCustomer service expertiseProblem-solving abilitiesTeam PlayerTech savvyCustomer Service-RequirementsBachelor's degree or equivalent number of years of experience.Customer service experience, ideally in a software environment.",Customer Service Representative Job in Austin,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Austin, TX",Internet ServicesBankingComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-austin-tx-us-170844271.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,15.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Customer Support/Client Care,db03af5c90ba4e1ddc9542d5094c8cba
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:09:24:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  686816SAP Sales Order Entry SupportApex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest IT Staffing organization, has an immediate opportunity for an SAP Sales Order Entry Support candidate to work for our client who is one of the world’s largest and most admired companies.  If you’re looking for an organization that focuses on innovation, social responsibility, and quality, then this is the place for you. Pay is highly competitive and the work is to be completed in Austin, TX.If interested, please send a copy of your resume to Ryan Moore, Technical Recruiter, at rrmoore@apexsystemsinc.com Client: International leader in IT field (will disclose in interview)Duration: 12 month contract on a W2 basisSAP Sales Order Entry Support Description:This position is responsible for providing customer service support and related activities supporting the client’s business customers. Candidates must be able to communicate information accurately and provide daily management of post-sales issues and activities. This position interacts directly with the client’s business teams and works cross-functionally with internal departments to ensure customer satisfaction throughout the order fulfillment and sales support cycle.  This position is responsible for all order management transactions, including all activities relating to management of the end-to-end order fulfillment process for both external and internally facing customers. Support includes, but is not limited to, data entry, internal order status inquiries, problem solving, billing inquiries and resolution, returns and exchanges, contract management, backlog management, process documentation, and email support.The role entails a high level of interdepartmental interaction within the company.Organizational skills and the ability to multi-task are essential. Previous customer service experience is a plus. If your skills include innovation, teamwork, communication, and an overall drive to contribute to the successes of the team while delighting the customer, then this role is a great fit for you.Requirements:Flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business is a must.Fluent with SAP, Filemaker, and Excel with the ability to assemble reports on a daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly basis.Recognize pattern and root cause/sub-root cause analysis and provide feedback to management to improve processes that will enhance internal and external customer experience.Adaptive and flexible to changing technologies, processes, and environments.Company & Group Details:The organization offers several perks, including great benefits, an onsite café, outdoor patios and other rewards programs.*Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; Corporate Discounts/Perks and our Referral Program.*EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",SAP Sales Order Entry Support Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sap-sales-order-entry-support-job-austin-tx-us-171097223.aspx?mescoid=4300724001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3dbaef2e5184c7a07ecf55e9e4afe1a2
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:09:49:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionJoin our collaborative team of dedicated individualsand love what you do. Why Progressive? Were an organization that celebrates and rewards hard work each and every day, with a goal of being a company people can trust. Named a Top Workplace in Austin 5 years in a row! Claims Representative Centralized Auto As a Claims Representative in one of our centralized claims centers, youll help customers resolve auto claims over the phone as quickly and accurately as possible. In this role, youll: Develop relationships with customers over the phone to answer questions, obtain additional information and provide support throughout the claims process Investigate, analyze and document auto claims Interview all involved in an accident to determine coverage and liability decisions Validate damage is consistent with the report of the accident Collaborate with peers, such as Estimators to identify suspect damages or any unrelated prior damage Start Date: October 17th, 2016 We offer paid training! Gain new skills and start a whole new career! Training Schedule: Monday - Friday (12 weeks) 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM Work Schedule: Required days: Monday, Friday, and Saturday plus two additional weekdays of your choice. Days off: Sunday and either Tuesday, Wednesday or Thursday. Scheduled hours are 11:00 AM to 8:00 PM on all work days. Pay Rate: $19.23/hour Education, Experience and Skills Needed to be Successful: Bachelor's degree or a combined total of two years of work experience and/or college education Work or educational experience must include: Making decisions Solving problems Planning, prioritizing and organizing Effectively communicating verbally and in writing Customer service Progressive Offers: Gainshare bonus of up to 16% of salary (Our annual Gainshare bonus program rewards employees based on the companys achievement of annual performance objectives) Shift differential for hours after 7pm on weekdays and weekend days Flexible work arrangements and casual dress Ongoing training, tuition assistance and opportunities for career advancement Award winning, supportive environment including Employee Resource Groups Medical, dental, vision and life insurance benefits 401k plan Employee discounts Child care subsidy On-site clinical care and fitness center Apply Now Apply now and find out what its like to be valued for the talent and passion you invest in all that you do. Here are a few things to keep in mind when applying with us: Youll be asked for information around your employment history and educational background After applying, you are able to monitor your status in the recruiting process on your profile A recruiter will contact you by email or phone if you are under consideration for a current position Some positions require candidates to meet company requirements on our online assessment test Candidates must pass a comprehensive background check Equal Opportunity Employer",Claims Representative - Centralized Auto Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-representative-centralized-auto-job-austin-tx-us-171294280.aspx?mescoid=4300755001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,865b5712e6eaacc31bb129ab7fccb4ee
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:10:01:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE - Operations Business Analysts are responsible for leading projects and initiatives that bring value to the Repair Program at The Home Depot. They must possess a high level of critical thinking skills to work through the ambiguity of a problem while effectively driving toward a solution.  They will use analytical skills to develop and improve processes within Tool Rental Centers and Repair and Liquidation Centers.  Key responsibilities include, but are not limited to, leading cross-functional teams on projects, effectively communicating to teams and other leaders, reviewing and understanding sales/financial data, identifying trends in business and the retail industry. A successful Operations Business Analyst will possess and demonstrate strong leadership skills and will be self-motivated. MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES -  Use strategic thinking to see the big picture, determine the problem and understand fundamental parts of the problemPrepare and deliver insights and recommendations based on analyses.Review sales/financial analyses (what sold/did not sell; determine which categories have potential to move upward; cost/benefit analysis; data process modeling/analysis of problems, regression analysis).Identify trends in consumer lifestyle and technology; conduct customer focus groups and analyze/synthesize findings. Scan business/industry trends;scan competitive landscape; analyze consumer dataInterpret data based on specific knowledge of statistics and procedures used. Provide data to all Directors to support decision making. Provide input on forecast based on knowledge of product and technology.Provide input on stategy based on knowledge of industry and technology trends. Provide customers with specialized information from a variety of resources. Facilitate workout problem-solving sessions with multiple groups of people.Synthesize findings and derive conclusions from analyses and make oral/written recommendations to upper management. Execute tasks related to core operations projects and/or process improvements. Execute day to day processes related to their areas of responsibility. Communicate issues and roadblocks related to their areas of responsibility. NATURE AND SCOPE -  Typically reports to Operations Process Manager or Business Manager No direct responsibility for supervising others. ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS -Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS - Must be eighteen years of age or older. Must pass the Drug Test. Must pass pre-employment test if applicable. EDUCATION REQUIRED - The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a bachelor's degree program or equivalent degree in a field of study related to the job. YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE -  3 PHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS -  Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles.  PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS - 1 year of work experience (business, retail, and/or consulting) is preferredOperations, Retail and/or field knowledgeDesire to support and provide excellent customer service to field and internal partnersAbility to work cross-functionally and develop strong business partner relationshipsKnowledge in analyzing data trends and reportingAbility to source and interpret data from a variety of applications (Access and SQL)Strong knowledge of Microsoft Office applications (Excel and PowerPoint)Strong written and verbal communications skills and presentation skillsBachelor’s degree is preferredKNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES -  Leverages PartnershipsTeamwork AdaptabilityProblem SolvingStrong quantitative skills such as statistics and data analysisSelf Development $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",OPERATIONS BUSINESS ANALYST Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-business-analyst-job-atlanta-ga-us-170811081.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=11,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),95158d5ba6110ff7b8f87bab21743556
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:10:32:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"ESSENTIAL SKILLS: Experience with SQL Server, .Net, VB.NET, SQL statements XML INTERPERSONAL COMPETANCIES: Excellent oral and written communications skills Ability to work well in a team environment Ability to work with minimal supervision Excellent analytical and problem solving skills Good planning and organizational skills Very detail oriented PREFERRED EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE LEVEL: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or EngineeringExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",. Net (Mid Level) developer Job in Chamblee,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,. Net (Mid Level) developer,"Chamblee, GA 30326",http://jobview.monster.com/net-mid-level-developer-job-chamblee-ga-us-171299372.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,eccfb015a4e131d6d8b8afe716427e47
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:10:34:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Title:                          Front-End Developer             Location:                     Atlanta, GA 30339Position Type:              Contract to HireDuration of Contract:     3-6 Months  Skills RequiredJavascript (Angular and React), HTML 5, CSS 3. High volume/traffic website experience preferred           Report",Monster,,"Title:                          Front-End Developer             Location:                     Atlanta, GA 30339Position Type:              Contract to HireDuration of Contract:     3-6 Months  Skills RequiredJavascript (Angular and React), HTML 5, CSS 3. High volume/traffic website experience preferred          ",,http://jobview.monster.com/front-end-developer-job-atlanta-ga-us-171265690.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=10,,,507bf5645573c3669db84be82083c735
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:04:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Austin ID  33712 Posted Date  6/18/2015 Category  Operations/Manufacturing/Production Employment Type  Fulltime-Temporary About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Job Summary: The cashier position is vital to achieving positive customer service and is responsible for successfully completing the financial transaction with the customer and maintaining the balance of the cash drawer at all times.   Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Maintain a positive attitude and smile Greet customers as they approach the cash register and be polite with customers during the transaction Must have knowledge of cash register, credit card machines, and Aramark cashier policy in order to effectively service the customer Must be familiar with all menu items and pricing to effectively complete financial transactions and answer questions from customers Maintain an organized, neat and clean cashier station Stock service areas with paper goods, condiments, beverages, and food items as needed Count, organize, and balance the cash drawer; fill out the cashier slip; and make deposits while in the presence of a manager or supervisor Distribute promotional material and customer loyalty rewards as necessary Monitor theft in the location and report incidents to managers Assist with daily functions in the kitchen, food court, or dining room during down time Must be able to stand for extended periods of time Must be able to lift 20 lbs Ability to understand and follow directions given by management Report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Involves repetitive motion Additional Job Functions: Cross-train at other positions in the location Work at other stations and in other departments as necessary Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team   Job Summary: The cashier position is vital to achieving positive customer service and is responsible for successfully completing the financial transaction with the customer and maintaining the balance of the cash drawer at all times.   Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Maintain a positive attitude and smile Greet customers as they approach the cash register and be polite with customers during the transaction Must have knowledge of cash register, credit card machines, and Aramark cashier policy in order to effectively service the customer Must be familiar with all menu items and pricing to effectively complete financial transactions and answer questions from customers Maintain an organized, neat and clean cashier station Stock service areas with paper goods, condiments, beverages, and food items as needed Count, organize, and balance the cash drawer; fill out the cashier slip; and make deposits while in the presence of a manager or supervisor Distribute promotional material and customer loyalty rewards as necessary Monitor theft in the location and report incidents to managers Assist with daily functions in the kitchen, food court, or dining room during down time Must be able to stand for extended periods of time Must be able to lift 20 lbs Ability to understand and follow directions given by management Report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Involves repetitive motion Additional Job Functions: Cross-train at other positions in the location Work at other stations and in other departments as necessary Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team   Required Qualifications: Excellent interpersonal and communication skills Excellent customer service and a positive attitude Must be able to work in a team environment Must have the ability to multitask and solve problems Experience running a cash register, knowledge of processing a credit card reader and performing credit card transactions Math skills for counting money and providing correct change   Desired Qualifications: Experience in the food service industry or grocery is highly desirable High school education or equivalent   Work Environment: Front-of-house, cash register station, dining room floor. Involves repetitive motion Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cashier - University of Texas Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-university-of-texas-job-austin-tx-us-170445582.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=17,,Food Services/Hospitality,a817c5e6f3764477e15ae738f524f7aa
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:    Mission: This position focuses on the coaching, implementation, and setup of material flow lineside implementations.     The Solutions Engineer will develop creative, yet implementable solutions to our customer's day to day problems, leveraging knowledge of transportation, warehousing, and manufacturing logistics engineering.  This position will be a change agent, using a process oriented, data driven, and customer focused approach.  The successful candidate will be team oriented with strong organization, problem solving, and communication skills, as well as the ability to support multiple tasks autonomously.  The Solutions Engineer will be a leader that can manage change, relationships, and technical problem solving.  Travel will be required to Menlo and customer locations.    Expected Outcomes: Promote and live the Menlo values of Safety, Leadership, Integrity, Commitment, and Excellence Customer relationships: interact daily with internal and external customers to ensure expectations are being met and to review progress.  Explain/train/educate others on lean principles, logistics concepts, and cost drivers for activities within scope. Develop and implement standard line side replenishment methods and processes Contribute to standardizing material flow processes across the assembly plants Develop and implement standardized processes Provide guidance to plants on developing their site specific material flow handbooks Coordinate and work with 3PL warehouse providers on replenishment changes Teach and provide training on new and current processes Analytical rigor: able to solve complex problems while clearly documenting the assumptions, logic, work steps, etc.  Provide guidance and assistance with process documentation and provide training to process operators, as well as continued updating of documentation as needed to meet changes in customer requirements, and/or changes in processes defined by Menlo Project and business case analysis:  identifying, analyzing, and delivering project based results to support new initiatives and/or continuous improvement opportunities in operations Provide timely, accurate and concise communication to the customer and cross functional groups. Identify and escalate project issues appropriately through Core Team and other management reviews Transfer process improvements to the operations group. Build trust and communicate change to Operations. Lean:  learn, apply, and demonstrate lean concepts such as A3s, value stream maps, kaizen events, and 5S. Competencies: o    Core Values:  Safety, Leadership, Integrity, Commitment, Excellence o    Strong Communication Skills (Written & Verbal) o    Excellent Problem Solving Skills o    Attention to Detail o    Highly Motivated o    Autonomous o    Team Orientation                 o    Conflict management and resolution TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION, PLEASE ACCESS THE FOLLOWING WEBSITE:  http://xpo.com/jobs-former-con-way-and-menlo-logistics  Please scroll down to “Operations” (the 5th icon on the left of the page), and click “management”.  This will bring you to the actual page to apply for the position. Click ""Show Criteria"",  type in the requisition number, (ENG000549), and the job will populate.      Qualification Requirements:Background:   Must have a Bachelor's Degree and 1-3 years of Experience Experience in Lean Manufacturing/ Lean Warehousing Ability to handle multiple projects in fast paced warehouse logistics environment Must be able to drive change Candidates will analyze processes, identify gaps, and drive improvements Candidates must have excellent data analysis skills. Knowledge of SQL queries a plus. Utilize Six Sigma/ Lean tools and methodologies to reduce waste and improve efficiencies Candidate will be responsible for analyzing the workflows and capital resources to determine the most effective way to meet customers’ requirements Work with Systems Engineering and Reporting Groups to develop dashboards and tools that assist daily operations Create standardized work processes Must be able to develop 2-D layout renderings utilizing AutoCAD Education Required - Bachelor's Degree in Industrial Engineering or related field   Technical Skills Strong analytical and problem solving skills are required Excellent oral/written communication skills, experience in preparing and presenting presentations. (MS Word and/or MS Powerpoint) Spreadsheet/Data analysis savvy Understanding of Transportation, Warehousing, Supply Chain Management, Manufacturing Logistics principles Knowledge of Lean Methodologies preferred Firm understanding of lineside and replenishment setup in an automotive environment TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION, PLEASE ACCESS THE FOLLOWING WEBSITE: http://xpo.com/jobs-former-con-way-and-menlo-logistics Please scroll down to “Operations” (the 5th icon on the left of the page), and click “management”.  This will bring you to the actual page to apply for the position. Click ""Show Criteria"", type in the requisition number, (ENG000549), and the job will populate.      Physical Demands and Work Environment: Physical Demands:  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands or finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk and hear.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.   Work Environment:  The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a light industrial environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and industrial equipment.   Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 10%",Industrial Engineer Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30301",,http://jobview.monster.com/industrial-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-171024265.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,5cc7c2bc3893fd125c7fef495014ac7b
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Launch your career with a national building materials distributor and discover opportunities for growth and advancement. Our people have the independence and authority to make a difference. We invest in relationships, and every person is important. Our highest priority is serving others. We passionately pursue a safe work environment along with a relentless focus on operational excellence. We believe you can never go wrong doing the right thing. CAPITOL MATERIALS, INC. Safely and efficiently operate a commercial motor vehicle in compliance with Company policies along with Federal and State regulations, and deliver all freight undamaged.  Work as a team-player to deliver, load/unload materials providing a world class customer service experience. Duties & Responsibilities: Inspect truck/trailer for defects for safe operation Safely load building materials onto flatbed or boom truck and unload products at commercial & residential job sites Deliver materials to assigned area as directed by the customer while prioritizing personal safety and the safety of those around you Maintain records required for compliance with State and Federal regulations Must report all accidents involving driver or company equipment Communicate professionally, both verbally and in writing Stamina to lift heavy building materials up to 80 lbs. for load/unload Excellent customer service skills and professional attitude DESIRED SKILLS: CDL License preferred Must meet our point system qualification Must have knowledge of Department of Transportation regulations Boom or Crane experience preferred Company Benefits:                                                                           Medical, Dental, Vision, Disability & Life Insurance 401k Paid holidays & vacation days    Competitive compensation GMS is the leading North American distributor of gypsum wallboard, acoustical ceiling products and other specialty building materials. Founded in 1971, GMS now operates a network of more than 150 distribution centers nationwide. For more information about GMS, visit www.gms.com or any one of our subsidiary company websites. The company provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.  ",Delivery Driver Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30318",All,http://jobview.monster.com/delivery-driver-job-atlanta-ga-us-170786882.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),98e8c07d82b329965977780d41f2ffbf
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Transfer Pricing Manager works with the Senior Transfer Pricing Manager and Region Tax Managers to develop and administer intercompany transfer pricing strategies that are compliant with the tax statutes and regulations in over 200 countries and territories worldwide. He/She continually refines transfer pricing policies using economic principles and analysis to minimize the issue of double taxation for the UPS enterprise among foreign countries where UPS operates. These policies serve as the basis for Advanced Pricing Agreements (APAs) and audit defense.The Transfer Pricing Manager prepares and provides overviews of UPS operations to Tax Authorities and Competent Authorities of other countries to obtain APAs that solidify methodology and avoid assessments and penalties. He/She develops the economic analysis to support the overall transfer pricing strategy using international databases and economic models. This position develops strategies for managing audits to ensure successful completion of U.S. and foreign transfer pricing audits. The Transfer Pricing Manager reviews new accounts, transactions, and services that involve intercompany transactions to ensure the best pricing methodology is applied and to ensure accurate transfer pricing.Other DutiesDevelops the economic analysis to support the overall transfer pricing strategy using international databases and economic models.Assists in evaluating the advantages of obtaining APAs to defend transfer pricing methodologies on audits.Develops alternatives during transfer pricing audits to aid the development of an equitable solution and reduce the amount of audit assessments.Reviews contracts to ensure intercompany transactions have accurate and legally defensible documentation.Organizes and develops processes to ensure accurate transfer pricing accounting and documentation for Sarbanes-Oxley audits.Works with UPS Accounting Department and Global Accounting Centers to ensure accounting for transfer pricing calculations is properly recorded.Collaborates with outside consultants and the Transfer Pricing Supervisor to prepare economic analysis that identifies comparable companies to specific UPS business entities for purposes of inclusion in transfer pricing studies for review by federal, state, and foreign tax authorities.Reviews annual Small Package and Supply Chain Solutions (SCS) transfer pricing documentation to ensure compliance with the Internal Revenue Code, foreign transfer pricing, and Organization for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) guidelines for all countries where UPS has operations.Reviews monthly and quarterly Small Package and SCS compensation adjustment calculations to confirm accurate transfer pricing accounting.Reviews new general ledger accounts to determine accurate compensation adjustment and cost plus methodology, and ensures proper transfer pricing accounting. Preferred CompetenciesAccounting Knowledge: Demonstrates a broad business and accounting knowledge; describes methods in compliance with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP).Business, Financial, and Industry Knowledge: Considers industry and financial trends when making account decisions; understands critical aspects of business models and operating structures to provide input into decisions.Conducts Research: Identifies the business problem that requires research; identifies sources of information that are relevant to a problem; reviews literature and data related to the research question; summarizes information from data sources.Legal, Regulatory, and Compliance Knowledge: Applies knowledge of agencies' functions and regulations to compliance and enforcement activities; identifies routine situations where the organization may be out of compliance as well as the specific impacts of non-compliance.Minimum QualificationsMaster’s Degree (or internationally comparable degree) – PreferredMaster’s Degree (or internationally comparable degree) in Accounting or Economics – PreferredDoctoral Degree (PhD) (or internationally comparable degree) in Accounting or Economics – PreferredJuris Doctorate (JD) – PreferredCertified Public Accountant (CPA) Certification – PreferredExperience using Microsoft Office Suite products (Excel and Access) – PreferredUPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Transfer Pricing Manager Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA 30328",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-transfer-pricing-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-170190296.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,a8198c53c2670c59621b4847d3688c6f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a Principal Member of Technical Staff to join our Wireless Access Architecture and Devices team. If you want to get involved in advanced 5G technology and contribute in our esteemed technical staff discipline then read below about our exciting opportunity! Working as a Principal Member of Technical Staff, you will be required to demonstrate your highly technical skills and deep understanding and working familiarity with wireless communication systems in general and 3GPP based 3G/4G/5G cellular systems in general and the Radio Access Technology in particular. To attain this technical level, you will be required to have or be capable of exhibiting significant contributions in these areas. Your contribution can be external to the company as well as internal. As the Principal Member of Technical Staff, you will be recognized in the company as a technical leader within this area and may lead projects across multiple groups as it relates to AT&T 4G and 5G cellular networks. Your contribution will be significant towards the overall AT&T technology strategy for 5G Radio Access Networks. Daily responsibilities involve: Develop new concepts as they relate to optimization of various elements of L1/L2 of a 5G radio access networks using techniques such as machine learning, linear/nonlinear programing etc. Develop novel cross-layer optimization techniques for better traffic management and service level optimization and work with other groups to create a SDN based framework for AT&T RAN controller. Work on developing a framework of new concepts and algorithms that can be used in a multi-RAT multi-service environment network optimization. Focus on optimization techniques as they relate to various L1/L2/L3 components of the 5G RAN as well as service aware traffic management and optimization. Analyze the benefit of implementing such optimization techniques in AT&T 5G network via modeling and simulations. Work with other teams to ensure the implementation of such optimization techniques in AT&T SDN based RAN Controller. Education: Master or PhD degree in an approved field such as Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Electronic Engineering or Mathematics from an accredited university. Experience: PhD in an approved field with a minimum of 4 years of relevant experience or Masters in an approved field with a minimum of 10 years or relevant experience. Awesome Points: Extensive and in depth understanding and experience of cellular networks including 4G and 5G. Experience with optimization techniques and analytical and/or simulation based analysis of wireless networks. Familiarity with Radio Access Network protocols for LTE, LTE advanced, and 5G radio access network with particular L1/L2 optimization and cross level optimization. Good understanding of SDN/NFV in the context of radio access networks and how that applies to our domain 2.0 vision of 5G. Experience with application of aforementioned skill and concepts toward research and development of new technology, concepts and ideas for wireless networks. Experience with development of simulation platform using platforms such as MatLab, NS-2/NS-3, C/C++, OpNET etc. Things that will make you stand out: Ability to solve complex, critical problems related to significant and unique issues Uses extensive research, interpretative thinking and innovative methods in developing solutions Has the ability to explain and provide technical expertise to peers across the company Can promote good working relationships and develop mutually beneficial strategic alliances with customers",Principal Member of Technical Staff G RADIO NETWORK OPTIMIZATION Job in Austin,,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-member-of-technical-staff-5g-radio-network-optimization-job-austin-tx-us-171297485.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=11,,,26eb21dea80bd7009476cccfb5ebc1c9
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Ellenwood,Full Time,"Ellenwood, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-ellenwood-ga-us-170915238.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b655decc3001a5da02e083abfb750d44
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Certifying Scientist Opening available for a Certifying Scientist to certify negative and non-negative drug testing results in accordance with the SOP manual, to review all results from EIA analytical screening and confirmed results using Agilent LC/MS/MS using Mass Hunter data analysis, and conferred with the LCM scientist. Applicant must possess 6 months' experience in the job offered and a Bachelor's of science in Biology or its equivalence. Competitive Salary. Send resume to Lab Solutions, LLC, 1451 Northside Drive NW, Suite A, Atlanta, GA 30318",Certifying Scientist Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30318",All,http://jobview.monster.com/certifying-scientist-job-atlanta-ga-us-170584137.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b912e44c73100ac88fa7ec8d79d372c0
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title Regional Manager, Facilities Auto Req ID 41474BR Job Description OVERVIEW This position is responsible for achieving the expected level of service delivery as described in the Service Level Agreements and measured by the Key Performance Indicators at all assigned facilities within a geographic area. Additionally, the expected levels of service delivery must be achieved at the lowest possible cost, minimally within the prescribed budget for each facility. RESPONSIBILITIES   Lead highly skilled Technicians and Managers, delivering Material Handling, Industrial Automation, and Robotics Services in a 24x7 distribution- fulfillment  environmentEstablish strategy and direction for site operations in conjunction with the senior account leadership team consistent with client goals and align team accordinglyCoordinate the operational aspects of the properties in a manner which protects, maintains and improves the value of the client's assets and operationsPerform compliance audits and SLA audits on site four times per year or as needed to determine condition and extent of service required; develop and drive performance improvement plans for both leadership team members and site level service improvements.Develop and manage annual operating expense budgets; Provide written variance analysis and forecast to clientIn conjunction with the leadership team Develop property specific multi-year capital improvement project plans; manage the process to complete the projectsManage third-party contractors/vendors engaged in operating and maintaining propertiesTeam with Procurement lead to bid and contract for scheduled and operational maintenance and project servicesTransform existing operational practices to leverage JLL tools, processes, relationships, best practices to ensure service delivery is high efficient and effective. Client Relationship ManagementPrimary interface with client representatives. Collaborate to determine client expectations. Ensures delivery of committed services and overall satisfaction with JLL performance. Demonstrate leadership, responsiveness and creativity in finding solutions for service delivery. Employee ManagementWork with Account Director to provide the strategy, vision and continuous improvement to drive the facility personnel to advance the quality of service delivery and further the client partnership.Foster a collaborative teamwork environment. Promote energy and enthusiasm. Maximize productivity. Motivate employees with recognition and career growth opportunities.Ensure optimal roll out and training in the use of standard JLL tools as well as client standardized tools, processes and systems where possible: 360 Facility computerized maintenance management system, JD Edwards finance and accounting, Clarify call center operations, Staples, SiteStuff e-procurement, AiX, ProSite Assessments and any others. Ensure facility compliance with use of the new tools.Complete all performance reviews, both mid-year and year-end, on a timely basis. Ensure that individuals that do not achieve excellence or show significant performance problems are coached and put on improvement plans. Work with HR to ensure proper performance management steps are taken.Work with the Account Director to source employee career growth and development opportunities within or outside of the account. Understand employee career growth aspirations to enable matching of firm needs with employee abilities. SERVICE DELIVERY Leads the facility organization to perform in accordance with the Service Level Agreements, achieve the Key Performance Indicators and score favorably on the client satisfaction surveys.Administer contract services including all major facilities operations as well as lead highly skilled Technicians and Managers, delivering Material Handling, Industrial Automation, and Robotics Services in a 24x7 distribution - fulfillment environment Optimize service call responsiveness and use of the National Property Service Center.Ensures reliability of conveyance equipment and building infrastructure supporting operations by completing preventive maintenance and reactive work orders.Ensure properties in the regional portfolio pass the JLL management, operations and financial audits Financial ManagementDevelop and maintain operating budgets for all sites, meeting targets as defined in KPIsMeet facility specific cost savings targets to contribute to the account achieving significant savings in year one and two of outsourced operations.Work with strategic sourcing professionals to identify cost savings opportunities and support their contracting efforts.Work with finance and accounting professionals to produce on-time and accurate reports, including cost savings initiatives, variance analyses, etc. SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS Undergraduate or Master’s degree in Business Administration, Engineering Technology or related field preferred.Minimum 8-10 years direct supervision of multi-building operations required Leading highly skilled Technicians and Managers, delivering Material Handling, Industrial Automation, and Robotics Services in a 24x7 logistics environmentSuperior financial skills and budgeting experience is a requirementExperience in managing multi-site locations, vendors and capital projectsExperience leading with in complex logistics- distribution- fulfillment facilitiesExperience managing on-site technical service operationsSuperior client relationship management skillsAbility to plan and manage within budget and time constraintsStrategic thinker with strong implementation orientationUnderstanding of commercial leases, contract documents and routine accounting methodsFamiliarity with and understanding of building systemsAbility to multitask and work without direct supervisionStrong organizational skills and collaborative management style needed.Proficient in MS Office, and possess strong written, verbal and people skills Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $58.3 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for’ in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years •America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive yearsThis partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com Information Security StatementEmployees are expected, at all times, to perform their responsibilities in accordance with the JLL Code of Business Ethics and the firm’s corporate policies. Employees granted access to the firm’s information technology are expected to follow the firm’s guidance designed to promote best practices for information security, data privacy and the appropriate use of technology systems. EEO Statement JLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",Regional Manager,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-manager-facilities-job-atlanta-ga-us-170466170.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bd56224a32c7464f8cc1f52284311d0a
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY: Hours are 12:30 p.m. to 8 p.m. Monday thru Friday Valid Driver License Required for the Loader Position This person in this position will unload the dirty garments off of the trucks and separate for washing at the beginning of the production process. At the end of the production process, the person in this position is accountable for ensuring the correct orders are loaded on the appropriate trucks for the route delivery drivers. ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: - STEPS TO LOAD A TRUCK: --Identify and transfer which upper trolley lines are storing garments for the day which you are loading trucks. This information can be found in the Trolley System Book in the Shipping Department. --On the erase board, record which routes are on which lower trolley lines --Back a truck up to the loading dock. --Put mats on the rack behind the driver�s seat --Locate the cage that the stager filled for the route being loaded and place the contents of the cage in the truck: --Initial completed loadsheets. --Check the damage line for garments. Place these garments on the dashboard of the truck for the appropriate route. --Check for NOGS in the yellow bins on the loading dock. --Put the garments on the truck after the load sheet is filled. The garments are on the lower trolley lines and can be pushed by hand towards the truck. --Fill the barrels in the rear of the truck with the appropriate quantity of shop towels. --Put cleaners, soaps, and grit on the dashboard. --Make sure there are laundry bags for the driver. --Place 2 hanger reclamation racks on the truck. --Make sure there are plenty of pouches for soil tickets and plastic bags for the driver. --Park the loaded truck and leave the loadsheet on the dashboard for the driver. --Hang up the keys for all trucks in the Route Rep Entrance. --Clean up the loading dock. --Bring garments down from the upper trolley storage lines to the lower trolley storage lines in order to make room for shippers to store additional routes the following day. Label which routes are on which lines on the erase board. --Complete productivity paperwork. - STEPS TO UNLOAD A TRUCK: --Place mats on the floor so that the soiled garments can be unloaded onto them. --Locate cages that can be used for soiled linen, towels, mops and CRT�s. --Back a truck up to the unloading dock. In order to do this safely, one person must stand by the unloading dock to let the driver know when to stop backing the truck. --Identify the route that is on the truck and note it on the lot list. NOTE: Refer to the sheet posted on the wall for which lots certain routes must be put into. --Unload garments from the truck. Set laundry bags of clothing on the mats for the sorter to sort. --Pull the truck forward far enough to allow for other merchandise to be unloaded: Put bags of shop towels in the shop towel cage; put linen bags in the linen cage; put CRT�s and mops in the appropriate cage. --Move the truck to the other end of the loading dock when mats and barrels of shop towels are left to unload. Place mats in a mat cage and barrels inside the plant near the shop towel counter. --Remove the dirty mat on the floor of the truck, sweep the truck, and put a clean 3x10 mat on the floor. --Check the Equipment List to see if any equipment such as empty barrels or carts needs to be placed on the truck. --Drive the truck to the loading dock and park it in a parking space. The loaders will back the truck up to the dock when they are ready to load it. --Continue this process until all the trucks are unloaded. --Clean up the area by sweeping the floor. EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS: - HS diploma/GED or equivalent reading, verbal and written communication, and basic math skills. WORK EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: SKILLS AND COMPETENCIES: SPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE, LICENSES etc.: - Valid driving license required Working Conditions, Hazard & Physical Work Demands: Working outside in inclement weather, handling soiled garments, and delivering products to a variety of different industries. G&K plant environment - noisy and moving equipment. Loading truck - standing, walking, bending, stooping, regularly lifting up to 50 lbs. In and out of truck throughout day, unloading and reloading truck - standing, walking, bending, stooping and regularly lifting up to 50 lbs.",Loader/Unloader Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30336",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/loader-unloader-job-atlanta-ga-us-170743337.aspx?mescoid=5301089001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,5b3ce4be40717341f6b0728ec9da15ad
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"As the Procurement Manager you will be responsible to constantly drive product costs down while maintaining relationships with key suppliers; all in the bounds of maintaining the highest quality of food in their restaurants. Client DetailsMy client is one of the fastest growing fast food chains in the US. Their revenues have increased by 120% in the last year.DescriptionThe Procurement Manager will be an integral part of our client's expansion. You will be responsible for procurement for 200 units.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Partner with Culinary and Operations Team to source necessary ingredients/supplies.Effectively manage the cost categories relative to budget and market conditions, including minimizing risk and exposure of obsolete and discontinued inventoryTrack commodities markets on prices and supply and determines strategy and direction for optimal procurement programManage freight routes, brackets and freight lane optimization to ensure best delivered costsMaintain a strong professional relationship between all in restaurant suppliersEvaluate and implement strategic contracting, supplier development and cost management objectivesIn charge of Procuring all indirect and director materials for the business related to the food industryProfileEDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE:Bachelor's degree in supply chain management, business, or related field 5+ years of experience in a purchasing organization with overall value chain analysis, reduction of non-value added costs and commodity management Industry experience: experience working with a multi-unit fast casual chain a plus Logistics management experience (internal or third party) a plusProfessional certification in purchasing or materials management a plus Job OfferOn offer is a great opportunity to join a growing business. They have great benefits also.",Procurement Manager Job in Austin,"Full Time , Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/procurement-manager-job-austin-tx-us-170520879.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=7,"85,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",,1b98413bab7152dceaa46fd7bea039f2
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition/Vacancy No. 136175BR Position Title Senior Program Manager Water/Wastewater Job Category Program and Project Management Business Line Water Country United States of America State/Province/Region USA - Georgia City Atlanta Why Choose AECOM? AECOM is a premier, fully integrated professional and technical services firm positioned to design, build, finance and operate infrastructure assets around the world for public- and private-sector clients. With nearly 100,000 employees — including architects, engineers, designers, planners, scientists and management and construction services professionals — serving clients in over 150 countries around the world, AECOM is ranked as the #1 engineering design firm by revenue in _Engineering News-Record_ magazine’s annual industry rankings, and has been recognized by _Fortune_ magazine as a World’s Most Admired Company. The firm is a leader in all of the key markets that it serves, including transportation, facilities, environmental, energy, oil and gas, water, high-rise buildings and government. AECOM provides a blend of global reach, local knowledge, innovation and technical excellence in delivering customized and creative solutions that meet the needs of clients’ projects. A _Fortune 500_ firm, AECOM companies, including URS Corporation and Hunt Construction Group, have annual revenue of approximately $19 billion. More information on AECOM and its services can be found at ;www.aecom.com. About the Business LineWater We create comprehensive delivery solutions for water, wastewater and wet weather systems, desalination, water resources, water reuse, tunneling, and community infrastructure through traditional and alternative delivery services such as program management and design-build. Job Summary AECOM Water is currently seeking to identify a qualified individual to present as Senior Program Manager (PM) for large multi-year Water/Waste Water Programs. Programs typically involve planning, design, construction, commissioning and closeout of multiple projects totaling $1.0B+ in total capital cost. This key leadership and high-profile role presents an excellent career development opportunity. A strong compensation package and relocation assistance is available for this position. The hired candidate may initially be based in one of our North America offices, and must be willing to relocate to a program leadership assignment within three to six months. The Senior Program Manager (PM), working closely and in concert with the client, will serve in a key role directing day-to-day program management and will be instrumental to the successful development, implementation and delivery of the program. The PM will organize and direct all activities between the technical and administrative aspects of the program including scheduling, budgeting, cost control, cash flow, QA/QC, risk analysis, document control and management information systems. The PM will be required to balance and appropriately address the needs/concerns of all of the stakeholders impacted by this program, including but not limited to the client, public, local businesses, politicians, other agencies and the regulatory community. Other responsibilities include, but are not limited to: + Lead efforts, beginning at the planning phase, to develop a comprehensive program execution plan, implement community/public involvement and coordinate/communicate relevant program status/issues with regulatory agencies + Lead development and drive implementation of the necessary business processes, plans and procedures required to manage design and construction in a programmatic, process-driven manner + Direct design and construction management and oversight activities as well as supporting specialty contracts, vendor programs and stimulus projects + Work with the client in the selection of design, construction management and other consultants and will provide management oversight related to performance, schedule and cost for both design and construction management based on Key Performance Indicators + The programs usually involve the implementation of water and waste water-related capital improvements and entail diverse technical aspects including but not limited to large treatment facilities, pump stations, storage and supporting infrastructure Minimum Requirements + Bachelor’s degree in engineering + PE required + 20+ years of relevant water and/or wastewater system planning, engineering, program and construction management experience + Outstanding client service, organizational, planning, communications, supervisory and interpersonal skills + Excellent and verifiable performance track record of success + Valid driver's license This position requires successful completion of the AECOM Project Management Certification program within 6 months of hire. This certification program is a series of learning modules and is available on-line through the AECOM Learning Management System at no financial cost to the employee. Preferred Qualifications + $0.50 B+ capital improvement program experience + MBA and/or PMP or CCM certification are preferred What We Offer AECOM is a place where you can put your innovative thinking and business skills into high gear and work alongside other highly intelligent and motivated people. It's a place where you can apply your skills to some of the world's most challenging, interesting, and meaningful projects worldwide. It's a place that values the diversity of our areas of practice and our people. It's what makes AECOM a great place to work and grow. AECOM is an equal opportunity employer and Minorities, Females, Veterans, and Disabled persons are encouraged to apply. For further information, please click here at http://www.aecom.com/deployedfiles/Internet/Careers/Diversity%20and%20Inclusion/EEO%20is%20the%20Law%20Poster%20Supplement.pdf to view the EEO Is The Law poster.",Senior Program Manager Water/Wastewater Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-program-manager-water-wastewater-job-atlanta-ga-us-170862971.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ccd5a6ede4381f9a782feae20eb27ba8
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:12,No,jobs.monster.com,Payroll Clerks needed for contract opportunities in Gwinnett and Perimeter!!!  Positions are scheduled to begin the week of August 29th!!!  Qualified candidates should forward resumes for immediate consideration! Requirements include: *3-4 years of recent payroll processing experience to include*Multi-state*Garnishments*Manual checks  ,Payroll Clerks Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA 30326",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-clerks-job-atlanta-ga-us-171273809.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=11,14.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,Human Resources,1ac28f2f017d8f27102557cc25e14f96
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Start Date          :    ASAPDuration             :   Long TermWork Location  : Austin, TXSend resume at tom@snsglobalstaffing.com   API development both rest and soap. Experience with APIGEE, API connect, Mashery, or other API toolsAPI best practices  Monetization experience Report",Monster,,"Start Date          :    ASAPDuration             :   Long TermWork Location  : Austin, TXSend resume at tom@snsglobalstaffing.com   API development both rest and soap. Experience with APIGEE, API connect, Mashery, or other API toolsAPI best practices  Monetization experience",,http://jobview.monster.com/api-architect-job-austin-tx-us-170555805.aspx?mescoid=1700157001001&jobPosition=1,,,f698371d2d53d5c20c66f5d79a8af821
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-atlanta-ga-us-170854640.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f1f4875ed53fad9cb240637e1f39baec
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a .NET Support Lead in Atlanta, Georgia (GA). Essential Functions: Engages in developing proof of concepts (POCs) for new programs and conducts peer code reviews. - Handles customer business requirement elicitations independently Develops high level functional and technical design specifications into design Coordinates in resolving highly complex software development issues that arise in production environments Understands the entire Project context, and demonstrates the knowledge of end-to-end application architecture. Awareness on hardware, operating systems software, application programs, or network Mentors and train technical Associates Drives the software development Life Cycle (SDLC) concept and software development methodologies framework for structuring, planning, and controlling the process of developing an information system Leads customer interaction on technical issues and contributes on proposal writing Builds solution design for support and maintenance work for moderate to complex service environment. - Impact is on multiple areas, functions or processes Responsible for multiple applicationsREQUIREMENTS: Candidates for this role must have relevant experience and skills to perform the tasks above",.NET Support Lead Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/net-support-lead-job-atlanta-ga-us-171253405.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),d151f6a1a37ab4eb2d19fd683924184d
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Requisition # EG-005.33 Location Austin, TX 73301 USFort Worth, TX 76137 US (Primary)San Antonio, TX 78218 US Job Type Full-time Job Description The Project Engineer is responsible for all routine on-site project administration, scheduling and engineering.  Plans, coordinates, and manages on-site construction engineering activities and schedules and communicates with subcontractors. Prepares monthly pay estimates and updates the Project CPM schedule.  Prepares, coordinates and updates job budgets, change orders and cost reports for Project and District Manager’s review and approval. This position reports to the Project Manager and requires relocating to the project site. Responsibilities:Including but not limited to: • Review pay subcontractor pay estimates prior to management’s approval• Review the owner’s pay estimate prior to management’s approval• Supervise cost report management and lead regular review meetings• Supervise project CPM management and lead regular review meetings• Manage project document control system• Identify issues early and work to develop solutions• Prepare all required information for presentation at project reviews Job Requirements Qualifications:• BS in Civil Engineering or Construction Management• Must have prior Heavy/Highway experience on projects over $20 Million• Minimum 5 years of engineering experience in heavy/highway construction• Familiar with grading, drainage, paving (asphalt and concrete), bridge construction, retaining walls, and all other highway construction scopes• JDEdwards experience is preferred• Strong working knowledge of Excel and Word• Excellent verbal and written communication skills• Strong prioritization and organizational skills; detail-oriented Lane Construction Corporation is a DFW Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.    The Lane Construction Corporation is a leading U.S. construction company specializing in the transportation, infrastructure and energy industries. Lane’s unique combination of capabilities includes public-private partnerships/innovative financing and joint ventures; large, complex design-build and bid-build projects; and the ability to produce and install asphalt, aggregates and concrete. Report",Monster,,"Requisition # EG-005.33 Location Austin, TX 73301 USFort Worth, TX 76137 US (Primary)San Antonio, TX 78218 US Job Type Full-time Job Description The Project Engineer is responsible for all routine on-site project administration, scheduling and engineering.  Plans, coordinates, and manages on-site construction engineering activities and schedules and communicates with subcontractors. Prepares monthly pay estimates and updates the Project CPM schedule.  Prepares, coordinates and updates job budgets, change orders and cost reports for Project and District Manager’s review and approval. This position reports to the Project Manager and requires relocating to the project site. Responsibilities:Including but not limited to: • Review pay subcontractor pay estimates prior to management’s approval• Review the owner’s pay estimate prior to management’s approval• Supervise cost report management and lead regular review meetings• Supervise project CPM management and lead regular review meetings• Manage project document control system• Identify issues early and work to develop solutions• Prepare all required information for presentation at project reviews Job Requirements Qualifications:• BS in Civil Engineering or Construction Management• Must have prior Heavy/Highway experience on projects over $20 Million• Minimum 5 years of engineering experience in heavy/highway construction• Familiar with grading, drainage, paving (asphalt and concrete), bridge construction, retaining walls, and all other highway construction scopes• JDEdwards experience is preferred• Strong working knowledge of Excel and Word• Excellent verbal and written communication skills• Strong prioritization and organizational skills; detail-oriented Lane Construction Corporation is a DFW Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.    The Lane Construction Corporation is a leading U.S. construction company specializing in the transportation, infrastructure and energy industries. Lane’s unique combination of capabilities includes public-private partnerships/innovative financing and joint ventures; large, complex design-build and bid-build projects; and the ability to produce and install asphalt, aggregates and concrete.",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-eg-005-33-job-austin-tx-us-170528468.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=6,,,09012453517dfff8bd73458f7bd6e633
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Role: IVR Developer (Avaya OD (Orchestration Designer) + Nuance grammar exp)Work Location: Atlanta, GA/Costa Mesa, CADuration: 6+ Months Very Must Skills:Avaya OD (Orchestration Designer)VXML,GRXMLJava, J2EENuance grammar development This will be support + enhancement kind of work. LocationSkill Set(Mandatory)Exp LevelAdditional Skill SetRole ExpectationsCosta Mesa, CA2.  VXML,GRXML 3.   Java, J2EE 4.  Nuance grammar development6+ yearsAvaya Aura PBX Avaya AAEP R7 IVR Nuance Recognizer V9 Nuance Speech Server V5.1 Deep technical bench however, may also play an onsite business solution consultant2. Resolve application bugs 3. Develop minor enhancements to the IVR platform 4. Modify / Create VDN’s Vectors as required to support call flow and IVR enhancements 5. Support QA and UAT as required 6. Perform code migration into production Thanks,NivasSoftHQ IncConsulting – Development – Staffing  Direct: 858-658-9200 x 621| Fax: 858-225-6834 | E-mail: nivas@softhq.com Report",Monster,,"Role: IVR Developer (Avaya OD (Orchestration Designer) + Nuance grammar exp)Work Location: Atlanta, GA/Costa Mesa, CADuration: 6+ Months Very Must Skills:Avaya OD (Orchestration Designer)VXML,GRXMLJava, J2EENuance grammar development This will be support + enhancement kind of work. LocationSkill Set(Mandatory)Exp LevelAdditional Skill SetRole ExpectationsCosta Mesa, CA2.  VXML,GRXML 3.   Java, J2EE 4.  Nuance grammar development6+ yearsAvaya Aura PBX Avaya AAEP R7 IVR Nuance Recognizer V9 Nuance Speech Server V5.1 Deep technical bench however, may also play an onsite business solution consultant2. Resolve application bugs 3. Develop minor enhancements to the IVR platform 4. Modify / Create VDN’s Vectors as required to support call flow and IVR enhancements 5. Support QA and UAT as required 6. Perform code migration into production Thanks,NivasSoftHQ IncConsulting – Development – Staffing  Direct: 858-658-9200 x 621| Fax: 858-225-6834 | E-mail: nivas@softhq.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/ivr-developer-avaya-od-orchestration-designer-nuance-atlanta-ga-costa-mesa-ca-urgent-job-atlanta-ga-us-170640978.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,,611a61b6306e4a0ddec22c1d970bef9f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hiring for the following locations: Five Oaks Southpark Meadows There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $49,157 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $56,860 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Study Guides for pre-employment screening (click the links below to open the various study guides) Retail Sales Consultant Test Reid Report Apply now! Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Bilingual Spanish Retail Sales Consultant Job in Austin,,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-spanish-retail-sales-consultant-job-austin-tx-us-171078588.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=17,,,cda28828a0ff925b4ea3f42f2c53437e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-atlanta-ga-us-170857248.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f947df7ff25b302618343a19f4b66789
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:11:20:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England has been hiring and training drivers since 1920. We are also one of the oldest and largest refrigerated trucking company in the nation. The majority of the freight you haul for us is no-touch – our clients will do all of the loading and unloading. You can choose to drive solo (OTR, regional, dedicated or intermodal) or as part of a team (OTR and regional). Experienced drivers also have the opportunity to earn extra income by becoming a truck driver trainer for the C.R. England team. There are many dedicated routes available for experienced C.R. England company truck drivers. Dedicated runs provide a stable income and predictable home time. Over the last few years, the Dedicated division has grown swiftly and will continue to grow in years to home. Benefits:Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Awards for SafetyLiberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Paid Time Off Retirement Plan 401k w/Company ParticipationHome Time-C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C.R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today!",Truck Driver – CDL ( Class A ) Transportation – Full Time / Training Provided Job in Sandy Springs,Full Time,"Sandy Springs, GA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-cdl-class-a-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-sandy-springs-ga-us-171213865.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,4ac9e056d6bdb2f6156a4b3af2e6c457
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE- The Sr. Operations Business Analyst of Tool Rental is responsible for:-          Management of D78 Communication vehicles-          Management of D78 myApron page-          Management of  the Rental & Repair Newsletter-          Owner of  the Tool Rental Top Performers programMAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES –Lead Project Teams of Analysts and other associates Perform data gathering tasks, synthesis - develop solutions, project/strategy planning and data utilization.Produce documents for teams and leadership to review and utilize.Deliver presentations to teams and executive leaders and sponsors.Build skills and knowledge including self-development, team knowledge and customer (internal) knowledge.Deliver presentations to teams and executive leaders and sponsors.NATURE AND SCOPE –Typically reports to Store Operations Process Manager or Store Operations Business Manager (or Sr. Managers).No associates report to this role on a permanent basis, but requires the leadership of a work group: assign and review work, train and contribute to performance appraisal (but not hiring, firing or disciplinary action).ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS –Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS –Must be eighteen years of ageMust pass the Drug TestMust pass pre-employment tests if applicable EDUCATION REQUIRED –The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a bachelor's degree program or equivalent degree in a field of study related to the job.YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 3PHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS –Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles.  PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS –Master's Degree is preferred.5 years of work experience.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES –Experience leading high performing teams.Consulting management and/or project management.Strong quantitative skills such as statistics and data analysis.Problem solving Strong Operations, Retail and/or field knowledge. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",SR OPERATIONS BUSINESS ANALYST- TOOL RENTAL Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-operations-business-analyst-tool-rental-job-atlanta-ga-us-171096367.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=7,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0411f03f0414a3ad2ce80fb32449dbbc
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"KinderCare Education is the nation’s leader in early childhood education. We nourish curiosity through purposeful experiences to create a future full of lifelong learners. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to create a world of learning, joy and adventure for more than 161,000 children ages six-weeks through 12 years every day.   Our Teachers bring warmth, patience, and understanding to the classroom every day, encouraging children to learn and grow. They inspire children to be lifelong learners using our nationally recognized curriculum that promotes social, physical, verbal, and cognitive development. Our Teachers are committed to making their center successful and know that creating meaningful relationships with children, families, and their team play a crucial role in that success. When you join our team as a Teacher you will: Implement KCE’s curriculum, and State Pre-K requirements, in a way that is consistent with the unique needs of each child; create a safe, nurturing environment where children can play and learn.  Partner and communicate with parents, in your a shared desire to provide the best care and education for their children.   Support your center’s success; partner with center staff and leadership to achieve goals around enrollment, accreditation, and engagement. Cultivate positive relationships with families, teachers, state licensing authorities, community contacts and corporate partners. Required Skills and Experience: A love for children and a strong desire to make a difference every day.  Ability to build relationships with families and coworkers and create a dynamic environment where play and learning happens. Outstanding customer service skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to multi-task and manage multiple situations effectively Must possess active Child Development Associate (CDA) Credential or meet NAEYC and state Pre-K candidacy requirements Must meet state specific guidelines for the role Must be physically able to use a computer with basic proficiency, lift a minimum of 40 pounds, and work indoors or outdoors.  Must be able to assume postures in low levels to allow physical and visual contact with children, see and hear well enough to keep children safe, and engage in physical activity with children. Ability to speak, read, and write English. The benefits our career professionals enjoy: In addition to a rewarding career where you help shape children's futures, KinderCare Education provides a competitive compensation package. Benefits include:   Medical, dental and vision Discounted child care Generous paid time off Education assistance and reimbursement Medical expense reimbursement/ Life insurance/Disability benefits/ Health and wellness programs 401(k) savings and investment plan with employer match   KinderCare Education employs more than 32,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our devoted family of education providers leads the nation in accreditation and includes KinderCare® Learning Centers, CCLC®, Champions® Before- and After-School Programs, Cambridge Schools™, Knowledge Beginnings® and The Grove School®.   KinderCare Education is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.",Pre K Teacher (GA & PA only) Job in College Park,Full Time Employee,"College Park, GA 30349",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/pre-k-teacher-ga-pa-only-job-college-park-ga-us-170388142.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=5,,Education/Training,337c81ed8d28dee64397528db17bb78e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionLooking for a law enforcement career? The Army National Guard is looking for dedicated team members to serve their community, state, and nation as Military Police (MPs).MPs support battlefield operations through circulation control, providing area security, conducting prisoner of war operations, supervising civilian internee operations, and carrying out law and order operations. MPs also support the peacetime Army community protecting critical resources, implementing crime prevention programs, and preserving law and order.The skills and experience you develop as a National Guard MP translate directly to those practiced by civilian police forces and security firms, making you a more attractive job candidate than someone without this background.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the National Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Military Police consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 12 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT) and on-the-job instruction, including practice in police methods. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Military Police - Police Officer Job in Henderson,Full Time Employee,"Henderson, NV 89002",,http://jobview.monster.com/31b-military-police-police-officer-job-henderson-nv-us-178732693.aspx?mescoid=5501110001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,1259bdeee6ab543298171f51f17d878c
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Currently seeking a 3+ year Senior Auditor for a one of the top Las Vegas based CPA firms. The ideal candidate with have their BS in Accounting, CPA and 3+ years of hands-on public accounting audit experience. This opportunity offers excellent growth potential to a manager, excellent benefits and work/life balance.",Senior Auditor Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-auditor-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178779344.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=4,"65,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a13c4422cdd8896a2f0e736e60338445
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Based out of West Palm Beach, FL, we are a family run firm that specializes in Transportation Solutions and building better communities! We provide our clients with top notch Engineering, Planning, Design and Technology Solutions. We are an innovative firm that prides itself on building trusting and lasting relationships with all of our clients. We have close to 200 professional in 13 offices dedicated to making this happen!What You Will Be DoingOversee all projects in specific group/departmentManage project teams of various sizes, including sub-consultantsEstablish group budgets and schedules, manage billability of group, troubleshooting and quality control on projectsDevelop new business opportunities and maintain existing client relationships through networking, client meetings, presentations and performing client satisfaction meetingsTraining and development of staff, including performance managementLead regular staff meetings as part of supervisory dutiesProvide specialized technical assistance to clients and staffDevelop proposals and lead project presentations on complex projects.Attend client meetings, presentations and public hearings as necessaryCoordinate with members of senior management to implement standard operations procedures and share technical expertise, industry trends and business development leadsReview and approve invoices for group within company schedule, addressing billing and accountsreceivable issues as necessary. This includes sub-consultant servicesWhat You Need for this PositionBachelor’s degree in Civil Engineering from an accredited four-year college or university12+ years progressively responsible experience in transportation engineering with at least 4 years of supervisory experienceActive participation in at least one professional society/organizationCERTIFICATIONS/LICENSES REQUIRED: P.E. License requiredKNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES:Excellent oral and written communication skillsStrong technical expertiseStrong analytical and decision-making abilitiesProven ability to interact among multiple levels of the businessStrong customer focus and interpersonal skillsDemonstrated leadership skills and abilityAbility to multitask and strong organizational skills necessary to prioritize and organize multiple projectsKnowledge of relevant computer applicationsWhat's In It for YouWe truly care about our employees! The average tenure for our employees in 15 years, and we provide an environment that promotes growth and work life balance! We have a work hard, play hard mentality and enjoy lots of fun activities out of the office! - Flexible work schedule, business casual dress, casual Fridays- Employer subsidized medical coverage- Cafeteria style plan for insurance- Flexible spending account (pre-tax Health Care and Dependent Care reimbursement accounts)- 401(k) with company match- Generous paid time off policy- Dental Insurance available- Salary commensurate with experience plus approved overtimeSo, if you are a Senior Project Engineer with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Sr. Project Engineer-Transportation Engineering exp. a MUST! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jennifer Cathcart,Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-project-engineer-transportation-engineering-exp-a-must!-job-west-palm-beach-fl-us-179144442.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=7,,,77926a802c1b14310c2d1c9f9e634ddd
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Senior Director of Regulatory Affairs with experience, please read on!Top Reasons to Work with UsWe are a privately-held biotechnology company focused on engineering and developing best-in-class oncolytic virus immunotherapeutic. We currently are the major developer for the Government project of ""Global-State-of-the-art-technology development for biomedical products"" We are also in a global phase 3 clinical trial in over 15 countries.What You Will Be Doing- Determine strategies to obtain global regulatory approval for clinical trials and products.- Provide strategic input and guidance to R&D project teams- Design regulatory processes and procedures- Regulate business decisions, product application and claims.- Develop and maintain strong working relationships with external legal, regulatory, and quality consultants to assist in project and with regulatory agencies- Ensure the FDA and global regulatory agencies receive a consistent and high quality approach in submittals and complianceWhat You Need for this Position- Bachelor's of Science- Minimum 15 years experience- Working understanding of electronic IND submission format and execution (eCTD)- BLA or NDA submission experience- Experience in oncologyWhat's In It for YouCompetitive Compensation and BenefitsSo, if you are a Senior Director of Regulatory Affairs with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Senior Director of Regulatory Affairs | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name John Stulpin,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-director-of-regulatory-affairs-job-san-francisco-ca-us-179122095.aspx?mescoid=1100056001001&jobPosition=5,,,9137256a4ff349717a4886d9d3adbf19
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionJoin the Army National Guard as a Fire Support Specialist and you'll find out just how exciting computers and communications can be. As part of an elite field artillery team, you will support infantry and tank units in combat operations while learning highly sought-after skills that will help you in your civilian career.Also known as the Forward Observer, the Fire Support Specialists act as the eyes of an artillery unit and are primarily responsible for target acquisition and relaying that information to artillery units at all levels. In this role, you will become an expert communicator as you establish, maintain, and operate communications equipment; encode and decode messages; assist in preparing and distributing fire support plans, documents, and lists; as well as determining target locations using computers or manual calculations.And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers, prepare observer target lists, initiate suppressive fire, and select and man observation posts. Plus, the skills you learn as a Fire Support Specialist can prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in computer consulting, information technology support, or data processing.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately seven weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn how to decisively compute target locations, proper ammunition handling techniques, system operations, and artillery tactics.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",F Fire Support Specialist Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89115",,http://jobview.monster.com/13f-fire-support-specialist-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178836448.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,74e1b818b0c8db74542c817a35370112
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Local Financial Institution is looking for an experienced Commercial Lender to manage and grow an existing portfolio. Position requires a minimum of 8 years experience in Lending and strong new business development.  Candidates must have a strong understanding of the banking industry and the underwriting process.   Highly competitive pay and bonus structure with room for advancement in the company. Responsibilities:Manage and grow a loan portfolio.Meet benchmarks in multiple facets including but not limited to profitability and credit quality.Promote new business development.Job Requirements:8+ years in lending. Bachelor's degree in Business, Finance or related fields.Relationship building and management skills.Understand and apply risk management policy and procedures.Existing portfolio is a strong plus.Apply with resume for confidential consideration.",SVP/Commercial Loan Officer Job in Branson,Full Time,"Branson, MO 65616",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/svp-commercial-loan-officer-job-branson-mo-us-177994377.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=15,$85.00+ /year,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,17dddaecfcf14fae9813a39106f5e507
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position duties include:Entry Level MarketingEntry Level Event PromotionsEntry Level Advertising We are seeking a Special Event Associate for a consistently growing event marketing company providing marketing, advertising and consulting services to large national companies and corporations. This firm identifies and develops new streams of revenue for clients through on-site promotions, innovative marketing strategies and advertising campaigns with a personal touch. Every product campaign is executed uniquely for each clients researched target market. As a result of recently taking on new clients to the event portfolio the marketing teams are looking for self motivated individuals to assist in the marketing events and grow into a campaign management role to develop new clients. This position is considered to be a crucial member of the Special Events team and reports directly to the Promotions Coordinator. Responsibilities:Assist the Promotions Coordinator in developing and executing marketing strategies for each eventCoordinate event activities including event setup, visual merchandising and inventory controlProcess and track event salesCoordinate event logistics, timelines and schedulesServe as Event Manager when necessaryServe as an enthusiastic member of the event staff and lead by example for interns The Special Events Training Program uses a hands on approach that will challenge our team to learn marketing, advertising, sales, public relations and management. Senior management provides a setting that will broaden experiences while promoting self-confidence, accomplishment and maturity. In just a short amount of time, an entry-level candidate will have the opportunity to work with several difference clients as well as the management team. We are looking for candidates with various backgrounds that have interests one or all of the following:Marketing/AdvertisingManagementPublic RelationsCommunicationsFinanceEvent PlanningCosmetic backgroundsFashion experience  JOB REQUIREMENTSEntry Qualifications:Bachelor's degree in Marketing, Communications, Advertising or Journalism OR1-3 years experience working in marketing, sales, customer service, brand promotions, or retailAdditional knowledge in the field is considered a plus including product positioning, pricing, promotions, market research, sales and distribution ; however full paid training is providedAbility to work some nights and weekends for events and promotionsMust have own vehicle to attend events; all travel is reimbursedPassion for events and brand promotionsShould be a proactive self-starter with the ability to work independently. Need strong ability to set priorities, solve problems, and be resourceful under pressure.Outgoing personality and able to interact with a variety of consumersComfortable in a fast paced environment and able to manage multiple projects and campaigns  Compensation:Exceptional Earning PotentialGenerous Bonus Levels on Top of HourlyIncentivesFull Training & SupportFun Working EnvironmentFully compensated travel opportunities both national and internationalGreat Advancement Opportunities  For IMMEDIATE consideration APPLY NOW!!",Event Promotions: Marketing / Public Relations- Entry Level Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89102",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/event-promotions-marketing-public-relations-entry-level-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178634045.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,241a7e02cccec244f061627ec25ac953
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, one of the largest full service heavy equipment dealerships in the nation, has an opening for a Field Mechanic. The Field Mechanics responsibilities include repairing, diagnosing, inspecting and maintaining various types of aerial and earth moving equipment, primarily servicing rentals and some customer owned equipment. Job Requirements: A minimum 3-5 years of experience as a mechanic repairing and maintaining heavy construction equipmentValid driver’s license and satisfactory driving recordAble to read schematics (both electrical and hydraulic)Capable of accomplishing task independently without direct supervision Perform thorough and accurate annual inspectionsKnowledgeable in troubleshooting various heavy equipment product linesAble to lift up to 40 lbs.History of safe work habitsGood customer service and communication skillsMaintains a great attitude toward workA high school diploma or equivalent is required Preferred Qualifications: Factory, vocational or mechanical training is a plusHistory of working with different forms of heavy equipment, specifically excavators, forklifts, compactors and other types of aerial and earth moving. Searching for a solid, growth-oriented company that values its employees? Join our client! They offer competitive salaries, excellent benefits package, 401K with company matching and ongoing training and development opportunities. Our client is an Equal Opportunity Employer of females, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans.",Field Technician / Heavy Equipment / Construction Equipment Job in Benicia,Full Time Employee,"Benicia, CA",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Technician-Heavy-Equipment-Construction-Equipment-Job-Benicia-CA-US-165404095.aspx?mescoid=4900873001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a05ab2e3ff99cae582c9c1ef487350fd
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Established Tractor and Equipment dealership in Gainesville, Florida is looking for a Mechanic to join their team. This is a full-time position, which will be working in the shop and in the field on various pieces of equipment included by not limited to tractors, diesel engines and hydraulics.If you are looking to join a great team that cares about you, this may be the position for you!The ideal candidate will possess the following:·         Minimum 1-5 years of relevant experience ·         Advanced knowledge in diesel engines and hydraulics·         Basic set of tools (must provide own tools)·         Strong organizational skills·         Team player with positive attitude·         Ability to work effectively and efficiently in a dynamic work environment Wages are based on experience and skill level. Please apply by emailing gatorlandjob@gmail.com with your contact information and qualifications.",Mechanic Job in Gainesville,Full Time,"Gainesville, FL 32601",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Mechanic-Job-Gainesville-FL-US-165410335.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),79bc066786c34c87c0edbf394ca7e0a1
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a GREAT opportunity with a strong national manufacturing organization seeking top Lean/Six Sigma Talent to join the team in a Production Manager role. Job DescriptionThe Production Manager is the leader for manufacturing plant functions for a defined area of the overall manufacturing plant. Works in conjunction with, or has direct responsibility for diverse areas as Operations, Production Control, Human Resources, Maintenance, Shipping, and Receiving. As a key member of the plant leadership team, the Manufacturing Manager will be expected to implement a zero waste manufacturing culture focused on continuous improvement and delivering sustainable performance for KPIs-SQDC OBJECTIVES: Identify, correct, maintain and improve quality standards with accountability for a complete operational area within the plant. Read and analyze charts, work orders, production schedules, and other records and reports, in order to determine production requirements and to evaluate current production estimates and outputs. Identify, solve problems, and remove barriers to production throughput. DAY-TO-DAY RESPONSIBILITIES: Coach and lead Production Associates and Team Leads to drive attainment of safety, housekeeping, quality, delivery, and productivity targets. Demonstrate equipment operations and work and safety procedures to new employees, or assign employees to experienced workers for training. Collaborate with other supervisors to coordinate operations and activities within or between departments. Other operational and leadership duties as assigned. KEYWORDS: Lean, Six Sigma, Green belt, Black belt, production, supervisor, Kaizen, Kanban, 5SDesired Skills and Experience Experience with continuous (one piece) flow manufacturing, labor paced production, standard work, and pull systems highly desirable, in addition to experience leading production in a made-to-order manufacturing environment.•       Any other duties as assigned by supervisor. ",Production Manager Job in Kinston,Full Time,"Kinston, NC",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Manager-Job-Kinston-NC-US-166066760.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=15,"80,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /yearBenefits, Competitive Bonus, Relocation","Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",5d2ebe392dae384f8d672e3c35b64be1
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:     Day Porter Part Time  7:00am to 11:00am   Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Cleans & Sweeps outside walkways Empties trash in entryways Cleans glass in entrances Follows all of Aramark's safety and sanitation policies Performs other duties assigned Qualifications   Past cleaning experience preferred   Additional Information:",Housekeeper - Unum Columbia Job in Columbia,"Part Time, Employee","Columbia, SC 29202",,http://jobview.monster.com/Housekeeper-Unum-Columbia-Job-Columbia-SC-US-165634482.aspx?mescoid=3700623001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,477b499c8dfa0d816d9117e655c415fa
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"WASHINGTON CHRYSLER CENTER, INC. is seeking a Full-Time, Experienced Auto Technician. Benefits include: Paid Vacation, 401K with Employer Match, Health Insurance, and Paid Holidays.Send resume to:Washington Chrysler Center105 E Van Trees St.Washington, IN 47501This job listing brought to you by The Washington Times Herald",Experienced Auto Technician Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,47501,Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Experienced-Auto-Technician-Job-US-165834812.aspx?ch=newswash&mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f22c6f4ae16dc9cbd884800fbbe7687e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"REQUIREMENTS:Seeking an Experienced Production Supervisor/Manager ready to Lead a Production Unit. Will Accept an Engineer with Limit Production Supervision Seeking to Advance thru Operation Management.DUTIES:Responsible for this Production Unit to Provide Leadership of the Production Teams. This will Include P/L Responsibility and Meeting Targeted Goals for Key Quality Operations System Metrics. My Client is Located North of Rockford, Illinois.PERKS:* Yearly Bonus to $12,000* Future Position Growth to Upper Management* Temporary Living and Relocation Provided",Production Unit Manager Job in Rockford,Full Time,"Rockford, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Unit-Manager-Job-Rockford-IL-US-162330965.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,"0.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",,f3de60f307eb0eade585a43508a70f32
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Neopost USA markets its Neopost and Hasler brands of mailing and shipping solutions throughout the United States via dealers and direct-sales channels. The company, headquartered in Milford, CT, supplies technologically advanced solutions for mailing, folding/inserting and addressing as well as logistics management and traceability. Neopost USA also offers a full range of services, including consultancy, maintenance and financing solutions. Position Description:   Neopost USA has an immediate opening in the Nashville area for a Field Service Technician. Technicians are responsible for installation, training and repair of Neopost's complete line of systems. Visit our website at www.neopostusa.com Neopost USA is actively seeking candidates who possess these essential qualifications: Ability to communicate and interact effectively in a multi functional and diverse organization Ability to multi task and change priorities as needed Ability to handle stressful situations and meet deadlines Commitment to customer satisfaction and retention Strong written and verbal communication skills Strong and effective decision making skills necessary to prioritize workload Strong MS Office skills (Word, Excel, Outlook) Proven experience and proficiency with electro-mechanical diagnostic and repair tools and test equipment Knowledge of PC hardware and software systems A strong electro-mechanical aptitude A + Certification desirable   Neopost USA facilitates the flow of documentation - letter, parcel and electronic - for small and medium businesses anytime, anywhere. Neopost USA is renowned for its technologically advanced mailing, folding/inserting, addressing, logistics management, traceability and shipping solutions offered throughout the United States via dealers and direct-sales channels. The company also offers a full range of services, including consultancy, maintenance and financing solutions. For more information about Neopost, visit our website at www.neopost.com   Neopost ranks number one in Europe and number two worldwide in mail processing and logistics systems. -         More than 5,500 staff in 13 countries (Austria, Belgium, Canada, France, Germany, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Netherlands, Norway, Spain, UK, USA) -         More than a million customers -         Products sold in more than 90 countries around the world -         Revenues in excess of 1.3 billion. Neopost USA is actively seeking candidates who display these six behaviors:  -         Accountability, personal accountability and a proactive approach. -         Adaptability and flexibility -         Strong communication skills/sincerity/candor -         A customer service orientation -         A team orientation and desire to partner and collaborate within one's team and cross functionally. -         Ability to form strong working relationships with a diverse groups of people   As a Field Service Technician you will enjoy a highly competitive salary as well as complete benefits and excellent opportunities for advancement and professional growth.    Neopost USA is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.  ",Field Service Technician / - Job in Nashville,Full Time,"Nashville, TN 37214",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-16-2068-Job-Nashville-TN-US-165793863.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb61821af0712a600d1647fc9a219b59
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Not too long ago CNN/Money and Money magazine ranked this location/town 44th on its list of the 100 Best Cities to Live in the United States. The ranking improved to 27th more recently as wellPlease do not respond via the monster message center, please email me directly if it is not too much trouble - joseph8601@sbcglobal.net Please feel free to call 860 889 4141, until 9 PM Eastern, 7 days a week, including most weekends and holidays, after you email a word doc resume directly to me from your own email, and I will help youMaintenance Supervisor - Equipment Supervisor over the Photo/Etch/ThinningEquipment supervisor with experience in etch AND (Photolithography OR Photo-lithography OR ""Photo lithography"" OR Photo OR litho OR lithography) and thinningREGULAR TASKS / RESPONSIBILITIES1.Evaluate standard critical performance indicators, availability, MTBF, MTTR2.Supervise hourly technicians; performance management, scheduling and payroll3.Manage and reduce costs in spare parts and consumables4.Manage continuous improvement to improve wafer and die yield5.Document, schedule and follow up on preventative and predictive maintenance6.Interview and provide recommendation on technical resources7.Establish shift scheduling for direct reportsSKILLS, EXPERIENCE, TRAITS, EDUCATIONSkills: •General working knowledge in multiple areas; mechanical, electrical, pipe-fitting, construction, calibration, preventative maintenance, spare parts•Preferred: Good working knowledge in all areas listed aboveExperience:•10 years as a Maintenance Technician or similar experience•Preferred:  Supervisory experienceTraits:•Interact well with a variety of employees and managers•Leadership capabilities•Detail oriented in electrical and mechanical work and documentation•Positive attitude, strong work ethic, record of excellent attendanceEducation: •Associates Degree, BS preferred. Physical Environment:•Work in the area of and with hazardous substances and may be required to select, inspect and wear appropriate PPE while working in the area of or with these hazardous substances.  The employee must be able to pass a pulmonary function test prior to employment.•May work with and around powered equipment and industrial machinery and will be responsible for complying with all environmental, health, and safety procedures, applicable federal, state, and local regulations and standard operating procedures Also, please understand this may take time for both of us working together to help advance your career. I will do my best for you and never charge you anything for our time and effortsIn all cases we always have several jobs not yet published on the WWW, listed on linkedin or posted to our company websiteMany full job descriptions and base salaries in your field of experience can be viewed in various sections on - http://www.anewbeginning-genesis2.com A New Beginning-Genesis 2 Regards, SHALOM, ciao, Namaste, Peace,JoeJoseph Anthony Vaccariellojoseph8601@sbcglobal.net",Semiconductor Maintenance Supervisor,Full Time,Multiple locations,"Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Semiconductor-Maintenance-Supervisor-Equipment-Supervisor-etch-Photolithography-thinning-etc-Job-US-164405940.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=7,"0.00 - 85,000.00 $ /yearbonuses, relocation money, etc",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e5fdda52aa91a70ed98a2a033b90ee67
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate is responsible for building loads for deliveries. In addition, must maintain a safe, clean and well organized lumber yard, load and unload lumber and/or building supplies, and operate a forklift. Other duties as assigned.Essential Functions:Build loads for deliveryLoad and unload lumber and building suppliesOperates forkliftKeeps management aware of any delays or discrepanciesKeeps lumber yard clean, well organized and safeEsta posicion es responsable de mantener un ambiente seguro, limpio y bien organizado con la madera, de carga y descarga de madera y / o materiales|de construccion, entrega de cargas de construccion, y operacion de un montacargas. Debe ser capaz de levantar los materiales de construccion a lo largo del dia. Otras tareas que le asigne.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-one.Ability to apply common sense understanding and carry out simple one or two-step instructions Capacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion de manera eficaz a los demas uno a uno.High school diploma or equivalent; or 1 to 3 months related experience or training.Previous experience working in a lumber yard or similar.Forklift operation experience strongly preferred. Un diploma de escuela secundaria or de educacion general (GED); o 1 a 3 meses de experiencia o entrenamieto relacionado. Tiene la capacidad de usar el sentido comun y puede ejercer simple instrucciones de uno a dos pasos; manejar situaciones regulares con minimo o sin ninguna dificultad.",Yard Associate (Benefits) ( G ) Job in Bridgeport,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Yard-Associate-Benefits-0409-7G-002-Job-bridgeport-WV-US-164829254.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,08b4cee3b34538c1bda431460108dc10
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field Service Technician Pioneering technology, exceptional service, acknowledged professionalism - that is what makes ENV Services a nationally respected leader in calibration, certification and decontamination services for the health care, pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries.  Position will support service operations by providing Calibration and/or preventive maintenance and repair of HEPA filtered devices, including Biological Safety Cabinets, Clean Benches, and Clean rooms. Using our test equipment, you will service air filtration equipment at medical and research facilities in eastern PA.  A company vehicle is provided, overnight travel can be anticipated. Your responsibilities will include routine service, troubleshooting, installation and maintenance.  ENV offers a competitive salary and full benefits package, in addition to growth potential. To apply, please online or send resume: careers@envservices.com Equal Opportunity Employer / AAP Job Requirements: Potential candidates will preferably have field service experience and will necessarily have a sound mechanical and electrical aptitude, a strong customer service focus, and excellent customer contact skills. Calibration or HVAC experience in the pharmaceutical and biomedical fields are highly desired. Post-secondary education is preferred. Daily job responsibilities may include lifting of various test equipment with weight up to 50lbs, extended periods of working overhead on a ladder, stooping, bending and driving sometimes extensively to customers locations. Applicants should have a lifting ability of at least 75lbs and up to 50lbs of overhead lifting.  Job requirements include:  Valid Driver's License and a clean driving record   Strong computer, scientific and organizational skills   Pre-employment Physical   Drug and Alcohol Screen",Field Service Technician Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165716803.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=13,,,29f40c2c6d694df6ea8a4462fda0f2a4
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Landscape Laborer, 45 temp full time Position Duties: Laborers will be needed for turf care, pruning, fertilization, irrigation systems maintenance and repair, general clean up amd installation of mortarless segmental concrete masonry wall units. Physical work in the outdoors. 3 months landscape EXP REQ. No education REQ. Post-hire drug testing REQ. Days & hours: Mon-Fri, 40h/wk, 6:00am-2:30pm. Dates of employment: 04/01/16-11/30/16. Wage: $12.07/h, OT $18.11/h if necessary. Raises, bonuses, or incentives dependent on job performance. OJT provided. Assurances: Transportation (including meals and, to the extent necessary, lodging) to the place of employment will be provided, or its cost to workers reimbursed, if the worker completes half the employment period; payment to be made in one lump sum. Return transportation will be provided if the worker completes the employment period or is dismissed early by the employer. The employer will provide workers at no charge all tools, supplies, and equipment required to perform the job. The employer guarantees to offer work for hours equal to at least three-fourths of the workdays in each 12-week period of the total employment period. Housing optional - $90/week. Utilites - based off local utility rates and usage. Medical insurance optional - pricing varies. The employer will provide daily transportation to and from the worksite. Job location: Memphis, TN - Shelby County. Applicants may inquire at Dept. of Labor & Workforce Development. Call 615-741-5671 or fax resumes to 615-741-3003 Attn: Lance Butler. Please reference Job Order: #419062. Employer: Rotolo Consultants, Inc. 894 Robert Blvd. Slidell, LA 70458. Contact: Angelina Halstead, fax (985) 643-2691 Posting provided by:",Landscape Laborers Job in Memphis,Full Time,"Memphis, TN 38103",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Landscape-Laborers-Job-Memphis-TN-US-165662124.aspx?ch=commercial&mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=9,,Student,2fb8df74de643d585cccd4384ab8183e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Water Treatment Equipment Mfr. in South Jersey seeks Field Service Tech.  Applicant will be responsible for start-up and troubleshooting of water treatment equipment.  Job skills require reading of electrical and mechanical drawings and interacting with contractors, engineers and equipment owners - communication skills a must.   Experience with pumps, valves and instrumentation is desirable.  Compensation includes 401K, profit sharing and medical/vision.  E-mail resume and salary requirements to:  rlilley@hungerfordterry.com   EOE",Field Service Technician Job in Clayton,Full Time,"Clayton, NJ 08312",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-Clayton-NJ-US-165815278.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,04dfdbd4278a56fb46f51696258ea64e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"San José State UniversityJob Title: PainterFull/Part Time: Full-TimeRegular/Temporary: RegularJob Code: 6526, Range 1Department: FD&OJob ID: 23629About the PositionFacilities Development & Operations (FD&O) is comprised of four primary departments: Planning Design & Construction (PDC); Maintenance & Operations (M&O); Environmental Health & Safety (EH&S); and Administrative Services (AS). SJSU is comprised of a main campus, a south campus, and a center at Moss Landing. In total, the facilities inventory comprises approximately 6M square feet of buildings on approximately 160 acres of land, with a staff of approximately 240 facility professionals comprised of managers, engineers, architects, administrative staff, journeymen, groundskeepers, custodians, and others. FD&O blends industry best practice, energy efficiency, and University Sustainability efforts to proudly serve our diverse campus community.Responsible for providing the full range of skilled painting, finishing and related work maintaining a wide variety of interior and exterior surfaces and structures, to ensure a clean, safe and attractive learning environment. Position makes decisions based upon sound maintenance practice.Responsibilities include but are not limited to the following:- Performs various types of preventative maintenance, including scraping, sanding, taping, covering, sealing voids, removing parts, and touch-ups.- Prepares for painting, and paints interior/exterior of college facility structures.- Moves and covers furniture and equipment to prepare for painting.- Operates hand and power tools for the preparation and completion of painting process.- Inspects surfaces and surrounding areas for needed maintenance or repair.- Operates paint mixing and coloring devices for preparation of materials.- Operates utility cart, scissor lift, forklift (as certified) for painting and transporting materials, personnel, and waste.- Reports problems and needed repairs to be documented and scheduled.- Unlocks and secures facility areas to access equipment, items to be repaired and/or maintained.- Records work details in log sheets and keeps time records to assists in completion of documentation.- Uses computer for communicating, researching painting-related items, documenting job duties, and recording time logs.- Maintains clean work areas, tools, equipment and associated structures.To Apply Visit: http://www.sjsu.edu/hr/careers/jobs/index.html Copyright 2015 Jobelephant.com Inc. All rights reserved.Posted by the FREE value-added recruitment advertising agency jeid-4d73b7be4127e74f86c33858d7cb292b",Painter Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95192",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Painter-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165100982.aspx?mescoid=4700809001001&jobPosition=18,,Entry Level,026a248a1aa127a7769d3429adbc2dba
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:14:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance Supervisor Location/ Site Description: This position will support oversee all maintenance work at the beautiful multi-family Oakwood Apartments in Moreno Valley. We are looking for dedicated work ethic and a passion for excellence. Learn more about us at, www.winnco.com Position Summary: The Lead Maintenance Technician is responsible for ensuring the physical aspects of the property meet the company’s established standards and any applicable laws. The incumbent ensures maintenance and orderliness of the property, HVAC, mechanical, electrical, utilities and lighting systems. Must have experience level to direct mechanics, technicians and outside contractors assigned on projects. Controls inventory of parts and equipment. This position supervises other staff members, vendors, and outside contractors.  Must also be able to perform maintenance work and repairs. Essential Functions: •        Providing assistance in supervising other maintenance staff •        Troubleshooting common apartment service work orders •        Scheduling vendors/ contractors •        Preparing vacant apartment homes •        Painting •        Heating/ cooling •        Electrical •        Carpentry/ general building repair •        Appliance repair Job Requirements: Education – Prior tech school education in construction/carpentry, appliances, electrical repairs, AC/Heating is desired. OR the equivalent of work experience and industry maintenance training. Years of Experience – 2 years experience performin maintenance work or equivalent. 1 year supervising others. Certifications/Licensure – Must have valid Driver’s License Computer Skills – Microsoft Office Physical Requirements – Able to lift up to 50 pounds Other – Participate in rotating 24/7 on-call schedule for emergency maintenance requests WinnCompanies Corporate Culture & Benefits: WinnCompanies is a fast-growing, award-winning national housing development and property management company with more than 2,600 team members working in 23 states. We offer opportunities for growth across the country. One-third of our team members were promoted to the positions they hold today.  We are always looking for outstanding team members who work with a passion for excellence, a “can do” results-oriented attitude and a dedication to quality. Our most successful team members are hardworking, responsible, customer-oriented individuals who are committed to improving the communities where they work. Founded in 1971, WinnCompanies is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Opportunity Employer that values and encourages diversity within the workplace. Nearly half of our workforce is comprised of women or minorities. In addition to training and recognition programs to help you succeed, we offer competitive Health, Dental, Life and Disability Insurance benefits, and a generous 401(k) plan. Learn more at www.winncompanies.com/careers .   See Job Description Additional Information:",Maintenance Supervisor Job in Moreno Valley,"Full Time, Employee","Maintenance Supervisor Location/ Site Description: This position will support oversee all maintenance work at the beautiful multi-family Oakwood Apartments in Moreno Valley. We are looking for dedicated work ethic and a passion for excellence. Learn more about us at, www.winnco.com Position Summary: The Lead Maintenance Technician is responsible for ensuring the physical aspects of the property meet the company’s established standards and any applicable laws. The incumbent ensures maintenance and orderliness of the property, HVAC, mechanical, electrical, utilities and lighting systems. Must have experience level to direct mechanics, technicians and outside contractors assigned on projects. Controls inventory of parts and equipment. This position supervises other staff members, vendors, and outside contractors.  Must also be able to perform maintenance work and repairs. Essential Functions: •        Providing assistance in supervising other maintenance staff •        Troubleshooting common apartment service work orders •        Scheduling vendors/ contractors •        Preparing vacant apartment homes •        Painting •        Heating/ cooling •        Electrical •        Carpentry/ general building repair •        Appliance repair Job Requirements: Education – Prior tech school education in construction/carpentry, appliances, electrical repairs, AC/Heating is desired. OR the equivalent of work experience and industry maintenance training. Years of Experience – 2 years experience performin maintenance work or equivalent. 1 year supervising others. Certifications/Licensure – Must have valid Driver’s License Computer Skills – Microsoft Office Physical Requirements – Able to lift up to 50 pounds Other – Participate in rotating 24/7 on-call schedule for emergency maintenance requests WinnCompanies Corporate Culture & Benefits: WinnCompanies is a fast-growing, award-winning national housing development and property management company with more than 2,600 team members working in 23 states. We offer opportunities for growth across the country. One-third of our team members were promoted to the positions they hold today.  We are always looking for outstanding team members who work with a passion for excellence, a “can do” results-oriented attitude and a dedication to quality. Our most successful team members are hardworking, responsible, customer-oriented individuals who are committed to improving the communities where they work. Founded in 1971, WinnCompanies is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Opportunity Employer that values and encourages diversity within the workplace. Nearly half of our workforce is comprised of women or minorities. In addition to training and recognition programs to help you succeed, we offer competitive Health, Dental, Life and Disability Insurance benefits, and a generous 401(k) plan. Learn more at www.winncompanies.com/careers .   See Job Description Additional Information:",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-Moreno-Valley-CA-US-165553436.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=18,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c28fdfdd204927ac756ed353a3d08875
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:12:54:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"River City Casino & Hotel, named among the top workplaces of 2015 by the St. Louis Post-Dispatch provides an exciting and fast-paced, values-oriented environment. We offer fun team member activities, one complimentary meal provided per shift, benefits which may include health, dental and vision insurance; paid time-off, tuition reimbursement, and a 401(k) company match. You can move your career forward by advancing within your department, to another department, or to one of our other 15 properties across the country. Join our team and work at our award winning Casino & Hotel as a Stewarding Supervisor!Coordinate and direct work on assigned shift to ensure the organization, sanitation, inventory and control of all cookware, china, glassware, and silverware items.Supervise dishwashers on assigned shift and ensure dishes, pots, pans, flatware and other kitchen items and utensils are cleaned in an appropriate and timely manner.Ensure all dishwashing machinery is operated in accordance with manufacturers operating instructions and properly cleaned at the end of the day/shift and is serviced periodically.Ability to obtain and maintain valid gaming licenseDemonstrated knowledge of kitchen sanitation standardsExperience with kitchen/dishwashing machinery Apply online at: https://www.pnkinc.com/careers Equal Opportunity Employer and Drug-Free WorkplacePI93232531Apply Here",STEWARD SUPERVISOR Job in St. Louis,"Full Time, Employee","St. Louis, MO 63125",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/STEWARD-SUPERVISOR-Job-St.-Louis-MO-US-165254283.aspx?mescoid=5301040001001&jobPosition=1,"26,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Installation/Maintenance/Repair,7aa78fcd3089fabf94a839108974f008
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:14:00:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Serving our community with career opportunities, FIRST QUALITYproudly serves healthcare and retail markets worldwide and is Clinton County's largest employer. The McElhattan location is currently hiring! For consideration please apply online at: www.firstquality.com and follow the links to the McElhattan job openings.You can also apply at the Williamsport or Lock Haven Careerlink Offices! Summer HelpVarious summer help openings include: operating packing equipment in a safe, competent, and efficient manner; facilities maintenanceincluding painting and landscaping; inspect, label, and package products into the designated carton in preparation for shipment; supportproduction line by bringing raw materials to the production floor; maintaining good housekeeping in the facility; and relieving other team members during scheduled break periods.High school diploma or equivalent required. E/O/ESummer Help positions will run May 2016 through August 2016 on the following shifts:1st shift - 7am to 3pm Monday through Friday3rd shift - 11pm to 7am Sunday night through Friday morningA/C crews - Rotating 12 hours 7am to 7pmB/D crews - Rotating 12 hours 7pm to 7amprovided by The Williamsport Sun-Gazette",Operating Packing Equipment Job in Mc Elhattan,Full Time,"Mc Elhattan, PA 17748",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Operating-Packing-Equipment-Job-Mc-Elhattan-PA-US-165944496.aspx?ch=centralpa&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0f11cafa4dfd760116963b90ea76bff3
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:14:03:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"SIMCO Electronics originated in the heart of Silicon Valley in 1962 and was built on a foundation of dedication to customer service and commitment to technical superiority. Today, SIMCO Electronics is headquartered in Santa Clara, CA with a worldwide network of laboratories and international field service teams providing localized support.   SIMCO Electronics’ strategic emphasis is to provide enhanced program management systems and services for customers’ test and measurement equipment needs. One global service provider improves quality control and compliance of services while reducing total program costs. The principal markets served by SIMCO Electronics include Life Sciences, Electronic Components/Semiconductors, Communications/Optical Networking, Automotive, and Government. Specific market-focused expertise is the core of SIMCO Electronics’ competencies and a central focus of capital investments and strategic initiatives. Position The Calibration Technician B will apply knowledge of measurement science, mathematics, physics, and electronics to calibrate inspection, measurement, and test equipment in the Acoustical, Chemical, Dimensional, DC/Low Frequency, RF/Microwave, Fluid, Mechanical, Optical, Thermodynamics, and Time & Frequency disciplines to ensure measurement accuracy. The Calibration Technician B will identify and utilize appropriate manual and automated measurement procedures.   This position will normally receive general instructions on work, applying job skills and company policies and procedures to complete a variety of tasks, and working on assignments that are semi-routine in nature where ability to recognize deviation from accepted practice is required. The Calibration Technician B will perform laboratory housekeeping and may be asked to report opinions and interpretations.   Responsibilities and Duties 1.      Calibrate inspection, measurement, and test equipment (IM&TE) in one or more of the following disciplines – Acoustical, Chemical, Dimensional, DC/Low Frequency, RF/Microwave, Fluid, Mechanical, Optical, Thermodynamics, and Time & Frequency, in order to ensure compliance with published specifications 2.      Maintain secondary and/or working calibration standards 3.      Perform basic maintenance, troubleshooting and repair of precision equipment 4.      Collect, compile, measure, summarize, and record data gathered during calibration 5.      Identify out-of-tolerance conditions and perform corrective action via adjustments, component replacement, correction factors, etc 6.      Identify and correct measurement errors, as applicable 7.      Prepare calibration reports and certificates 8.      Adapt existing calibration equipment, standards, and techniques to accomplish unique measurement tasks for which they are not principally used 9.      Train subordinates in calibration concepts and procedures 10. Interact with other technicians, Customer Service Representatives, Account Managers, and customers 11. Other duties and responsibilities as may be assigned     Qualifications 1.      Minimum High School diploma or equivalent 2.      Must be able to perform general math and algebra functions 3.      Must possess good written and oral, communication skills 4.      Basic ability to troubleshoot repair, align and optimize precision equipment 5.      Basic computer skills 6.      Proficient in use of MS Word and Excel 7.      Minimum one year of calibration experience some of which can be offset by formal metrology training 8.      Must have very good interpersonal and customer service skills 9.      Strong attention to details 10. Must be a self motivator, work as a team player, and follow written procedures   Job Requirements:Physical Demands   1.      Must be able to lift up to 45 pounds without assistance 2.      Occasional standing and bending are required     Working Environment   1.      Works primarily in a laboratory or manufacturing environment at a SIMCO location and/or customer sites 2.      Travel may be required to other domestic and possibly international locations  ",Calibration Technician B Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL 60290",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Calibration-Technician-B-Job-Chicago-IL-US-164433216.aspx?mescoid=1700213001001&jobPosition=12,,,5c123beaf0c508f01c89a1a461fcfd4c
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:14:04:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; &nbsp; City:&nbsp;&nbsp;MaderaState:&nbsp;&nbsp;CaliforniaPostal/Zip Code:&nbsp;93637 &nbsp; Oldcastle SurePods is the leading manufacturer of fully outfitted, modular building components in North America with over 15,000 bathroom pods and over 100,000 total modules manufactured and installed (security, telecom, educational, bathrooms, shelters). Oldcastle SurePods is part of Oldcastle Inc., the largest building materials company in North America. We are a proud reflection of hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies, and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Job Description Summary &nbsp; Work in one or multiple work areas along an assembly line building pre-fabricated bathrooms, depending on your skill and training level These work areas include tasks such as wall/ ceiling/ floor build Follow defined procedures and practices in our 12-step production line process and offer suggestions for improvement Troubleshoot problems with assistance from peers or supervisors depending on the level of complexity Exhibit teamwork skills and will be expected to mentor new associates through training Complete quality paperwork as required Notify supervisor of any non-compliances to part and/or product standards Maintain cleanliness of work area Comply with all health and safety guidelines Other duties may be assigned as needed &nbsp; Requirements/Skills &nbsp; Minimum 1 year experience in home improvement/renovation/construction and/or vocational technical school required At least 5 years of experience working in a company environment, preferably manufacturing or construction is a plus Experience in a lean manufacturing environment is a plus Experience in construction is a plus although individual must be willing to learn alternative building methods Knowledgeable and skilled in the use of hand and power tools Ability to take direction and work in a team environment Eager to work, dedicated and inquisitive Able to work occasional overtime Experience as a team leader or other leadership role is a plus &nbsp; Physical Requirements &nbsp; This job involves the following physical demands: &nbsp;walking, standing, bending, stretching, use of hands and fingers to hold, grasp, push and lift items Lifting may be required with assistance provided if needed Environmental conditions involve limited outdoor work; Indoor work is generally warm during summer months Job responsibilities involve occasional use of cleaning chemicals &nbsp; &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs ​ About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; SurePods is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; SurePods is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Fabricator Framer- Madera,Full Time Employee,"Madera, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Fabricator-Framer-Madera-CA-Job-Madera-CA-US-165998143.aspx?mescoid=5100920001001&jobPosition=20,,,496efe7264ca1842dc35bf6bbfec1f8b
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:14:37:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Maintenance Support Level IIReports to: GL/Supervisor with assistance from Team LeaderDepartment: Industrial Services Auto AmericasPosition Purpose: Complete the scheduled tasks to standard Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Understand and live Voith's Core Values.Continually seek out opportunities to improve onsite activities.Review JES's to identify areas for improvement.Live ""Safety is Your Life"" Program. Use proper personal protective equipment, i.e., hearing protection, steel toed shoes, safety glasses, etc., as required for the task at hand.Report any issues with ISP-T system which could cause erroneous fault indications.Monitor and use radio for communications with Maintenance Techs.Run daily reports for downtime during shift and previous shift if applicable.Manage ""Free Issue"" areas and maintain proper levels and reporting use.Manage the ""Special Tools"" from tool crib (Token Tools.)Expedite the delivery of critical parts to line-side breakdowns.Conduct inventory audits on parts (Remstars and Supply Pros.)Relocate parts in storage areas for optimization of space.All other duties as assigned by Voith site management. Competencies:Customer Service Orientation - Satisfying customers.Adaptability - Willingness to deal with unexpected challenges or circumstances.Problem Solving - Defining problems and bring about viable solutions.Servicing the Customer - Readily initiating actions to meet or exceed the needs of the customer. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:Communication Skills - Ability to communicate with team members and management.Language Ability - Ability to understand JES's.Reasoning Ability - Ability to conduct basic problem solving. Position Requirements:Knowledge of SAP system for entering notifications, MBR's and creating work orders with necessary information.Ability to monitor and use radio for communications with Maintenance Techs.Working knowledge of Supply Pro/SAP for locating spare parts.Ability to access Remstar machines for issuing out parts.Ability to follow written procedures issuing/tracking part usage and for adding new parts to inventory.Working knowledge of spare parts.Ability to use radio for communications.Basic Excel skills for completing shift reports. Physical Requirements: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the key actions of the job:  The employee is also required to talk and/or hear in an industrial setting (noise level is moderate). The employee is frequently required to stand and walk on concrete surface from 8-12 hours. The employee is occasionally required to reach with hands and arms; climb or balance; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl.Vision requirements: close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision, and depth perception and focus adjustment.Please see job descriptionEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",MRO/Maintenance Support Job in Greer,Full Time,"Greer, SC 29651",All,http://jobview.monster.com/MRO-Maintenance-Support-Job-Greer-SC-US-165974499.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,c625e4912a32545c2028dccbb0d6fa63
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:14:44:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Biomaterials Production TechnicianLocation: Berkeley, CA 94710Duration: 12+ monthsShift: Swing Shifts Responsibilities:Responsible for producing Biomaterials products in compliance with established client procedures and ensuring Biomaterials products are of consistent high quality.Perform production activities, provide support to peers, perform ERP system transactions, and support training of personnel assigned to the Biomaterials Production Department.Perform Biomaterials manufacturing within controlled environment areas in accordance with clients standard operating procedures and all safety requirements as assigned. Can set up and operate all equipment in the department including, but not limited to, Mixers/reactors, pressure pots, Scales, and Hand Tools, with limited supervision. Handle chemicals and solvents.Provides sifting, packaging, extruding support as required.Monitor and adjust diverse processes to meet specific product specifications with limited supervision.Responsible for cleaning all reactors, pressure pots, drums and other ancillary equipment that are needed for the synthesis of Biomedical products.Keep detailed, accurate, and legible paper and computerized records of production activities following clients guidelines.Advise direct supervisor of perceived problems with processes, machinery, or product quality and assist in developing improvementsRespond with flexibility to changes in the production schedule and interact with other departments as necessary.Provide proper documentation to support manufacturing proceduresMaintain professional level of contact with clients and auditors.Maintain labor posting and timekeeping requirements in designated system on a daily basis.Assist in the repair and preventative maintenance of manufacturing equipment.Assist the Production Chemist in managing the disposal of Hazardous Waste that is generated daily.Assist the Production Chemist in raw materials preparation, weighing and dispensing for the synthesis and making sure that the reactor and ancillary equipment are clean and ready for use.Adhere to clients Quality System procedures and the ISO 9001and/or ISO 13485 standards.Perform other duties as assigned by Direct Supervisor.Requirements:0 - Two years’ experience in manufacturing, such as pharmaceutical or medical production; chemical mixing and knowledge in handling and operating a variety of mechanical production equipment or basic industrial tools are preferred.High School graduate or equivalent Does not require formal training in a trade.",Biomaterials Production Technician Job in Berkeley,Full Time,"Berkeley, CA 94710",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Biomaterials-Production-Technician-Job-Berkeley-CA-US-165910120.aspx?mescoid=1700230001001&jobPosition=9,,,8f78549033f4c894bd8b4ad73a30117f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:14:44:10,No,jobs.monster.com," JOB PURPOSE STATEMENT JOB TITLE:   Service TechnicianREPORTS TO:   Service Manager Rogers, Minnesota based EnDiSys, a worldwide supplier of O.E.M. pumping systems and equipment, is also a distributor of Graco fluid dispensing equipment.  EnDiSysequipment is used to meter, monitor, and control a wide variety of fluids in industrial, commercial, and mobile applications. We currently have an exciting opportunity for a Service Technician. PURPOSE OF JOBThe Service Technician will be responsible for evaluating, repairing, assembling, testing, and documenting fluid handling systems to EnDiSys standard test and repair procedures.   PRINCIPAL ACTIVITIES/DUTIESTypical systems may include pneumatic, hydraulic, process material (fluid), and electrical circuitsMay work from prints, drawings or other specifications in accordance with established assembly and inspection proceduresRequires the ability to actively participate in quality improvement activities and to take the initiative to increase technical efficiency.  Some travel may be required for field service and training at end-user facilities.  Demonstrates the ability to work as a team member in a manner that is conducive to a positive work environmentA strong work ethic and strong communication skills are a must.  POSITION REQUIREMENTSHigh school diploma or GED1-2 years’ experience  working in a similar environmentKnowledge of general shop/manufacturing practices, tools, and equipment Capability of repeatable mechanical assembly using best standards techniquesDemonstrated ability to work with computers and shop toolsDemonstrated excellent written and oral communication skills DESIRABLEGraco, Inc product knowledgeFluid Power Degree or related a plus EnDiSys offers attractive compensation, benefits, and opportunities for both professional development and career progression. The Company’s comprehensive benefits include medical, dental, and 401(k) plans.     ",Service Technician- Manufacturing Job in Rogers,Full Time,"Rogers, MN 55374",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Technician-Manufacturing-Job-Rogers-MN-US-163801022.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,18.00 - 24.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),066a19ae2941c7f04d4c938f8f719a48
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:15:26:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"2014 Pillar Award winner - Multifamily Development Firm of the Year! At NRP Group, we successfully develop, build, own, manage and have partnered in numerous projects in multifamily, senior housing, single-family infill, and commercial and retail sites. From high-density urban infill sites to more suburban settings, our focus is to make every building we develop, construct and/or manage a true reflection of the special needs and desires of our customers and residents, with a commitment to excellence from concept to completion. In fact, we developed nearly 17,000 single-family and multi-family homes and apartments in the past 16 years with our eye on more to come.We develop, construct, and operate high quality market-rate and affordable rental properties. We are a dynamic and growing company that works in conjunction with many financial institutions, partners, and non-profit organizations to pursue the development and financing of real estate properties. Currently, The NRP Group has assets and operations in Ohio, Texas, Louisiana, North Carolina, Virginia, Arizona, New Mexico, Michigan, and Indiana.Edison Lofts a 223 unit MARKET rate community is currently seeking an experienced Maintenance Technician. This position is responsible for overall facility maintenance including basic plumbing, electrical, painting, cleaning and dusting of facilities. In addition, this position is also responsible for groundskeeping, pool and equipment maintenance. Ideal candidates must:• Bring a minimum of two years’ experience in building / facility maintenance including basic electrical & plumbing diagnostics/repair.• Be a TEAM PLAYER in an atmosphere of mutual respect.• Have a POSITIVE ATTITUDE.• Enjoy helping and assisting people. • Have basic tools for the trade. • Have reliable transportation.• Hold a valid driver's license and have the flexibility to occasionally respond to 'off-hour' emergency situations and tenant concerns.• HVAC (CFC Universal) certification requiredWe offer a competitive pay rate plus bonus opportunities and a benefit package that includes: medical, dental, prescription, life and disability insurance, paid time off, and 401(k) retirement plan. Qualified candidates, please apply now. You will be required to pass a criminal background and drug test.",Maintenance Technician - Edison Lofts Job in Raleigh,"Full Time, Employee","Raleigh, NC 27601",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Edison-Lofts-Job-Raleigh-NC-US-163147985.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=12,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,4167263438f75d3c32244e5b87d86619
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:15:27:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Technical Institution which mission is to educate and re-educate youths and adults with the competencies to compete for employment opportunities that can emerge in these fields is looking for: Open Positions: Automotive Technology Mechanics Instructor Industrial Welding InstructorDiesel Mechanics InstructorComplementary Courses: English ProfessorLocation: Orlando FL 32809Responsibilities/DutiesInstruct students, using approved course outcome guides developed by college-wide subject area Faculty.Assess and grade student achievement of learning outcomes.Use student feedback to improve teaching.Be available for a reasonable amount of student contact to respond to questions and to resolve problems related to the course through time spent before or after class or through telephone or e-mail exchanges or office hours where facilities and schedules permit.Demonstrates a sensitivity toward and respect for the myriad of diversities represented in the student population, colleagues and service area Designs and maintains an active classroom environment conducive to student learning and success QualificationsCertificate or Diploma as evidence of education in the field of experience2 – 5 years related work experienceSkillsBilingual ( Spanish and English )Communication skills ( verbal and written )People development and instructional skills and abilitiesProblem solving and multi-tasking, can adapt to a changing fast pace environmentMotivated and professional, with a positive attitude Computer skillsContact Person: Mr. Jose A. Alicea, Occupational DirectorEmail: josealicea@faculty.mechtech.eduBy fax: 407-888-1112                                   Write in cover Att: J. Alicea - Occupational Director",Automative Tecnology,Part Time,"Orlando, FL 32809",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Automative-Tecnology-Diesel-Mechanics-Instructor-Industrial-Welding-Instructor-Job-Orlando-FL-US-165228429.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),34e6aef338d597b2d4c18db150328cf1
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:15:56:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Commercial HVAC Filter TechnicianCompany: National Filter ServiceLocation: Fork Union, VA 23055Positions: InstallerIndustry: Commercial/Industrial-------------------National Filter Service is hiring a full time filter service technician. If you would like to work with a company that stands for teamwork and integrity above all else, this could be the perfect position for you. DUTIES- Follow company provided service schedule for your specific route- Follow company safety standards while on the job and while operating company provided vehicle- Access rooftops from the outside with the use of an extension ladder- Update work order notes for specific locations on route- Ability to communicate verbally and electronically in a professional manner both with coworkers and customers- Overnight travel is required. 2 weeks on/2 weeks off. Position requires extensive overnight travel during 2 weeks on. Lodging allowance is provided. REQUIREMENTS- Must pass a criminal background check and drug test- 1-2 years of related experience preferred, but not required (handyman, facilities, mechanical, HVAC or roofing/construction)- Ability to read and write in English in order to complete day to day paperwork- Must have valid driver's license with at least a 3yr driving history- NO DUIs or suspensions- Absolutely no fear of heights, must have 32ft extension ladder experience- Ability to lift 50lbs on a daily basisINCENTIVES- Company provided vehicle- Health and Dental Insurance and Simple IRA after 60 days- Lodging expenses and gas paid for overnight travel- Uniform T-shirts and hats providedALL APPLICANTS MUST FILL OUT AN APPLICATION IN ORDER TO BE CONSIDERED FOR THE POSITION.Visit our website http://www.nationalfilterservice.com/opportunities.html to complete an application.",Commercial HVAC Filter Technician Job in Fork Union  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Fork Union 23055,All,http://jobview.monster.com/Commercial-HVAC-Filter-Technician-Job-Fork-Union-164860685.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,48b36f1713a738814530ff20a815a305
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:16:48:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate is responsible for delivering material to customer job sites. Truck Drivers must maintain a professional image and be courteous to all customers. They are responsible for building loads for deliveries and maintaining a safe, clean and well organized lumber yard; loading and unloading of lumber and/or building supplies, and operating a forklift.  Truck Drivers must have valid state issued driver s license and safe driving record. Responsable de la entrega de materiales de la tienda para el sitio de trabajo.|Otras funciones incluyen: Tirar la carga lista dada por el gestor de carga de|material para construir el sitio de trabajo, de carga y descarga de camiones,|el almacenamiento de materiales que se le asigne. Otras tareas segun sea|necesario.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-one.Ability to apply common sense understanding and carry out simple one or two-step instructions; deal with standardized situations with only occasional or no variables.Capacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia|y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion|de manera eficaz a los demas uno a uno.High School diploma or general education degree (GED); or 1 to 3 months related experience and/or training.Satisfactory MVR Record as defined by 84 StandardsMust be 21 years of ageValid driver's license (NON CDL)/ Satisfactory MVR Record as defined by 84 StandardsDiploma de escuela secundaria o grado de educacion general (GED),|o 1 a 3 meses de experiencia y / o entrenamiento.||Debe cumplir los requisitos de edad minima.||Debe tener licencia de conducir valida.",Truck Driver-Full time ( D ) Job in Lenexa,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Truck-Driver-Full-time-3908-7D-002-Job-Lenexa-KS-US-165673681.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,b1c5665c1df2d4ade3237d4aa74d6a92
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:16:48:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"For over 65 years CSC ServiceWorks has proven stability and has been the nation’s leading provider of performance-driven laundry equipment and industry-leading service solutions to the commercial and multifamily industries.  At CSC you have an opportunity to grow with us as we continue to expand our services across the United States as well as Canada and Europe.  And…we’re hiring!  At CSC we have one simple goal – to create customers for life!  As a CSC team member, you are the key to achieving our goal.  As a CSC associate you will be encouraged to challenge yourself, share your expertise, and grow both professionally and personally.  You will be part of improving every customer interaction by providing the “CSC Experience” to make sure everyone has a great experience. Our passion for delivering a positive experience doesn’t stop with our customers, it includes you!  Our core beliefs and behaviors result in creating a work environment that fosters teamwork, accountability, recognition…and is just a great place where you will want to come to work each day! Your success is important to us.  We are now accepting applications for a customer oriented, quick learner to join our team as a full-time Route Driver Collectorfor our _Northwest D.C._ branch. These are some of the things you will do in this job:Responsible for the collection and return of all company property to branchUnderstanding and strictly following all company processes / procedures for the collection of propertyResponsible for driving to various locations and independently determining the best daily route and stops for collectionsCompleting large routes daily and in a timely mannerResponsible for company paid cleaning and routine maintenance of company vehicle Ability to maintain heavy workload and lift up to 75 lbs. on frequent basis each work day These are the basic skills and requirements you should have:Excellent oral and written communications skillsValid Driver’s License requiredHigh school diploma or equivalentHighly flexible; able to work on multiple projects while meeting deadlinesExcellent organizational and interpersonal skills.Good analytical skillsMust be able to handle confidential information per company policies/proceduresMust have excellent customer relation skillsMust have knowledge and ability to read maps, routes, and be detailed orientedMust maintain accurate and verifiable recordsMust maintain high level of honesty and integrityMust be able to work independently and exercise good judgmentMay be required to work flexible hours CSC values and wants to retain its associates by offering you industry leading benefits including:Competitive payMedical, dental and vision insuranceLife insuranceShort-term and long-term disabilityPaid holidaysVacation and sick leave401(k) with generous company matchCompany vehicleCompany fuel card for business useBusiness travel reimbursementAward winning company training At CSC we welcome initiative, seek excellence, and reward your performance. If you are interested in joining a winning team, then apply directly today!  When you click the “apply” button you will be directed to our recruitment team at PEAR Core Solutions. Please submit your resume along with other requested information.  We look forward to hearing from you! Position: Full TimeDrug Free Workplace: Pre-employment screenings performedEOE ",Route Driver Collector Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, DC 20008",,http://jobview.monster.com/Route-Driver-Collector-Job-Washington-DC-US-165725862.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,827857d001198733812b6eb16f1e7f18
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:16:48:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Crown is currently seeking a Field Service Technician / Mechanic.  This position is based out of our Aurora, Colorado branch location and will service Denver and surrounding areas.  Field Service Technician / Mechanic responsibilities are as follows: ·      Troubleshoot, diagnose and repair Crown and all other makes of lift trucks.·      Perform all assigned planned maintenance on customer lift trucks. ·      Maintain a service van and its inventory. ·      Process paperwork after completion of each job. Crown offers Field Service Technicians:·      Award-Winning Service Training·      Tuition Reimbursement Prior to Crown·      Company Vehicle·      Tool Insurance·      No Flat Rate·      40 Hours Per Week plus Overtime·      Uniforms·      Specialty Tools·      Primarily 1st Shift·      Solid Support Network·      Career Advancement Opportunities Crown also offers an excellent wage and benefits package for full-time employees including Health/Dental/Vision/Prescription Drug Plan, Flexible Benefits Plan, 401k Retirement Savings Plan, Life and Disability Benefits, Paid Holidays, Paid Vacation, Tuition Reimbursement, and much more! REQUIREMENTS:·         High school diploma or equivalent.·         Good mechanical and electrical aptitudes, knowledge of electrical/electronic systems and hydraulics and internal combustion engines, and the ability to read and understand electrical and hydraulic schematics,.·         Good written/verbal communication and customer care skills.·         Valid driver's license, good driving record, and ability to safely operate lift trucks.·         Technical degree, previous lift truck repair, welding experience, and knowledge of various types of testing equipment preferred.·         Completion of a background check, drug screen, and physical required.EO/AA Employer Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Field Service Technician - Mechanic Job in Aurora,Full Time Employee,"Aurora, CO 80011",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Mechanic-Job-Aurora-CO-US-165776124.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,954086b85792e4540370faa0ca060152
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:16:48:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a position in property management? At Satellite Management Company, we are currently seeking to fill the following maintenance technician positions within our Inland Empire team:Centrepointe Apartments, 360 units - Colton, CA 92324 - full time / Roving, based out of the Colton officeWindwood Apartments, 220 units - Riverside, CA 92507 - full time / Roving, based out of the Riverside officeFairway Manor Apartments, 69 units - Victorville, CA 92392 - part time Job Requirements:Provide own transportation and tools Establish and abide by superior safety habits Experience in electrical, plumbing and carpentry, working knowledge of HVAC systems and various appliances Superior customer service practices Must work weekends and cover rotating emergency on call scheduleCore Responsibilities include, but are not limited to: Maintain visual presentation of property (including amenities, vacants, shop areas, grounds, etc) Completing work orders timely and accurately Conduct apartment turn overs for rent ready apartmentsScheduling vacant turnovers as neededIf you or anyone you know thrives on changes, diversity, challenges, and heavy responsibility then please do not hesitate to reach out to us! Things will move quickly and we wouldn't want to miss out on good talent simply because we couldn't connect soon enough. We want to hear from you! My email is ehostetler@satellitemanagement.com. You may also view our website to learn more about our company at www.satellitemanagement.com.  ",Maintenance Technician - Property Management - Full Time Job in Canyon Crest,Full Time,"Canyon Crest, CA 92507",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Property-Management-Full-Time-Job-Canyon-Crest-CA-US-130156491.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,16.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),c062e14700e5b40e3070ae93a242ae09
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:16:48:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Appvion, Inc. is currently accepting applications for the following roles at the Roaring Spring, PA facility. PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR(MACHINE ROOM)The Production Supervisor (Machine Room) is expected to lead and support a work group of approximately thirteen hourly employees working a southern swing shift rotation in the machine room. Ensure equipment reliability, uptime, quality and product availability are maximized to support the mill operations and customer needs and provide a safe work environment. A technical background in paper manufacturing, industrial manufacturing, or technical degree is preferred; minimum work experience level of 2-5 years in a union manufacturing leadership role. INDUSTRIAL MAINTENANCE MECHANIC(PIPE UNIT)The Industrial Maintenance Mechanic (Pipe Unit) is expected to provide Millwright and Pipefitter services to perform scheduled maintenance and emergency repairs to industrial/Pulp & Paper-manufacturing machinery and equipment in a safe manner. A minimum high school diploma/GED; higher education, technical degree, or certification in industrial maintenance is preferred. 2+ years of experience working in a heavy industrial environment is preferred. To be considered for employment, your application must be submitted online via the companyâ s website at www.appvion.com Paper applications/resumes will not be accepted. Preference will be given to applications received by 4 p.m. Friday, April 29th. No phone calls please. All offers of employment are contingent on a pre-employment physical, background check, and drug/alcohol screen.EOE/Individual with Disability/Veteran StatusThis job listing brought to you by The Johnstown Tribune Democrat",PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR & INDUSTRIAL MAINTENANCE MECHANIC Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,16673,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/PRODUCTION-SUPERVISOR-INDUSTRIAL-MAINTENANCE-MECHANIC-Job-US-165943273.aspx?ch=newsjtpa&mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=19,,Entry Level,ebdafaad9d2d0847e2b67769153ce63c
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:17:06:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Freight, a leader in the LTL trucking industry, is currently seeking an Operations Clerk to answer customer inquiries, process paperwork, and follow procedures concerning overages, shortages, damages, claims, and the tracing of freight.An Operations Clerk will also be responsible to:Review invoicesWork with both central and local dispatch offices to assist in managing load schedulesAnswer customer inquiries relating to rate quotes, appointments, etc.Perform data entry functions (i.e. keying bills from manifests)Transportation industry understanding and/or previous data entry experience preferred.BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:Must be at least 18 years of ageU.S. citizen or otherwise authorized to work in the U.S.High school diploma or equivalentBasic computer skillsOTHER CRITERIA:Employer will not sponsor visas for position.UPS is an Equal Opportunity Employer ",UPS Union Clerk - Part Time - UPS Freight Job in La Crosse,,"La Crosse, WI 54603",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Union-Clerk-Part-Time-UPS-Freight-Job-LA-CROSSE-WI-US-166083212.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=17,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,0af44ed6603632fd93318cc5e5f0022c
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:18:13:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under general supervision, a Low-Voltage Specialist II performs a variety of tasks related to the installation and decommissioning of network and low voltage wiring.  This position will be responsible for executing the tasks related to the implementation of structured cabling solutions.  This role will assist with process improvement, scheduling, inventory levels, standardization, and overall efficiencies of the network and low voltage wiring team where needed.ResponsibilitiesImplementation, installation, training, maintenance, and support of low voltage wiring projectsThis position will be assisted by and will provide mentorship and training to Level I Low-Voltage Cabling Specialists  Responsible for the day to day coordination with the facilities and work units to maximize the productivity of the team while minimizing the disruption in areas that will be affectedHandle components for data or voice communications using various kinds of cable, most commonly category 5 (CAT5e) and category 6 (CAT6a), patch panels, and modular connectorsTesting, troubleshooting, and commissioning of completed wiring installationsDevelop and follow instructions regarding wire paths, endpoint terminations, penetrations, and documentation  Advise team members and leadership of any changes to the scope of the project and any issues that arise on the jobWork with the assistance of other skilled tradespersons in the completion of complex tasks that relate to the overall structured cabling projectRequired QualificationsThe level of education required in order to support structured cabling projects is generally acquired through completion of a High School diploma or GED equivalent2 or more years of progressively more responsible work experience in fields related to networking, maintenance, construction, and/or a skilled tradeGood written and oral communication skills necessary to communicate effectively with user departments when executing projects, and in training other Low Voltage Wiring SpecialistsGood organizational skills necessary to maintain an efficient and safe work environment for the team and the facility affectedAbility to read blueprints and other construction related documentationKnowledge and adherence to relevant Infection Control policies and procedures, as well as all applicable building, fire, and life safety codes",Low Voltage Cabling Specialist II Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, IL 61571",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/Low-Voltage-Cabling-Specialist-II-Job-Washington-IL-US-165858173.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,e3b918745e1d85ff5dcc4ee993bb12b5
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:18:15:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fruit of the Loom Palmetto Distribution We are Expanding! Fruit of the Loom, an independent, wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway Inc. & leading international basic apparel company, has immediate openings for Maintenance Distribution Systems Technicians and Forklift Drivers at the Summerville, SC distribution center. Maintenance Distribution Systems Technician is responsible for maintenance, repair and operation of facility equipment and highly skilled in a specialized area such as electrical, mechanical, etc. Also responsible for repair and diagnosis of all facility equipment regardless of its complexity and is familiar with the reading of diagrams and  schematics. Ability to supervise maintenance department based on prior knowledge of mechanical,facility, and electrical maintenance. Fork Lift Drivers operates battery or LPG powered forklift equipped with lifting devices to push, pull, lift, stack, tier or move materials or equipment between areas or departments throughout the facility for storage and/or retrieval purposes. We offer competitive pay and benefits including medical, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, vacation, holiday and 401k. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, protect veteran status, disability or any other protected status. Candidates should apply in person 1116 Business Park Road, Summerville, SC      EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity",Maintenance Distribution Systems Tech & Fork Lift Drivers Job in Summerville,Full Time,"Summerville, SC 29483",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Maintenance-Distribution-Systems-Tech-Fork-Lift-Drivers-Job-Summerville-SC-US-165661561.aspx?ch=newschar&mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=18,,,61583b36750ddbe961fd91c86fd0439f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:02:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Physician Assistant needed for a direct hire opportunity with Yoh's client located in OklahomaCity, OK. Top Skills Should You Possess: - Physician Assistant licensure from any state in the U.S. - At least 24 months experience as a Physician Assistant within the last 36 months - Ability to apply sound judgment with clinical skills to ensure optimal patient care What You'll Be Doing: - Responsible for a regularly appointed clinic; Provide primary or specialty medical care with the cognizance or supervision of a physician - Provide immediate evaluation and management of emergenct problems as they occur - Perform a general physical examination - May become the primary care manager for a panel of patients - Stabilize and manage a patient in a medical or surgical emergency and/or transfer physician care - Perform the following blocks: Digital, Local Infiltration, and Intercostal and perform urological procedures What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Active Physician Assistant licensure from any state in the U.S. - Graduate of a Physician Assistant Training Program accredited by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant (ARC-PA), or its predecessors, and acceptable to the Surgeon General, USAF, is mandatory - Certification as a Physician Assistant by the National Committee on Certification Physician Assistants (NCCPA) is required What's In It For You? - Opportunity to work for a major United States Air Force base with tenant U.S. Navy and other Department and Defense Missions - No call and no weekends (shifts are Monday-Friday from 6:00am-4:00pm) Opportunity is Calling, Apply Now! Recruiter: Hana Brown Phone: 818-587-4475 Email: Hana.Brown@yoh.com Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: HC MONJOB CB1 J2WNWHLTHRef: 1070697SFSF: HCCB1Nearest Major Market: Oklahoma CityNearest Secondary Market: OklahomaJob Segment:Physician Assistant, Medical, Patient Care, Defense, DoD, Healthcare, Government#TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Physician Assistant Job Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time Employee,"Oklahoma City, OK",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Physician-Assistant-Job-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-166046041.aspx?mescoid=2900483001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,570be110377688a848b0fb2a9f5aec88
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:02:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  To assist management in maintaining or improving cleanliness quality through inspections, training and employee accountability, including employee counseling or disciplining. Supervisors must build upon established employee or customer relationships, improve employee morale, and help develop subordinates on a continuous basis.   Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Conduct daily inspections for quality and safety. Make necessary corrections. Understand all employee work assignments and schedule for adequate coverage. Conduct training and retraining as necessary. Follow recommended training process. Maintain effective business relationship with staff. Build upon and develop employee satisfaction and knowledge. Enforce department policies, follow up on daily assignments, and conduct counseling or disciplinary action. Maintain loyalty and honesty with employees, peers, customers and managers. Monitor special projects and on-call or new employees. Tour areas of responsibilities at least 2-4 times daily. Initiate or ensure corrective action is taken. Audit building keys, pagers, and payroll on a daily basis. Ensure all projects, maintenance, or cleaning challenges are communicated effectively for resolution. Control supply inventories and distribute equipment effectively. Supervise equipment performance and make necessary corrections. Assist in performing employee performance evaluations and make recommendations on employee performance ratings. Observe and report the need of furniture or other building fixtures repairs. When necessary, complete custodial work assignments. In case of emergency, perform all duties as assigned. Provide functional/operational support to work area as essential personnel during times of emergency, catastrophe, inclement weather, etc. Complete all other assigned tasks by management in which the employee is capable of performing. Qualifications   High School Diploma or equivalent required. Must be physically able to lift, lower, push and pull objects up to 50 lbs. unassisted. Ability to stand, climb, bend, stoop and crouch for extended periods of time. Must be able to initiate and maintain good customer and co-worker relationships in a team environment. Must have the ability to follow oral or written instructions and directions. Must be able to communicate effectively with both written and verbal skills. Bi-lingual preferred (English and Spanish). Must have the ability to supervise others, demonstrate ""quality customer service"", and good human relations skills. Pays special attention to detail.   Additional Information:",Custodial Shift Supervisor - University of Denver Facilities Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80208",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodial-Shift-Supervisor-University-of-Denver-Facilities-Job-Denver-CO-US-165557339.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,7de9e8817cc3e214790afb2ae207933b
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:02:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: EMCOR Facilities Services (EFS), an EMCOR core business, services over 1 billion square feet of space worldwide. From corporate campuses to single sites, EFS provides a range of services that support mission-critical areas of financial services, manufacturing, pharmaceutical, transportation, and government sectors. Job Title: Building Engineer I Job Summary: Provides maintenance and leadership support to the site-based maintenance staff and client; Assists with various technical and non-technical tasks within a facilities environment. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: include the following. Other duties may be assigned. §  Ability to effectively manage and respond to emergency situations. §  Ability to work various schedules and shifts, including on-call. §  Familiarity with Archibus §  Performs carpentry, corrective and preventive maintenance, in the following areas, using tools and equipment as required: repairing shelves and cabinets, replacing ceiling tiles, patching and painting drywall, repairing floor tiles, replace vinyl base molding, and minor repairs on doors. §  Request assistance from plumbers, painters, HVAC technicians, carpenters, plant operators, and electricians when necessary. §  Must be able to lift 75 lbs §  Required to climb ladders §  Stays abreast of changes (safety and code) in the field through seminars and other educational means. §  Communicate with the owner, owner’s representative, or supervisor on the work performed and present status of the mechanical system. §  Knowledge and implementation of proper Personal Protective Equipment is required §  Ability to use voltage tester and/or Muiti-meter to verify electrical current is present §  Must be able to read/understand English §  Start up and secure all equipment in designated buildings as requested by his/her supervisor §  Must be a team player committed to working in a quality environment. §  Comply with all company policies and procedures; adhere to company standards and safety program. §  Respond to service calls/tenant request for HVAC, plumbing, lighting, escorts, general carpentry & painting duties, key making, picture hanging, safely move furniture and equipment as needed, and provide support or assistants when needed. §  Complete assigned preventative maintenance work §  Assists any tradesperson as required §  Performs reporting/note taking as required Completes work in accordance with EMCOR Business Systems Standard Operating Procedures and Work Instructions Qualifications:  To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education and/or Experience                                                                                                                  Must have 5-7 years’ work related experience as a Maintenance Mechanic in commercial applications.  General knowledge of carpentry, drywall repair, basic electricity, painting, plumbing and HVAC. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",Building Engineer I Job in Framingham/Worcester,Full Time Employee,Location:,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Building-Engineer-I-Job-Framingham-Worcester-MA-US-165176482.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=17,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,058c9c951958033456a0b25c0e290de5
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:02:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Summary: The Operations Unit Manager has the responsibility to directly supervise and coordinate the activities of production and office employees. Essential Duties & Responsibilities: Review processing schedules or production orders to make decisions concerning inventory requirements, staffing requirements, work procedures, or duty assignments, considering budgetary limitations and time constraints. Direct or coordinate production, processing, distribution, or marketing activities of industrial organizations. Develop or implement production tracking or quality control systems, analyzing production, quality control, maintenance, or other operational reports, to detect production problems. Assist in the hiring, training, evaluating, or discharging of staff or resolving personnel grievances. Prepare and maintain production reports or personnel records. Set and monitor product standards, examining samples of raw products or directing testing during processing, to ensure finished products are of prescribed quality. Initiate or coordinate inventory or cost control programs. Coordinate or recommend procedures for facility or equipment maintenance or modification, including the replacement of machines. Required Skills Minimum of Associates Degree in Engineering, industrial technology, or business management. 3-5 years of management experience in manufacturing/chemical processing environment. Prior paint manufacturing experience is preferred but not required. Train/coordinate teams to achieve high levels of productivity, quality and safety performance. Good written and verbal communication skills. Good computer skills. Proven abilities to successfully drive continuous improvement, manage multiple priorities and multitask. Ability to work well with other peer groups. Knowledge of industrial safety regulations. Additional Consideration Given to Those With: Exposure to quality programs Paint/Coatings/chemical industry knowledge or experience Experience with a continuous process discipline such as Six Sigma/Lean/TQM manufacturing environment Previous experience with safety programs Job Location Rockford, Illinois, United StatesExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Production Manager WI Job in Rockford,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Summary: The Operations Unit Manager has the responsibility to directly supervise and coordinate the activities of production and office employees. Essential Duties & Responsibilities: Review processing schedules or production orders to make decisions concerning inventory requirements, staffing requirements, work procedures, or duty assignments, considering budgetary limitations and time constraints. Direct or coordinate production, processing, distribution, or marketing activities of industrial organizations. Develop or implement production tracking or quality control systems, analyzing production, quality control, maintenance, or other operational reports, to detect production problems. Assist in the hiring, training, evaluating, or discharging of staff or resolving personnel grievances. Prepare and maintain production reports or personnel records. Set and monitor product standards, examining samples of raw products or directing testing during processing, to ensure finished products are of prescribed quality. Initiate or coordinate inventory or cost control programs. Coordinate or recommend procedures for facility or equipment maintenance or modification, including the replacement of machines. Required Skills Minimum of Associates Degree in Engineering, industrial technology, or business management. 3-5 years of management experience in manufacturing/chemical processing environment. Prior paint manufacturing experience is preferred but not required. Train/coordinate teams to achieve high levels of productivity, quality and safety performance. Good written and verbal communication skills. Good computer skills. Proven abilities to successfully drive continuous improvement, manage multiple priorities and multitask. Ability to work well with other peer groups. Knowledge of industrial safety regulations. Additional Consideration Given to Those With: Exposure to quality programs Paint/Coatings/chemical industry knowledge or experience Experience with a continuous process discipline such as Six Sigma/Lean/TQM manufacturing environment Previous experience with safety programs Job Location Rockford, Illinois, United StatesExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Rockford, IL 61101",http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Manager-WI-Job-Rockford-IL-US-165990412.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,34fa2b3910f0460864937e06dc77b2b5
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:02:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Greencore USA is currently seeking high-energy, hands-on qualified applicants for the position of Maintenance Technician for our new Des Moines, Washington facility. This position will report directly to the Maintenance, Engineering and Environmental Manager.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBLITIES·      Assist in training employees on operation of equipment.·      Diagnose, troubleshoot, repair and maintain all equipment including, but not limited to:   Threif slicers, conveyors, mixers, packaging machines, ovens, refrigeration systems, metal detectors, building and building equipment   ·         Provide continual support to production, assembly, packaging and warehouse.·         Assist in maintaining the CMMS (computerized maintenance management system). Windows based computer experience a must.·         Familiar with Continuous Improvement and continually trying to improve operations and eliminate downtime.  Capable of developing/implementing improvements to daily operations.·         Electrical troubleshooting experience required.·         On floor time = 100 % (floor is inclusive of production floor, shop, outside of building, etc.)·         Must always work in a safe manner and use GMPs.·         Must be available for call backs on a rotating schedule.·         Other duties as assigned.QUALIFICATIONSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.  The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCEHas completed or is working on a 2 year trades degree; high school degree necessary or equivalent 5 years plant electrical/mechanical maintenance experience.  Electrical print reading, motor controls/VFD, relay logic and pneumatic/hydraulic experience are necessary. Experience with food/USDA facilities and welding/fabrication a plus.LANGUAGE SKILLSRead, write and speak English.  Bilingual capabilities a plus.  Able to communicate and take direction from direct supervisor and/or the production supervisor.MATHEMATICAL SKILLSMust have basic math skills.OTHER SKILLS AND ABILITIESAttention to detail.  Legible record-keeping and data entry skills using a computer.  Must be highly motivated, flexible, have creative problem solving abilities, and able to handle multiple tasks simultaneously.  Will be required to work shift work and weekends.PHYSICAL DEMANDSThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hand(s) to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; and talk or hear.  The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, stoop, crouch and work at heights from floor level to 30 feet above floor.  This includes ladders and lift equipment.  The employee will regularly lift and/or move up to 60 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.",Maintenance Technician Job in Des Moines,Full Time,"Des Moines, WA 98198",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Des-Moines-WA-US-165560749.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),43724bec5efec223b5ae7025f765b5df
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:02:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Our FineLine Additive Manufacturing Division, located in North Carolina’s Research Triangle Park makes custom prototype and production parts for companies worldwide using Rapid Prototyping, Additive Manufacturing and 3D Printing technologies. We have a fast-growing, high-energy team of associates who work together in a friendly environment.   Position Overview:   The Model Finisher is responsible for the safe cleaning and finishing of RP models in accordance with customer requirements. Identifying quality non-conformances related to build issues, parts cleaning, support removal, sanding and dry-blasting. This shift will be Monday, Tuesday, Thursday, Friday (10 hr shifts)  Specific duties include: Effectively use all checklists associated with the cleaning and finishing of RP models. Remove support structure and sand remaining supports to create a smooth, clean surface according to specified finish level using the appropriate tools.   Utilize grit blasting machines properly to ensure an even, matte finish if specified by customer. Count parts and verify order quantities. Ensure order quantities and customer specifications have been met. Enter process information into computer. Interact with Team Leads, Quality Inspector and Supervisor regarding issues with order quantities or part quality. Maintain a clean and safe laboratory environment by complying with Fineline Safety Procedures, and Regulations. Assist in the removal and disposal of contaminated materials according to Fineline Procedures. Assist in the general clean-up and maintenance of the facility. Maintain a resin free work environment outside of the specific part cleaning area. Contribute to team effort by accomplishing related tasks as needed. Continually seek to improve work processes and individual performance. Properly utilize Kanban (pull-card) system for maintaining correct inventory levels. Observe all Fineline Safety and Quality Procedures. Wear all required PPE (gloves, lab coats, etc.). Perform other duties as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required High School or better. Experience Required Strong attention to detail and ability to focus on one task for extended periods is required. Able to work in a fast paced, team oriented environment. Good written and oral communication skills Must be able to actively contribute in a team based environment; encourage open communication and positive interaction with peers and management to effectively reach a common goal. Must have a strong service and quality focus. Must regard safety as a core value. Able to work safely with sharp tools/objects including hobby knives, utility knives, files, abrasives, rotary tools, general cutters and more. Able to make precise, coordinated movements of fingers and hands to manipulate and work on parts. Able to use measuring instruments such as scales and calipers. Able to use a computer and calculator. Able to read and write in English, and do basic arithmetic. Must be punctual and have good attendance. Able to comprehend and follow printed and computer-screen instructions, and direction from Supervisors and Team Leads.",Model Finisher - Saturday - Tuesday Shift Job in Raleigh,Full Time Employee,"Raleigh, NC",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Model-Finisher-Saturday-Tuesday-Shift-Job-Raleigh-NC-US-166024098.aspx?mescoid=4100685001001&jobPosition=16,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,8ba93afca6effc9eeb826b740fd1a5bd
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:07:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Audiovisual Design EngineerOverview:We invite you to discover the excitement, diversity, rewards and excellence of a career at TRITECH Communications. Our company is one of the region’s leading technology systems integrator’s installing and servicing Audio Visual, Communications and Security Systems. Our business model is very unique in that we are the only company in the region capable of delivering these three services as a single source. Our Corporate Headquarters is located in Garden City, Long Island and we operate three regional sales offices in Manhattan, Boston and Washington DC. This position is for an Audio Visual Design Engineer to join our team in Lanham, MDResponsible for providing pre-sales support to sales and technical staff for design/build proposals and RFP reviews. Must have a good understanding of AV systems, a working knowledge of Excel, and the ability to effectively communicate with internal and external customers.Primary Responsibilities:Design/Build - Create rough-order-of-magnitude budgetDesign/Build - Create equipment list for Estimating to price based on functional needs of clientCreate sales proposals; send approved proposal to the clientMaintain regular communication with Client,Director of Mid-Atlantic Region, and Director of Business Development.Work with Project Team to verify system functionalityDevelop and maintain knowledge of current and new technologies that company offersProvide sales and technical staff with technical support on both a pre and post sales basisAbility to create System connections schematics for Audio Visual Systems in a Auto CAD.Ability to create Architectural plans for Audio visual systems and modify architects drawings to incorporate AV systems. Accountability: The Design Engineer will be accountable to the Director of Mid-Atlantic Region.Qualifications:Two-year electronics degree, four year bachelors preferred. CTS certification preferredMinimum 5 years working experience in the electronics field requiredExcellent written and verbal communication skillsMust be responsible, self-motivated, self-starter, personable and well-organizedSuperior customer service skills Ability to manage multiple tasks simultaneouslyAbility to work with diverse groupsProficiency in the use of personal computers including such programs as Microsoft Office; must have skills in ExcelAbility to demonstrate planning, organizing and implementing skills Must be able to read and effectively interpret general business documentation and drawing packagesCompensation: Commensurate with experience. Includes a comprehensive benefits package with dental, medical, and a 401k plan.Qualified candidates interested in joining a challenging, growing, customer-oriented organization are encouraged to send their resume, including salary requirements.  Visit us online at www.tritechcomm.com     AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER ",Design Engineer - Audio Visual Job in Lanham,Full Time,"Lanham, MD 20706",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Design-Engineer-Audio-Visual-Job-Lanham-MD-US-162803795.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=16,"Excellent benefits package, Health, 401k",Experienced (Non-Manager),57859c8fc779ba911ebcf74badb24e30
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:10:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENEAL LABOR Will do general labor work on rail cars.  Must be able to work with various heights.Must have mechanical experience.  Will remove and reinstall parts on rail cars.  Will be doing disassembly, cleaning, touch up painting, and the assembly of railroad cars.  Previous mechanical experience or painting experience is a plus. Must lift 20 - 50lbsFull-Time PositionBenefits available after 90 days probationary periodIncentive Days available1st    6am - 2:30pm Monday - Friday2nd   2:30pm - 10:30pm Monday - FridaySend resume or apply in person at:Economy Coating Systems, Inc320 21st StreetCamanche, IA 52730",General Laborer Job in Camanche,Full Time,"Camanche, IA 52730",,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Laborer-Job-Camanche-IA-US-164086117.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=20,$12.00+ /hour,Student (High School),f21bf93bacfdbfbe2cc8690af431648f
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:27:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position is responsible for managing the entire Auto Center and Associates, including the Assistant Manager, in Auto Centers with annual sales volume between $1.1 and $2.19 million. This includes, but is not limited to, selecting, scheduling, supervising, directing, managing, counseling, disciplining, and training of subordinates; analyses and driving of sales volume, customer service, profitability and performance; identification and solution of business problems; creation and implementation of competitive strategies; managing productivity standards; and overall Auto Center management responsibilities. Personally provides professional, timely and courteous service by listening carefully to customers, presenting Sears Automotive products clearly, and teaming with technicians.This position is responsible for the overall management and performance of the Auto Center and its staff and other projects as assigned. The Auto Center Manager II is expected to spend well over 50% of his/her time on management duties on a daily and weekly basis. The Auto Center Manager II will be a back up to address customer needs and sales transactions when the Assistant Auto Center Manager is not able. QualificationsJob Duties/Responsibilities:•Sets plans and strategy to lead Auto Center to ensure achievement of business goals in sales and service.•Focuses selling, service and support teams on consistent, timely and accurate customer care.•Ensures delivery of speed and expertise to the customer through day to day management of business operations, processes and programs.•Conducts financial review, analyses, and long term planning and management of business and key drivers to impact sales and profit.•Sets plans and strategy to manage expense, understand and drive margin, maintain appropriate merchandise protection standards.•Responsible for determining appropriate outcomes to customer issues and concerns by making sound business decisions.•Recognizes, encourages and acknowledges excellent customer service.•Performs as the Customer Experience Manager on duty.•Responsible for building a high performance team that delivers Sears Automotive services consistently and to high quality standards.•Plans, directs and supervises the work and productivity levels of Associates to ensure standards are met or exceeded•Recognizes exceptional performance.•Makes appropriate decisions on subordinate performance, up to and including termination of employment following various appropriate disciplinary processes, and trains and supervises Assistant Manager in the store to appropriately address performance concerns•Achieves personal sales and service goals and helps team in achieving the same.•Delivers speed and expertise to the customer through daily execution of business processes and programs.•Communicates accurately with service technicians to ensure timely delivery of the specified service.•Performs supervisory functions, including but not limited to, making employment decisions regarding hiring, promoting, demoting and terminating, conducting performance appraisals and coaching and developing associates.•Miscellaneous duties as assignedJob Requirements:•Must have a valid Driver's License•Supervisory ExperiencePreferred Skills:•ASE Certified•Bachelor's Degree EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Automotive Center Manager - Deptford,Full Time,"Deptford, NJ 08096",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Automotive-Center-Manager-Deptford-NJ-Job-DEPTFORD-NJ-US-164850441.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=3,Commensurate with Experience,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5cf90c166995270a043c6ce3dd937eff
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:19:29:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Part Time Warehouse Jobs Location: Miami Gardens, FLWarehouse and Distribution Part Time Positions AvailableJoin our team starting with an hourly rate of $10.75 working part-time. We are seeking enthusiastic, energetic and customer centric individuals for our Warehouse Associate positions located inside the Amazon facility. The ideal candidates for these roles have a commitment to customer satisfaction. As customers make on-line merchandise purchases, a member of our team will get the merchandise and package it for delivery. Located in Miami Gardens, FL near Miramar, Hialeah, and Hollywood, FL. Associate Benefits * Starting hourly rate $10.75 * Earn up to $11.75 * Paid Training * Weekly paychecks * Direct Deposit or Cash Card pay options * Medical and Dental Insurance * Casual Dress Code * Referral BonusJob ResponsibilitiesThe Warehouse Associate Job Duties consist, but are not limited to the following: Loading, unloading, and sorting packages for delivery service providers. These roles will continuously have you on the move and directly impacting the customer experience. Work ScheduleWe have several shifts available offering part-time hours. All shifts will work overnight ranging from four to seven hours working three to five days per week. * Part Time * 3rd ShiftAssociate Requirements * HS Diploma or GED * Must be at least 18 years old Work LocationAmazon15600 NW 15th AveMiami Gardens, FL 33169Apply for a Job at Staff Management |SMX & Get Hired Today! Interview and Recruiting OfficeCareerSource 7550 Davie Road Extension Hollywood, FL 33024 (305) 206-3982 Please bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or Passport Applications will be taken Monday through Friday from 10:00AM to 2:00PM daily beginning July 7, 2015. Applications are by appointment only. With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment. EOEPlease visit us on Facebook at Staff Management |SMX or on Twitter at #SMXJobsnowShare this job with your social network. Invite your friends to work with you.",Part Time Package Handlers - Warehouse Jobs Job in Miami Gardens,Part Time,"Miami Gardens, FL 33169",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Part-Time-Package-Handlers-Warehouse-Jobs-Job-Miami-Gardens-FL-US-165991658.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=19,10.75 - 11.75 $ /hour,Entry Level,fc9b2b9b8d80a774df1d7528ac9f710e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:20:32:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Checking in and confirming all freight, closing out trailers, working with a handheld scanner and computer to track freight and will be on the dock 80% of the time.Coordination, scheduling and dispatching of all service requirements from local pickups through deliveries.Responsible for developing, tracking, data input, and reporting of key performance measures.Responsible for inter-company and intra-company communication.Coordinates trailer loads.Actively identifies and pursues innovative logistics approaches and makes recommendations based on analysis or factual information.Consistently provides exceptional customer service to multiple customers based upon process analysis.Utilizes computer techniques for analysis, simulation or information systems and documentation.Identify and implement continual improvement initiatives to enhance the performance of the position, your team and the company.Ensure Quality Processes are followed.Send out utilization and reports as needed.Supervise loading of line haul trailers. Job Qualifications:Bachelor's Degree from a four-year college or university; or one to two years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.Excellent computer skills: Word, Excel, OutlookMust be willing and able to work both parts of this position: dock (using forklift, scanning, and lifting) and office (using MS office programs and ProTrans-Specific software)Must be able to multi-taskMust be organized and detail orientedMust be able to work in a team environmentMust be willing and able to work the shift for this position",Material Handler Job in Schaumburg,Full Time Employee,"Schaumburg, IL 60159",,http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handler-Job-Schaumburg-IL-US-165977236.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=10,12.00 - 14.00 $ /year,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,011256c9cd1188acbf446165c5e9d641
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:20:34:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ross & Sons Refrigeration & Construction is looking for a highly qualified refrigeration service mechanic with a minimum of 7 years of industrial ammonia experience. This individual will be responsible for the maintenance and repairs of ammonia refrigeration systems for all types of cold storage warehouses and food processing facilities.Job Requirements     operating procedures for each operating phase, including initial start-up, normal operations, temporary      operations, normal shutdown, and start-up following a turnaround or emergency shutdown;     emergency operations, including circumstances requiring a shutdown;     identifying and correcting typical abnormal operating conditions;     safe work practices (lockout/tagout, confined space entry, hot work permits, line and vessel opening, etc.);     knowledge of Process Safety Management (PSM);     knowledge of OSHA regulations.Drug screen and good driving record are required.",Industrial Refrigeration Service Mechanic Job in Fresno,Full Time,"Fresno, CA 93725",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Refrigeration-Service-Mechanic-Job-Fresno-CA-US-165376410.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),90102f03b1d5751140fb732c464c27bf
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:21:14:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Twin Mills RV Resort, a full service RV Camping Resort, is currently seeking the following maintenance positions to join their team in Howe, IN.Maintenance Supervisor - Permanent Full TimeMaintenance Level III – Permanent Full TimeMaintenance Level I - Seasonal Part Time (4 positions) Job Responsibilities include but not limited to: General building maintenance and upkeepGrounds maintenance to include general landscapingPool maintenance including chemical application, water testing,  logbook recordingBasic plumbing, electrical, HVAC, and carpentry repairsOther tasks/special projects as assigned RequirementsEducation and Experience: High School diploma or equivalentMinimum of 1 year of relevant work experience in a similar role preferred Skills and Abilities: Valid driver’s license with good driving recordMust be able to lift up to 50 lbsKnowledge of multi unit water and sewer systems operations preferredExperience with basic machinery including tractors, lawn equipment, power toolsOrganizational skills and the ability to pay attention to detailExcellent communication skillsCertain positions are subject to flexible scheduling that may include weekendsProvide exceptional customer service and be a ""team player,"" willing to assist other staff Compensation and Benefits: Competitive payBenefits package available for Permanent Full Time, year round positions To Apply: Contact the Resort direct at (260) 562-3212 and ask for the Resort Manager to schedule an onsite interview. In return for your excellent skills and abilities, we offer a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental and vision plans; a generous 401k employer match; and paid vacations, holidays, and sick time.We thank all applicants. EOE",Maintenance Technician Job in Sturgis,Full Time,"Sturgis, MI 49091",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Sturgis-MI-US-165373158.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=13,Benefits elegible,Entry Level,ba29920508be41ee8e060c9e3589bfd5
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:21:15:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Work from your home in the area of Santa Rosa, Napa, Petaluma California, providing service at customer locations.The Altec Service Group delivers on Altec's commitment to be there for the life of the equipment, through a network of mobile service technicians. If you have the broad range of skills,across the United States and Canada.Apply at https://careers.altec.com Or send resume to servicejobs@altec.com Why Join Altec?We are an industry leader in the design, manufacture, sale, and servicing of truck-mounted hydraulic utility equipment,With a commitment to on-going in-house training and technical support,Providing a state-of-the-art service vehicle for mobile technicians,Within a positive and team-oriented service environmentCustomer First - Enjoyment of Work - Family - Financial Stability - Integrity - People are our Greatest Strength - Quality - Spiritual Development - TeamworkRequirementsRelated experience or educationSpecific experience includes truck-mounted hydraulic utility equipment such as aerial devices, digger derricks, chippers, cranes, specialty equipmentExamples of related equipment are construction, mining, or farm equipment such as dozers or tractors; or military heavy equipment such as the MRAP vehicle, HMEE, or tanks.  Aircraft and Aerospace or Ground Support Equipment (AGE / GSE) repair is also good experience.Overtime may be requiredFor mobile technicians, travel is required, and schedules are not always uniform day-to-day or week-to-week.  Flexibility is key.Physical effort and dexterity is required, lifting up to 75 pounds, including service-related tools.High School or GED requiredThe job level is able to be adjusted at time of hire, if the candidate meets the qualifications for jobs of a more experienced level in the career path.Major ResponsibilitiesUphold Altec’s safety commitmentMaintain and repair Aerial Devices, Digger Derricks, and other equipmentDetermine overall condition of machines through inspectionsDiagnose issues with hydraulic and electrical systemsRestore equipment to working orderExhibit positive and effective interaction with other Altec associates, vendors, and customersMaintain accurate records of all service, repair, and other workCompetitive pay which rewards performanceComprehensive benefits including Medical, Dental and Prescription Drug Program - Retirement 401(k) Program - Vacation and Holidays - Flexible Spending Accounts - Tuition Assistance Program - Employee Assistance and Mental Health/Substance Abuse Program - Life Insurance, Accidental Death and Dismemberment InsuranceAltec Industries, Inc. and its affiliates are equal opportunity employers and maintain affirmative action plans to recruit, retain, develop, and promote qualified individuals without unlawful consideration of race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, citizenship status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. Altec strives to maintain a work environment free from unlawful discrimination and harassment, where associates are treated with respect and dignity.",Mobile Equipment Mechanic Job in Santa Rosa,Full Time,"Santa Rosa, CA 95407",Altec Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/Mobile-Equipment-Mechanic-Job-Santa-Rosa-CA-US-162749453.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=5,Full Benefits Plus Company Vehicle,,ff95a4bfaadc6b8c75b504de1706634d
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:21:56:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"ALERIS is a privately-held, global leader   in   aluminum   rolled  and extruded products, and aluminum recycling.    Headquartered   in Cleveland, Ohio, the company operates 14 facilities in North America, Europe and Asia.Our Rolled Products North America (RPNA) division is seeking to add a talented General Maintenance Mechanic to its team located at our Uhrichsville, Ohio Rolling Mill.  As a member of the   facility's bargaining unit maintenance team, this role will support our general operations including daily preventative maintenance, troubleshooting and repair. The position works a 3 day on/3 day off 12 hour rotational shift, including day and night coverage.Responsibilities Include:Maintains safe and clean working environment by complying with    procedures, rules, and regulations.Identify safety risks and the precautions required to eliminate those risks.Ensures operation of machinery and mechanical equipment by     completing preventive maintenanceControls downtime by informing production workers of routine     preventive maintenance techniques; monitoring compliance.Fabricates repair parts by using machine shop instrumentation and equipment.Conserves maintenance resources by using equipment and supplies as needed to accomplish job results.Removes defective parts by dismantling devices; using hoists, cranes, and hand and power tools; examining form and texture of    parts.Maintains continuity among work teams by documenting  and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs.Required Qualifications:High School Diploma or GED required. Two to three years' work experience in a heavy industrial setting.Prior experience working in maintenance department of an industrial manufacturer (1-3 years minimum depending on quality of  experience).Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short     correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple    correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in    one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization.Experience operating construction equipment (ie: forklifts, or larger     material handling equipment).Ability to achieve a passing score on both a general and mechanical  knowledge aptitude test.______________________________________________________Process for Applying:Please email a cover letter and resume to: Amanda.Quick@aleris.com Resumes can also be dropped off at the Security office located at: 7319 Newport Rd. S.E.,  Uhrichsville, OH  44683.Aleris is an equal opportunity employer and supports diversity in the workplace. Aleris offers competitive compensation and benefits programs which include: Medical, Dental, Prescription Drug, Vision, 401(k) Plan, Life, and S&A.",MAINTENANCE MECHANIC Job in Uhrichsville,Full Time,"Uhrichsville, OH 44683",All,http://jobview.monster.com/MAINTENANCE-MECHANIC-Job-UHRICHSVILLE-OH-US-164939535.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=15,,,714b9cb1aa4c44fda47448f63f4efd21
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:21:57:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking a challenging and fast-paced work environment? Our Customer Service Advisers participate in a highly rewarding program that recognizes outstanding performance. With industry-leading training and strong people-focused leaders, we are committed to advancing your skills and career growth. At Sears Auto Center, we truly are customer focused. This is why we look for individuals that not only have customer service knowledge and experience, but those who enjoy helping others. We are seeking a success oriented customer service adviser who will work passionately towards assisting and educating customers on options available, to provide customer assistance and deliver a positive automotive center experience. The customer service adviser is responsible for selling and servicing customers within the automotive center by maintaining knowledge of product and services. QualificationsJob Duties/Responsibilities:• Recommend vehicle repair and maintenance to customer and promote sale of products and services mutually beneficial to customer and dealership• Build relationships with customers to promote repeat and referral service business• Building Customer Satisfaction & Loyalty.• Energetic responsiveness to every customer, on the phone and in the store• Solutions oriented selling• Involvement in every aspect of the store operation.• Continuously learns new technical information and techniques in formal training sessions in order to stay ahead of the rapidly changing automotive technology world.Required Skills:• 1-2 years of Retail Sales preferred• Must have Valid Drivers License• Pre-employment drug test and background check will help assure we build teams of people who can best work with others and serve customer needs.Preferred Skills:• Solutions oriented sales experience• Retail experienceEducation Requirements: HS Graduate or EquivalentLicense/Certificate Required: YesDriver's License Required: YesAge Requirement: 18+ EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Automotive Customer Service Advisor Job in Bensalem,Full Time,"Bensalem, PA 19020",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automotive-Customer-Service-Advisor-Job-BENSALEM-PA-US-165012983.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,Commensurate with Experience,Entry Level,1d82d4ab1b946ce9740ea885a949692e
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:22:45:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lawn Care Technicians Local lawn care company is looking for enthusiastic, self-motivated team players who enjoy working outdoors.  Spring-Green has 38 years of proven excellence in the green industry, and we encourage personal and professional growth which supports our core standards of Quality, Service, Professionalism, and Value. Qualified candidates will be responsible for providing lawn care services (fertilization, weed control, insect control, aeration, seeding, etc.) to residential and/or commercial customers. Experience is helpful, but not required. Sign on bonus for licensed operators/applicators.  This is a full-time, seasonal position.  We offer paid training and a generous benefit package including: medical, dental and life insurance, paid vacation and holidays.  Compensation:  $600 - $800 per week.Applicants must: Have a minimum of a High School Diploma (or GED)Be able to read and recall regulations and procedures and pass state issued pesticide examPossess a valid Drivers' License with a good driving record,MVR will be screened Ability to follow driving directions and familiarity with service area a plus  Ability to work independently, provide good customer service and demonstrate effective verbal and written communication skillsBe able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., and work in various weather conditions and temperature rangesWork Monday through Friday, Saturdays during peak seasons (spring and fall) are part of the routine work scheduleExperience is helpful, but not required. Sign on bonus for licensed operators/applicators.Selected candidates subject to pre-employment drug testing and background screening. Equal Opportunity Employer ",Lawn Technician Job in Plainfield,Full Time,"Plainfield, IL 60585",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Lawn-Technician-Job-Plainfield-IL-US-164903259.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=5,600.00 - 800.00 $ /week,Entry Level,d3382296e9770bcf73d7f2629b232be9
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:23:29:43,No,jobs.monster.com," Position SummaryThe Service Delivery Engineer, Level 1 is an entry level position responsible for providing end-to-end support to Financial Centers within a region, ensuring that all problems are fixed or directed to the appropriate department to be resolved. As such, the SDE1 will learn the basic operations of a Financial Center and how to diagnose system hardware, software and operator problems within the Financial Center environment. As experience is gained, will recommend and perform remedial actions to correct trouble issues. She/he will also develop skill sets that will enable coordination of activities with the Help Desk, Network Services, and other information services. Responsibilities ·         Support Financial Centers and back office staff by maintaining equipment through installs, modifications, repairs and preventative maintenance on all affiliated hardware including ATMs, Teller/Platform Systems, Voice, Networking, and Data Communication equipment.  ·         Responsible for timely resolution of break / fix incidents as dictated by established service level agreements as well as Move-Add-Change requests assigned by area manager, ensuring prompt and efficient service to both our internal and external customers. ·         Build and maintaining solid working relationships with their customers, both internal and external. ·         Proactively identify potential maintenance and/or repair needs that could impact customer service and sales for their assigned locations. ·         Remedy System must be reviewed regularly to ensure that maintenance and other requests that directly affect the internal and external customer experience are handled expeditiously.  ·         Maintain and inventory Company equipment. ·         Administrative duties must be performed in a timely manner and include submission of expense and maintenance reports, and other work order specific documentation.  ·         Must be team oriented, professional with excellent communications skills, as he/she will be required to interface with Financial Center staff, the Help Desk and other entities within HTx Services.  ·         Must have ability to articulate how specific repairs, installs and maintenance related work to Financial staff in non-technical terms. ·         Maintain use and safety of Company motor vehicle. ·         Travel within specific region and/or as needed by the Company. ·         Ability to work overtime as needed Practical Experiences: Entry Level -- This includes: 1-2 years of technical school for PC repair and/or networking.Knowledge of LAN/WAN, Internet, Windows Operating Systems, Applications, and Electronic Mail Systems, P/C Hardware Troubleshooting (i.e., System Disassembly and Inspection, Motherboards, Microprocessors, ROM, RAM, Serial Parallel Ports, and USB ports, CD/DVD Drives and Hardware Diagnostics). Ability to read electrical schematics comprehending diagnostic and repair instructions for data/telecommunication network and systems equipment. Strong communication skillsValid Driver's License.Ability to travel and flexibility to work overtime as needed.Technical Qualifications or Specialized Certification:Technical Certificates A+ or MCP. PC Repair and/or Networking.   Computer SkillsMicrosoft Office Suite.  HTx Services provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, HTx services complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. M/F/D/V",Field Service Technician Job in Fort Lauderdale,Full Time Employee,"Fort Lauderdale, FL 33302",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-Fort-Lauderdale-FL-US-161470227.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,"40,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Installation/Maintenance/Repair,718b48b4465e24de86db4aa401fe8e13
United States of America,US,05/Dec/2015:23:31:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Keywords: warehouse, builder, pallet   Overview:   REFRESH your career by joining our exceptional team.  Coca-Cola Bottling Co. Consolidated (CCBCC), the largest independent bottler in the US, is looking for Warehouse Associates (Order Builders).  If you are a dependable professional who is looking for a solid career with a growing Global Brand Leader that values its employees, then we are the place for you!   This is a part-time position responsible for building pallets and other warehouse duties.   Accountabilities: “Build” pallets/orders as needed/directed to support successful order fulfillment, i.e., repackaging product. Use appropriate material handling equipment to move product and materials from/to designated locations to support activities in an efficient and safe manner. Assist the daily housekeeping and maintenance of the warehouse and other material handling equipment. Complete appropriate warehouse paperwork. Adheres to all policies and procedures relating to product age and quality. Understand the safety culture and strives for 100% compliance concerning safety observations. Perform miscellaneous activities as directed to support the efficient operation of a warehouse in a dynamic environment. Required Qualifications Must desire and be able to work a part-time schedule (up to 25 hours per week)  Ability to read, speak, write and understand English and to perform basic math skills (addition, subtraction, multiplication and division)  Proven history or ability to demonstrate safe / responsible behavior, and a positive performance record (including attendance) Must be able and willing to repetitively lift up to 50 pounds, push, pull, stand, squat, bend and reach    Ability to work independently in a fast paced environment while meeting productivity and quality expectations Must be self-motivated, respectful, positive, team oriented and maintain a high degree of integrity Willingness to operate common warehouse equipment (i.e. forklifts, walk behind / riding pallet jacks)    Successful candidates will be required to pass a post offer, pre-employment drug screen, physical abilities test (where applicable) and background check Great Company, Great Brands, Passionate People .   See Job Description Additional Information:",Part Time Warehouse Associate (Order Builder) Job in Knoxville,Part Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37901",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Part-Time-Warehouse-Associate-Order-Builder-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-165417307.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=5,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,b9d97a2389cc84b52d1596ea53e41969
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:23:33:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking an Account Director to join our Boston PR/Social Influence team.The ideal candidate will have strong PR, social media and digital background working with prominent, consumer-facing food, nutrition and packaged goods brands. You will be a key day-to-day strategic, program and media relations manager with a demonstrable track record in influencer communications, consumer media relations/PR and social media engagement programs. This is not the role for you if you like wearing one hat. To be successful in this role you will need a strong foundation of PR skills and experience, but also proven experience, passion, and excitement for the digital space. You must have willingness to redefine what it means to be an Account Director at a modern, innovative agency and truly blend old media fundamentals with new media opportunities. And you?ll need to be a foodie too ? not just by your palette, but by your portfolio of clients, programs and contacts.Key qualifications:We expect that at this level, everyone has the basics. Strong communication skills, leadership qualities, desire to always deliver the best work, etc. So we'll focus on a few qualifications that especially important to us. -Relentless drive to make the work better. Good enough isn't. No exceptions. -A constant source of positive energy, perspective and constructive input. You're always level-headed and calm. Especially when things get crazy. -Experience with and a love for building and growing teams. Not just management. Actually investing yourself in helping, challenging, and pushing those around you. -A hunger for what's new and next. You're constantly finding ways to rethink things - find new solutions to old problems. -Fantastic in a room. With new clients, old clients. New business. Press interviews. You're an excellent presenter, great at reading a room, and can always contribute something. -Four year degree is required-8-10 years of experience required.-Excellent writing and media relations skills required.-Relationships with key national media, including both print and broadcast, across the food, nutrition and lifestyle sectors is essential .You must be eligible to work in the United States to be considered for this role. We are an eoe and do not discriminate against applicants due to race, age, ethnicity, gender, religion, national origin, veteran status or on the basis of disability.",Account Director Job in Boston,Employee,"Boston, MA 02116",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/account-director-job-boston-ma-us-167585955.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),7f2e30d768480fbd1f2f19037f9a5b5f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:23:31:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Siena College Office of Marketing and Communications is accepting applications for the position of Associate Director of Marketing and Communications. The Associate Director of Marketing and Communications is the primary spokesperson for all day-to-day media needs for the College in an effort to strategically communicate Siena values, issues, policies, products and crises to external audiences. The Associate Director is responsible for strengthening reputation and brand identity, translating the Siena story into impactful communication, promoting a positive public image and raising institutional awareness. Reporting to the Director of Marketing and Communications, the Associate Director plays a leadership role in supporting all divisions on campus, with specific responsibility and accountability for the Offices of Development and External Affairs, Alumni Relations, and the Office of Student Life. Essential Duties: Communicate the Siena story to the external world on topics that span all divisions and disciplines; identify existing and new media channels and opportunities; define the various audiences for messages and target them appropriately; maintain and build a portfolio of media contacts and campus “experts”; collaborate with/train colleagues and students to effectively communicate to external audiences; and manage messaging strategy in situations that threaten reputational risk. Plan, prepare, and edit innovative institutional communications and marketing projects to support College-wide promotional efforts, including: website content, press releases, newsletters, informational brochures, and executive level speeches and correspondence. Advise and initiate collaboration with faculty, staff, and academic/institutional leadership to ensure that their respective areas are considered within a clearly communicated marketing and communications strategy. Minimum requirements: A master’s degree in related field; significant industry experience preferred.  Must demonstrate strategic thinking, leadership and management skills, strong understanding of communications best practices, developed knowledge of evolving media landscape, and familiarity with the unique demands and challenges of higher education marketing. A background screening will be required. Please send resume and cover letter, including salary requirements, to Office of Human Resources, Siena College, 515 Loudon Road, Loudonville, NY 12211, or email humanresources@siena.edu Siena College is a Franciscan and Catholic institution and expects members of its community to be knowledgeable about its mission and to make a positive contribution to that mission. Siena College is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Siena College surveys all job applicants in accordance with the U.S. Department of Labor’s affirmative action requirements. Therefore, we request that in addition to your application, you complete the Equal Employment Opportunity Data Form located at www.siena.edu/eeo In order to complete the form, you will need the posting number for this position which is R1218. Any information you choose to provide on the Equal Employment Opportunity Data Form will be treated as personal and confidential and will be kept separate from your application for employment. Your cooperation is key to maintaining an effective equal opportunity program at Siena College and is greatly appreciated.",Associate Director of Marketing and Communications Job in Albany,Full Time,"Albany, NY",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-director-of-marketing-communications-job-albany-ny-us-167556493.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=10,,,33797f3b82398e5951936003bb27cbf1
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:21:55:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Duties and Responsibilities The Product Marketing Manager will be responsible for product strategy and management, product promotion, positioning and messaging, product enhancements,  sales support to meet revenue and growth targets. New Product launches Product pricing and promotions. Coordinate the development of strategic marketing plans and channel marketing initiatives.Competitive analysis and evaluation of industry trends. Message and content development for digital and print. Product packaging and labeling development.Creation of product selling tools and product sales training Provide support to sales dept. with regard to marketing initiatives Forecasting sales to assist with inventory management Qualifications and Skills Minimum 5 to 7 years of successful product marketing experience, preferably in the giftware/tabletop industry Professional education Strong analytical skills. Able to optimizes the use of data and information to uncover customer and market insight Able to provide strong evidence-based analysis that builds brand equity and a differential advantage Customer Focused - able to develop and sustain positive relationships to obtain customer insight Strong communication skills in oral and writing.Maintains work process flows by coordinating information and requirements with related operational departments; participating with and providing resources to business improvement teams.Proactive in identifying needs/issues and developing and employing effective solutions in a timely manner Detailed and action oriented Strong collaborator to work with other functions in the organization such as IT, Sales, to accomplish business goals Education Bachelor degree in Business or Marketing required",Product Marketing Manager Job in City Of Industry,Full Time,"City Of Industry, CA 91744","City Of Industry, CA 91744",http://jobview.monster.com/product-marketing-manager-job-city-of-industry-ca-us-166080533.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=1,"$50,000.00+ /yearbase salary plus bonus",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),c23aa8865b1da359f461d7e31a7c46b8
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:21:54:31,No,jobs.monster.com,12 months active PMP (Project Management Professional) certificationExperience as Project Manager for a $10M + IT implementationExperience as project team lead in a federal or customer facing application project implementationExperience as a project team lead in a business analysis project implementation requiring process changesExperience in maintenance of a multi-year project plan for an IT effort with milestones and resources Experience leading a communication effort for a multi-layered/cross functional IT implementation Experience in risk identification and mitigation for a  multi-layered/cross functional IT implementationExperience with government projects that followed a Project Management methodology.,Project Manager Job in Albany,Full Time,"Albany, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-albany-ny-us-167898589.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,,4284c9988d82eaf7c47324978fc11673
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:21:22:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:The Brand Manager is responsible for bringing the brand vision to life via creative marketing strategies.  You will be responsible for annual marketing planning and budgeting across advertising, digital, public relations, events and other activations.  The Brand Manager will partner with their Product Manager counterpart to align on brand and product line marketing objectives.  They must also work cross-functionally with sports marketing, event planning, digital, creative services, sales and other partners.   The ideal candidate will be extremely creative, high energy, results driven, consumer and customer focused, brand savvy and skilled at building internal relationships and external partnerships.  This is a mission critical position that is customer and consumer facing.     Essential Job Functions: ·         Serve as evangelist for the brand·         Work closely with Director of Brand Marketing to establish strategic marketing priorities and execute resulting tactical  plans across all points of brand contact, including demand-creation, media relations, packaging, in-store,    event, sports marketing and online vehicles·         Act as brand guardian to ensure consistent messaging and execution across categories, channels and countries·         Communicate and guide international distributors with brand-driven marketing direction, plans and collateral to achieve consistent worldwide brand presence·         Manage/guide agency relationships, media schedules, and project budgets·         Participate and represent brand in advocacy activities and industry associations·         Promote and communicate brand activities internally·         Promote sponsored teams and riders across all marketing collateral and media channels·         Work with sales and marketing staffs to promote brand through event presence·         Create and promote product training vehicles for sales reps and retailers·         Partner with digital team to manage content across consumer websites and social media vehicles.  ·         Provide collateral support for b-to-b websites·         Obtain and analyze consumer and industry market data·         Remain informed about industry news, trends, and competitor product advancements·         Manage tradeshow marketing activities, graphics and presence·         Seek and communicate market/product information from end consumers, retailers and sales reps to marketing and product teams Education and Training:·         Bachelor’s degree in marketing or related field, or equivalent experience·         3-5 years marketing and/or related experience – preferably in the cycling or outdoor industry Skills and Abilities:·         A creative approach grounded in practicality·         Ability to manage multiple projects and timelines·         Excellent written and verbal communication skills·         Strong social media skills  ·         Passion for and good knowledge of both bicycling industry and trends  NOTE:  This job description is not intended to be all-inclusive. Employee may perform other related duties as negotiated to meet the ongoing needs of the organization.",Brand Manager,Full Time,"Scotts Valley, CA 95066",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/brand-manager-bell-job-scotts-valley-ca-us-166664904.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=2,,,1108069ba1e3140f5ba64d18625f035f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:21:06:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking to fill both a Sr Research Manager and Director of Market Research·         Guide a team as they execute the project process from study design through analysis and reporting, producing thorough, high-quality deliverables while achieving excellent financial results.·         Effectively perform the Lead Analyst role on a variety of projects.·         Direct multiple projects for you and your team simultaneously, while ensuring they remain efficient, on schedule and within budget. ·         Apply solid business understanding to deliver actionable, impactful findings to clients. ·         Demonstrate a strong sense of teamwork while providing growth and development opportunities for team members, including building morale and supporting company initiatives and efforts.·         Provide mentoring and coaching to create an inspiring environment; maintain a positive attitude in challenging situations. ·         Be available to serve as a team resource for decision making and guidance.·         Proactively lead problem solving efforts; provide suggestions and take action on areas needing improvement.·         Develop client rapport and manage expectations through communications that develop trust and build strong relationships.·         Collaborate with Business Developers by assisting in the proposal and bid process.·         Effectively manage people managers in direct reporting relationships.Education and/or Experience:·         B.A. in related field such as Business, Economics, or Social Sciences. M.A. or MBA preferred.·         At least 4 years of prior experience in market research. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:·         Able to lead project managers, multiple projects and teams simultaneously to deliver quality deliverables with strong financial performance.  ·         Demonstrate strong leadership skills of direct reports, project team and broader project members.·         Excellent verbal and written communication skills.·         Proficient analyst and report writer.·         Capable of managing workload priorities for self and team. ·         Strategic thinker with strong business acumen.·         Proficient in building and maintaining client relationships.·         Preferred expertise in one or more business verticals or study methodologies.   ",Director of Market Research Job in Wayne,Full Time,"Wayne, PA 19080",All,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-market-research-job-wayne-pa-us-167552982.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),1e98780984d5277b79f617345f9b01e2
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:21:00:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:                       The Marketing Manager is responsible for the management and implementation of the firm’s daily marketing-related activities, including: strategic planning, public relations, website management, client marketing, brand management, internal marketing communication efforts, referral development efforts, and promotional/event planning for the firm’s six offices.  Parker Ibrahim & Berg is a fast-growing, business to business law firm headquartered in Somerset, NJ.  We are looking for a Marketing Manager who is highly intelligent, experienced in law firm marketing, has the ability to handle multiple tasks, excels under pressure and tight deadlines, willing to be held accountable for their results, has outstanding communication skills, can effectively work with multiple partners, and is a consummate professional with an excellent eye for details. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:                               Core duties and responsibilities of the Marketing Manager include the following: Assist in the formulation of the firm’s strategic marketing goals and plans;Develop and maintain written material for use in the Firm’s marketing and business development initiatives, including attorney biographies, credentials, experience lists and marketing collateral;Create and monitor the firm’s and individual attorney’s marketing plans;Create and manage client development programs/activities;Increase firm’s visibility through outreach to appropriate members of the media; draft and submit press releases;Stay current on the firm’s service offerings, industry capabilities and best practices in legal marketing;Create, develop and maintain marketing budget;Coordinate and update information on the firm's website;Track market activity and business proposals; andInternal and external cross-selling initiatives throughout the firm. SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE & ABILITIES: ·         Prior law firm marketing experience is strongly preferred;·         Excellent verbal and written communication skills;·         Ability to deal professionally with both internal and external clients on all levels;·         Ability to multi-task and prioritize workload and projects;·         Must be self-motivated and committed to excellence in everything you do and·         Ability to think strategically, but implement tactically.Education and/or Experience:                                              Bachelor's degree (B. A.) in related field of study preferred;Minimum 5 years of experience in Marketing andSolid track record as a marketer in the professional services industry.to apply:         To apply for this position please email your cover letter, resume and salary requirements to: careers@piblaw.com.",Marketing Manager Job in Somerset,Full Time,"Somerset, NJ 08873",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-manager-job-somerset-nj-us-167039038.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b972a188c6ddc986964774ba87340c99
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:21:00:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY: Under general supervision of the Warehouse Supervisor or other supervisory/management-level position within the facility responsible for performing a variety of warehouse-related duties such as receiving and storage of goods preparing orders for shipment by picking items from shelves and placing them in totes and ensuring that orders are filled accurately and efficiently continually striving for improved customer satisfaction. This position is categorized as compliance critical and as such requires and is assigned specific responsibility for ensuring continual and proper compliance with all division corporate and regulatory requirements. PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: If a fully automated PkMS enabled environment must be able to utilize the functions of the warehouse management system in order to perform daily tasks. Verifies merchandise received against receiving documents notes and reports discrepancies and any obvious damages. Stocks shelves with various types of merchandise. Rotates stock so that newly-received items can be used last. Prepares orders for shipment by pulling items from shelves and placing them in totes to be packed and sent to customers. Processes and performs data entry of returns; also returns merchandise to proper shelf in the warehouse. Performs daily counting and researching of discrepancies. Assists with inventory procedures as requested. Maintains a clean work area to help ensure that merchandise remains clean and to help prevent work related injuries. Complies with all appropriate policies procedures safety rules and DEA regulations. Must be able to work overtime when necessary and participate in physical inventory. Have a good overall understanding of DC workflow and can work with minimal guidance Primary duties include order fulfillment stocking and replenishment and outbound shipping of customer orders. Performs related duties as assigned. EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS: Requires completion of a high school diploma general education degree (GED) or equivalent combination of experience and education; normally requires less than one (1) year of equivalent work experience. MINIMUM SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITY REQUIREMENTS: Ability to read and understand the English language for the purpose of comparing and reading product descriptions names and shelf labels. Must possess basic mathematical skills. Strong interpersonal skills; ability to develop and maintain cooperative working relationships with others. Strong organizational skills; detail oriented. Ability to use good judgment in order to carry out detailed instructions. Basic computer knowledge preferred. Ability to operate power equipment at high levels (20’-40’) such as reach trucks picker machines etc Must be a team player and demonstrate effective communication and problem solving skills Maintain appropriate attendance standards. PHYSICAL AND MENTAL REQUIREMENTS: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an associate to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions: Ability to operate in a production-driven environment and perform at a level that is 95% or greater of engineered standards. Physical activity requiring reaching, bending, kneeling, stooping, pulling, carrying, balancing, lifting, finger dexterity, grasping, feeling, repetitive motions, talking and hearing. Ability to lift up to 50 lbs. Visual requirement is for close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision and ability to adjust focus. Associate is required to stand, walk (or otherwise be mobile). Ability to deal with stressful situations as they arise. Ability to operate equipment such as forklifts, pickers, etc. Must be able to use wrist mounted controller unit. Must be able to use box cutter to open boxes of product. Additional Information:",Warehouse Associate I,Full Time Employee,"Kent, WA 98032",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-i-nights-job-kent-wa-us-167068716.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=10,,Marketing/Product,0e89044b927f4d4f67179a8cf6c4b096
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:20:34:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Benore Logistic Systems, Inc., we develop a partnership with our clients that enable us to identify supply chain issues and provide integrated logistics solutions that add value. We integrate our clients’ values, systems, and people with ours to deliver a seamless supply chain for optimal performance.  We are currently seeking a Project Manager who will oversee the planning, implementation, and tracking of multiple short- and long-term projects, concurrently, which have a beginning, an end and specified deliverables. Reporting to the Senior Project Manager the Project Manager will establish project planning activities on topics presented by organizational leaders. Identify needs within the organization or client base and promote project activities to address.  Position represents the company in a positive image with employees, customers and the community always performing in a safe and ethical manner to achieve financial success.  The ideal candidate will have project experience in warehousing/distribution or manufacturing environments.  This person will have completed or will be willing to complete their PMP and will have MS Project experience.  ",Project Manager Job in Greer,Full Time,"Greer, SC 29651",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-greer-sc-us-166159416.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8052a17f14fa9d4ff75b66bd2a5362f4
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:20:34:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Junior Analyst / Assistant Project Manager – Entry Level PositionRequirements:Bachelor’s degreeExcellent working knowledge of Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, and PowerPoint)Strong basic math skillsActivities/Responsibilities:Assist project manager in developing market research reports in PowerPointExtracting information and verbatims from recorded interviews and focus groupsProofing and editing questionnaires and reports.Programming of web-based surveys Data analysis using ExcelPutting together graphs and charts into PowerPoint presentations.Extra Consideration:Experience in market researchExperience in writing reportsDatabase management skills (Access, SQL, etc.)Advanced Access, Excel and PowerPoint skillsStatistical analysis for market research experience (modeling, analysis, and research design)Business experience or internshipsSalary Range:$35K to $40KLocation of Position:Pittsburgh, PA (Robinson Township area) Company Description:AMG Research (www.amg-research.com) is a global market research company located in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.  Since 1991, AMG Research has conducted more than 1,000 market research projects for the leading companies and organizations in the Healthcare, Business to Business (Industrial, Commercial), Associations, and Business to Consumer sectors.   AMG Research provides a range of research-based consulting services that provide actionable market research and analysis to assist companies: Assess new market opportunitiesAssist sales and marketing in new product development/voice-of-customer research Assess brand strength, awareness, and perception Conduct competitor intelligenceAssess pricing optionsDetermine competitive advantage through customer satisfaction measurementContact/Resumes to:Tammy Lucas, Office Manager, at tlucas@amg-research.comor (412) 787-4166  ",Junior Analyst/Assistant Project Manager Job in Crafton,Full Time,"Crafton, PA 15205",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-analyst-assistant-project-manager-job-crafton-pa-us-146480217.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,"35,000.00 - 40,000.00 $ /year",Entry Level,60d1301ebeb2356c404ccfd797235254
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:20:30:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a Remote position: preferred cities - Denver, Minneapolis or Santa Fe POSITION SUMMARY: The Patient Access Specialist will be responsible for the management of defined types of service (physician practices, hospitals and other places of care) accounts in a specified geographic region in the. Applicants must live within 45 minutes of a major airport in the Denver, Minneapolis or Santa Fe metropolitan areas. The Access Specialist will partner with internal and external stakeholders, including call center services and collaboration partners to  ensure optimal access, effective pull-through, and understanding of access services and program support as it relates to ssupporting  access to specific specialty  therapy. .   PRIMARY DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES: Access Specialists manage daily activities that support appropriate patient access to our client’s products in the provider offices and work as a liaison to other patient assistance and access support services offered by our clients.  Activities include, but are not limited to: Act as an extension of the call center; provide live one-on-one coverage support. Review the scope of access-related resources available through support the call center Offer assistance from prescription to fill/SPP shipment, educating the site staff on the  access  process or cycle through payer prior authorization to appeals/denials requirements procedures and forms Review of patient-specific information in cases where the site has specifically requested the assistance in resolving issues or coverage challenges. Review patient insurance benefit options with the site staff to support access and understanding of patient out-of-pocket costs Support site’s process to identify alternate funding/financial assistance programs Coordinate with client’s patient support services programs representatives to meet site specific educational needs and address access barriers. Educate physician office staff on the use of our client’s patient assistance and call center support services, including web based provider programs Provide information on relevant access topics related to our client’s products.  Demonstrate an understanding of each payer’s prior authorization process to facilitate sites incorporating operational changes to meet payer requirements and avoid access delays. Serve as payer expert for defined geography and able to communicate changes to key stakeholders in a timely manner   About Xcenda: Xcenda, part of AmerisourceBergen, is an integrated, world-class consulting organization focused on value, reimbursement and patient access.  Our company brings together a team of exceptional healthcare and business professionals whose multidisciplinary experience fulfills an unmet need in the marketplace. We provide customized solutions and innovative approaches that discover and communicate the value of pharmaceuticals and other healthcare technologies. Why Xcenda  As a member of the Xcenda team, you will be working, learning, and teaching alongside intelligent, collaborative, and experienced professionals who are inspired by what they do and highly motivated to make a difference.  Whether you join us in one of our core locations: Tampa, Charlotte, San Francisco, Washington D.C. or Hanover, Germany – or work remotely like many of our Associates, you will experience what we call ""Commitment that Counts"" – a mindset and attitude we all share. It is the commitment that we have to our clients, to each other, and to the patients we serve that makes Xcenda such a special and unique organization and more than just a place to work. We are a group of highly motivated people -- all dedicated experts in what they do -- - who value accountability, collaboration, customer focus, innovation, integrity, and passion. We believe life is meant to be pursued and enjoyed through creative thinking, ethics and bringing an entrepreneurial spirit to everything we do. Share in our commitment to excellence. Play a vital role in helping patients gain access to life-saving therapies. Take the next step today and learn how you can join us   EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS:  Bachelor’s degree or relevant specific healthcare experience preferred Minimum three years’ experience required in public or private third party access arena or pharmaceutical industry in managed care, clinical support, or sales. Specialty/retail pharmacy experience/knowledge preferred (ability to teach an office the entire process from prescription to fulfillment)  MINIMUM SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITY REQUIREMENTS:  Interpersonal skills related to establishing relationships within a practice by working closely with them to help remove access barriers to specialty products for their patients Ability to operate as a “team player” in collaborating with multiple sales representatives, sales leadership, and internal colleagues to reach common goals General payer policy knowledge including private payers and Medicare/Medicaid Foundational knowledge of benefit verifications and prior authorization requirements Knowledge of access processes within the physician office and ability to educate sites on the implementation of operational changes to avoid access barriers Ability to understand and interpret payer policy to provide education to sites on how they may proceed in filling out prior authorization/formulary exception/appeals documentation Ability to travel overnight for 3-4 nights per week; 75% travel Excellent communication skills, both oral and written Strong presentation skills Advanced knowledge of medical insurance terminology Ability to analyze and interpret regulation and   legislation Demonstrated teamwork abilities Project management skills Ability to work independently Ability to manage expenses within allocated budgets Good driving record Ability to schedule individual work related travel (air, hotel, rental car as needed) Above average computer skills: PowerPoint, Excel, Word   Additional Information:",Field Access Specialist - Colorado,Full Time Employee,"Minneapolis, MN 55405",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-access-specialist-colorado-minnesota-new-mexico-job-minneapolis-mn-us-167592198.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=18,,Marketing/Product,ed2bfc4c9c5503e9698a5e08785539d5
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:20:28:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRIMARY PURPOSE:            Develop and manage activities related to products in anoverall effort to increase sales revenue and gross margin.KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:·         Create and execute project plans and market studies for new products, design changes, and cost reduction projects. ·         Coordinate and execute product launch for new products. ·         Manage product offerings that are competitive in price, performance, quality, features, etc., while at the same time striving for continual cost reductions. ·         Maintain agency certifications/standards as needed (i.e. AMCA, UL, OSHPD, etc).·         Provide Fan Selector Team with product information required to maintain data in the Fan Selector Program: package offerings, accessories, pricing, weights, costs, cross-reference, feature descriptions, specifications, drawings, etc. ·         Coordinate product with the Mainframe System and Fan Selector Teams so that orders flow smoothly from order to shipment. Identify and find solutions to order entry, manufacturing and field application problems. Facilitate inter-company communications on issues related to product line as needed.·         Understand and manage product cost information·         Maintain price sheets and coordinate any price changes within the Fan Selector Program.·         Partner with Marketing Department in the development of product information required to maintain existing and new product literature, including: bulletins, specifications, flyers, market brochures and IOMs. Assist with drawings, photos and performance data as needed. Instruct Marketing Department which media should be updated, i.e. website, Fan Selector Program, presentations, print publications, etc.·         Monitor sales forecasts, industry statistics, and market trends. Stay current with competitive product offerings. Propose changes to existing products, development of new products, or elimination of products.  ·         Participate in the development/coordination of trade shows, sales meetings, and/or regional shows as needed.·         Train Sales staff and representatives on product features. Create training presentations on overall product line as well as individual products and features. ·         Other duties as assigned. QUALIFICATIONS:·         Bachelor’s degree in mechanical engineering, marketing, or related.·         Five + year’s industry-related experience in the air moving industry, or equivalent combination of education and experience.·         Ability to define market requirements and understand product costing.·         Project engineering-related experience, including scheduling and project management. ·         Strong analytical, communication, interpersonal and leadership skills. ·         Ability to read, analyze, and interpret common scientific and technical journals, financial reports, and legal documents. ·         Ability to respond to common inquiries from internal and external customers, and regulatory agencies. ·         Translate complex concepts and technologies into compelling marketing materials that resonate with customers both written and verbal. ·         Very strong verbal and written communication skills, effective presentation and public speaking skills.·         Proficient in the use of standard office software programs and equipment. PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORKING CONDITIONS:·         Standard office environment.·         Ability to occasionally lift up to 20 pounds.·         Ability to occasionally climb, balance, stoop, kneel, and reach.·         Ability to work extended hours sitting at a computer.Twin City Fan Companies, Ltd. offers an exceptional compensation and benefits package and career growth opportunities that can only be found in a growing industry leader. Interested candidates should send a cover letter, resume, and salary expectations to careers@tcf.com EOE/M/W/Vet/Disability",Product Manager Job in Plymouth,Full Time,"Plymouth, MN 55442",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/product-manager-job-plymouth-mn-us-167358763.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=16,,,c23c4603304a913521ec1b7e1b5b8e6e
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:47:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Great Opportunity for a Systems Integration Project Manager! Our client is looking to hire a Project Manager who can become part of a team in charge of a data center expansion. You will have the opportunity to work with outside vendors, internal management as well as unifying teams across 32 different databases. Our client is looking to move very quickly with this position. This position offers a competitive rate and great benefits. Skills Required:·         Systems Integration Experience ·         Vendor Management experience·         Experience managing teams across a data centerFor immediate consideration, send your MS Word resume to kyle.kramp@principlesolutions.comConnect with me on LinkedIn - https://www.linkedin.com/in/kyle-kramp-59840a49   Keywords: PM, Project Manager, Project Management, Systems, Integration, system integration, vendor, manage, management, vendor management, stakeholders, budget, data center, database, lead, coordinate, execute, spearhead",Project Manager Job in Raleigh,Full Time,"Raleigh, NC 27606",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-raleigh-nc-us-167404108.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,,fd89a16d69bd531e24a9ae8d3a3bf0d3
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:30:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARYThe Site Acquisition Manager will use project management expertise to oversee staff processes and procedures, client relations, time schedules, deliverables and quality performance to successful completion of wireless site development. Ensure that the company meets production, budget and deadline goals for the project.JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITESManage day-to-day operations related to a particular projectCoordinate accurate, up-to-date reporting of project status, scheduling, and planningManage schedule of Site Acquisition deliverablesSupervise the site acquisition staff progress relative to assigned projectsProvide direction and guidance to Site Acquisition Specialists as well as conduct weekly one-on-one meetings with project staff to review individual site progressManage site selection from a Real Estate viewpoint while coordinating with the Design,  Zoning, RF Engineering and Construction Management TeamsAssist in the development of master real estate agreements including Lease Documents, Option Agreements and Letters of AuthorizationOversee the finding of suitable site candidates, review preliminary site documentation,  review negotiated terms of the standard lease or option agreement with property owner, report the negotiation issues to the client, review letter of explanation describing every deal point for completenessCoordinate with other managers, consultants and contractors on project to ensure quality performanceAttend project and deployment meetingsOversee project financials, including managing billing and receivable processBuild and maintain superior client relationsOversee vendors REQUIREMENTSBachelor’s degree or a minimum of eight years of progressive experience in a related field.Five years’ experience in project management. Experience managing others required.  Highly developed working knowledge of business process, including tender and sales.Highly developed working knowledge of site acquisition process.Strong financial knowledge/training.Real Estate License preferred but not requiredPACE/CASPR/ATT experience is a plus Additional InformationBusiness skills should include excellent leadership & negotiation skills, strong customer orientation, excellent conflict management skills, excellent analytical & problem solving capability, excellent communication skills both oral and written, a strong business minded consultative approach with focus on profitability & margin.",Site Acquisition Manager Job in Centennial,Full Time Employee,"Centennial, CO 80015",,http://jobview.monster.com/site-acquisition-manager-job-centennial-co-us-167412335.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=9,,Project/Program Management,19c5f0979b86816882a3c44c188624be
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:26:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"As the Social Media Coordinator you will be the voice of Books-A-Million and 2nd & Charles brand. This position will be responsible for creating, implementing, and executing the Company’s social media strategy. Roles and ResponsibilitiesCreate and deploy social media strategies, supporting the companies’ offerings and promotions.Adopt the brand language to promote social media strategies.Foster and maintain interactive social media relationships over a variety of platforms.Maintain a promotional calendar of social media plans consistent with company marketing initiatives.Coordinate creative and production projects for Books-A-Million’s digital space, especially social media promotions and at times, email promotions.Prepare graphic designs for social media posts as required.Effectively recommends social media approaches supporting Books-A-Million’s Merchandising, Operations, and Marketing Departments.Clearly articulate project scope and objectives for social media and additional marketing projects to the marketing team and others.Establish and meet deadlines for all projects undertaken and assist supervisor with budget management of promotions in the digital space.Collaborate with marketing team to support marketing campaigns and initiatives.Knowledge of trending and emerging social media platforms  Qualifications and Education Requirements Degree in Graphic Design, Marketing or Advertising 3-5 years experience in a professional setting where you have created, implemented, and executed social media strategies requiredKnowledge of Social Media portals required Preferred SkillsMust be proficient with Adobe Suite including Photoshop, Illustrator, InDesign and Dreamweaver.Should be highly competent in HTML coding.Should be highly competent in all social media platforms.Should be a skilled multi-tasker that thrives in a fun, open, quick-paced environment.Demonstrated skill in written and oral communication.Able to present ideas and strategies to all levels of the organization including Executive team members. Stays abreast of trending and current events and consults with supervisor to respond appropriately.",Social Media Coordinator Job in Birmingham,Full Time,"Birmingham, AL",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/social-media-coordinator-job-birmingham-al-us-167601511.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),327dd5b3b3b5f0cf7df08a76b0d5b6c6
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:24:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"SummaryThe Consumer Insights Global Research Analyst is responsible for supporting all levels of the development, execution, and analysis of global consumer research. The Consumer Insights Global Research Analyst will work with the Global Consumer Insights team to develop consumer learning plans in support of company’s strategic goals, and conduct and research to understand consumers’ needs and compensating behaviors to uncover insights and drive future strategies. The individual must possess a unique blend of research, business and technical savvy with the drive, leadership, and ""hands-on"" ability to make their vision a reality. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following, other duties may be assigned* Support ongoing primary research:* Help write, program, and test surveys to collect feedback that addresses specific quantitative research objectives* Manage and process all data generated from qualitative fieldwork and help synthesize insights* Work with external vendors to manage survey/interview fielding and obtain necessary project bids* Monitor fielding to ensure quotas are filled and respondents are meeting expectations* Use SPSS to analyze responses and create a reporting plan* Working with other team members, create reports to summarize research findings* Review all reports for data accuracy* Support secondary research:* Pull point-of-sale data to support market size and share analyses and ad-hoc requests* Gather and summarize industry information and competitive product announcements* Manage market research team’s SharePoint site* Proof all reports for data accuracy and consistency* Be the voice of the consumer inside and outside the organization* Up to 20-30% travel, domestic and international Attendance/Punctuality Is consistently at work and on time; Ensures work responsibilities are covered when absent; Arrives at meetings and appointments on time.Competencies To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:Supervisory ResponsibilitiesThis position has no supervisory responsibilities.Qualifications to perform this job successfully an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions:Education and/or Experience * Candidate must have a minimum of a bachelor’s degree from a four-year college/university in marketing, advertising, statistics or related field (MBA a plus)* 1 - 2 years relevant experience* Candidate will ideally have 2-5 years experience in qualitative and quantitative consumer/ market research for a consumer products company or research supplier. Candidates with backgrounds in R&D, engineering, product development, brand/ product management, statistics, or marketing will be considered.* Experience managing projects and vendors preferred, but not necessary* Experience delivering projects against aggressive timelines.* Experience with concept testing, habits and practices, usage testing, segmentation, and ethnographic research. A blend of these or other qualitative and quantitative methods is preferred.Language Skills* Strong communication and presentation skills, both written and verbal skills including the ability to convey analytical insights in actionable business terms Mathematical Skills * Excellent quantitative and analytical skills* Robust understanding of data and meticulous attention to detail both in calculation and reporting Reasoning Ability* Ability to concisely synthesize research and analysis into impactful reports and presentations * Strong analytical skills with demonstrated ability to sift through vast amounts of data to uncover insightsComputer Skills* Knowledge of internet, spreadsheet, presentation, and word processing software* Advanced Excel skills (especially in the creative and usage of Excel pivot tables)* Highly competent skill level with Microsoft Office Suite* Knowledge of SPSS or other statistics software preferred.* Experience with SPSS or other analytical software, syntax experience preferred but not necessary* Familiarity with IT industry and demonstrated interest in technology Certificates, Licenses, Registrations Other Skills and Abilities* Ability to establish and maintain effective relationships with internal clients* A high level of accountability* Ability to multi-task and meet deadlines while maintaining a high-level of accuracy.* Has a desire to question the status-quo and is driven by curiosity* Is comfortable with ambiguity and can create recommendations from multiple sources of information.* Candidates will be self- motivated and agile, and able to work well with global, cross-functional teams. Physical Demands - The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Ability to work at a computer for longs period of time in an office environment.Work Environment - The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Primary work completed in office environment.",Consumer Insights Global Research Analyst Job in Palatine  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Palatine 60067,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/consumer-insights-global-research-analyst-job-palatine-il-us-167074842.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=8,,,6e84c566e46a99de8d959bff985949de
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:24:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking dynamic individual to join our team.  What you'll do: You will help apartment complexes with marketing and business development. This is very flexible opportunity. You can work remotely from home. Dynamic earning potential: $860.00 – $2,200.00+/Wk. General Responsibilities: ·         Sell tenant referral and marketing services to apartment complexes and realtors in your area. ·         Secure new clients for core online advertising and marketing solutions.·         You are responsible for collaborating with apartment managers in your community to design an effective ad campaign in digital media.·         Able to maintain a high volume of daily prospecting calls 25-50 per day.·         Able to deliver phone presentations customized for each client.·         Quickly develop thorough knowledge of client services.  Requirements: ·         Able to work 1-2 days per week contacting provided apartment manager leads.·         Experience canvassing and cold-calling into various types of local businesses, with evidence of consistent success.·         Able to be convincing and commanding on the phone, and to quickly establish credibility and rapport.·         Successful candidates will have motivation for sales, good presentation skills, and excel at beneficial business relationships. ·         Able to work independently without supervision.·         Passionate about selling and creating value for customers.·         Able to build and manage your book of business.·         \Reliable transportation a plus. Additional perks include: ·         Fun Sales Contests and Performance-based Bonus OpportunitiesOngoing sales lead support and tools designed to help you reach your revenue goals.·         Cellphone Allowance Plan·         Independent Flexible Work Schedule·         Local / National Sales Possibilities Note: This is an independent contractor position.. We look forward to hearing from you!",Apartment Marketing Job (Real Estate) Job in Indianapolis,Full Time,"Indianapolis, IN 46217",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/apartment-marketing-job-real-estate-job-indianapolis-in-us-167357835.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=5,,,ca07dc7515b5786a56f4709052cb9fb4
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:24:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us:  Universal Language Service is the premier Interpreter and Translator referral service agency offering Interpretation, Translation and Localization services to a wide range of businesses across many industries like Healthcare, Government, Legal, Technical, Education, Insurance, Travel and many more.  Our persistent commitment to great customer service has allowed our business and team to grow continuously for 20 years that Universal Language Service has been in business. In the workplace we value honesty, diversity, integrity and equal opportunity for everyone.  Our team members have different ethnic, religious and political backgrounds, but we are all united to serve our community and our clients. TRANSLATION PROJECT MANAGER Position Summary:The position of the Translation Project Manager is responsible for managing and coordinating the completion of all translation projects.This is a full-time position (40 hours / week), at the Bellevue, WA corporate office.  Salary negotiable based on experience. Position responsibilities:• Manage the entire life-cycle of multiple translation projects in a fast-paced environment• Coordinate all the project phases and efficiently predict the lifetime of all the stages of the project• Collaborate with sales staff to clarify project parameters• Establish and maintain excellent relationships with contract translators and proofreaders globally; recruit, negotiate rates and deadlines, coordinate billing• Monitor and control projects status• Perform quality checks at various stages of process to ensure quality and accuracy (proofreading, final eye…)• Manage project finances, including budgeting• Prepare and send customer invoices• Prepare and maintain project documentation• Comply with relevant and applicable procedures Essential skills and experience required:• Excellent written and verbal English communication skills; fluency in a foreignlanguage highly preferred• Bachelor's Degree (preferably in linguistic/translation related studies)• Experience in translation and localization project management required• Detail oriented with the ability to multitask• Ability to meet deadlines• Excellent problem solving and analytical skills• Independence in carrying out assigned tasks• Ability to work under pressure in a fast-paced environment• Highly-developed computer skills (MS Office, Windows)• Working knowledge of Desktop Publishing and CAT Tools, Translation Management System Apply Online: http://universallanguageservice.com/careers/corporate-positions/online-employment-application/   ",Translation / Localization Project Manager Job in Bellevue,Full Time,"Bellevue, WA 98004",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/translation-localization-project-manager-job-bellevue-wa-us-167606204.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=7,Salary negotiable based on experience,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),8856cb60effc816883a86d20394502ce
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:17:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"MarketPro has partnered with a leading Atlanta-based marketing agency specializing in advertising, public relations, and events that offers exceptional opportunities for professional growth and development. We are currently seeking an experienced Media Relations Manager to join our top-notch team. The Media Relations Manager will manage the development, implementation, and coordination of internal and external public relations strategies for the agency and its clients, with the goal of helping to establish and maintain favorable perceptions across all media channels. In addition, you will manage the overall communications vision and direction of the agency in tandem with the CEO's vision.RESPONSIBILITIES:• Helping to create, develop, and manage all proactive and reactive press opportunities (consumer, trade, and digital)• Press release writing and dissemination• Local, regional, and national media outreach• Social media planning, implementing, and nurturing• Strategic planning and ongoing day-to-day direct client interactionREQUIREMENTS:• Strategic thinker, with excellent public relations skills, solid and cooperative media relationships, and knowledge of the evolving digital and social media fields • Should have strong writing and organizational skills, excellent people skills, plus the ability to create and implement communications plans.  • Bachelor's degree required. Advanced degree or certifications are a plus.• Two or more years’ experience in an agency or corporate environment",Media Relations Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30309",,http://jobview.monster.com/media-relations-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-167319649.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),18c409e2ba3a234e3ca5d5a41afecb89
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:19:01:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Coordinator needed for multi-department telecom construction project. This is scheduled to be a seven (7) month contract assignment in Houston, TX. Previous wireless telecom experience is desirable.Responsibilities for the Project CoordinatorSupport of Construction Manager by maintaining document control and tracking project activities within project timelinesGather all project information: schedules, data requests, assignments, tasks, and project meetingsWork with project team to understand and assist with tracking all work, task and project assignmentsAssist in developing a comprehensive workflow process for projectMonitor and modify project schedule as assignedMaintain document control, database management, track project activities and team communicationAssists project team and team lead in strategic meetings and follow up with meeting notesSchedule project follow up meetings as neededRequirements for the Project Coordinator4-6 years experience as a Project CoordinatorWorking knowledge in Excel, Powerpoint, and Sharepoint Previous wireless telecom experience a plusExperience with Veiwpoint software is desirableBenefitsThis Job is located in Houston, TX -> United States",Project Coordinator - Construction/Wireless Telecom/Microsoft Excel Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Houston, TX 77046",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-construction-wireless-telecom-microsoft-excel-job-houston-tx-us-167398876.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=18,35.00 - 38.00 $ /hour,,d28a521367020237583554791e9be64c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:18:43:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"    Position Summary The Project Manager will work independently to lead the planning, scheduling, control and effective coordination of all parallel activities related to the management of multiple projects of moderate to high complexity from concept through close-out.  Essential Duties Ensures that electrical projects are competed timely in accordance with established quality standards and procedures. Scheduling of field personnel and equipment to the various ongoing projects. Managing both small and large complex projects; insuring maximum job safety, efficiency and profitability. Order all parts and materials required for projects. Set-up and schedule projects arrange for required power outages and insure field personnel have all the necessary paperwork and materials to perform the work. Review all completed test reports and write the executive summary with recommendations. Performs job estimates and proposals/quotes for customers. Maintains Work In Progress Reports (WIPs), insures all project invoicing is completed & delivered and assist with AR issues on projects. Assists in training of other employees as directed. Takes emergency calls, assesses situation and calls out technicians as required. Review and approve contractor bids, RFI’s, submittals and change requests. Inspect or direct the inspection of work to ensure conformance to specifications, schedules, and safety regulations. Achieve high customer satisfaction through effective communication of both technical and non-technical topics with all levels of the organization both verbally in writing. Exhibit project leadership, and effective decision making and throughout each project and consistently deliver projects that meet all stakeholder requirements and are fully commissioned, qualified and ready for start-up/occupancy. Ensure all safety regulations are closely adhered to; completes related documentation as required. Works with and takes direction from the Regional Manager. Perform other duties as assigned. Job duties may be modified at any time.   Job Requirements:Bachelor of Science Degree in Engineering or a Business Degree with a minor in Engineering, preferred. Minimum five (5) years project management experience, required. Minimum ten (10) years electrical testing/powder distribution system experience, required. PMP certification preferred, but not required. Must have extensive managerial and technical experience. Strong understanding of engineering principles, procedures and standards. Experience related to computer processing of project costs and schedule information. Experience estimating and making proposals to customers. Well organized with strong planning. Extensive managerial and technical experience. Business development experience Coordinates closely with related departments to maintain schedules and effect necessary revisions as required. Must have experience in preparing detailed electrical equipment specifications, datasheets and submittal packages. Must have the ability to read, interpret, and check the following for construction packages, one-line diagrams. Ability to effectively communicate in English both written and orally with managers and clients Knowledgeable of current IEEE/ANSI/NETA, NEC, NFPA-70E, and other applicable current standards and specifications. Must be willing to travel.    ",Project Manager (Electrical Power Solutions) Job in Englewood,Full Time Employee,"Englewood, CO 80112",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-electrical-power-solutions-job-englewood-co-us-167593230.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,Project/Program Management,ca9f581325cfe3b0857d69ffe86d1eb1
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:17:23:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client 1on1 Development is looking to add a new Project Manager to their growing service delivery team. As a project manager at 10n1 Development, you will assist in the execution multiple projects along with managing and building client relationships and should have a passion for web technologies and working in a collaborative environment. Project Management is a key function and is responsible for driving and delivering a positive client experience, providing project clarity, ensuring projects are delivered on time and on budget as well as building client trust by striving to exceed client expectations with every activity and deliverable.. Summary of responsibilities: ·         Work with sales to estimate cost for proposals·         Analyze client business drivers and their relationship to project objectives·         Translate client goals to actionable plans and execute services that align with those plans·         Providing overall performance and delivery of the project ·         Managing scope, cost, schedule and deliverables·         Managing project plan, budget, structure, schedule and staffing requirements·         Utilizing Project Management Methodologies·         Manage the project to the agreed upon scope and initiate “Change Orders” as necessary·         Identify and initiate steps to mitigate risk and solve any project issues·         Providing direction/guidance to the project team as well as managing client relationships.We are looking for Technical and Professional People with:·         Strong tech and website development background·         3-8 years of project estimating/planning/monitoring; identifying, estimating and presenting costs and schedules aligned with project activities and deliverables; tracking and reporting deliverables·         3-8 years of resource management, dependencies; managing project scope, risk, changes and issues·         3-8 years of Client Relationship Management - managing customer expectations and satisfaction; weekly meetings/communications·         3-8 years of planning/conducting client workshops; collecting/confirming business requirements; documenting application functional use cases and other required documentation·         3-8 years of utilizing and applying known PM Methodology - PMI preferred If this sounds like you, we would welcome a chance to talk with you.  1on1 Development is an equal opportunity employer that is dedicated to create a diverse environment.   All suitable candidates will receive due consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",IT Project Manager Job in Lakewood,Full Time,"Lakewood, NJ 08701",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-project-manager-job-lakewood-nj-us-167566655.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),867312f9da6318de81985405edf732a5
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:17:23:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Role: Marketing and Communications Intern (Summer)We are looking for a Marketing and Communications intern that is interested in learning the ropes of fully integrated marketing and public relations campaigns. Our ideal candidate is a creative thinker and a strong writer that has the ability to come up with interesting topics and identify industry-wide trends, blog, and create engaging social media posts to position Prism as a thought-leader.The Marketing and Communications Intern will be a key member of the marketing team, and have the opportunity to contribute to a broad range of marketing activities ranging from content creation, email marketing, lead generation, and public relations. Our ideal candidate is currently studying marketing, communications or journalism, and is interested in bolstering their degree with real world experience from a hot San Francisco start-up. Responsibilities Assist the marketing team with day-to-day planning and execution of integrated campaigns Draft blog posts, newsletters, and other marketing materials that communicate the power of Prism and any news that we’re planning to share with the world Research any number of topics from industry trends to journalists that cover and write about our space   Social media Rock Star: help us manage our social media channels by identifying and creating sharable content Big picture thinker: Brainstorm and contribute creative ideas that can be used to raise awareness of Prism to new audiences  Requirements Current student studying business, marketing, communications or journalism A strong interest in both the worlds of technology and business An excellent communicator with a clear and concise writing style Comfortable in a fast-paced environment, managing multiple projects and meeting deadlines A creative thinker with a strong sense of humor – you work hard but also know how to have fun!  ",Marketing and Communications Intern (Summer) Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94104",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-communications-intern-summer-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167591627.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=20,,Student (High School),1d154d1b87e8774297f7eb8594a113f7
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:17:19:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Market Research Manager The Market Research Manager is responsible for selecting the appropriate research methodology and supporting techniques to meet a defined business objective. Depending upon the selected methods, the Research Manager develops or assists in the development of the research instrument. The Research Manager works closely with clients and internal customers ensuring the successful execution of the fieldwork. Upon completion, the Market Research Manager reviews the collected data, authors reports and makes business-oriented recommendations to the sponsoring client.Responsibilities:·         Communicating with clients to understand and document the business objectives·         Selecting the most appropriate research methodology and techniques·         Designing qualitative and quantitative research plans for products in all stages of the Product Life Cycle·         Designing research questionnaires and moderator guides·         Working with Project Directors to oversee the fieldwork initiative·         Interpreting data, writing reports, and making actionable recommendationsRequirements:·         A minimum of 5 to 7 years within the custom Market Research industry·         1 to 3 years of industry/sector experience·         Academic and practical experience with a wide array of new product, brand, advertising and customer satisfaction research methodologies·         Exceptional written and oral communication abilities·         Strong analytic skills with experience in statistical modeling and analysis·         Proficient with Excel, PowerPoint, and SPSS/SAS·         Bachelors or advanced degree in business, mathematics, or the sciences Contact/Resumes to:Tammy Lucas, Office Manager, at tlucas@amg-research.comor (412) 787-4166  ",Market Research Manager Job in Crafton,Full Time,"Crafton, PA 15205",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/market-research-manager-job-crafton-pa-us-166227250.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=14,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0e16e5d22e066a841a4955a815b677fd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:17:18:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"The social media coordinator will be able to help run campaigns, as well as handle routine postings to our social channels.They will also be able to assist in building up our inventory of shareable social assets to share with Presenters when the digital media library is available.Essential Job Duties:Posting regularly to Facebook, Instagram, Twitter, Pinterest, YouTube, Google+, LinkedIn, SnapchatRunning social media campaigns and contestsWorking with a cross-functional team to create new marketing materials or to modify existing materialsFacilitating the translation of social media copy for foreign-language social channelsCreating international market-specific content working with the market representatives and social media managerMeasuring and analyzing the performance of posts and campaigns, and tracking the growth of social channelsQualifications:Social media or content marketing experienceExperience translating text or managing the translation processAbility to understand and cultural nuances of international marketsBachelor's degree in marketing, advertising, or business preferredKnowledge of cosmetics and/or direct sales industries a plus",Social Media Coordinator Job in Lehi,Full Time Employee,"Lehi, UT 84043",,http://jobview.monster.com/social-media-coordinator-job-lehi-ut-us-167050711.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=6,,Marketing/Product,74697c806f94117ad38f1e56a4b26293
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:16:14:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overall Purpose: Performs non-technical project management work focused on internal AT&T projects/ programs. Typically manages these projects/programs from initiation through delivery. The incumbents are responsible for meeting the project requirements by applying project management skills, tools, and techniques to manage the project scope, quality, schedule, budget, resources, and risk. Focus: Support delivery of Wi-Fi product roadmap via program managementKey Roles and Responsibilities: Conducts end to end program management of one or more programs containing multiple large projects, or portfolio management of a large scope entire portfolio that are company-wide, cross functional and/or strategic in nature. May also manage one or more portfolios which includes identifying, prioritizing, authorizing, managing, and controlling projects, programs and other related work to achieve strategic business objectives. Directs cross functional teams to complete projects and program deliverables within allotted timeline and budget. Defines project/program scope and objectives, directs activities of project teams, and identifies resources. Projects/programs are very complex in nature, with project activities that are distinct for each new project, are company-wide, and require a high level of analysis to create project plans for new concept programs. Work with external vendors and internal stakeholders to champion project/program(s) across the entire organization. Develops detailed work plans, schedules, estimates, resource plans, and status reports. Conducts program meetings and is responsible for program tracking and analysis. Ensure adherences to quality standards and reviews project/program deliverables. Manages the integration of vendor tasks and tracks and reviews vendor deliverables. Provides technical and analytical guidance to project team. Recommends and takes action to direct the analysis and solutions of problems. Communicates to client/vendors/leadership. Education: Preferred Bachelor of Science or Bachelor of Administration degree or equivalent experience. PMP Certification desired. Experience: Typically requires 5-8 years experience. Supervisory: No. Requirements:Experience in high tech or telecom industryProgram Management experienceProject Management experienceDemonstrated knowledge and understanding of Wi-Fi products",Principal Project Program Manager Job in Austin,,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-project-program-manager-job-austin-tx-us-167075258.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,,0f3e128b6a991de73fdde089f4f4c383
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:16:14:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Duane Morris is seeking a Marketing Data Specialist for our Philadelphia headquarters. In this role, you will develop and promote best practices in the use and maintenance of the Firm’s client relationship management (CRM) system. You will have primary responsibility of providing training and support for all CRM users and  shared responsibility for supporting marketing initiatives, including events and the integrity of all data in the firm’s CRM system. Responsibilities will include the following: continuously update all training materials and develop and maintain a CRM landing page on the intranet to communicate updates firmwide; coordinate all CRM-related aspects of marketing initiatives, including list creation and segmentation, mailings, and analytics; work closely with Marketing and Business Development Managers to scope projects and identify appropriate analytics for follow-up; ensure ongoing data and list quality through analysis, research, and validation to firm standards. Responsiveness, proactivity, detail-orientation, strong analytical and presentation skills and a commitment to client service are keys to success in this role. Interested in candidates that have: 3-5 years of relevant experience with Lexis Nexis Interaction; knowledge of email marketing platforms, including Vuture or Tikit; prior experience in a law firm or other professional services firm; excellent communication and presentation skills, both written and verbal; the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously, prioritize, work with little direct supervision and thrive within the firm's highly dynamic environment; and strong presentation skills; training experience a plus. A bachelor’s degree, preferably in marketing or communications, or 5 years related experience required. Duane Morris LLP, a global law firm with more than 700 attorneys in offices across the United States and around the world, offers innovative solutions to the legal and business challenges presented by today's evolving global markets. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package including, but not limited to: medical, dental, 401(k) with firm match, pension, life insurance and generous PTO.  To apply candidates must complete our online application. The position can be found on our careers page at http://www.duanemorris.com/site/careers.html#tab_support-staff",Marketing Data Specialist Job in Philadelphia,,Location: ,,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-data-specialist-job-philadelphia-pa-us-166984804.aspx?mescoid=4300761001001&jobPosition=15,,,b4caf170bd2e00e695b77dd77218d9e0
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:14:53:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"OBXtek is an award winning Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business providing information technology and management services to the federal government. As the prime contractor on over 85% of its work, OBXtek is a leader in its field and has a robust corporate infrastructure that provides support for all of its programs. OBXtek has realized exceptional growth over the last four years and has been awarded prime contracts with 10 federal agencies.Responsibilities:Provide organizational IT Service Desk support and services to the Air Force Medical Operations Agency (AFMOA), Air Force Medical Support Agency (AFMSA), and Air Force Drug Testing Lab (AFDTL). Support ranges from resolving technical issues and a broad range of information management (IM) and IT services to maintaining optimum office operations.OBXtek, Inc. is hiring the Project Manager to oversee the AFMOA IT Service Desk Support Operations contract to ensure that activities are carried out in accordance with established specifications, schedules, and budgets. The Project Manager will coordinate interdepartmental functions in order to minimize delays and meet with program team members on a regular basis to review program status and plan future actions.Duties include, but are not limited to: Manages AFMOA and AFMSA South IT support to include all AFMOA outlying customers and linked sites. Coordinates the preparation, review, and consolidation of client information systems. Provides recommendations for IT upgrades as needed to keep systems current with technology.Recommends policies, standards and methodologies.Provides assistance for information security.Develops and oversees preparation of studies, reports, and other documents, as requested.Reviews work of subordinate personnel; provide guidance and training where appropriate.Responsible for AFMOA and AFMSA South IT support and systems analysis.Works with NCOIC and COR to identify changes in computer and systems technology and interprets their meaning to senior management.Provides direction to facilitate planning the design, installation, modification and operation of network capability.Recommends long and short-range plans for hardware/software selection, systems development, systems maintenance, and production activities and for necessary support resources.Provides feasibility studies, time and cost estimates and recommendation for establishment and implementation of new and revised plans and programs.Consults with the base communications squadron and other DOD/Air Force Agencies as deemed necessary to coordinate network requirements and activities. Prepares activity and progress reports.Consults with and advises network users.Coordinates network administration and performance requirements with others in the information systems function.Identifies, analyzes and documents long-range requirements and schedules resources related to the enterprise network.Prepares technical implementation plans that provide integrated solutions including actions, milestones, timelines and critical paths required for complete solutions.Researches applicable standards and requirements documents to assure compliance.Plans for and provides reasonable responsiveness in terms of system performance. Prepares activity and progress reports regarding the network performance.Confers and consults with the COR and NCOIC, AFMOA IT Service Desk regarding all performance, scheduling issues, and any unresolved customer complaints.  Operates as MECO for AFMOA. Implements/supports program IAW with Air Force, JBSA Lackland, and AFMOA policies regarding ITAM.Operates in the position of alternate IAO for AFMOA.  Implements/supports program IAW with Air Force, JBSA Lackland, and AFMOA policies regarding Information Assurance.**Clearance Level Required: SecretQualifications:Must be able to attain and retain a Secret government clearanceREQUIRED QUALIFICATIONSEDUCATION:Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited college or university in management or related discipline or a project management professional certification. EXPERIENCE:10 years’ experience working with military policies and procedures.  Must have 10 years’ leadership experience.One (1) year knowledge in IT Service Delivery (ITSM) and related frameworks (ITIL, CMMI, etc.).One (1) year knowledge in computer hardware, including desktops, laptops, printers, scanners, and smart phones",Project Manager Job in Balcones Heights,Full Time,"Balcones Heights, TX 78201",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-balcones-heights-tx-us-167302850.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,,ee5db0c002d24544045354c9394fd381
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:14:52:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"ProCirc, the award-winning Miami-based provider of outsourced magazine publishing circulation services, is looking for a Coordinator to work in a fast paced, high-volume environment.  Candidates will work closely with publishers, printers, internal marketing teams, and vendors to organize magazine print production and print order reports.  Job responsibilities include:·         Organize multi-title direct mail print production requirements for 30 plus magazines·         Negotiate best prices for print materials; hire vendors and coordinate interaction ·         Manage multiple projects from concept to final output ·         Enforce deadlines with internal departments and off-site vendors·         Traffic, proofread, and approve proofs·         Ensure jobs meet postal regulations, quality standards and client-specified requirements·         Compile data from multiple sources and organize into excel spreadsheets for reporting and production needs  ·         Create magazine print order reports to determine copy distribution, communicate print and bind instructions and print timing  ·         Liaison to printer for timeliness and accuracy of print order needs  Job Requirements:·         Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent related experience·         Advanced level excel skills and strong analytical ability·         Knowledge of printing production process·         Excellent communication, time-management and organizational skills·         Attention to detail, multi-tasking ability and strict adherence to schedules a must·         InDesign or Photoshop experience a plus COLLEGE GRADS WELCOME!",Marketing Coordinator,Full Time,"Miami, FL 33145",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-coordinator-analyst-job-miami-fl-us-167551804.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,091a2718e4d810ee1838e720c769b73e
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:14:13:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTION Position Summary: This position is responsible for leading and overseeing all corporate life-cycle pricing strategies, price management systems, rules, standards, and guidelines that deliver on financial goals. In addition this position will drive efforts to extract, organize, understand and utilize sales and movement data analytic relating to driving sales and profits. This role is directly responsible for establishing a business partnership with all team members involved with retail pricing to develop, quantify, and execute pricing strategies in all regions and stores. This responsibility includes developing and implementing advanced analytical techniques, tools, and scorecards to drive business results and ensure fact-based analytic are utilized when making pricing decisions that increase the overall customer experience.  The following are intended to be examples of the accountability for which the person in this position is responsible. This position description is not intended to be complete or all-inclusive and does not preclude management from assigning other or related functions if such functions are a logical assignment for the position.General Duties and Responsibilities:  Develop a partnership with Procurement, Merchandising and Operations team members to support the development of key merchandising pricing strategies and tactics that deliver financial objectives and ROI.Fully implement and utilize business analytic tools available to more fully understand trends in category growth and work with team to develop strategies to correct or capitalize on these trends. Partner with the Procurement, Merchandising and Operations team members to drive and execute key business decisions such as: Sales, Margins, Baseline, Promotional, & Clearance Pricing, Advertising and Promotional Signing, Pricing Standards, Calendar and Timeline compliance with regard to new stores, remodeled stores and category transitionsLead the development and implementation of best practice life cycle pricing capability by creating and defining the tools, processes, guidelines and standardized reporting. This will help  the team define a price strategy, set prices, and execute pricing plans to achieve revenue, gross profit, and market share goalsPartner with Procurement, Merchandising and Operations team members to develop corporate, division, and category pricing strategiesWork with the team to develop pricing strategies for both national brand and private label programs to deliver optimum sales and profits while ensuring they align with overall Vallarta pricing strategiesDrive accountability within the team to seek out strategic opportunities to maximize sales, margins, inventory turns, and ROI.Develop, coach, guide and provides direction and leadership to team members involved in competitive price surveys, analytic and execution of retail pricing Manage and develop relationships with key vendors within area of responsibility, defining pricing and competitive intelligence strategiesSynthesize and interpret pricing analytic and present recommendations to leadershipDevelop and present key pricing strategy recommendations to leadershipEnsure timely and actionable scorecards/ad hoc reports are provided to pricing, merchandising, procurement, planning and marketing leadership Knowledge and Skills ·         Excellent communicator, both verbal and written, with the ability to influence at all levels of the organization·         Outstanding strategic thinking and analytical skills. Demonstrated ability to synthesize facts and insights into concrete, actionable recommendations·         Proven project leadership skills, with the ability to prioritize and deliver on multiple concurrent initiatives that have significant financial impact·         Results driven with a desire to work in a fast paced environment; equally adept at providing leadership as well as working side by side with the teamRequired Education and Experience ·         Bachelor’s Degree and/or adequate experience in the industry·         Experience in pricing related project leadership, business analysis, and strategy development in a retail, consulting, or consumer-packaged goods environment Supervisory Responsibility Responsible for the direction, supervision and interaction with everyone involved in retail pricing Physical Demands Will be required to spend long hours sitting and using office equipment and computers Some travel and overnight stays from time to timeMay also have to do some light lifting of supplies and materials from time to time Position Type/Expected Hours of WorkThis is an exempt level position; schedule would be based on business necessity and coordinated through the reporting supervisor.",Corporate Pricing Manager/Business Analytics Job in Sylmar,Full Time,"Sylmar, CA 91342",,http://jobview.monster.com/corporate-pricing-manager-business-analytics-job-sylmar-ca-us-165728114.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=8,"70,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),76940f1bbd6c67353b5f12a771d46ca3
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:14:07:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential FunctionsManage the activities of the Marketing Team with ultimate responsibility for tasks assigned and completed.  Manage and drive the sales team toward divisional goals. Ability to grow the division’s sales.   Provide technical guidance to other team members. Plan marketing and branding objectives.  Responsible for future divisional product life cycle management. Prepare marketing strategies alongside other company executives and staff.Analyze market trends and recommend changes to marketing strategies based on analysis and feedback.Oversee creation and delivery of press releases, advertisements, and other marketing materials.Oversee and manage company social media image and communication.Attend various meetings as requested.  Coordinate travel activities within the team. QualificationsBachelor’s degree in Engineering, Marketing, Communications, Journalism, or a related field or discipline.   Sales and marketing experience with project management skills",Marketing Manager / Sales Job in Greeneville,Full Time,"Greeneville, TN 37743",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-manager-sales-job-greeneville-tn-us-167207897.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=17,"85,000.00 - 125,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),d95c7a4bc45912da24f8106d8d712fd6
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:13:34:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Wanted: Global Innovators to Help Us Build Tomorrow's Enterprise - Principal Consultant - Agile coach - Infosys Consulting   Are you looking for a change? Do you want to collaborate with some of the best talent in the industry? Are you ready to join a company with a passion for business transformation that makes a difference to clients, communities, and the world?  Then you are the one we've been seeking!   Infosys is a global leader in consulting, technology and outsourcing solutions. We enable clients, in more than 30 countries, to stay a step ahead of emerging business trends and outperform the competition. We help them transform and thrive in a changing world by co-creating breakthrough solutions that combine strategic insights and execution excellence. Our consultants partner with clients to transform their business - one conversation; one idea; one insight at a time.  While we continue to challenge convention and the status quo, some things remain unchanged:  the unwavering ethics, transparency and respect behind everything we do. We will always be a company powered by intellect and driven by values.  So, if your passion is to build solutions that really make a difference to enterprises, the community and your world, Infosys may be the right place for you.   Responsibilities - Principal Consultant - Agile coach - Infosys Consulting The Principal Consultant role is within the Financial Services practice of Infosys Consulting, the Management consulting unit of Infosys. The Infosys Consulting unit focuses on partnering with senior business and technology stakeholders of our clients to help craft and execute their strategy. Responsibilities include but not limited to: o Lead engagements at Financial Services firms in an Agile methodology o Collaborate with business and technology stakeholders to define technology strategy and roadmap, create work plans, define business requirements, analyze data needs and help drive QA strategy. o Provide leadership and mentor junior consultants in the engagement team. o Collaborate with other streams including technology delivery streams across Infosys to deliver a compelling value proposition to the client. o Manage and minimize engagement risk by proactively identifying issues and recommended courses of remediation.   Location: * Atlanta, GA * Chicago, IL * Los Angeles, CA * New York, NY * San Francisco, CA * Plano, TX   Basic Qualifications: * Bachelor's degree or foreign equivalent required.  Will also consider three years of progressive experience in the specialty in lieu of every year of education. * 7+ years of relevant work experience with three years of experience in comparable consulting services. * Ability to travel 4 days a week to multiple local, state and national client locations. * U.S. citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. are encouraged to apply.  We are unable to sponsor at this time.   Preferred Qualifications: o At least 5-8 Years of experience as an Agile Coach with Group Training experience o Must be a Certified Scrum Master with 10+ Years of IT Background o Experience in Advising Senior Executives on Agile Adoption strategy o Ability to lead technology organizations with understanding and adoption of Scaled Agile Framework (SAFe) o Ability to Plan and Conduct Agile Maturity Assessment Interviews and Surveys o Experience in coaching executives on both business and technology o Should have coached organizations of varying sizes to accelerate agile adoption o Conducted online training sessions and agile boot camps o Experience in coaching Globally dispersed Teams o Experience in conducting Agile workshops covering various roles and responsibilities as well as different Agile practice techniques o Candidate must be excellent listeners with outstanding facilitation and conflict-resolution skills o Experienced in conducting Release Planning Sessions across Team-of-Teams in the enterprise. o Experienced in Scrum, Kanban, XP and Lean Agile Practices. o Experienced in DevOps, Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery process and automation o Participated and Contributed to Agile Community of Practice. o Experienced with Process and Tools Supporting Agile Methodologies o Consulted on process improvement initiatives o Experience in Applying Lean Principles on Process to optimize the whole. o Must have strong Analytical and Problem Solving Skills o Should possess the ability to work in multi-vendor environment with high level of collaborative skills. o MBA or advanced degree preferred.   This job may entail an extensive amount of travel. The job also entails sitting as well as working at a computer for extended periods of time. Should be able to communicate by telephone, email or face to face.   Please note this description does not cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee.   EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled     Additional Information:",Principal - Business Consulting Job in Plano,Full Time,"Plano, TX 75024",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-business-consulting-job-plano-tx-us-167510751.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6e798d21583fb3b5240e2a72b4b826a1
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:12:21:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Project Engineer will coordinate material procurement and delivery, produce project schedules, review and determine suitability of shop drawings and submittals, quote/qualify subcontractor requests for change orders, track change order status and requests for information, collect, verify and distribute as-builts, maintain project close-out documents, assist with field staff supervision, be proficient at blueprint reading and quantity takeoffs.Requirements:Candidates should have a B.S. degree in Construction Management or Civil Engineering and 2-3 years of experience.  Must be proficient with computer applications for spreadsheets, word processing, and scheduling and must have good oral and written skillsAA EOE M/F/V/H",Project Engineer Job in Ft. Lauderdale,Full Time,"Ft. Lauderdale, FL 33308",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-job-ft.-lauderdale-fl-us-166219965.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3de1041e71c5e1238d034f13def63b44
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:12:20:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chenega Logistics, LLCCompany Job Title:Project Manager Clearance:Ability to obtain a TS/SCI security clearanceLocation:Alexandria, VAReports To:Director of OperationsFLSA Status:Exempt, Full Time, Regular Summary: The Project Manager will support the United States Department of Defense, Office of the Inspector General, Defense Criminal Investigative Service (DCIS) - Asset Forfeiture Financial Investigative Support Services program. The Project Manager will be required to manage a financial investigative/asset forfeiture program. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: (Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position)· Manage and execute all aspects of the services required under the DCIS Asset Forfeiture Support Services Task Order. · Ensure that all resources are dedicated to the support of Task Order requirements and that all contract personnel, procedures, and policies conform to both host agency and USG guidelines/instructions/regulations.· Maintain daily contact and open communication with the Government Program Manager (GPM) and/or COR to guarantee Task Order requirements are met or exceeded.· Serve as an Asset Forfeiture ""Subject Matter Expert"" providing the GPM with consultation on the management of an Asset Forfeiture program, investigative techniques, legal and procedural subjects and AFMLS or TEOAF policies.· Work with DCIS agents to utilize asset forfeiture sanctions in investigations. This assistance includes reviewing; processing; and analyzing information, records, and observations in conjunction with DCIS criminal investigators.· Organize and conduct asset forfeiture and other investigative-related training.· Support DCIS AFP operations.· Obtain assistance in the investigation and monitoring of violations to identify assets subject to forfeiture sanctions against DoD contractors and contractor personnel and DoD personnel involved in criminal misconduct.· Assist and advise DCIS in establishing an administrative Forfeiture Program within the DCIS. This assistance could include reviewing the current forfeiture authority contained in statutes within the purview of the DCIS, making suggestions for legislative initiatives, assisting the DCIS in discussions with the Department of Justice (DOJ) regarding DCIS participation in the DOJ Assets Forfeiture Fund. · Meet with agents and supervisory personnel, as necessary, to monitor the progress of investigations and to provide suggestions for forfeiture-related investigative strategies and techniques, as requested.· Review, process, and analyze complex business, financial, and other records to determine patterns and relationships between business entities and individuals.· Conduct detailed link analyses utilizing the results of financial analysis and other investigative techniques, such as Title III surveillance, physical surveillance, and the like to determine relationships between the subjects of the investigation and the events that lead to the alleged forfeitability of assets. · Prepare the necessary information for presentation of the facts to the United States Attorney's Office so that seizure warrants can be obtained. The Contractor's review, processing, and analysis of the information provided by DCIS agents will be sufficient to perfect the Government's interest in forfeitable property identified during the course of the investigation.· Provide additional services to identify amounts and property that may be subject to forfeiture in a particular investigation. If necessary, the Contractor will also assist in location and repatriation of assets that are subject to forfeiture. · Provide advice and guidance to develop fully the forfeiture aspects of an on-going investigation.· Analyze financial records obtained by the investigating agencies and submitting reports documenting the results, when requested.· Review bank statements, deposits, letters of credit, Currency Transaction Reports (CTR), loan applications, and related records that are obtained pursuant to Federal and state subpoenas and search warrants executed by the Government. The contractor will review the documents to determine hidden assets and false statements that are used to hide assets from investigators and to make the assets appear to be legitimate.· Review, process, and analyze information sufficient to (a) assist in determining the amount to seek for forfeiture; (b) identify and trace assets during the course of investigations; and (c) assist the Government in perfecting its interest in the property.· Identify the individuals and entities making deposits and all related bank accounts, properties, investments, and any other assets that may be identified from the documentation.· Maintain detailed case documentation and database files of financial investigative research to trace proceeds of criminal activities and investigative interests in targeted property.· Provide technical expertise in using various investigative automated systems such as Choice Point, Autotrack, Clear, and other Internet capabilities to include law enforcement databases in order to provide case support to the government in civil and criminal forfeiture matters (e.g., analyzing and documenting the ownership interests of targeted properties; analyzing financial records to trace the proceeds of criminal violations to their current form; creating a data base from financial records to document the source of targeted property; preparing seizure warrants, civil complaints and forfeiture counts; preparing exhibits on the source and ownership of targeted property; documenting and cataloguing evidence on the source and ownership of targeted property; and in identifying, analyzing, and documenting potential substitute assets). · Provide additional services, including the parsing of dialed number strings, to identify amounts and property that may be subject to forfeiture in a particular investigation and to perfect the Government's interest in forfeitable property.· Utilize information obtained as a result of financial analysis to prepare documentation for use by law enforcement personnel pursuing civil and criminal forfeiture matters.· Organize and conducting detailed examinations of information generated during complex criminal/civil investigations and information available through alternative sources for the purpose of conducting financial analyses of personal/business assets of targeted organizations/individuals.· Prepare analyses of the evidence identifying the legal grounds to forfeit targeted property and assess risk in proceeding.· Develop sufficient probable cause to enable the government to pursue seizure warrants, temporary restraining orders, civil complaints, and forfeiture counts against targeted property and parties.· Provide investigative support to assist the government in coordinated planning to mitigate excessive risks in seizing targeted property to include assessing impacts on the local community.· Prepare documents and catalog case exhibits on the source and ownership of targeted properties.· Perform analytical research to identify and record potential substitute assets.· Identify witnesses and subjects and assisting the case agent/attorney during government conducted interviews and courtroom proceedings regarding the ownership and source of targeted property of ongoing case investigations.· Assist DCIS in participating in the execution of search warrants, once the search site is secured, by searching for financial records to assist in the identification of assets. Non-Essential Duties: Other duties as assigned Supervisory Responsibilities: Supervise and manage a minimum or 36 Sr. Financial Investigators and Analysts at various locations throughout the United States. Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.) · 10+ years of federal law enforcement experience planning, conducting and participating in complex investigations· 5+ years in a specialized area of expertise such as Forfeiture, Organized Crime, White Collar Crime, Fraud, Drug, Money Laundering, or similar area of criminal activity is required· Significant leadership experience (examples required) · B.S./B.A. degree in Business Administration, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science or related field · Applicants must possess a valid US passport or immediately apply for a passport as a condition of employment.· Applicants must possess a valid State driver's license · Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: · Ability to obtain TS/SCI security clearance· Ability to travel· MS Office especially Excel as well as other software applications and databases· Knowledge of commercial databases and other sources of information: FINCEN *Lexis-Nexis *PACER *CourtLink *TECS Choice Point - Autotrack - CLEAR - THREADS - Accurint - ISYS West Law - NADA - Used Price.com Diversity:· Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce. Ethics:· Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values. Physical Demands:· The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.· While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision. Work Environment:· The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.· The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.· During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise. Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Native preference under PL 93-638. We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",Project Manager Job in Alexandria,Full Time,"Alexandria, VA",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-alexandria-va-us-167751604.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),8af21b53191fddfb7087a0b3496275dd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:11:32:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"INTERNET-SALES COORDINATOR Northwest Honda has immediate opening for a person to manage business web site, Craig's List, internet sales & some showroom duties. Income based on education, dedication, & performance. Internet experience preferred. Send or E-Mail Resume to: 1230 South Main Street P. O. Box 148 Rice Lake, WI 54868 ded@nwhondawi.com",Internet-Sales Coordinator Job in Rice Lake,Full Time,"Rice Lake, WI 54868",All,http://jobview.monster.com/internet-sales-coordinator-job-rice-lake-wi-us-167329832.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=14,,,798fa787e7490869b083556959358803
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:10:48:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilities:Participates as a member of the International Business Team Works in close partnership with the Life Cycle Team (LCT) via the International Business Leader (IBL), International Product Managers (IPM) and Medical and Scientific AffairsCollaborates with the team to create the marketing plan, marketing messaging and value propositionServes as the single point of contact (SPOC) for all Product Communciations for the assigned Life Cycle Team (LCT)Manages the creation, development, and execution of all Product Communication materials (electronic and print) on-time, within budget and in allignment with business objectivesEnsures compliance with content review and approval processesMaintains LCT teamsites, intranet content, and provides content for the InternetCoordinates and provides overall management of events, tradeshows, symposia, speaking engagements in support of LCT promotional activities, including event budget oversight and vendor and speaker contract managementManages vendors to deliver quality product and manage costs to a defined budget. Ensure vendors are compliant with all processes and procedures including legal, procurement, and financeManages creation and distribution of affiliate facing newslettersCollaborate with RMD Corporate Communications and Basel, as needed, to provide business department information on products, new product launches, regulatory approvals, press releases and other relevant annoucementsEnsures the use of proper branding, copyright, and trademarks5+ years of business experience with a concentration in product communciations/marketingExperience with new product launchesProficient in MS Office, with advanced Powerpoint skills and familiarity with MS SharepointMedical Device, Diagnostic, or Pharmaceutical industry experience preferred. Proven project management and critical thinking skillsDetail oriented, able to prioritize and able to work under tight timelinesExcellent oral, written and interpersonal communication skillsMust be team oriented and able to work independently within a highly matrixed team environment Education:Bachelor's degreeMasters preferred in either Communications/Public Relations, Business, or Science related discipline",Project Manager- Marketing Communications Job in Pleasanton,Full Time,"Pleasanton, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-marketing-communications-job-pleasanton-ca-us-167643799.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=4,,,540a745b49cb111df450f34d855c3312
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:10:22:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are a high growth company founded three years ago by a leadership team that has a stellar track record in building high growth businesses. Our rapid expansion has created a need to broaden our brands and to lead our expansion as it relates to our internet presence and distribution strategy. Technology skills are important but our critical requirement is written communication skills that convey our passion and enthusiasm.The position is responsible for:Increasing web traffic by creating content using blogs and other social media platformsDeveloping and creating content and brandingCreating and Deploying campaigns that increase SEOSuccessful candidates will have:A strong interest and affinity towards Social Media marketing including Facebook, Twitter, Youtube, Pinterest, Google+, etc.Fantastic written communication skillsHighly self-motivated and detail-oriented and able to operate effectively in an early stage, high growth companyComfortable with Google Analytics, Facebook Insights and other relevant platforms",Web Marketing Specialist Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30022",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/web-marketing-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-166894872.aspx?mescoid=1500146001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9b31f930a02c8056799178e7d003beb0
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:10:19:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsWe have an immediate need for a Public Relations and Marketing Communications Assistant to join a rapidly growing team.  This rapidly-growing promotional marketing company, applies a customer-friendly, direct, results-driven approach to marketing research and sales. As a result of proven success and expertise, new clientele is continuously added as we dramatically increase clients' product exposure, sales and brand recognition.  What We Do Our Public Relations and Marketing teams can extend sales reach to practically any region of the globe -- quickly and with dramatic results. Utilizing an outside marketing force for new customer acquisition, expanded product sales and client-retention campaigns for customers.Our personal approach to marketing creates the most direct link between our clients and their potential or existing customers. Our representatives are trained to interact with customers in a friendly, courteous, and professional manner while responding to their questions or concerns. Unlike direct mail or telemarketing, our representatives will develop a rapport with a prospective customer and address their specific needs with the advantage of visual demonstrations and product samples.  The Public Relations and Marketing Communications Assistant plays an integral role in this as they help our teams bring a brand message directly to the public and support increased market share.Our Opportunity We offer an in-depth training approach with hands on experience. Each employee has the opportunity for personal growth and expansion with a strict policy for promotion from within. Employees will experience the opportunity to learn in a progressive sales and management training program while maturing true leadership. As they move up through the ranks, earning the respect of their peers, team members gain the firsthand experience necessary to manage a business. With our clients 'demanding needs, management opportunities are waiting for those individuals who complete the program and show the loyalty and commitment required of a future partner.RequirementsQualities necessary to succeed in our environment:- Ability to work well in a high energy, team environment- Excellent interpersonal and communication skills- Student mentality and the desire to constantly improve and develop- Positive demeanor and personalityWe only seek the best, brightest and most selfless people to work with. As a company we are committed to training and developing our people and have a vested interest in building their skills. It is because of this that we can hire an individual with little to no experience and turn them into a top performer in a matter of weeks.",Junior PR Communications Assistant: Training,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19104",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-pr-communications-assistant-training-public-relations-marketing-job-philadelphia-pa-us-167035964.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=15,,Marketing/Product,1e97d7c3dbc3b8861b6a8aa06e5a23dd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:10:17:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window, an interactive candidate resource that specializes in connecting up and coming talent to entry level opportunities all across North America, is excited to announce that one of its premiere promotional & experiential marketing clients is looking for an Entry Level Marketing & Promotions Assistant  to join their promotions team! As a leader in experiential marketing & client acquisitions, our client specializes in creating and implementing customized marketing strategies for a large portfolio of clients. By using a personalized approach to brand recognition, our client is able to connect brands directly with consumers through merchandising, sales, direct advertising, sampling, promotions, lead generation and special events within local markets and businesses including major retail locations across the globe! In this entry level role, the Entry Level Marketing & Promotions Assistant  will use their upbeat personality and extraordinary ability to capture an audience to create excitement with target demographics during promotional events and throughout the duration of promotional campaigns in a variety of settings. The Entry Level Marketing & Promotions Assistant will also assist the promotions team with executing any administrative, advertising, marketing and/or sales tasks required. Responsibilities of the Entry Level Marketing & Promotions Assistant:Develop, setup and publish advertising used to create brand awareness and generate increased attendance during each promotionSet up promotional displays and visual merchandising required at each promotional event to create excitement of featured client brands as well as their products and/or servicesPromote consumer excitement and brand connections through consumer interaction and product/service demonstrations and explanationsBuild product & brand knowledge of each featured brand/product/service being promoted at each event. Educate new employees of product/service benefits, costing, details, etc.Manage supplies and inventoryBasic salesMaintain relationships with retail partners, marketing/advertising clients and stakeholders The Entry Level Marketing & Promotions Assistant will successfully progress from this Corporate Event Promotions Assistant  opening into an advanced management training program designed to prepare team members for a management role in one of the many aspects of promotional & experimental marketing including but not limited to:Brand marketingAdvertisingClient relationsSalesPublic RelationsMerchandisingSales PromotionClient AcquisitionAdvertising & Sales Account Management  RequirementsEntry Level Marketing & Promotions Assistant Positions Requirements1-2 years of experience in a sales promotion, marketing, advertising or any retail related setting is an asset. Internship experience and previous entry level experience will as be considered as working experience.Outstanding written & verbal communication skillsExcellent organization and planning skillsSelf-motivated and results drivenAbility to work some nights and weekends for events and promotionsExcellent time management skills and ability to adhere to a scheduleEnthusiastic about providing best possible customer service for clients and consumersPositive attitude & eagerness to learn Must be able to provide social security or a work permit - we are currently not offering sponsorships.**If you can’t wait to become an enthusiastic sales promotions professional and are ready to create and promote product, service & brand hysteria on a daily basis our client would love to hear from you! ",Entry Level Marketing & Promotions Assistant Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","San Francisco, CA 94106",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-marketing-promotions-assistant-job-san-francisco-ca-us-166955439.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=7,,Marketing/Product,f22875e6d0105d346c021894079de96c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:10:11:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Construction firm that services the utilities industry is seeking a Field Engineer for a long term opportunity. Main responsibilities would include assisting with preparation of proposals, workdowns and Powerpoint presentations and assisting in validation of the close out of work portfolios, contractor scorecards and post-construction checks. Qualified candidates will have a degree in engineering or construction management or equivalent experience in the construction industry. Experience with utilities construction preferred. Additional responsibilities and requirements detailed below. Excellent opportunity to join a high energy company with great benefits and reputation!Responsibilities for the Project EngineerAssist in conducting job reviews, pre-check jobs, verify USA markingsAssist in coordinating customer shutdownsAssist in preparation of proposals, change orders and the estimation process.Assist in close out of estimate, post-construction checks, complete as-builts, and review contractor invoices Maintain project databases, working files, field binders, field tickets, etc.Preparation and generation of routine reports and correspondence; some involvement in preparing more complex reportsExceptional communication (written and verbal) an absolute must to succeed in this role. High level of interaction with client. Requirements for the Project EngineerBS Construction Management or Engineering preferred or equivalent experience. Must possess High School Diploma or GED and CA Driver's License. 1+ year of construction experience required (utilities preferred, commercial or residential experience OK)Ability to read and understand civil, architectural, structural, mechanical plans and specifications as they relate to electrical and/or other utility work.High proficiency in Excel required (ability to create Pivot tables and generate reports).BenefitsMedical, 401k, PTOThis Job is located in Concord, CA -> United States",Project Engineer - Utilities/Construction/Planning Job in Concord,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Concord, CA 94518",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-utilities-construction-planning-job-concord-ca-us-167771325.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=17,36.06 - 40.87 $ /hour,,4e36fb3485184ff61494ee39484bc323
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:51:48,No,jobs.monster.com," Title: Patient Experience Project Manager Clinect Healthcare is a leader in patient experience solutions, focusing on understanding and improving patient-practice relationships. Project manage patient experience software implementations.  Keyrole is to ensure delivery of our projects on-time and with great customer satisfaction. You will be conducting project management, implementation and training activities.  The ideal candidate for the Patient Experience Project Manager is an experienced project manager or an up-and-coming all-star with a ""can-do"" attitude and a passion for technology and project management.S/he is client-driven, with an desire to deliver the best possible experience for the clientThirst for innovation and a penchant for collaboration and a desire to gain a deep understanding of products and processesResults-driven, strategic analytical thinker with strong problem-solving skillsDisciplined, well-organized, detail-oriented team leaderSystematic, with high-quality standards – able to understand and operate within existing systems and processes, while being able to build new processes to meet organizational needsPractical thinker, with strong critical reasoning skills – a calculated risk-takerMotivated by a fast-paced working environment, with a drive to exceed preset deadlines while maintaining high qualityGreat judgment with decisive evidence-based reasoningPatient (but not too patient), yet assertive leadership styleHigh personal accountability and the ability to hold others accountableEager to “get hands dirty” and dive into projectsValues individual differences and appreciates diversity of thought and backgroundsAble to turn ambiguity into action The QualificationsProject management skills, with a proven track recordAbility to program manage multiple complex learning projects simultaneously.Monitors activity, progress, and time related to project development using a project planning tool.Previous customer service, account management or project coordinator experienceImpeccable customer service delivery, with a proven track recordExperience in an education or technology organization is a plusPatient survey experience preferred but not requiredHealthcare IT experience preferred but not requiredBachelor’s degree preferred; equivalent combination of education and work experience, comparable work experience.  Preferrably lives in Charlotte, NC or Raleigh, NC ",Patient Experience Project Manager Job in Raleigh,Full Time,"Raleigh, NC",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-experience-project-manager-job-raleigh-nc-us-167630742.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f228a61a6640d738504ec82f0f25373c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:50:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Since the first FORCE project in 1946, Force Construction Company, Inc. has been guided by a commitment to providing our clients with quality construction services.  The ability to successfully meet each project’s functional, budgetary and time considerations is what established and has maintained FORCE’s leadership position in the construction industry.  Proudly serving our clients as a full-service general contractor, our professional staff members work in partnership with our clients, which has earned FORCE our reputation as a dynamic construction firm.  New staff members are drawn to FORCE because of our commitment and reputation in the construction industry, and they stay because of FORCE’s commitment to our staff members.  We are proud to offer competitive wages and great benefits.  We rely heavily on, and invest significantly in the success of our professional team, and promote a work environment that is collaborative, as well as stimulating and challenging.   Position Overview:The qualified candidate will be located at our Columbus, Indiana office, and responsible for reviewing project drawings and/or travelling to project site to determine scope of work and time constraints of the project.  They will prepare & submit take-offs and estimate site projects.  The qualified candidate will review bids from and work with a wide range of subcontractors and suppliers.  They will participate in pre-bid and bid review meetings, as required.  Upon award of the project, this position will work with Project Manager and other personnel to develop the initial project schedule, budget and sequence of work. Job Requirements:·         4-year engineering or construction management degree or equivalent technical training and/or experience·         At least 3+ years of construction site estimating experience·         Working, practiced knowledge of site estimating techniques and cost control.·         Highly motivated self-starter, with strong organizational skills·         Ability to read and interpret proposal specs and drawings to conceptualize the project·         High level of accuracy and attention to detail, as well as strong mathematical and analytical skills·         Skilled in oral and written communications·         Ability to work well with diverse personalities and levels of experience·         Valid driver’s license and ability to drive a motorized vehicle·         Strong sense of personal integrity and high ethical standards·         Knowledge of HCSS Heavy Bid, MC2, Trimble Business Center and Viewpoint Construction Software, a plus·         Ability to work under pressure of tight deadlines, and handle a fast-paced environmentEOE   M/F/V/D",Site Estimator Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, IN 47201",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/site-estimator-job-columbus-in-us-167812420.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),053e524e23f79e86c2638080c6145926
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:43:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Program Coordinator - ​Organizational Consultant 4 Seeking a qualified individual to serve as a Program Coordinator within the Financial Services Integration Program.  The Program Coordinator will be responsible for coordination and communication of activities, resources,equipment and information. The projects encompassing this program include business technology upgrades and implementations.  The program will involve alignment of staff functions, updating of policies and procedures and communications and change management.  The success of this program will result in transforming the current disparate operations and technologies of the multiple entities of Heath Center, Hospitals, Faculty Practice and Clinics into an integrated organization with common tools, processes and shared services. The Program Coordinator will play a key role on the Financial Services Integration team and the Program Management Office (PMO).  The Program Coordinator will be required to manage scheduling and communication between projects and team members, and serve as communication team leader in driving all communication deliverables and developing an appropriate communication strategy/plan.  The Program Coordinator will be expected to provide program deliverables persistently and professionally, assuming accountability for all program results.  The Program Coordinator will be expected to apply his/her own subject-matter expertise and/or knowledge and execute the work independently, with minimal supervision.Key Responsibilities:Manages scheduling and communication between projects and team members, coordinates materials and resources, produces reports, updates and project documentationWorking with PMO, develops program and project schedules, making certain that all scheduling conflicts are resolve with routine updates with the Program ManagerServe as the communications team leader, driving all communication deliverables, coordinating resources between departments, and addressing unforeseen questions or challenges with research and problem resolutionAssist the program manager in drafting and issuance of project proposals, RFP’s, budgets, and preliminary schedulesKeep the Program Manager and others informed about project status and issues that may impact overall project success, effectively and accurately communicating relevant project informationResponsible for working with PMO and all project managers to develop an appropriate communication strategy/plan, create the necessary change-focused communications, work with PMO and project teams to develop messaging points, and  to oversee execution of the communications in the applicable vehiclesUse project scheduling and control tools to monitor project plans, work hours, budgets and expendituresAttend project meetings, assist with determination of project requirements and distribute minutes to all project team members, in a timely mannerPrepare project organization and communication chartsCommunicate ideas for improving processes with a positive and constructive attitude, and for developing this attitude in othersRequirements:4-6 years of experience in communications or financial project management, managing multiple projects at one timeExperience with project management methodologies and change management processes, procedures and their applicationStrong writing, editing, proofreading, layout and design, professional printing/publishing skills are essential, including ability to present concepts verballyMust possess excellent organizational and planning skillsDemonstrated ability to work independently and as part of a collaborative, geographically dispersed teamExcellent communication skills (verbal and written) and strong analytical and problem solving skillsExcellent MS Word, Excel and PowerPoint skillsBachelor's Degree in Finance or other related field, or MBA preferredThe flexibility to orient and work at any and all Medical Center locations is required$70-$85 Per Hour, depending on experience       San Francisco CA  94103       2 Month Assignment",Program Coordinator Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94103",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/program-coordinator-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167764661.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,70.00 - 85.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),ea60d6c8f3c2bdb29b0eb2c0c9cb3bae
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:37:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Agile Project Manager will manage application development by performing the role of an Agile Scrum Master. The incumbent will have a passion for the Agile methodology and serve as a champion to effectively utilize it. This position will be responsible for all aspects of managing development via Scrum, including facilitating planning meetings, conducting daily stand-ups, and ensuring methodology is followed. Job Responsibilities:Identify and estimate project resources, schedule delivery, and task details.Work closely with the Product Owner and Business Analyst to ensure development is completed per expectations.Lead a team of onshore developers utilizing the Agile Scrum Development methodology.Work closely with the Business Analyst and application developers ensuring proper definition of user stories/acceptance criteria.Perform updates/maintain Agile development tracking tool.Provide development metrics as well as conducting all relevant Agile ceremonies.Budget for and manage project costs.Manage business partner and supplier involvement throughout project.Manage change, project deliverables, and project direction while adhering to the company's standard project management methodology.Required Experience:Bachelor's degree with a technical focus or equivalent training.5-7 years of progressively responsible job-related experience in project management (must be professional experience).Proven record delivering software development utilizing the Agile Scrum methodology and related tools and techniques (2-3 years’ professional experience).  Experience with Agile Project Management tool(s) such as Rally, Target Process, etc.Scrum Master Certification. Training in project management or project management related skills, such as Young & Clark and Associates or Project Management Institute’s PMP certification.Proven experience with project management concepts, including project charters, scheduling and planning projects within Primavera or experience or training using tools to manage projects, such as Microsoft Project or Excel.Required Skills:Strong verbal and written communication skills, problem solving skills, organizational, customer service and interpersonal skills.Basic ability to work independently and manage one's time as well as be a collaborative team member.Proven ability to work with Enterprise-wide program managers and project leads.Strong project leadership and decision-making skills.Business planning/processes, accounting, and change management acumen. Ability to thrive in a fast paced, highly dynamic environment.Strong communication, organization, and planning skills.Focus on metrics and process improvement.Desired:Experience with Microsoft's Visual Studio application.Experience working in a DevOps environment.Project Management Institute’s PMP certification or equivalent.Previous application development experience. ",IT Project Manager Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, IL 61571",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/it-project-manager-job-washington-il-us-167352612.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0aab2a511a868beca51b8f0bf6d58d09
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:37:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title Digital Marketing Specialist Auto req ID 5798BR City Salt Lake City State Utah Job Category Marketing Employment Status Full-Time Job Description At Extra Space Storage, if it matters to you, it matters to us! It is a really exciting time to be at Extra Space Storage! We got our start in 1977. Today we are a New York Stock Exchange-traded company leading the self-storage industry in more ways than one. But in order to maintain this lead, we need exceptionally motivated, capable, and driven people like you. We offer a fast-paced collaborative environment where each of us directly contributes to the company’s success. Come join us and find out why so many of our employees recommend us as great place to work. We’re currently hiring for a Digital Marketing Specialist for our corporate offices in Salt Lake City, UT who will be responsible for moving forward interactive marketing strategies by managing internal and external partnerships. The incumbent will have a passion for data that will guide their decisions and objectives. You will be essential to ensure Extra Space Storage maintains a leading and competitive presence in the interactive marketing landscape. External Requirements A Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university A full working knowledge of MS Office suite with two to three years of internet marketing experience preferred Expert knowledge of Excel including macros, pivot tables, vlookups, charts and graphs as well as demonstrated ability to present data insights to a larger audience for actionable business results 1-2 years of experience with Google AdWords and/or GDN Experience with 3rd party bid optimization tools (Marin, Kenshoo, Doubleclick) a plus Knowledge of SAP, SPSS and SQL a plus Experience with Google Analytics and/or Adobe Site Catalyst a plus. Experience working with marketing metrics and programs Strong understanding of interactive marketing channels Carries working knowledge of standard campaign management and measurement strategies Proven ability to work in a fast-paced environment, and to meet changing deadlines and priorities on multiple simultaneous projects Ability to create a positive and professional business relationship with internal and external clients External Responsibilities Drive our growing Display, Retargeting, and Social Media Acquisition programs. Manage current Lead Gen partnerships. Evaluate and implement new partnerships and advertising opportunities. Analyze performance of strategic marketing campaigns to acquire new consumers and forecast objectives Evaluate return on asset investment and performance of media mix within specific market segments Analyze consumer behavior and response to investment and creative messages Recommend actions to improve campaign performance using data-driven insights Collaborate with other areas of marketing, (SEO, Email, & Social) to implement and improve marketing performance aligned with company-wide initiatives Design, conduct and evaluate testing scenarios Help implement tracking and measurement approaches to effectively support programs. We pride ourselves on hiring top talent and provide you the following benefits and more: Well defined career paths Qualify for Medical, Dental, and Vision benefits on Day 1 Health Savings Account (HSA) or Flexible Spending (FSA) Company paid Life, AD&D, and Short & Long Term Disability 401K with company match after 90 days of service Holiday pay and paid time off Extensive Wellness Program and various Employee Discount Programs Personal Health Advocate Free soda, coffee, and drinks all day every day and much, much more!  We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",Digital Marketing Specialist Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,"Salt Lake City, UT",,http://jobview.monster.com/digital-marketing-specialist-job-salt-lake-city-ut-us-167310900.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=18,,,ac77db3acdf544035c544ca746386bdd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:19:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Take your career to the next level finding creative solutions for interesting clients.If you've ever wondered how radio stations keep noise from ruining their productions, how industrial facilities maintain the quiet of a neighborhood or how it would feel to work for some of the hottest names in video production, this specialist Project Manager role for door products could be the opportunity you've been waiting for.Put your commercial door, frame, and hardware experience to use as a subject matter expert and take your career to the next level managing interesting projects for a strong niche player serving an exciting list of clients. As our Project Manager for specialty high level sound control doors, you'll use your aptitude for computers, mechanical components and an appreciation of remarkable acoustic environments to work across a wide range of fields for a variety of companies. It will take creativity and an engineering mindset to come up with expert solutions to interesting acoustic challenges. Apply today to fill this key role that offers stability and growth paired with the close-knit atmosphere of a small company.To be a good fit for this Project Manager -- Door Products opportunity you should have:2+ years of experience in commercial door, frame and hardware purchasing and/or sales; while ideal candidates will have door experience, we'll also consider candidates with experience in direct trade, project management, or estimating in other trades or general constructionBasic working knowledge of AutoCAD, Revit, or a similar CAD systemWorking competency in Microsoft Office (Word and Excel) and Adobe AcrobatTrade experience with framing, drywall, insulation, acoustical tile/t-bar, field experience also helpful You'll need a valid driver's license and reliable transportation to travel, no more than 5-10% of your time, primarily in California within a day's drive, though there may be occasional out-of-state travel for particular projects.A basic qualification for this role is legal authorization to work permanently in the U.S. for any employer without requiring a Visa transfer or Visa sponsorship.For over 50 years, Pacific Sound Control has supplied the best value in sound control to the Southern California construction industry. Our work ranges across industries such as radio/entertainment, water treatment, military, schools, libraries, police, fire stations and more. Our quality focus is deliberate and we believe that quality is what makes us stand out from our competition.EOE/AA/M/F/Vets/Disabled",Project Manager -- Door Products Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95101",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-door-products-job-san-jose-ca-us-167194562.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),46e29538e8e7e7ffc1d898de90fa966f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:15:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"NLD Group is now hiring Entry Level Marketing Account Managers and Marketing Manager Trainees. Do you have a college degree but little to no experience? Do you have extensive marketing and sales experience but no college degree? NLG Group is willing to train motivated, hard working individuals that want an opportunity to work in a positive, team environment and have the potential to have unlimited growth potential financially and professionally.Benefits: Full time position Entry Level training -- business management - sales - marketing - communication Leadership training -- interviewing - training - team development - public speaking Fun, team environment Weekly and monthly bonuses and incentives (cash, tropical trips, cruises, gift cards, suits) Promotions only from within and merit based Entry level business to branch management trainingQualifications: Motivated and ambitious Attire business professional Student Mentality Enjoy face to face interaction Thrive in a fast pace, team environment Push to surpass goals Integrity     For immediate consideration contact Becca @ 267.900.5494",Entry Level Marketing Position Job in Manayunk,Full Time,"Manayunk, PA 19127",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-marketing-position-job-manayunk-pa-us-162327763.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=18,,,e62414f3173f03b689ccf20f7d8ce37f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:14:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Gallery and Marketing Coordinator: Responsible for operation of gallery, and for marketing LARACs programs and activities. BA-BS-BFA and experience in gallery and marketing required. Full-time. Cover letter and resume to: director@larac.org",Gallery and Marketing Coordinator Job in Glens Falls,Full Time,"Glens Falls, NY 12801",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/gallery-marketing-coordinator-job-glens-falls-ny-us-167064438.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=17,,,aaa82b16c598c906915bfde93825c772
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:09:00:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is actively recruiting candidates for the position of Assistant Manager, Communications and Design, reporting to the Senior Manager, Strategic Communications. This position is responsible for supporting the Senior Manager, Strategic Communications in all efforts including cross-program branding cohesion, press and media inquiries, communications content development, and web and social media presence.  Demonstrated expertise is required in areas including leadership, presentation skills, brand management, and media and press relations.  Ideal candidates will also possess a strong background in graphic design and be capable of working independently.Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Media and Public RelationsTriage media and press inquiries based on priorityAssist with overall media and press communications strategyPlay a central role in drafting, coordination, and publication of press releasesResearch and draft responses to media inquiries to be reviewed and submitted on behalf of C-suite executivesHelp manage the flow of news about the organization to the mediaSupport Senior Manager, Strategic Communications in managing working relationship with contracted public relations firmBranding, Communications, and Content DevelopmentAssist content and branding of official publications and marketing collateralCurate custom presentations based on the interests of specific stakeholder groups and maintain a core set of up-to-date presentations for use by the companyEnsure consistency and quality of communications brand across companyDevelop templates and style guidelines for communications in all departmentsLead upkeep of online presence including websites and social media and assist with strategy and prioritization of major changes and upgradesEnsure the company protects and promotes its image in a proper, coordinated, and consistent mannerPosition Requirements:Bachelors’ degree3-5 years of experience in communications; corporate or non-profitExceptional written and verbal communication skills, including the ability to communicate and present to C-suiteAbility to function independently with little guidance and to complete projects in accordance with set timelinesBackground in graphic design and company branding",Assistant Mgr./Communications & Design Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL 60642",,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-mgr-communications-design-job-chicago-il-us-166077981.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d402740566b0e20055f5cd6c900dfe2f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:07:56:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summer Intern RAMJob Function: SalesPrimary Location:  USSchedule:Part-timeJob Type: TempSalary: $15.00 per hourPosting Date:  Job Description Build and maintain ABI product displays.Rotate and stock shelf and displays in all accounts with ABI products.Pull-up and maintain existing POS.Installation of permanent and paper point of sale in retail accounts.Responsible for daily paperwork and the proper completion of all Company documents.Report out of stocks and take note of items consistently out of stock.Take pictures of all beer displays in the accountResponsible for any other tasks deemed necessary by the Key Account Manager.Responsible for participating in weekly conference calls with the KAM and Sales Director Job Qualifications Must be at least 21 years of age.Bachelor's degree in progress.Valid Drivers License required.Must be able to work weekends and holidays.Must be willing to work pre-Memorial Day thru pre-Labor Day or up to Labor DayBeverage experience preferred.Ability to handle multiple tasks at one time.Good oral and written communications skills.Able to lift, load, unload and move product weighing up to 50 lbs. as well hang merchandise materials.Be able and willing to work flexible hours, including nights, weekends, and/or holidays.  ",Summer Marketing Internship Job in Columbus,Part Time Intern,"Columbus, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/summer-marketing-internship-job-columbus-oh-us-167074204.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=11,0.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Marketing/Product,c83fe0d1f4cf4fa947910e7bd3de3563
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:07:06:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Event Promotions: Marketing / Advertising / Public Relations Entry Level MarketingEvent PromotionsAdvertising Positions Gulf Coast Events, Inc. is a consistently growing company based in Houston that provides dynamic marketing, advertising and consulting services to large national companies and corporations. We identify and develop new stream of revenue for clients through on-site promotions, innovative marketing strategies and advertising campaigns. We create and execute these campaigns to each clients researched target market. Due to our successes, we have recently taken on new clients to our portfolio. This success and expansion has opened 5 new positions that are available immediately!We are looking for people who we will aid in the development of each new client and increase productivity in multiple divisions.  Our management training program uses a hands on approach that will challenge our team to learn marketing, advertising, sales, public relations and management. We provide a setting that will broaden experiences while promoting self-confidence, accomplishment and maturity. In just a short amount of time, entry-level candidates will have the opportunity to work with several difference clients as well as the management team. We are looking for candidates with various backgrounds, but the following majors or work backgrounds will be considered first: *Marketing*Management*Public Relations*Sports Management*Advertising*Communications*Cosmetic backgrounds*Fashion experience*Event Planning / Coordination Requirements -You must actually be ENTRY LEVEL (less than 5 years experience and willingness to learn) -You must possess great people skills. -You must demonstrate excellent work ethic and a ""coachable"" demeanor. -You must have a positive business attitude, like the rest of our enthusiastic staff. -You must be confident you'll be successful, just waiting for a career opportunity where you can prove  yourself. We will be reviewing all resumes, and the most qualified candidates will be contacted within the next week for a preliminary interview. Good Luck!       ",Event Promotions: Marketing / Advertising / Public Relations Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77057",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/event-promotions-marketing-advertising-public-relations-job-houston-tx-us-167082447.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=7,,Marketing/Product,77cf8c33a5b36fc2ff18a280802c5811
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:07:06:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"NO C2C FOR THIS REQUIREMENT Our LARGE and stable client located in Cincinnati, OH is looking to onboard Mid-Sr. Level ETL Developers for a Permanent Position!We are searching for talented ETL Developers to help design solutions that revolutionize how customers interact with their mission-critical data warehouse applications, and how these applications perform in enterprise environments. Salary Range: $100,000 - $120,000 + Low Cost Health, Dental, Vision, 401k Benefits RESPONSIBILITIES:Develop and maintain DWH (data warehouse) and ETL (extract, transform and load) solutions using DataStage, JCL, Shell, Bash, and REXXMonitor the performance of new and existing ETL applications to ensure appropriate performance, to correct errors, to isolate areas for improvement, and for general debugging.Critically analyze test results to correctly align development efforts with problem areas.Assist in the preparation and documentation of software requirements and specifications, as they relate to the DWH.Provide accurate time estimates and status reports to project management as required.Work with database administrators, network administrators, systems analysts, and software engineers to help resolve problems with ETL and DWH applications.REQUIREMENTS:3+ years of experience in database development, with an emphasis on DWH methodologies and technologies.3+ years of experience in an industry-standard ETL tool (SAP DI / Informatica / SSIS / Data Stage).Knowledge of waterfall and rapid-application-development software development life cycles.Exposure to DataStageStrong SQL, Shell, Bash, and JCL scripting experience For Immediate consideration please send an updated MS word version of your resume to emily.reno@principlesolutions.comKeywords: Informatica, ETL, Extract, Extraction, Transformation, Load, Loading, data warehouse, data warehousing, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS, application, development, developing, developed, develop, app, database, SAP, Datastage, Microstrategy, Business Intelligence",ETL Developer Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH 45242",,http://jobview.monster.com/etl-developer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-166169220.aspx?mescoid=1500143001001&jobPosition=17,,,c75d22f1a8affe57781255d634d422ec
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:07:00:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Faith Church Office ManagerPosition Focus Sheet Reports to:      Church AdministratorWork hours:   32 hours/week – Monday - Thursday – 8:00 AM - 5:00 PM with 1 hour for lunch Relates closely with:      Pastors, Worship Director, Technical Ministry Coordinator, Church Administrator, Facility Coordinator, Ministry Associate(s), Office Volunteers Purpose:   To oversee the workings of the church office, operation of the church membership management database system, and administrative support of pastors and directors. Responsibilities:Order office suppliesMaintain office machinery and order suppliesReceptionistGet daily mail and distributeTake staff meeting notes, staff schedules and distribute weeklyAdministrative support for pastors and directors such as but not limited to:membership, child dedications, baptismsprayer ministry/chainCommunication link to Convey MediaPrint and prepare provided weekly bulletin, posters, and flyersSubmit volunteer communication requestsOversee Fellowship One databaseBe intimately familiar with how data is entered and stored.  This includes overseeing data consistency/integrity in regard to how existing data is entered and how new information should be captured.Act as the point person for proactively updating attendee status changes and life events (births, deaths, marriages, household splits, etc) as well as other ongoing maintenance tasks.Be proficient in running reports to help ministries extract information.  Many reports are generated in a spreadsheet format, so Microsoft Excel skills are required for some advanced reporting.Work with ministry areas to maximize the system's usefulness to those ministries and making recommendations for efficient use of the system by all staff members.Act as the first point of contact for staff members in need of assistance using the church management system.Oversee church calendar systemInterface with Ministries and Third Parties (such as home school groups)Ordering booksOccasional technical supportAnswer phones in rotation as neededOther duties as assigned Required Strengths/Gifts:·         Excellent organizational skills with ability to prioritize/delegate workload·         Good working knowledge of church, attendees, policies, procedures, and office systems·         Careful attention to detail·         Excellent computer skills (Experience with Microsoft Office, Adobe Creative Suite a plus)·         People skills·         Willingness/ability to learn new skills and updated procedures·         Flexibility in working with staff and volunteers Additional Characteristics:·         Agreement with Faith Church’s Statement of Faith·         Agreement with Faith Church’s Core Beliefs document·         Able to explain personal Christian faith and practice·         Models Christian lifestyle and principles",Office Manager Job in Milford,Part Time,"Milford, OH 45150",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-job-milford-oh-us-168094000.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=3,Per experience,,c8fc62de512960687eac158a97c9b818
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:06:36:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Instructional Designer needed for a contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in Atlanta, GA.The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess:BS in Scientific & Technical Communications, Business Communications, Business Administration or relevant work experience.Three (3) - Five (5) years relevant work experience in an instructional designer roleWhat You'll Be Doing:Will be responsible for applying best practice training content design and development knowledge, skills, tools, and techniques to develop blended-trainingResponsible for developing curriculumWill design and develop course for online and ILT deliveryDesign and develop train-the-trainer workshop materialsAnalyzing, gathering, and document training requirements to identify curriculum objectives and desired outcomesWhat You Need to Bring to the Table:Minimum of three years' experience designing and developing training materials for enterprise-wide softwareProven ability to meet project deadlinesAbility to understand and analyze complex business processesExperience in instructional design, adult learning theory, interviewing, and communicationsIntermediate to expert proficiency using Oracle UPK to develop and publish e- learning courses, job aids, user guides, and knowledge checksProven ability to work at the direction of a lead person, but also possess independent thinking and creative thinking skills.Get Hired, Apply Now!Recruiter: KatelynPhone Number: 314.275.1229Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here!Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process.",Instructional Designer  Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer SoftwareEducationComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/instructional-designer-464424-job-atlanta-ga-us-178005144.aspx?mescoid=2500399001001&jobPosition=14,,Creative/Design,f49b565a5dfe3b71c1026a076a66bf0a
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:06:36:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description   Are you interested in the opportunity to work for an industry-leading company whose work with cutting-edge technology is driven by something human: the lives our technology protects?  If so, Northrop Grumman may be the place for you.  It’s not the systems that drive us: it’s the soldier our systems bring home. It’s not just the equipment that motivates us: it’s the people our equipment protects. It’s not the innovation that gets us up in the morning: it’s whom those innovations serve. We’re united by our work to help people and protect the world. And that mission makes our team even stronger.  When you join Northrop Grumman, you’ll have the opportunity to connect with coworkers in an environment that’s uniquely caring, diverse, and respectful. Employees share experiences, insights, perspectives, and creative solutions with some of the best minds in the industry. We collaborate through integrated product teams, cross-functional teams, and employee resource groups, while thriving through the support of training and development, mentors and every day coaching, along with extensive health and work/life benefits. We’re committed to our employees’ professional and personal development and success. Northrop Grumman recruits top talent with traditional and non-traditional backgrounds in order to ensure our team is united, connected, skilled, focused and innovative. An inclusive workplace of people with diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives is the key to our performance. At Northrop Grumman, we want our employees to bring their whole self to work.  All your different sides are welcome here, as we believe they make our team, our products and our services, that much better. Roles and Responsibilities: The qualified applicant will provide expertise in applicable public health disciplines: 1.       Support HAI Prevention Implementation activity, working with and assisting a multidisciplinary team of epidemiologists, statisticians, health educators, medical officers, behavioral scientists, and subject matter experts 2.       Maintain and update technical content of protocols, instructions, and other documents for HAI prevention implementation projects including but not limited to measurement instruments, implementation guidance, and Human Subjects/IRB materials 3.       Perform data entry, cleaning, and analysis (both qualitative and quantitative) from multiple data sources including but not limited to surveys, focus groups/interviews, and surveillance systems 4.       Oversee the design, management, and use of databases for process reporting, outcomes, and other areas of evaluation 5.       Develop and prepare data summaries, feedback reports, and presentations for partners 6.       Develop implementation and assessment tools as well as provide training, technical assistance, and user support to health departments, healthcare facilities, and other partners participating in HAI prevention implementation projects 7.       Confer with and represent the assigned program and division in meetings with offices within CDC, grantees, and external partners to foster collaborative working relationships to the benefit of the program     Qualifications   Basic Qualifications: To be considered for this position, you must minimally meet the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed below: ·         Master’s degree in Public Health with a focus on Statistics, Epidemiology, or a related field with a minimum of 1 year of experience. ·         3 years of experience in epidemiology and/or statistics in a public health agency or research setting. ·         Proficiency in statistical analysis and database management using statistical programs (e.g., SAS) and database software (e.g., Excel, Access). ·         Strong attention to detail. ·         Ability to work both independently and collaboratively on a team. ·         Strong oral and written communication skills.   Preferred Qualifications: ·         Experience in areas of healthcare such as infection prevention, infectious diseases, and/or healthcare epidemiology       Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",HAI Prevention Data Analyst Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/hai-prevention-data-analyst-job-atlanta-ga-us-177893536.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,4ec8f3710926259757a74bf3e4290a77
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:06:36:01,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  99428 Georgia Masonry Supply is a division of the Oldcastle Architectural Products Group (APG). APG is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Essential Duties and Responsibilities Load and unload products on dump trucks or flatbed trucks with MoffettUnload multiple stop loadsUnderstand proper placement of materials at jobsiteIdentify different types and sizes of materialAssist customers and outside vendors with any issues (i.e. matching materials and quantities)Keep assigned equipment in proper working condition/clean at all timesDaily maintenance check sheet; report any concerns to his/ her supervisorPerform other work-related duties as assignedOther duties may be assigned to meet business needs Qualifications / Requirements CDL Class A License with 2 plus years of commercial driving experienceMust have Moffett ExperienceAbility to drive dump truck and straight truck with MoffettPrevious flatbed and dump truck experience requiredCertificate of driving school trainingMust have acceptable driving record throughout employment (driving record changes/ updates will be monitored annually)Detailed orientedAble to work in team environmentMust be able to complete all required paperwork for job site assignmentsMeet the DOT federal regulations for certification annuallyCommunicate effectively, both verbally and in writing, with superiors, colleagues, and individuals inside and outside the Company Physical Requirements Must be able to sit, bend, walk, and climb in and out of trucks and Moffett in an outdoor setting for up to 8 plus hours a day Preferences Prior forklift experience highly desirable What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs  About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Georgia Masonry Supply is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Georgia Masonry Supply is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.   ",Truck Driver / CDL A / Home Nightly - Conley,Full Time Employee,"Conley, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-home-nightly-conley-ga-job-conley-ga-us-177362496.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=8,,,3f046e7257bff1341f84cf6e1f803dfd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:06:30:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Skilled Nursing Facility is seeking RNs, LPNs and CNAs for all shifts. Experience in long term care preferred, however, we will train appropiate applicants. We are seeking RNs for Staff Development and Nursing Supervisors. Interested candidates may contact the facility at 770 498-4144 or send resume via fax to 770-498-4255 or via email to coeur@brnh.net Report",Rosemont At Stone Mountain Job Application for RNs,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name See Ad,All,http://jobview.monster.com/rns-lpns-cnas-job-stone-mountain-ga-us-177957297.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=5,,,b4bb3feb0c24fd86530f3ede976bd35c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:06:29:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENERAL DESCRIPTIONIs responsible for all phases of facility storage and shipping operations in a safe and efficient manner. Responsible for supervision of Finished / Raw Material Product Handlers assigned to shift. RESPONSIBILITIESï€­ Overseeing the Material Handlers on their shiftï€­ Maintains and adheres to work instructions for activities such as verification of incoming and outgoing shipments, handling and disposition of materials, and keeping warehouse inventory currentï€­ Provide for movement and storage of all finished / raw products.ï€­ Establishes and maintains FIFO system of inventory as required by customer with consideration for all products stored at all warehouses.ï€­ Responsible for cycle counting of assigned areas. ï€­ Responsible for the accuracy of transactions and product movement.ï€­ Responsible for removing goods from production lines and storing in planned locationsï€­ Ensure all shipments both inbound and outbound are accurate ï€­ Responsible for maintaining ISO standardsï€­ Maintains communication between shiftsï€­ Insures proper staffing to meet daily requirementsï€­ Provides instruction to shuttle drivers regarding transfers to outside warehousesï€­ Coordination of warehouse activities with activities of other functions such as conversion, administration, quality, sales, purchasing, scheduling, and delivery.ï€­ Other duties as assignedREQUIREMENTSï€­ Team oriented.ï€­ Must have flexibility of job assignments.ï€­ Must have strong communication skills.ï€­ 3 to 5 years prior related work experience or demonstrated leadership abilities.ï€­ Strong computer skills.ï€­ Self-motivated.PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENTThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.ï€­ Able to operate a sit-down forklift on a continuous basis; up to 100% of the time.ï€­ Physical effort required, continuous mental and visual attention requiredï€­ Lift up to 40 lbs.ï€­ Walk up stairsï€­ Manual dexterityï€­ Exposed to dust, odors, oil and noiseï€­ Required to stand and move about the facilityï€­ Overtime required per schedule, 7-day week operationhttps://loopapply.com/apply/62/E6BBBEBAF63F35F18E2B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Warehouse Team Lead Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-team-lead-job-atlanta-ga-us-177227018.aspx?mescoid=5301033001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,066d16b84e25081d58edecc2fdfe7d33
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:06:10:38,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  94448Non-Exempt  Oldcastle Precast is the leading manufacturer of precast concrete, polymer concrete, and plastic products in the United States. Our products range from utility vaults, reinforced concrete pipe, catch basins, drainage and septic tanks, to retaining walls, storm shelters, wall panels, concrete barriers, a variety of prestressed concrete products and more.   With more than 80 locations nationwide and 3,000 plus employees, Oldcastle Precast is committed to upholding core values of reliability, quality, and service in cutting edge ways.  Job Description Summary The Precast Concrete Team Lead is responsible for leading and supervising a team of Process Technicians in accordance with the vision and values of the corporation.  Model and demonstrate a “Culture of Safety” for their team and all employees.  Ensure team adheres to the production plan (daily/weekly) to meet delivery schedules and efficiency expectations.  Follow the predictive/preventative maintenance plans for their area of responsibility.  Hold team accountable for adherence to standards, policies & regulations.  Participate in continuous improvement initiatives that affect their area or cross functional areas.  Actively participates in training and development.Position ResponsibilitiesEssential Duties include, but are not limited to the following: Manage application of overall safety initiatives for their team, including: daily morning safety training/message, morning stretches, daily PPE inspections & equipment inspections, reporting all safety concerns through the proper channels in the organization and taking appropriate corrective action for all safety related issues in their area of responsibilityCommunicate and implement the area work schedule to their team, including: Reviewing the previous days production results, planning and organizing tasks for each team member (drawings, specific work related tasks, assembly of parts, identifying and correcting hazards related to the tasks) detail and assign work tasks on the ""white board"", capture & report-out the following (safety hazards identified, process delay, quality issues, opportunities for process improvement, etc.)Accurately read and interpret drawings to assemble and produce quality precast concrete structures to customer specificationTeach and train Process Technicians to safely and efficiently utilize tools and processes to assemble concrete structures in a precast operationPerform daily duties of a Process Technician (strip, set-up, pour, housekeeping, etc.)Participate in weekly planning meetings to review upcoming production schedule details and properly prepare his team's tasks and resource needsPerform Lockout Tagout (LOTO) in conformance with company and OSHA regulationsAssist in the corrective action/progressive disciplinary process for all process techsOther duties as necessaryEducation / Experience 5+ years in a Concrete field highly preferablePrevious supervisory experience preferredHigh School Diploma, Associates Degree or equivalent preferredKnowledge/Skills/Ability Knowledge of precast manufacturing process and improvement processFamiliarity with correct application of systems and processes that ensures continuous improvement (safety, maintenance, quality and manufacturing)Understanding of safety and environmental requirementsLeadership skills; ability to lead meetings and teamsGood analytical skillsGood organizational, motivational skillsDemonstrated written / oral communication skillsAbility to define, delegate and follow-up on assigned tasksAbility to effectively manage time and resourcesAbility to effectively communicate, verbally and in writingAbility to motivate direct reportsAbility to interface with peersAbility to operate computer and supporting softwareSpecial Tools and Equipment Overhead Crane operation/riggingHand tools (hammer, saw, chisel, pliers, tape measure)Portable power tools (grinder, air chisel, hand saws, wire-guns, port-a-power jacks, crimpers, table saw, drill, stinger, etc.)Arc WeldingForklift operation Work Environment Industrial Plant environmentFrequent walking/standing (6+ hrs./day)Frequent lifting (up to 10 lbs.)Infrequent lifting (up to 25 lbs.)Max lift (up to 40 lbs.)Frequent climbing of ladders  What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America's largest corporations.  We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family.  Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle Precast is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle Precast is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Precast Concrete Team Leader - Stone Mountain,Full Time Employee,"Stone Mountain, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/precast-concrete-team-leader-stone-mountain-ga-job-stone-mountain-ga-us-177361618.aspx?mescoid=4700797001001&jobPosition=18,,,6e329376905bf9acaa85e67660ff2053
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:05:56:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENERAL DESCRIPTIONResponsible for ensuring that production plans are executed, must be active in organizing and controlling the blow molding and auxiliary departments. Ensures completion of preventative maintenance as outlined by machine specifications and guidelines. Has knowledge of various production orders; and ensures that all products meet customer specifications. Responsible for maintaining clean, safe work environment. Responsible for planning and maintaining housekeeping procedures.RESPONSIBILITIESï€­ Works with site schedulers and cell leaders to plans production schedules, establishing priorities and sequences for manufacturing products. Develops plans for efficient use of materials, machines, and associates. ï€­ Ensures products are in accordance with customer specified requirements, identifies areas in the process for improvements, leads or directs process improvement teams. ï€­ Reports on the effectiveness and performance of the production activities to the Site Manager and Site Steering Team. ï€­ Informs Conversion Manager of any changes in production. ï€­ Meets with Cell Leaders to discuss improvements and work with teams to complete root cause analysis on issues identified in the process. ï€­ Ensures that the Site Quality and Food Safety Policy, Operational Procedures and High Standards of Workmanship are maintained at all times. ï€­ Ensures that heldware inventory is managed to ensure that plant targets are achieved. ï€­ Converses with Blow molding cell leaders to prioritize work to be completed on their lines. ï€­ Resolves machinery and quality problems in the conversion department. ï€­ Responsible for maintaining a high level of motivation. ï€­ Housekeeping and safety. ï€­ Responsible for maintaining ISO standards in the conversion department. ï€­ Member of the Site Steering Team. ï€­ Responsible for reporting food safety issues to personnel with authority to initiate action.ï€­ Initiate action for food safety issues.ï€­ All other duties as assigned.REQUIREMENTSï€­ A (B.A. or B.S.) in Industrial Technology or related field, with emphasis on plastics and / or related experience. ï€­ Team oriented. ï€­ Self - Motivation and flexibility of job assignments. ï€­ Blend of technical, interpersonal skills. ï€­ Must possess strong leadership skills. ï€­ Strong interpersonal and written communication skills. ï€­ Must be able to build a strong working relationship with employees on shop floor.PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENTThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.ï€­ Individuals may need to sit or stand as needed. Requires walking primarily on a level surface for varying periods throughout the day in the Production area. Could involve long periods of Computer work. ï€­ Able to lift 40 lbs. continuously; and able to lift 70 lbs. occasionally with assistance.ï€­ Postural activities include climbing, maneuvering, bending, stooping, kneeling. Crouching, crawling above, under and around machinery, equipment and conveyors continuously throughout entire shift.ï€­ Reaching, handling, touching grasping machine parts, controls, control panels, levers, switches continuously while repairing machines.ï€­ Ability to climb ladders, stairs, platforms and scaffolding to diagnose/troubleshoot machine and equipment occasionally.ï€­ Ability to work in non-permit required confined spaces and at heights of 15' to 20'.ï€­ Physical effort required, continuous mental and visual attention requiredï€­ 7 day a week operation; may require working more than 40 hours.ï€­ The performance of this position includes exposure to the manufacturing areas where certain areas require the use of personal protective equipment (PPE) such as Safety Glasses with Side Shields and Hearing Protection. Primary environment: ambient room temperatures, lighting and traditional office equipment as found in a typical office environment. Required to be able to read documents and computer screens.Note: The responsibilities and tasks outlined in this document are not exhaustive and may change as determined by the needs of the company.https://loopapply.com/apply/62/E6BD63034023CFF18E2B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Production Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/production-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-177367888.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=5,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,5c98eb05a9c04f2c8ca30caae77a123b
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:05:32:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  717091**Currently seeking highly motivated and experienced Financial Services Representative**Apex Systems, the 2nd largest IT staffing company, is seeking a  Financial Services Representative with a focus on insurance services. In addition, there will be appropriate salary compensation as well as additional perks such as: technical training, certification, career development, benefits, weekly pay, and growth potential.**Interested and qualified candidates please send resumes to Hillary at hthrockmorton@apexsystemsinc.com**Job DescriptionCustomer Service Analyst will be responsible for supporting our Advisors by answering inbound calls related to brokerage operations, paperwork requirements, system education and related questions, and explaining policies and procedures set forth by the broker dealer. Topics of requests may include: cashiering, margin, account establishment and maintenance, transfers, commissions, compliance and retirement accounts. You will be required to establish a rapport with the financial professionals in the financial industry.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES • Receive inbound calls from clients who have service related issues. • Create a strong working relationship with Advisors and their assistants. • Educates Advisors where to find on-line information • Process incoming on line requests from Advisors and resolve requests in a timely manner.• Log transactions into CRM system for most inbound calls • Work independently to make decisions regarding resolution of issues. • Pay close attention to detail, process work accurately • Exercise judgment to know when to escalate issues to supervisor or manager • Ability to communicate with other business units within the company to resolve Advisors concerns and issues • Analyze problems and follow through to resolution • Works collaboratively with other business units to assure satisfaction of the needs of our Advisors • Meet quality and production goals • Strong interaction with clearing firm and external vendors on routine brokerage account platform questions. • Assist with other projects as needed • Provide peer to peer training • Keep up to date on changes to industry and business processes.EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE Two to five years related brokerage experience preferred Series 7 license preferred One to three years call center/customer service experience preferred Ability to work well as part of a team. Resourceful, detail oriented ability to multi-task, self starter. Exceptional organizational skills Proficient with windows, Microsoft applications such as Word, Excel, and Outlook. EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",(US)-Customer Service Representative Experienced Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/us-customer-service-representative-experienced-job-atlanta-ga-us-178174977.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),136e6c9a4866162f89e786db2e1ec80b
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:05:30:13,No,jobs.monster.com,Call Center Agent Opening in South Austin!We are looking to add new agents to our growing team!INTERVIEWING IMMEDIATELY!This is a call center environment taking inbound calls and helping people enroll in medical benefits. Compensation: $13.50/HR and $14/HR for bilingual in SpanishHours: Have to be available to work 8am to 6pm Monday-FridayJob Type: Customer Service RepresentativeThe ideal candidate will have the following requirements:* 1 year of Customer Service Experience * Must have a high school diploma or GED* Must be computer literate* Must be able to multi-task* Must have attention to detail* Must be able to remain calm in escalated situations  please email resumes to: viviana.guerrero@lkjordan.com for immediate consideration L.K. Jordan & Associates is an Equal Opportunity Employer ,Customer Service Representative Job in Travis Heights,Full Time Employee,"Travis Heights, TX 78704",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-travis-heights-tx-us-177609444.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,13.50 - 14.00 $ /hour,Customer Support/Client Care,c88b0acf5e06575df99ab72c791b6ea5
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:04:20:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for an exciting new career? Volt Workforce Solutions is looking for candidates to become part of our team. This position is a Technician Repair for an aerospace company. The Shop Technician provides service and repair of mechanical, electronic, and other equipment requiring technical knowledge and expertise, effective diagnostic and repair techniques and procedures related to a wide variety of equipment.DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESThis list of duties and responsibilities is not all-inclusive and may be expanded to include other duties and responsibilities, as management may deem necessary from time to time.• Performs skilled technician work that involves diagnosis, replacement, repair and rebuilding of a variety of equipment, components and/or systems.• Uses diagnostic equipment and a variety of tools specific to the trade. Applies principles and practices of electrical and electronics theory.• Interprets and follows technical manuals, blueprints, mechanical drawings, and schematics. Applies knowledge of the design and function of equipment.• Follows industry/ government specific guidelines, particularly as they relate to safety, health and environmental practices.• Assist with research and development of new repair capabilities. This will include reading and understanding new manuals and may include on and off site training.• Assists with the maintenance of shop equipment and supplies.• Makes computer entries and completes various types of paperwork maintenance documents such as Service Reports and 8130-3's in accordance with FAA Regulations and company policies.* Has basic knowledge of electrical and mechanical devices. Has the ability to use common hand tools and precision measuring equipment such as micrometers, depth gages, flow meters, pressure gauges etc. Is able to read and interpret diagrams and component schematics in order to diagnose and repair equipment malfunctions. Has basic personal computer skills such as Word and Excel.• Ability to apply basic mathematics to convert metric and/or standard rates of flow, torque, load and distance measurements.•Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Technician Repair Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/technician-repair-job-atlanta-ga-us-178336965.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=11,,Other,4e9a740ab2a66c4e74d7323518183fb4
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:04:19:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"A growing food and beverage company located near Austin, Texas is currently searching for a Food Scientist.  This individual will be responsible for generating and developing new food products, line extensions and reformulation from bench top through manufacturing scale up. They provide technical expertise and coordination of new product development within company guidelines and regulatory standards.In return, the company offers a good starting salary, excellent benefits, and relocation assistance if needed.Salary range for this position is $70-90k plus 15% bonusQualifications & Requirements:-Bachelor’s Degree in food science or a related technical degree is REQUIRED-4+ years of demonstrated accomplishments in food production product development for retail and food service REQUIRED-Product Development experience in frozen foods is STRONGLY PREFERRED-Must be will to taste products including food animal products-CCS (Certified Culinary Scientist) is a HUGE PLUS",Food Scientist Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/food-scientist-job-austin-tx-us-177295483.aspx?mescoid=1900238001001&jobPosition=16,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e11be4f2d8a15204fa9e6c00d0c879ac
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:03:38:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"VP of Engineering (Head of Application Development)Skills: College Degree in Computer Science or relevant work experience, 3+ years Management ExperiencePay: $125,000-$175,000 based on experienceLocation: Atlanta (Midtown)Our client is one of the hottest startups in Atlanta and has doubled in size in back to back years. This company is on fire. They partner with some of the most well-known companies in the world including Amazon, Google, and Twitter.Requirements:Bachelor's degreeManagement ExperienceHands on DevelopmentTech Stack:  Magento, Shopify, OSCommerce, ZenCart or other eCommerce platform development• Hadoop, MongoDB or other big data techs• Build/deployment process management• Social media API experience• Data science/analytics background• Open source contributions Benefits: (Probably some of the best benefits in all of Atlanta)Casual Dress (jeans, etc.)Catered LunchPaid Vacation and Sick DaysTeam-building EventsStock Options and BonusFlexible Environment / CultureFlexible hours (9am-4pm core hours)",VP of Engineering Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/vp-of-engineering-job-atlanta-ga-us-177932044.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=5,"125,000.00 - 175,000.00 /year",IT/Software Development,2ae0f123720c09a7471227ee8555f5ce
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:03:37:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary RETAIL SUPERVISOR FULL TIME   Our retail team needs a sales supervisor with a knowledge of sales and merchandising with the ability to motivate their associates. This full time Retail Supervisor is responsible for achieving and maintaining all Client and Customer standards by overseeing and directing activities of Retail Sales Representatives and Merchandisers within an assigned territory. This person works closely with Business Development Managers, Clients, Store Managers, and various retail personnel to ensure retail business objectives are met. Come join the team at Advantage Solutions and earn competitive pay rates at the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.    RESPONSIBILITIES: Business Development: Building goodwill with the trade and Clients, timely new item retail placement, and ensure completion of all retail projects. Managing and directing retail personnel, conducting store audits, and executing all retail projects.  Will increase brand representation and effectiveness through establishing and maintaining trade and Client relationships and by conducting Client work with appointments. Sales and Merchandising: will maintain Client objectives by ensuring product(s) are fully stocked, correctly signed, properly faced, and set to schematics. New Items: will work on the achievement of business objectives through placement of new items in all authorized stores. Shelf Standards and Conditions: will authorize items to meet Client shelf schematic standards. Call Coverage; oversee call coverage through scheduling merchandisers and reviewing reports. Budget and Expense Control: Budgeting and expense control with the goal of coming in under budget and having excellent control of expenses. Administration/Reporting: will complete accurate and timely paperwork and reports, recaps, itineraries, timesheets, expense reports, etc. Qualifications:  Education Level: (Required):Associate's Degree or equivalent experience. 4 years of applicable experience. 2+ years supervisory experience. Excellent written communication and verbal communication skills. Strong prioritization skills. Skill in supervising to include delegating responsibility, training and evaluating performance. Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment. Ability to work independently and prioritize duties with minimal supervision, in order to meet deadlines. Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting from one to another with frequent interruptions and competing deadlines. Basic computer skills including familiarity with Word, Excel, and Internet usage.  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Retail Supervisor Full Time Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-supervisor-full-time-job-atlanta-ga-us-178219374.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=15,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e2a64b93520647e3fa9a2bcc132282d9
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:03:15:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Code : M150548PS Job Category : Hot Jobs Job Type : Full-Time (PERM) Job Location : Texas(TX), Austin Zip Code : 78746 Post Date: 19-Dec-2016 Job Description: Protouch Staffing is seeking Pedi ER RN to join our team for Full-Time PERM Position currently available in TX !! Start dates ASAP!!Qualified, interested and dynamic candidates send resumes via job posting or visit our website www.protouchstaffing.com to see what we have available!! Qualification/Certification: Texas RN License or a Compact RN license from a NCLA Compact State; BLS certification as per SDH policy; ACLS certification as per SDH policy. New hires must obtain ACLS and PALS, within 6 months of hire. Completion of required coursework from an accredited school of nursing resulting eligibility for NCLEX examination. Graduate of accredited applicable school or [if RN] enrolled in an Alternate Entry MSN program or higher level education. ADN’s will be required to complete their BSN within (5) years from date of hire into this job. Min. Experience : 1-3 yr. Salary : $24.91-$37.81/hr. Company Details: Protouch Staffing is one of the leading healthcare staffing companies in the US. Since 1989, Protouch has specialized in providing highly-skilled professionals. Our staff of highly trained professionals has one goal in mind – to provide the highest quality healthcare professionals and the highest level of customer service to the healthcare industry. Protouch Staffing knows that the decision to utilize supplemental staffing is critical to a healthcare facility’s ability to meet its patient care standards. That’s why Protouch works hard to streamline the process to make it as easy as possible to get experienced and qualified healthcare professionals to help meet patient care objectives anywhere in the United States. Protouch is committed to being the best provider of staffing services to our more than 1,000 clients, and we strive to be the benchmark in providing quality employment opportunities to more than 500 nurses per year. Additional Information: ** Sign on bonus up to $10,000 and relocation assistance up to $3500 **",Registered Nurse: Pediatric Emergency Room Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-pediatric-emergency-room-job-austin-tx-us-177901771.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,4ef9b472b0594a51cef26cd143b3e1ba
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:03:15:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  710471If you meet the below qualifications, please send a Word Document resume to dfisher@apexsystemsinc.com Customer Support / Customer Service RepresentativeDuration: Long term contract / ongoing contractRate: $16/hrLocation: Austin, TXQualified candidates will possess the following qualities:- Highly Organized- Studious- Effective in team settings- Punctual- Strong aptitude for learning and adapting to changing technologies- Excellent communication and interpersonal skillsJob Description:- Support internal executives by setting-up, scheduling, and supporting of the client product line.- Performing live demos for prospective clients- Teleconferencing with customersEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Customer Support/Customer Service Representative Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  710471If you meet the below qualifications, please send a Word Document resume to dfisher@apexsystemsinc.com Customer Support / Customer Service RepresentativeDuration: Long term contract / ongoing contractRate: $16/hrLocation: Austin, TXQualified candidates will possess the following qualities:- Highly Organized- Studious- Effective in team settings- Punctual- Strong aptitude for learning and adapting to changing technologies- Excellent communication and interpersonal skillsJob Description:- Support internal executives by setting-up, scheduling, and supporting of the client product line.- Performing live demos for prospective clients- Teleconferencing with customersEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-support-customer-service-representative-job-austin-tx-us-178078978.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),224b9af2cc4573998de6bb221d4363a0
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:02:30:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Job ID:  99751 Oldcastle Materials, Inc., a division of Oldcastle, is the leading vertically integrated supplier of aggregates, asphalt, ready mixed concrete, and construction and paving services in the United States.  Our operations span the nation from Montana to Texas and from Washington to Florida, with 18,000 employees at more than 1,200 locations in 44 states. Position Overview The director of data services role is to focus on strategic development and operation of the BI/data warehousing practice, including managing staffing requirements, optimizing processes and technology, and ensuring a high availability BI/data warehouse platform. The data services director will also work closely with business executives and stakeholders in other departments in order to identify, recommend, develop, implement, and support analytics solutions to deliver essential information to satisfy their information needs. Key Responsibilities (Essential Duties and Functions) Work with key business representatives to develop an enterprise strategy for Business Intelligence processes, methodologies and platforms.  Develop an execution roadmap to implement this strategy.Work with business owners to ensure the roadmaps for the enterprise data repositories and applications align with the business objectives and strategies. Liaise with business executives to understand and document business requirements for the portfolio of enterprise data repositories and services.Direct planning and implementation of enterprise data management programs including data stewardship, data standardization and the development and maintenance of data models.Manage the portfolio of data services along with the projects and teams that support these functions.Oversee the development, design and implementation of Enterprise Data Staging, Extract, Translate and Load (ETL) processes and changes to existing ETL processes.Manage the service & solution delivery of the company’s enterprise visualization products, including reports and Business Intelligence (BI) applications.  This includes engaging, software suppliers and support developers (internal and contract), including but not limited to: defining and managing projects, defining SLA’s for prompt rectification of problems and/or operational emergencies.Manage the teams responsible for software development and maintenance of data related tools which support the development of enterprise applications.Oversee management of portfolio of enterprise data projects using defined project management methodologies, effective communication with project champions/sponsors, and management of resources and other project constraints.  Effectively prioritize and maintain control over project management activities.Develop and establish appropriate operating policies, technology standards and procedures to ensure security policy compliance of enterprise data. Review, approve and negotiate major contracts for supporting data related information technology services.Actively participate in both strategic planning and operational activities for enterprise data applications and repositories to manage IT strategic investments, and to effectively set and balance technology priorities and efficient IT operations across the organization Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.  Education/Experience Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering/Computer related discipline, or equivalent experience requiredAdvanced degree preferred Work Requirements 10+ years of large enterprise experience developing, deploying and maintaining technology solutions.10+ years of progressive experience managing the implementation and operations of enterprise applications5+ years experience managing IT professionals5+ years of experience defining and managing data visualizations using tools and industry standard practices. Knowledge/Skill Requirements Strong fundamental knowledge of software development methodologies (both agile and waterfall).Strong software engineering experience including: Service Oriented Architecture, n-tier application design, RDBMS implementation, and mobile platform development.Demonstrable experience in full life cycle management of enterprise applications.Implementation of flexible staffing models utilizing both onshore and offshore partners.Familiarity of Microsoft stack development and implementation.Extensive experience in solution and application vendor management.Implementation of enterprise level business intelligence practices, solutions and platforms.Demonstrable experience mentoring and growing managers and staff.Ability to effectively work and communicate with people with a wide range of skills, experience, cultures and capabilities – “C” level Business leaders, peers, vendors, staff members.Ability to present ideas in concise, business-friendly and user-friendly language.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Excellent interpersonal skills.Construction Industry experience a plus.Experience with SQL Server Reporting Services a plus.Experience with Tableau or equivalent platforms a plus.Experience with Data Warehousing tools and appliances a plus.Experience with Master Data Management tools a plusAbility to manage and collaborate with multidisciplinary teams. Physical Requirements The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Able to communicate with others by telephone and in personAble to utilize a computer for word processing, email communication, and preparation of documents and presentations.May require sitting for extended periods of time Work Environment Usually, normal office working conditions.  The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.   The noise level in the work environment is usually quietThe position will require travel 10-25%The position may require work outside of normal business hours The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive.  They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job.  Other duties may be assigned as required.  Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn!  EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle Materials is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.Oldcastle Materials is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.#CAN ",Director of Data Services - Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-data-services-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177544698.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=18,,,89e2bec5d616da01d4f7e82e63aa1de7
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:02:28:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Hurry up!! Immediate opening for Power BI Developer for Contract to hire role at Atlanta, GA with Feuji Inc. Note:1.       US Citizens, GC, GC-EAD, L2-EAD, TN Visa and H4-EAD are eligible to apply2.       We cannot work with 3rd Party OR C2CRole                     Power BI DeveloperDuration              3 to 6 months Contract to hireLocation               Atlanta, GA - 30328 Requirements·         Experience with developing Power BI solution in the cloud·         Project requires developer to have clear understanding of integrating data between ERP and Power BI in cloud.·         Experience integrating Power BI with Microsoft Dynamics and Oracle ERP is desired.   ·         Experience developing executive dashboards·         Self-starter and should be able to work closely with business-users, ERP developers, and Infrastructure team.·         Able to guide and develop Power BI strategy for long-term.Thanks & Regards,Laxmi Siginam | Technical Recruiter | Feuji, Inc O: 972 525 7522| E:  laxmi.s@feuji.com300 E. John Carpenter, Suite 160, Irving, TX, 75062LinkedIn:https://in.linkedin.com/in/siginamlaxmiUSA | Costa Rica | Bulgaria | India Report","Feuji Job Application for Power BI Developer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Hurry up!! Immediate opening for Power BI Developer for Contract to hire role at Atlanta, GA with Feuji Inc. Note:1.       US Citizens, GC, GC-EAD, L2-EAD, TN Visa and H4-EAD are eligible to apply2.       We cannot work with 3rd Party OR C2CRole                     Power BI DeveloperDuration              3 to 6 months Contract to hireLocation               Atlanta, GA - 30328 Requirements·         Experience with developing Power BI solution in the cloud·         Project requires developer to have clear understanding of integrating data between ERP and Power BI in cloud.·         Experience integrating Power BI with Microsoft Dynamics and Oracle ERP is desired.   ·         Experience developing executive dashboards·         Self-starter and should be able to work closely with business-users, ERP developers, and Infrastructure team.·         Able to guide and develop Power BI strategy for long-term.Thanks & Regards,Laxmi Siginam | Technical Recruiter | Feuji, Inc O: 972 525 7522| E:  laxmi.s@feuji.com300 E. John Carpenter, Suite 160, Irving, TX, 75062LinkedIn:https://in.linkedin.com/in/siginamlaxmiUSA | Costa Rica | Bulgaria | India",,http://jobview.monster.com/power-bi-developer-job-atlanta-ga-us-177546216.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,,,46b836b7700a3537e67869c480835f65
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:02:21:54,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  97355 Oldcastle Architectural Products (APG) is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. Additional strong national positions are also found in packaged lawn and garden products. The business produces and markets brands you know such as Belgard® hardscapes and Sakrete® cement mixes. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Job Description Summary        Proactively manages customer programs. Plans, prepares and anticipates customer needs.Reacts with a sense of urgency and delivers customer-centric solutions.Manages customer expectations in regards to sales and services provided.Provides and participates in all market and customer strategies.Develops and recommends short-term and long-term sales plans for assigned territory to meet regional and national goals.Provides supervisor with forecast and budget recommendations for territory and other reporting as requested.Develops and manages relationships with the customer; District Managers, Market Directors and Regional Merchandising Managers.Builds and maintains a strong, collaborative rapport with local Oldcastle business units and their Management team.Communicates, informs and partners with local Oldcastle business units to provide customer with timely responses and solutions.Communicates and manages any customer/product complaints with the stores/customers.Provides technical assistance to all customers.      Manages and coordinates territory DIY's, product knowledge training, customer, contractor and company events.Accurately maintains and manages store assignments, product sku’s and other related customer information. Facilitates the “sell through” of changing products with our manufacturing sites. Reports changes to customer accounts timely.Manages all retail credits to make sure they are all accurate and applied properly.Manages proper inventory levels in the stores using cycle counts and various reports. Communicates variances to National Account Managers and Category Managers. Identifies discrepancies, recommends solutions and partners with the customer to make appropriate adjustments.  Determines and manages all ""best practices"" throughout the team as well as implementation.Communicates effectively and consistently to supervisor on field status.                                                                  Partners with National Account Managers, Category Managers, Marketing team and local Operators to successfully execute projects and effectively communicates progress.Communicates and implements National Retail initiatives within territory.                                                          Supervisory Responsibilities Accountability for meeting and exceeding Team and Customer Service performance expectations within territory.Provides direct supervision of field sales and service team within territory.Supervises the team’s quality of work, timeliness and completion of daily assignments, tasks, and projects, including internal and external requests.Organizes and plans team’s work routine to effectively and efficiently maximize service, time and cost.Actively manages company’s annual performance review process for direct reports and establishes annual business goals, development goals and individual performance expectations.Recommends hiring of new employees, promotions, salary changes and disciplinary action.Approves overtime, vacation and expense reimbursements.  Job Requirements3 to 5 years of Retail industry and service experience.High school diploma or equivalent combination of education and work experience.Proficiency in all Microsoft Office programs.Strong ability to communicate effectively; written and verbal within the company and with the customer.Strong presentation skills.Ability to prioritize activities and multi-task.Basic math skills; addition, subtraction, multiplication and division.Use of basic hand and power tools.Daily travel to and from company locations and/or customer locations; some overnight travel required. Job PreferencesFamiliarity of Retail building materials, hardscapes and lawn and garden products.Knowledge of basic retail merchandising best practices.Basic knowledge of landscaping; DIY landscaping projects and products.Hands-on experience using Tableau and other various financial systems.                           Physical / Work EnvironmentAbility to lift up to 80 pounds.Ability to stand, walk, bend, climb, kneel, perform repetitive motions and work from a ladder.Ability to work outside in all types of weather conditions.Ability to stand and sit for extended periods of time. What Oldcastle Offers YouA culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About OldcastleOldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle Architectural is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle Architectural is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.#CAN ",Area Sales Manager - Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/area-sales-manager-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177601992.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=1,,,e8826fb5e9788f3216f355c8060e70b2
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:47:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt Workforce Solutions is now hiring for a terrific candidate to fill our outstanding administrative position in College Park, Georgia. This position in first shift Monday - Friday from 8am to 5pm. You will be required to be computer savvy, being able to use MS word, Excel, and Power Point. You will be answering phone calls and emails. You must have great communication skills both written and verbal. You will be running errands and helping the production team for the majority of the day.Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.* Must be able to communicate both written and verbally• Must have computer skills• Must have 5 years or more of administrative experience• Must be dedicated and hardworking",Administrative Assistant Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-atlanta-ga-us-178336971.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,,General/Other: Administrative/Clerical,1eebb9af8c6ffbe5fdd8f7ca37358d77
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:47:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad in Marietta is hiring for a Replenishment Analyst to fill a temp to perm position with a client in the Smyrna area. If you have the skills listed below then please apply. MUST HAVE heavy experience using excel and creating Pivot tables. MUST HAVE strong analytical skills. Also Siebel experience is a plus. - Status: Exempt- Salary Range: 50-55k- Location: Smyrna Office- Hours: Normal Business M - F- Travel: Negligible- Would like to do a temp to hire if possible, but would entertain direct hire for the right candidate.Responsibilities- Works closely with Category Management team to develop reporting specifications. Utilizing various data systems, extracts raw data from reporting system and conducts in-depth analysis Consults with internal business partners to present data and recommends actions to assist client with meeting business objectives.- Extracts data from third-party market research resources, integrates with internal data and conducts trend analysis. Interprets results and presents recommendations to business partner.- Manages ad hoc projects based on business partner or client requests.Working hours: 8-5PMSkills:Qualifications- Bachelor's Degree preferred or equivalent experience, MBA desired; 2+ years of experience in an analytical position.- Experience dealing with retailers or CPG companies preferred- Strong analytical and research skills.- Strong written and verbal communication skills. - Ability to make oral presentations and interact with all levels of professionals.- Strong prioritization skills with the ability to work independently and prioritize duties with minimal supervision, in order to meet deadlines. Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting from one to another with frequent interruptions and completing deadlines.- Strong computer skills including expert proficiency with Microsoft Office; specifically Microsoft Excel and Microsoft Access.- SAP Experience preferredRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",General Merchandise/Replenishment Analyst Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30080",Wholesale Trade/Import-Export,http://jobview.monster.com/general-merchandise-replenishment-analyst-job-smyrna-ga-us-177429246.aspx?mescoid=1300086001001&jobPosition=16,"50,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",,0fd7a89f9f247d36133894a8be8c7629
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job <!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:Arial; panose-1:2 11 6 4 2 2 2 2 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536859905 -1073711037 9 0 511 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Cambria Math""; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1107305727 0 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-520092929 1073786111 9 0 415 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} .MsoChpDefault {mso-style-type:export-only; mso-default-props:yes; font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} @page WordSection1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.WordSection1 {page:WordSection1;} --> Expandtree, Inc. seeks Master’s + 1 yr exp. / Bachelor’s + 5 yrs. exp./ equiv. as .Net Developer (ETND16): .Net, C#, ASP.NET, ADO.NET, AJAX. Mail resume with job ID to HR: 10711 Burnet Road, Suite #315, Austin, Texas 78758. Travel to unanticipated worksites throughout U.S. Foreign equivalency accepted. Report",Expandtree,"Full Time, Employee","Address 10711 Burnett RoadAustin, TX 78758",,http://jobview.monster.com/net-developer-job-austin-tx-us-177106997.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,,903aef71abacbb235b5abb6232edba75
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Benefits Counselor Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30311",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/benefits-counselor-job-atlanta-ga-us-177029160.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=20,,Customer Support/Client Care,46acaff180e8d8b0abbc102f3970e467
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Reports to: Senior Vice President, Operations or Market President, OperationsRegional Vice President, OperationsRoles Reporting to this position: AdministratorsJob SummaryAccountable for all aspects of clinical excellence, operational efficiency, financial performance, growth, partnership management and adherence to internal controls of multiple surgical facilities within a designated Region.Responsibilities and ExpectationsThe following description of the job responsibilities and performance expectations are intended to reflect the major responsibilities of the job, but is not intended to describe the minor duties or other responsibilities as may be assigned from time to time.Clinical Excellence Ensure commitment to USPI's EDGE and accuracy and timeliness of clinical data Attendance at meetings, and guidance and direction to the Medical Executive Committee at each of the regions' facilities. Leadership in enhancing clinical processes and procedures to better deliver sale and excellent care.Growth Ensure individual facility and regional growth through the addition of new physicians and additional case volume from existing physicians. In addition, effective cost containment especially in the areas of staffing and supplies. Development and management of Partners Advisory Board at each of the regions' facilities. Monitor and oversee the Sales Plan for each facility as well as participate with the Sales Team in monthly sales calls.Operations Develop the leadership skills of the Administrators, enabling them to prioritize and execute the goals of the facility and provide the necessary guidance and feedback to their staff. Motivate, encourage and assist in the professional development of Administrators and other site managers to advance their career path within USPI. Perform RVP/RD mini-audits of facilities annually to ensure compliance regarding USPI's policy and procedures as related to internal controls. Visit all sites in assigned region on a regular, weekly basis. Prioritize/coordinate all corporate resources as needed in order for the facilities to achieve goals/objectives. Assist in appointment of an individual to act as interim Administrator when the Administrator is absent. Partner with Administrators to ensure that all sites have a culture to reflects the USPI Mission and Culture.Financial Oversee the regional budget development and ensure financial performance of the region meets or exceeds budgeted expectations. Ensure growth in case volume and effective management of net revenue per case, personnel expense per case and drugs/medical supplies per case. Ensure all business offices functions are compliant with USPI's EDGETM and Today's Proven Process. Ensure that Monthly Self Assessments are being performed by all Business Office Managers.Communications Facilitate communications with all partners (physician & hospital if applicable) at least monthly. Attend and actively participate in each facility''s governing board and partnership meetings. Act as a liaison between healthcare system partner, USPI and the facilities. Organize and actively participate in quarterly partnership meetings with healthcare system partners. Steer and focus Monthly Operations Review presentations and discussions. Attend facilities' staff meetings as appropriate and present USPI's goals and priorities, ensuring appropriate communication of USPI's global objectives are understood by all staff members of the center. Attend all regional and USPI management meetings throughout the year. Required Skills Qualifications Master's degree in business administration or healthcare administration preferred. Minimum five years experience with exposure to healthcare business development & operations, finance and business consulting required. Demonstrated experience in developing growth strategies required. Excellent verbal, written and formal presentation communication skills required. Ability to work well with healthcare partners, physicians, employees, patients and fellow workers required. Word, Excel & PowerPoint analytical and presentation skill a must Ability to effectively articulate financial results respond to questions from hospital and physician partners required. Strong mathematical aptitude to assist with financial budgeting, reporting and analysis required.Criteria for Evaluation Annual Case Growth Goals Annual Cost Containment Goals Annual Leadership Survey Goals Physician Feedback Hospital Partner Feedback Employee feedback / Leadership Survey Results within industry norms for all clinical benchmarks, and active programs in place for continuous improvement",Regional Vice President Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-vice-president-job-austin-tx-us-177786574.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,3cb83282159cebf170f86b7a9759ed0d
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  715818Looking for a seasoned Capacity and Demand Analyst for Servers:    Must be/have :•  Highly knowledgeable in the world of servers, including windows, unix, intel and•  Experience in the Cloud strategy.•  Mush have worked with asset management and discovery of servers, but is technical enough to know how they work.Plus to have:•  Would be nice to have Ariba, Cognos and database experience.Prior Experience:•  College degree or an equivalent combination of education and experience from which comparable knowledge and skills may be acquired;•  7 years’ experience working in a large IT environment supporting multiple computing environments, operating systems and hardware platforms.•  Demonstrated ability to determine key needs, diagnose and address problems, assess risk and drive issues to resolution.•  Demonstrated change agent and ability to influence others.•  High level of architectural knowledge and the ability to read and analyze infrastructure diagrams.Preferred Qualifications:•  Servervand Mid-Range equipment knowledge a plus.•  College degree in a related field and 10 years relevant work experience with focus on project and program management experience which cross businesses and technology initiatives.Responsibilities:•  General, budgetary and resource planning, coordination and documentation.•   Strategic assessment to understand scope and identification of risk, facilitation of efficient/effective integration for new projects, track and report progress, and control/influence costs.•  Working with our team to make sure we are within our budget for IT equipment.•  Manage inventory of IT equipment.•  Place orders, work with project teams, etc. Additional Information: Please click on the attached job description below to view a more detailed description of the position. It is projected that there will be FTE openings in this area in the future. The resources selected for these contract positions can register at SunTrust.com and apply for an opening should one become available.A Bachelors Degree is preferred for this role, however candidates with commensurate experience will be considered.If you are interested, please contact: hfasil@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Capacity and Demand Analyst - Servers Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/capacity-demand-analyst-servers-job-atlanta-ga-us-178342604.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cc244352755d1f74316e547c7c0e72d3
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionIt takes a team of highly trained professionals on the ground to help the Army National Guard maintain its flight status. If you're looking for a career in the aircraft repair and maintenance field, then join the Army National Guard and watch your future take flight.As an Aircraft Powerplant Repairer, you will inspect, service, and repair turbine engines, parts, and electrical components on Army aircraft to ensure that they remain safe and ready to fly transport, patrol, and flight training missions.Plus, through your training, you will develop the skills and experience to enjoy a civilian career with aircraft manufacturers, commercial airlines, and Government agencies.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to learn. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Soldiers in the Aircraft Powerplant Repairer specialty consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, plus 18 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. During this time, you'll learn essential Soldiering skills and refine your aircraft repair abilities in the field and the classroom.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Aircraft Powerplant Repairer Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30060",,http://jobview.monster.com/15b-aircraft-powerplant-repairer-job-marietta-ga-us-178214261.aspx?mescoid=5100984001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,d5cc34a8c05763c77bf666de0478987e
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position Information:Sales Support Representative position with a company that gives back and works one-on-one with families in your community. Hands-on training, competitive compensation, performance awards and incentives.We Need:Entry level and senior level applicant or applicant with business-to-business sales experience who wants to help people, gain experience and earn the money they need.You Will Help Your Community By:- Supporting the needs of people in the community- Managing relationships with new and existing customers- Providing customer service and communicationYou Only Need:- A high school diploma or equivalent- Be a people-person that likes interaction among others- Be independent-minded and flexible- Outstanding communication skillsWho Is Liberty National?We are Liberty National Life Insurance Company. We have been helping working-class people fulfill their benefit needs since 1900. That's over 100 years of making a difference in lives of people across the United States.Apply NowApply here and see success testimonials at https://agent-jobs.lnlcareers.com . Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Liberty National Insurance Company Job Application for New Customer Service Job Before The New Year | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-800-405-6522,All,http://jobview.monster.com/new-customer-service-job-before-the-new-year-job-austin-tx-us-178282737.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,,b3d54b8600807ba32f73ba5e068e383c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"What if you could actually live that life you dreamed of? What ifyou didn’t have to go at it alone? What if you had the Power? Here,nothing is impossible. Your success is in your own hands, and we have your backthe whole way. Strong leaders, mentors, training and powerful tools – they’llhelp you push yourself to the top, and keep pushing, until your idea of the topis higher than you ever imagined. It’s time to kiss your dreams hello. NamedFortune Magazine’s #1 Workplace for Millennials, when you begin your salescareer at Power, you know you will be set up to thrive from day one.  All sales representatives are full-time, W-2 employees whocomplete our proven sales training program — a comprehensive approach tolearning corporate sales strategy, communications, and leadership skills thatwill map out a path to future opportunities and financial independence. Sales representatives will also gain exposure to a variety ofother areas within the company, including business development, marketing andoperations — and will be provided ongoing opportunities for growth in the formof sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis, as well as unparalleledleadership conferences featuring high-profile, world-renowned speakers inbusiness, entertainment, sports, and government twice a year. Primary job responsibilities include: No cold calls required as all leads are pre-qualified Delivery of interactive sales presentations to homeowners on Power’s eco-friendly, green products and services Participation in ongoing sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis Qualifications: Highly developed interpersonal, organizational and communication skills Ability to speak publicly with confidence and poise Strong sense of ambition, self-motivation and self-discipline Committed individual who is passionate about fulfilling the company’s mission Naturally positive, outgoing and articulate individual who thrives in social settings Previous sales experience preferred BA/BS preferred Salary and Benefits: $75,000-90,000 average first-year compensation Monthly opportunities for performance-based rewards, such as luxury vacations, high-end electronics, gift cards and tickets to concerts and sporting events Various medical, dental, life and disability insurance plans that can be tailored to your specific needs or the needs of your family Ample paid vacation and holidays A competitive 401(k) retirement savings program, matched by Power Access to the latest technology, such as laptops, smart phones and tablets that will help you reach your earnings goals faster and more efficiently A dynamic social program filled with can’t miss events, parties, and activities, including an annual bonus in the form of a company trip to a tropical destination for you and a guest.",Sales Representative Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30093",All,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-177751329.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,8fe3a772a2263c7fdd42d0391ff0f36c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:The Warehouse Associate is responsible for inputting data, preparing packing and shipping documents, picking and staging outbound shipments, ensuring inbound and outbound shipments are accurate and free from damage, and maintaining a clean, neat and orderly work area. He/She must also have the ability to manually move and lift 50 to 100 lb. boxes of tile on a regular basis and be available to work nights and weekends.  Responsibilities:Read customer order, work order, shipping order, or requisition to assemble customer orders from stock and place order on pallet or shelves.Sort and place materials or items on racks, shelves, or in bins according to predetermined sequence such as size, type, style, color, or product code.Complete all paperwork pertaining to inventory, which includes shipping confirmations, receiving confirmations, purchase orders, open orders, order check-off, and UPS.Ensure complete accuracy of store inventory at all times.Label all orders and back stock clearly.Participate in the cycle counting program.Load and unload customer vehicles; ensure proper paperwork is completed and signed off by the customer after loading of product.Process incoming freight trucks in a timely manner.Proper use of equipment, including but not limited to forklifts, to move inventory.Inspect equipment to maintain good working order.Record amounts of product received and distributed.Accountable for overall cleanliness/organization of the warehouse.Enter records into computer.Other duties as assigned. Qualifications:  High School DiplomaAbility to read and write in EnglishStrong work ethicForklift certification or willing to be certifiedExcellent organizational skillsBasic mathematical skillsBasic computer skillsKnowledge of proper safety measuresAbility to manually move and lift 50lbs regularly and up to 100 lbs.BenefitsGreat Pay and Exceptional TrainingIndividual Career Growth OpportunitiesHoliday, Vacation and PTO PayMedical, Dental, and Vision InsuranceHSA Employer Contributions401(k) Plan with employer matchingCompany Paid Basic Life Insurance and Accidental Death & DismembermentCompany Paid Long Term DisabilityThe Tile Shop is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Warehouse Associate Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30346",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-job-atlanta-ga-us-177184706.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,809d0352265cd571664fff65897726c3
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"The goal of the Outside Sales Representative position on our Document Services team is to prepare you for taking on your own territory by starting you in a Trainee capacity. Reynolds Document Services provides over 5,000 different types of printed forms and promotional items to the automotive market, including business forms, license plate frames, banners, and much more. As a Trainee, you will be assigned a seasoned Sales Representative, as a mentor, to learn about our products and the overall sales process within various accounts and territories. You will assist your mentor in lead generation and other aspects of the sales cycle. Once you complete the training period and a territory becomes available, you will be required to relocate to the open territory and take over selling documents and promotional products to existing customers as the territory’s assigned Sales Representative. In this role, you will also develop and maintain new customers throughout your specified territory. You are eligible to receive a company car for both business and personal use. In addition, you will be provided a company cell phone, laptop and home office equipment.Document Services Facts: With eight out of 10 car dealerships in the U.S. using a document or product produced by Reynolds – Reynolds Document Services has a level of brand awareness that stands out with dealerships. Document Services delivers the Reynolds brand with excellence. In Voice of the Customer surveys, dealers score Reynolds documents a near-perfect 97 percent in customer satisfaction.Training:Our extensive, world class training includes on-the-job training with a mentor, as well as classroom instruction at our corporate headquarters in Dayton, Ohio. You will complete courses on our products, processes, sales skills and automotive dealership operations. We take the time to train you right because your success is our future. Requirements:·         Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience·         Must be a self-starter with the ability to schedule time effectively·         Strong influential skills/level of charisma for building long-term relationships with customers·         Good organizational skills·         Ability to learn both sales process and product and make applicable use of knowledge·         Must be willing to relocate upon completion of trainingBenefits:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including:·         Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance·         401(k) with up to 6% matching·         Company car for business and personal use·         Working remotely with a company cell phone, laptop, and other provided home office equipment·         Professional development and training·         Promotion from within·         Referral bonuses·         Associate discounts for cell phones, cars, computers, entertainment, and much more  Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Outside Sales Representative (Trainee) Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",AllRetailBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-representative-trainee-job-atlanta-ga-us-177220650.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,"$40,000.00+ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,734d8001b0df3221370af607fbc2297b
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bankers Life is currently hiring Insurance Agents / Insurance Sales Professionals! We're looking for motivated leaders with strong management skills, a proven track record of success, and the ability to play a critical role in our sales organization-one of the largest and most respected in the insurance industry.Qualifications & Experience: Our Sales Agents come from various backgrounds, we do find, however, and that our top sales performers all have the following skills and abilities:Experience prospecting, networking and new business developmentAbility to close a saleExperience creating and delivering sales presentationsExperience in Life, Health, or other personal lines of insurance (not required)Retail sales experienceExcellent communication or customer service skillsPerks and Benefits:New Sales Agents earning $100K+ and Experienced Agents earning $300K+ Competitive commissions and compensation packagesQuarterly bonus, trips and incentivesCompensation option to provide commission after retirementFormal comprehensive training via our nationally recognized programs Opportunity for advancement into a management positionAccess to lead generation and prospecting programsIndependence and freedom to set your own workResponsive technology supportAcross the country, more than 5,000 Bankers Life insurance agents live and work in the communities they serve. Our sales force enjoys unlimited earning potential, great advancement opportunities and work/ life balance.Join a respected career and Apply Now! About the CompanyBankers Life has offered challenging and rewarding insurance sales opportunities for 130 years with branch offices nationwide. Bankers specialize in serving the growing senior market, offering solid insurance protection and top quality service that have made Bankers an insurance industry leader. Today we serve more than 4 million middle-income working Americans and retirees. There are more than 50 million potential customer households across America in our target market, and the projected growth of the market is remarkable.",Sales - Insurance Agent - Sales Representative Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-insurance-agent-sales-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-165270546.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=16,,,f58643a2ca5684f0b5ac251faa2fe41c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Would you like to work for a Medical Device company? Are you proficient in C programming language? If your answer is yes, then we have the perfect opportunity for you.Job Description:* The Software Developer develops, maintains, and updates detailed design and interface specifications.* Working from requirement specification.* Participates in and supports the implementation, development, enhancements, and modifications to software source code, scripts, and procedures.* Debugs, troubleshoots, and isolates software problems as well as offers strategic solutions, analysis, and advice regarding identified issues for future development.* Presents at design reviews; documents and resolves issues as directed.• Experience in a regulated industry such as Medical, Aviation or Defense desired but not required.Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer* Critical Skills: Software development in C language.* Experience with Linux.* Ideal candidate will have: B.A. or B.S. in a technical discipline. Relevant industry experience preferred.",Software Developer/ C Language Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-developer-c-language-job-atlanta-ga-us-177948162.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,41da0262ef039db6a161ac574dcb3321
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that better care begins at home.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services.Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families.Girling Community Care, a Gentiva company, is currently seeking an Intake Coordinator to assist in processing new member and ongoing member paperwork. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Receives incoming faxes and distributes throughout the office.Processes new member’s paperwork and makes new member’s charts.Completes weekly reports.Responsible for admission logs.Post to O-1 daily admissions and discharges and reconciles on a monthly basis.Processes increases and decreases in units/hours and completes new task(s) sheets.Audits charts for accuracy regarding service control standards.Establishes rapport with DHS.Maintains confidentiality for members, provider and staff information.Qualifications:High school graduate with some college preferred.Excellent professional communication and organizational skills are essential.Supervisory and Home Health experience preferred.Bilingual skills are preferred (Spanish).Keywords: Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.",Intake Coordinator (Comm Care) Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/intake-coordinator-comm-care-job-austin-tx-us-178324979.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,fd93cbddd284b71202efa5bfe3571016
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Activ8 Recruitment and Solutions is an international recruiting company in the United States. Our clients are from all business sectors and we work to source the highest qualified candidates available. A world renowned refrigeration manufacturing company is looking for a dedicated Electrical Controls Engineer in the Greater Atlanta, GA area for their facility.Please apply with your most updated MS Word resume.Requirements of Electrical Controls Engineer – Refrigeration Manufacturing:B.S. degree in Electrical Engineering Familiar with PLCs such as Omron, Mitsubishi, Siemens, or Allen BradleyExcellent verbal, and written communication skillsExperience with AutoCAD(2D/3D), SolidWorks, or SolidEdgeProficient in computer skillsAbility to read, interpret, create, and edit electrical drawings and code requirementsAt least a 1 year of experience in Electrical, Automation, or Controls EngineeringResponsibilities of Electrical Controls Engineer – Refrigeration Manufacturing:Troubleshoot and make programming changes to PLCProgramming and teaching of robot changesDraw up plans using computer-assigned engineering and design softwareRead and interpret plans, diagrams, electrical drawings and code requirementsCreate and draw wiring schematics for panels to various motors and sensorsModify electrical circuits as necessaryOther duties such as control panel fabrication, machine wiring, PLC programing, electrical installation, schematic design and circuit designCommunicate and work close with other engineering departmentsCommunicate with clients about project specific configurationsDocumenting project requirements/components for client installsOther duties are as assignedWhile performing the duties of this job you may be required to intermittently sit, stand, walk, lift up to 25 pounds, lift in excess of 25 pounds with a lift assist, climb stairs, use hands to handle or feel parts/equipment, reach with hands and arms, stoop, kneel, crouch, bend at the waist, talk and hear. You may also be required to use close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and peripheral visionDirect applicants only. We do not accept any resumes from any third party organizations or other recruiters.We screen ALL Candidates to verify the validity of each applicant with criminal background / Social Security verification - some positions require drug screening and vehicle driving reports. Upon submitting your resume, we will contact only those candidates that we deem qualified for our client. If we do not contact you, we do not see the fit for the position. If we are unable to reach you in a reasonable time frame, you will be eliminated from the pool of potential candidates.Salary: DOELocation: Greater Atlanta, GA area Report","Activ Atlanta Job Application for Electrical Engineer - Refrigeration Manufacturer (GA/MH/) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Activ8 Recruitment and Solutions is an international recruiting company in the United States. Our clients are from all business sectors and we work to source the highest qualified candidates available. A world renowned refrigeration manufacturing company is looking for a dedicated Electrical Controls Engineer in the Greater Atlanta, GA area for their facility.Please apply with your most updated MS Word resume.Requirements of Electrical Controls Engineer – Refrigeration Manufacturing:B.S. degree in Electrical Engineering Familiar with PLCs such as Omron, Mitsubishi, Siemens, or Allen BradleyExcellent verbal, and written communication skillsExperience with AutoCAD(2D/3D), SolidWorks, or SolidEdgeProficient in computer skillsAbility to read, interpret, create, and edit electrical drawings and code requirementsAt least a 1 year of experience in Electrical, Automation, or Controls EngineeringResponsibilities of Electrical Controls Engineer – Refrigeration Manufacturing:Troubleshoot and make programming changes to PLCProgramming and teaching of robot changesDraw up plans using computer-assigned engineering and design softwareRead and interpret plans, diagrams, electrical drawings and code requirementsCreate and draw wiring schematics for panels to various motors and sensorsModify electrical circuits as necessaryOther duties such as control panel fabrication, machine wiring, PLC programing, electrical installation, schematic design and circuit designCommunicate and work close with other engineering departmentsCommunicate with clients about project specific configurationsDocumenting project requirements/components for client installsOther duties are as assignedWhile performing the duties of this job you may be required to intermittently sit, stand, walk, lift up to 25 pounds, lift in excess of 25 pounds with a lift assist, climb stairs, use hands to handle or feel parts/equipment, reach with hands and arms, stoop, kneel, crouch, bend at the waist, talk and hear. You may also be required to use close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and peripheral visionDirect applicants only. We do not accept any resumes from any third party organizations or other recruiters.We screen ALL Candidates to verify the validity of each applicant with criminal background / Social Security verification - some positions require drug screening and vehicle driving reports. Upon submitting your resume, we will contact only those candidates that we deem qualified for our client. If we do not contact you, we do not see the fit for the position. If we are unable to reach you in a reasonable time frame, you will be eliminated from the pool of potential candidates.Salary: DOELocation: Greater Atlanta, GA area",,http://jobview.monster.com/electrical-engineer-refrigeration-manufacturer-ga-mh2-21516-job-atlanta-ga-us-178150785.aspx?mescoid=1700169001001&jobPosition=10,,,538db3cfec56874cbd7f3a1d3aefeeac
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"SummaryProvides services and care for residents and patients.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesProvides personal care and services such as:Assisting with activities of daily living (turning and positioning, toileting, bathing and grooming, feeding, and mobility)Obtains and records vital signs and weight as assigned.Accurately documents all care as required by company policy and in compliance with state and federal regulations.Provides non-resident services such as, but not limited to, washing wheelchairs and cleaning resident / patient areas in compliance with infection control procedures.Contributes to the resident assessment and care plan.Makes routine rounds on each assigned resident and patient in accordance with established procedures.Promptly communicates any significant changes in behavior or condition to supervisor.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Performs other duties as assigned. QualificationsMinimum high school diploma or equivalent, or related experience and / or training.Successful completion of State-approved Nursing Assistant Certification course. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Resident Care Specialist,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/resident-care-specialist-cna-job-tucker-ga-us-178090647.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=5,0.00 - 1.00 $ /year,,0553141dab2d5d550f4c80f8dca804b8
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionAs an Automated Logistical Specialist in the Army National Guard, you will learn the ins and outs of supply chain management, from storage and distribution to warehouse management and record keeping. Major duties include:Establishing and maintaining records, such as stock lists, inventory, material control, accounting, and supply reportsReviewing and verifying quantities received against bills of lading, contracts, purchase requests, and shipping documentsUnloading and storing incoming supplies and equipmentMaintaining stock locator system and administering document control proceduresProcessing requests and turn-in documents at direct support level through warehousing sectionPerforming prescribed load list and shop stock list duties in manual and automated supply applicationsPreparing, annotating, and distributing shipping documentsOperating material-handling equipmentYou will join a team that makes sure Guard units are equipped to respond to any challenges put before them. This vital position ensures the Guard's overall state of readiness while giving you the experience you need to begin or further a career in supply chain or warehouse management.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Automated Logistical Specialist job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 12 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in handling and storing stock. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",A Automated Logistical Specialist - Supply Chain Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30060",,http://jobview.monster.com/92a-automated-logistical-specialist-supply-chain-job-marietta-ga-us-178216577.aspx?mescoid=1300084001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,78eec8f142004bcba820936a459ec46a
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  707802Customer Support / Customer Service RepresentativeDuration: Long term contract / ongoing contractRate: $16/hrIf you meet the below qualifications, please send a Word Document resume to dfisher@apexsystemsinc.com Qualified candidates will possess the following qualities:- Highly Organized- Studious- Effective in team settings- Punctual- Strong aptitude for learning and adapting to changing technologies- Excellent communication and interpersonal skillsJob Description:- Support internal executives by setting-up, scheduling, and supporting of the client product line.- Performing live demos for prospective clients- Teleconferencing with customersEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Customer Support/Customer Service Representative Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-support-customer-service-representative-job-austin-tx-us-177892860.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8fd48a187ff4e7f7cccc23aa8e196787
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:39:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Entry Level Sales ManagerAre you ready to begin your last career?Training:In the classroom, and in the field, our most accomplished sales professionals will teach you their most time-tested formulas that directly lead to their successes. Cross-selling, referral networking, and benefit package sales are some examples of the professional mentoring you will receive.Requirements:Excellent Communication SkillsCommitment to Excellence with a Winning AttitudeCoachable and Accountable Team PlayerHigh Personal Integrity and CharacterWork Ethic, Self-Motivation, and a Desire to SucceedA Passion for Helping Other People EverydayMaking a DifferenceUSHA advisors are making a real difference in people’s lives. Our trusted advisors planning can impact, and protect, families for generations. We pride ourselves on being a unified company who share our values of commitment and dedication with our customers. As a result of current economic conditions, our clients are looking for viable alternatives to their current benefit programs and the demand for our products and services has never been greater!Benefits:Industry Leading Compensation and Rewards ProgramsExceptional Product Portfolio (Numerous Product Lines)Weekly Direct DepositPerformance Bonuses (up to 16 Bonuses Annually)1st year income potential $100,000+ (Sr Leaders $200,000+)Stock Sharing ProgramsResidual IncomeProfessional Coaching and MentorshipCompany Generated LeadsNational Sales Awards Trips (Exotic Locations)Career Advancements Based on MeritEntry Level Sales Manager position is also relevant to job seekers with various work backgrounds such as; Sales, Marketing, Military, Finance, Business, Real Estate, Executives, Banking, Leasing, Financial Services, Managers, Customer Service, Retail Sales, Education, Business Graduates, Regional and Territory Sales.",Entry Level Sales Manager Job in Austin,,"Entry Level Sales ManagerAre you ready to begin your last career?Training:In the classroom, and in the field, our most accomplished sales professionals will teach you their most time-tested formulas that directly lead to their successes. Cross-selling, referral networking, and benefit package sales are some examples of the professional mentoring you will receive.Requirements:Excellent Communication SkillsCommitment to Excellence with a Winning AttitudeCoachable and Accountable Team PlayerHigh Personal Integrity and CharacterWork Ethic, Self-Motivation, and a Desire to SucceedA Passion for Helping Other People EverydayMaking a DifferenceUSHA advisors are making a real difference in people’s lives. Our trusted advisors planning can impact, and protect, families for generations. We pride ourselves on being a unified company who share our values of commitment and dedication with our customers. As a result of current economic conditions, our clients are looking for viable alternatives to their current benefit programs and the demand for our products and services has never been greater!Benefits:Industry Leading Compensation and Rewards ProgramsExceptional Product Portfolio (Numerous Product Lines)Weekly Direct DepositPerformance Bonuses (up to 16 Bonuses Annually)1st year income potential $100,000+ (Sr Leaders $200,000+)Stock Sharing ProgramsResidual IncomeProfessional Coaching and MentorshipCompany Generated LeadsNational Sales Awards Trips (Exotic Locations)Career Advancements Based on MeritEntry Level Sales Manager position is also relevant to job seekers with various work backgrounds such as; Sales, Marketing, Military, Finance, Business, Real Estate, Executives, Banking, Leasing, Financial Services, Managers, Customer Service, Retail Sales, Education, Business Graduates, Regional and Territory Sales.",All Personal and Household Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-sales-manager-job-austin-tx-us-177773488.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=3,"65,000.00 - 131,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,9bfdc530d9d3ff26352940770114ad4f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aptean is a leading provider of mission critical enterprise software solutions. We build and acquire industry-focused solutions to support the evolving operational needs of our customers. Our solutions help nearly 5,000 organizations stay at the forefront of their industries by enabling them to operate more efficiently, thereby ensuring higher customer satisfaction. For more information, visit www.aptean.com. Provide leadership to implement and deliver overall MES and system integration solutions, with a focus on both the software delivery and the change management associated with a successful project.  Participate as a member of the implementation team to deploy new projects, and/or provide on-going support to their existing installation.   Consult with customers in the configuration and usage of application modules; research and resolves problems and issues. Manage customer expectations and foster positive business relationships.  Facilitate customer training & workshops to discover and document customer requirements, and also provide market-driven product requirements back to the internal product team.  When necessary, participate in the preparation of sales proposals. Requires interface with customers and other team members. Will involve frequent travel to customer sites, estimated 70%. Scope Knowledge: Having broad expertise or unique knowledge, uses skills to contribute to development of company objectives and principles and to achieve goals in creative and effective ways. Contributes as both an individual and an informal supervisor on assigned projects. ·         Understands the manufacturing industry and business environment served by Factory MES ·         Has experience in client-facing professional services in a manufacturing environment ·         Has led change management projects involving multi-functional teams Complexity: Works on significant and unique issues where analysis of situations or data requires an evaluation of intangibles. Exercises independent judgment in methods, techniques and evaluation criteria for obtaining results. Creates formal networks involving coordination among groups. ·         Able to instruct customers on the set-up and usage of standard application features ·         Able to engage multi-functional business teams from shop floor to C-level ·         Follows standard practices and procedures in services delivery and ticket management Supervision: Acts independently to determine methods and procedures on new or special assignments. Serves as a mentor to others. Supervises others when leading projects they own.   Principal Duties and Responsibilities Consulting Services Provide consulting services to customers based on Aptean’s service delivery methodology and procedures; services engagements may include implementation consulting, upgrade consulting, training, testing, and/or process improvement consulting Effectively work on multiple projects simultaneously Work collaboratively with project manager and project team to deliver projects on time, on budget, on schedule Submit time and expenses punctually each week Maintain a professional appearance when onsite with customers Project Delivery Work to an existing project template on all aspects of the project deliverables Provide expert insight into signal scoping, project execution, assignment of roles and responsibilities, setting clear & realistic milestones Present system capabilities and benefits to multi-functional teams at all levels of the business, to raise awareness of what’s in it for them Train the teams, and engage the C-level to ensure the go-live is aligned to core management strategies Provide on-site support during go-live, coaching and mentoring new users to ensure self-sufficient operational excellence is delivered and maintained Expand expertise within the product Attend training sessions offered and use self-study tools; assist with peer training as needed Contribute to a customer focused environment that encourages information sharing, team-based resolution activity, cross training and an absolute focus on resolving customer incidents as quickly and effectively as possible Create KB articles and documents using the Knowledge Centered Support (KCS) methodology, to be published and shared both internally and with the customer base Ensure that all internal and external customer interactions are handled professionally and with the highest level of service, follow-through and consistently keep commitments Knowledge Management Communication b.    Ensure a professional communication manner when in-person or on the phone at all times 5.    Additional Duties a.    Assist in the resolution of customer escalations to improve customer experience b.    Provide mentorship to other members of the Customer Solutions team c.    Recommend improvements in Customer Solutions policies and procedures d.    Participate in system and release testing and QA as needed e.    Additional duties as assigned by management Education Bachelor's degree required Work Experience (Indicate the approximate years of relevant work experience necessary for this position) Typically requires a minimum of 6 years of related experience with a Bachelor’s degree; or 5 years and a Master’s degree; or a PhD with 4 years’ experience; or equivalent experience. Typical range of experience is 6-9 years. ·         Requires 5 - 7 years of professional experience in a manufacturing environment ·         Has led or participated in lean manufacturing projects in a project management or industrial engineering capacity ·         Has work experience in customer-facing professional services ·         ERP software implementation experience is a plus Knowledge ·         Possesses working knowledge of MES applications and demonstrates proficiency in key areas of the application, with a particular focus on Performance KPIs and BI, Quality Management, and CI practices ·         Understands the implementation of ERP software in a manufacturing environment and the natural touch points with MES ·         Knows the industry and business environment served by the application (food and beverage, consumer packaged goods, pharmaceutical and automotive) ·         Basic understanding of relational database concepts and architecture ·         Knowledge of the project management discipline including managing risk, directing people, and controlling scope to deliver projects on tie and within budget   Skills and Abilities ·         Excellent time management and organizational skills ·         Excellent verbal and written communication skills and ability to effectively communicate at all levels of an organization ·         Strong presentation and facilitation needs ·         Ability to work efficiently and independently and do whatever it takes to get the job done ·         Ability to handle difficult or sensitive situations with diplomacy and tact ·         Track record in providing outstanding customer service PMP / PRINCE2 certification a plus Aptean, Inc., is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer. In accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws No applicant for employment with Aptean shall be subjected to discrimination because of race, color, sex, national origin, religion, disability, age, covered military veteran status, reprisal for engaging in anti-discrimination activities, protected genetic information, sexual orientation or parental status.   *LI-AM1    ",Lead Customer Solutions Consultant Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30319",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-customer-solutions-consultant-job-atlanta-ga-us-177998074.aspx?mescoid=4100681001001&jobPosition=9,,,5161fbc700993e35a3e2a94f8e04974b
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job This prestigious full service engineering consulting firm is a leader in sustainable building design.Their growth has created an opportunity for an Electrical Design Engineer in their Austin office.In this role, you will prepare preliminary electrical design layouts and calculations and provide support to Project Managers and Project Engineers on complex building design projects.This is a high-visibility position with strong career potential, and offers a competitive salary and excellent company benefits.Job requirements:BS in Electrical EngineeringCertification as an EIT preferred2 to 5 years' experience in building design engineeringExperience in the design of electrical building systems (such as power, lighting, fire alarm, and telecommunications)Experience in use of 2D/3D modeling software (such as AutoCAD and Revit)Proficiency with building and electrical codes and standardsThis client prefers a candidate who currently resides in the greater Austin area. We are an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. Report","Company Confidential Job Application for Electrical Design Engineer - MEP - Direct Hire - Austin | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Confidential,Architectural and Design Services; Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office; Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/electrical-design-engineer-mep-direct-hire-austin-job-austin-tx-us-178157605.aspx?mescoid=1700169001001&jobPosition=3,,,3a42ecf2454e470999aa1264f2128d28
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"A very reputable Commercial Drywall Company is seeking an experienced Drywall Estimator/Project Manager to add to their team. This is a progressive company expected to grow extensively in the next few years. If you are looking for your forever career, this is it! Drywall Estimator Functions: • Preparing proposals• Maintain construction documents• Submit RFI’s as needed to architects, engineers, and/or general contractors for clarifications on scope of work and drawing details• Compile submittal information and submit to general contractors• Review, estimate, price, and change orders on active projects Drywall Estimator Qualifications:• Knowledge in basic math and reading blueprints• 3+ years of drywall estimating/ project management• Capable of handling multiple projects and meeting deadlines• Proficient in reading architectural and structural documents Compensation:• Competitive base pay• Excellent benefits packageTake the next step in your Drywall Estimator/Project Management career. APPLY NOW! Please contact Amanda Biteler directly at amanda.biteler@gogpac.com or 605-809-8569 for more information on this or any other positions you may be interested in. GPAC (Growing People and Companies) is an award winning search firm specializing in placing quality professionals within multiple industries across the United States over the past 23 years. We are extremely competitive, client-focused and realize that our value is in our ability to deliver the right solutions at the right time.",Commercial Drywall Estimator/Project Manager Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-drywall-estimator-project-manager-job-austin-tx-us-177370966.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=15,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,a72c9d94cc9782524c55aa8d8de6265a
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is currently in search of a UI Engineer for a Fortune 500 Financial Services Company in Austin, TX. This is a long-term Contract position.  Unable to work C2C- must be able to work on Judge Groups W2. Description of Role:We are looking for a UI Engineer to build responsive and accessible: landing pages, email templates, and websites. Candidate will work ""hands-on"" with a large volume of projects, will be expected to lead large scale project implementation and help create and uphold quality standards, templates, support systems and processes. The ideal candidate will have a can-do attitude, passion for technology, extensive HTML/CSS/JavaScript development experience, and be a quick learner. Qualifications:Ability to work in a team environment, building responsive and accessible websites. Deep understanding of HTML and CSS Approach technical challenges with an open mind and desire to innovate Working knowledge of Adobe Photoshop and Illustrator A good ideology for managing maintainable, scalable and cross-browser code across large sites Understanding how to optimize emails across a variety of different clients Experience working with jQuery and/or other JavaScript libraries. Understanding of Usability and User Experience Familiar with SVGs and icon fonts. Familiarity with Javascript task runnersQualified Candidates should send a Word attached copy of their Resume to Leila Pomales at lpomales@judge.com",UI Engineer,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ui-engineer-creative-center-job-austin-tx-us-177031611.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,a1cf205dcd465ac0a1b8e865db554a22
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  717108Looking for a seasoned Solutions Architect -Delivery Must have:• Architecting business-sponsored enterprise solutions within the Microsoft stack (Server 2008/2012, HA/Failover Clustering)• Ownership of the designing, documenting and delivering vendor integration solutions, in-house custom developed solutions and COTS solutions within a structured SDLC model• Designing and providing technical oversight in provisioning and deploying implementing highly scalable, fault tolerant infrastructure solutions across multiple platforms i.e. Linux, Microsoft, Oracle, etc.Nice to have:• Architecting and driving the implementation of  virtualization technologies i.e. VMWare, SAN, etc.• Understanding and designing complex DB structures within SQL and Oracle (Build, HA/Failover Clustering, etc.)• Impeccable written and oral communication skills, experience producing project artifacts i.e. low level design docs, technical specifications, technical support documents etc.• Capital Markets trading, back office, and market data systemsResponsibilities:Project delivery focused, this individual will partner with Architects to implement complex enterprise solutions and their associated systems\network infrastructure as needed to support Client’s Corporate Investment Banking group, Candidate must have the ability to support multiple projects concurrently. Additional responsibilities include technical project documentation (Assessments, Diagrams, Operational\Support Handoff, Etc.).  Additional Information: Please click on the attached job description below to view a more detailed description of the position. This position is CONTRACT ONLY.A Bachelors Degree is preferred for this role, however candidates with commensurate experience will be considered.     If you are interested, please contact: hfasil@apexsystemsinc.comEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",EIS Appl Svcs Capital Mkts Solutions Architect Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/eis-appl-svcs-capital-mkts-solutions-architect-job-atlanta-ga-us-178342718.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4e4215e824755d2bb7dfe9a79325fe30
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Returned Mail Processor will use hand-held barcode scanners and mag-stripe readers to process returned card envelopes. Expectations are 1750 cards or more processed per hour. Accuracy is critical for this role; experience with Outlook and Excel required; experience with office automation equipment (scanners, copiers, fax machines) required.This part-time position will be available to work between the hours of 7:30am and 6:00pm, Mon-Fri, for a period of 90-180 days. Volume will fluctuate on a daily basis and weekly basis; some days may have more hours than others. The number of hours worked weekly is in the range of 20 to 30 hours per week. The number of hours worked per week may vary. This role will also be responsible for other duties as assigned.Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Familiarity and experience using hand-held barcode scanners and mag-stripe readersMust be able to work under deadlines and high volume pressure with little supervisionExcellent capacity for attention to detailInteract with staff members and others encountered in the course of workLearn and apply new information or skillsAble to work independently and also as a strong team player with a positive ""can do"" attitude, working with the team to adhere to daily deadlinesMS Outlook, Word, and Excel 07 skillsAs provided in Background Check policy, eligible candidates may be subject to drug, criminal history, and credit checks, which will be conducted and used in accordance with applicable local, state, and federal laws",Part time Mail Processor Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-mail-processor-job-austin-tx-us-177884023.aspx?mescoid=4300757001001&jobPosition=11,,Other,41c306a705fc4ef506da75705fec968a
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Our success continues with you!   Our concept is culinary-driven. That means your role is absolutely vital to our success. We provide the freshest ingredients, the cleanest kitchens, top of the line equipment, and standards of operation that are simply unmatched in our industry. But it takes your talent and your vision to make excellence an everyday reality for our guests.   As a Culinary Partner, you manage the back of the house. From training to food prep to the perfect execution of our recipes, our reputation is in your hands. If you’re looking for the chance to drive a global success story, we’ll give you the opportunity – and the rewards – you deserve.   Requirements Requirements: ·         3-4 years of culinary management experience in a high-volume restaurant or seasonal Management experience ·         Graduate from an accredited culinary program preferred ·         Previous restaurant management experience preferred ·         Must be able to work an average of 55 hours per week ·         Work closely with the management team to identify and develop employees for future leadership roles ·         Must be able to facilitate and effectively execute training ·         Ability to handle difficult/challenging situations ·         Ability to manage a large team while delegating tasks and ensuring consistent follow-up ·         Strong communication and organizational skills ·         Read, write and speak English fluently   Benefits: We value our employees’ time and efforts. Our commitment to your success is enhanced by our competitive salary, bonus plan, and an extensive benefits package including medical, dental and vision benefits, 401K plan and future growth opportunities within the company. Plus, we work to maintain the best possible environment for our employees, where people can learn and grow with the company.   Apply online today!       P.F. Chang's is an Equal Opportunity and e-Verify Employer.",Executive Chef Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-chef-job-atlanta-ga-us-177930733.aspx?mescoid=3500601001001&jobPosition=7,,Food Services/Hospitality,e8b11ddc62fcb3a8f9a121639c6e3c44
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is currently looking for a Director of Food Safety and Quality Assurance for a client in Georgia (GA).  The ideal candidate will have an extensive Food Safety / Quality Assurance background within the red meat / beef processing industry.  Job Responsibilities:Responsible for the management and development of all areas within the Food Safety / Quality Assurance divisionIdentify areas in need of improvement in order to develop and implement short & long-term approaches for continuous improvement within all areas of Food Safety & Quality Assurance in the facilityResponsible for building and managing a sturdy FSQA team through effective recruiting, ongoing training/coaching, and solid team cultureProvide strong leadership and constructive feedback to ensure the success of the FSQA division and its Food Safety and Quality Assurance programs and strategiesProvide Food Safety and Quality Assurance guidance that is compliant with all Federal, State, and Local food regulations, as well as client specifications/standardsJob Qualifications & Requirements:Minimum of 10+ years of progressive Food Safety or Quality leadership experience requiredMinimum of 5+ years of experience in a beef (strongly preferred), protein and/or food processing facility requiredBachelor’s Degree in Food Science, Microbiology, Animal Science, or related field requiredStrong knowledge / understanding of the different aspects of food manufacturing within further processing operationsStrong knowledge / understanding of all quality assurance / food safety regulations (Federal, State, and Local)**Relocation assistance is provided!**",Director of Food Safety & Quality Assurance Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-food-safety-quality-assurance-job-atlanta-ga-us-178146711.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,547ed152eadbb43eb7f9c4b3154fcac0
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionAs an Automated Logistical Specialist in the Army National Guard, you will learn the ins and outs of supply chain management, from storage and distribution to warehouse management and record keeping. Major duties include:Establishing and maintaining records, such as stock lists, inventory, material control, accounting, and supply reportsReviewing and verifying quantities received against bills of lading, contracts, purchase requests, and shipping documentsUnloading and storing incoming supplies and equipmentMaintaining stock locator system and administering document control proceduresProcessing requests and turn-in documents at direct support level through warehousing sectionPerforming prescribed load list and shop stock list duties in manual and automated supply applicationsPreparing, annotating, and distributing shipping documentsOperating material-handling equipmentYou will join a team that makes sure Guard units are equipped to respond to any challenges put before them. This vital position ensures the Guard's overall state of readiness while giving you the experience you need to begin or further a career in supply chain or warehouse management.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Automated Logistical Specialist job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 12 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in handling and storing stock. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",A Automated Logistical Specialist - Supply Chain Job in Ellenwood,Full Time Employee,"Ellenwood, GA 30294",,http://jobview.monster.com/92a-automated-logistical-specialist-supply-chain-job-ellenwood-ga-us-178216595.aspx?mescoid=1300084001001&jobPosition=13,,Entry Level,0bf3c1011690406c83a7a9225d5d3c47
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Job ID:  93551  Summary The Content Manager will be responsible for creating, improving and maintaining content to support the overall communications strategy for Oldcastle and achieve our overall business goals. Primary responsibility includes researching, sourcing, writing and editing and curating interesting content for various communication channels.This position will also be responsible for the production of company newsletters (print and electronic), development of presentations, maintaining intranet sites and external websites, managing, supporting the communications team with content for multi-channel distribution and expanding the company’s social media presence. The ideal candidate is an experienced professional with demonstrable creative writing coupled with CMS and social media skills. As a Content manager, you should perform well under deadlines and be detail-oriented. Responsibilities Collaborates across functions to deliver an effective content strategy and editorial plan to meet the business objectivesDevelop and maintain an editorial calendarCreate and publish engaging contentBuild a photo and collateral archiveEdit, proofread and improve messagingDevelopment of editorial governance so content is consistent with our brand voice, style and tone.Use content management systems to analyze website traffic and users engagement metricsBuild, manage and expand the company’s social media profiles and presenceChannel management of digital content hubs and all supporting social channels including email / newsletter distribution.Solid understanding of basic best practices of communication channels, which content and approaches work on each and whyActively hunt, gather and tell stories — see connections where others don’t Qualifications  EducationBA/BS degree Experience 2+ years as a writer/content manager ( experience in the B2B industry preferred), maintaining a high-impact, high-paced editorial calendarExcellent writing skillsKnowledge of journalism standards and best practices, as well as AP styleHighly organized & proactive with strong ownership sensibility and a true passion for content curationExcellent communication and presentation skills – Oral and writtenInterpersonal savvy- Relates well to all levels of people in and out of the organizationAttention to detail; Looks for ways to improve and promote qualityHands on experience with CMS (including SharePoint and Joomla) and MS Office SuiteBasic technical knowledge of HTML and web publishingKnowledge of SEO and web traffic metricsAbility to successfully manage multiple schedules and projects simultaneouslyTeam-oriented and collaborative with the ability to manage relationships with internal and external partners Experience creating content for the web and growing a social audienceEditorial mindset that seeks to understand what audiences consume and how to create itProject management skills and understanding how to manage the priorities of multiple stakeholders in a complex environment and focus on the delivery of quality resultsExperience with graphic design is a plusProficiency in Spanish is a plus What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join our Talent Community to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Content Manager - Corporate Communications - Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/content-manager-corporate-communications-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177361848.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=14,,,d18f0ccfa17db70a3a31d9dba0512a7f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Sales Operations Analyst works closely with Americas Sales management and other key leadership in the Sales and IT organizations.  This is an entry level position. This role will be located in Austin, Texas and reports to the Manager of Sales Operations.  The primary responsibility of this position is communicating and implementing corporate sales processes and best practices within Salesforce.com and other sales tools to enable the Americas sales team. Essential Functions Optimize use of sales tools, enforce best practices with regional sales leaders Aid Regional VP and Regional Directors in tracking and reporting territory coverage models Account, Opportunity, and Territory Alignment in Salesforce.com.  Track new hires/exits within the system and update user access. Answer reporting requests using Salesforce.com, MS Office and Cloud9 forecasting tool Aid in billings and revenue forecast process Approve commission splits and return/rebills and provide regular communication with commission team Liaison between Sales and other functional groups including IT Helpdesk, Order Processing, and Pricing Provide ad hoc analyses to the Executive and Sales Management  Perform other duties and projects as assigned Education and Experience Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience. 0-2 years direct experience in Sales Operations, IT, and/or Business Strategy. Knowledge of Salesforce.com, proficient in MS office, knowledge of database and sales support software applications. Mid - large size public company experience ($200M+ in annual revenues). Ability and personality to articulate processes in a meaningful way for our sales field and IT teams. Strong analytical and accuracy skills required. Be a confident self-starter. Effective presentation, organizational, and MS Office skills. Excellent verbal and written communication and the ability to interact professionally with diverse groups, executives, managers, and subject matter experts. Strong experience in building financial models preferred. Experience working with compensation management software (Xactly) is desirable. #LI-LM1 WBSN123    ",Sales Operations Coordinator Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX 73301",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-operations-coordinator-job-austin-tx-us-177559975.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,91ea5a3373e9cb2e51039e468db4e5ff
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  714849Senior Project Manager, Data CenterRemote position.  Minimal travel (0-20%).$120,000-140,000 annually, DOEContract-to-HireSenior Project Manager must be able to clear a Drug screen, Credit check, and Background check, including Education and Employment verifications.The project will involve an entire data center transformation, large-scale migrations, and networking infrastructure upgrades.  PM will manage project teams, budgets, communication with internal teams and external clients (including executives), and make technical recommendations.Position requires direct interaction with external client executive sponsors and senior account leaders. Responsible for leading projects with contract values ranging from $500K-3M+. Candidate must be experienced leading project teams through all phases of the standard project lifecycle: Initiation, Planning, Execution and Shutdown. It is preferred that this individual have experience and training requisite of a formal, documented Project Management environment (PMM, PMI, PRINCE II, etc.) and methodology.If you meet the qualifications and are interested in applying, please send your Word resume to cdennison@apexsystemsinc.com.Responsibilities:- Experience in communications/management at C-Level- Document meeting, coordinates status reports and approvals on deliverables and sponsor status reports, minutes, etc.- Lead preparation and execution of overall project plan and maintain open communications among project participants and affected parties- Maintain strong focus on Customer Satisfaction by delivering exceptional project performance and predictable, repeatable project results- Perform analysis that reflect actual vs. planned cost at the project level and access impact of labor and cost variances- Create and maintain baseline cost estimate at the project level and work through informal channels in order to obtain informationQualifications:- 12(+) years of specific project/program management experience- Demonstrated experience working within a large program management office environment and experience leading multiple-project programs- Infrastructure consulting project experience, specifically managing large enterprise customers and data center transformation projects- Technical background and ability to make recommendations for networking - LAN/WAN, transition management, application rationalization, etc.- Proven track record of successful project delivery results and project assets to describe scope and work performed- Experience working within the entire project lifecycle – Initiation, Planning, Execution and Shutdown – through multiple projects- Proficient with standard project management tools - Microsoft Project, Project Server, all Microsoft Office applications etc.- Exceptional written and verbal communications skills including experience with executive level presentations and interactions- Working knowledge of quality assurance methods, tools, and techniques experience evaluating products / services from multiple vendors and produce written vendor solution recommendations detailing candidates; benefits and drawbacks- Advanced university degree highly preferred- PMP certification; PMI membership and participation highly preferred- Quality program experience such as ISO-9000, CMMI or Six Sigma implementation and assessments highly preferredEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Senior Project Manager - Data Center experience required Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-manager-data-center-experience-required-job-austin-tx-us-177891774.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),95707500a38464acff1fcd27b75f9523
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Project Manager - Commercial ConstructionResumes to: careers@directhr.comOur client is global leader and manufacturer of outdoor equipment that you will find at school, churches, day cares, corporations and fitness centers.  They recognize market trends and safety regulations and offer unique product designs utilizing the best quality materials.  They are seeking to hire a Senior Project Manager to manage a team and oversee the entire project cycle, from strategy and development to completion. They will be responsible for monitoring the planning/scheduling, pricing and review of the design and installation plans.  Responsibilities:Manage a team of project managers; train & develop staffManage and coordinate various projects; ensure projects are completed within budget & schedule; meeting client needsEnsure project designs are within compliance standards including engineering and company principlesMonitor project plans according to standards of construction for each phaseEvaluate project proposals and contracts, approving job forecastsMaintain client and vendor relationshipsManage job profitability, budget and schedulingProvide recommendations that will improve quality and cost reductionResponsible for reporting and billing for each project ensuring cost efficiency and accuracyRequirements:Bachelor’s Degree preferred in Construction ManagementMin. 5+ years project management experienceMin. 3+ years’ experience managing a teamKnowledge of Prolog, Suretrak, Primavera and ViewpointExperience in construction planning, design, engineering, conceptual estimating and CPM schedulingUnderstanding of construction industryStrong Leadership and management skillsProficient in Microsoft Office and Microsoft ProjectExcellent problem-solving and decision making skillsAbility to travel up to 25% - 50% Offering:Base Salary $90,000 - $110,000+ (based on experience)Bonus PotentialFull Benefits Package, 401K, PTO Resumes to: careers@directhr.comDirect Sales Recruiting, LLC, (DSR) and DirectHR are National Recruitment organizations partnering with National, Regional and Local Clients to bring qualified candidates a career and a future. DSR offers over 50 years combined Recruitment, Sales and Management experience. We are, along with our clients, an Equal Opportunity Employer and are committed to hiring and supporting a diverse workforce. A M/F/D/V  ",Senior Project Manager - Commercial Construction Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Manufacturing - OtherArchitectural and Design ServicesConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-manager-commercial-construction-job-austin-tx-us-177704786.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=4,"90,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",Project/Program Management,88eeba1f8069459b62dbe0be903975fd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Benefits Professional Job in Marietta,Full Time,"Marietta, GA 30060",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/benefits-professional-job-marietta-ga-us-177043497.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,28566017cb72223f197c83c19c254ee2
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHENEGA GOVERNMENT CONSULTING, LLC Company Job Title:Executive Assistant - CGC Chenega Job Title:Administrator IV, OfficeClearance:NACILocation:Atlanta, GAReports to:Program ManagerFLSA Status:Regular, Full-time, Hourly, Non-exemptPrepared Date:12/12/2016Approved Date: 12/12/2016 Summary:Chenega Government Consulting, LLC is seeking an Executive Assistant to support the Center for Disease Control and Prevention's (CDC) Division of HIV/AIDS Prevention (DHAP). CDC's DHAP works to provide national leadership and support for HIV epidemiologic research and surveillance of the behaviors and determinants of HIV transmission and disease progression, and for prevention research and the development, implementation, and evaluation of evidence-based HIV prevention programs serving persons affected by or at risk for HIV infection. There are eight offices and 10 branches that support the Division's goals to prevent HIV infection and reduce the incidence of HIV related illness and death. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: (Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position)E-Clearance of publications: Provide coordination services for the publication clearance process as DHAP's Division Clearance Coordinator.E-Clearance of publications: Provide support services in administering a systematic process and tracking for publications, brochures, abstracts, fact sheets, power point presentations, website material, and training materials. This also includes cross-clearance of documents with the ADS offices in other divisions, centers, institutes and offices (CIO's).E-Clearance of publications: Respond to requests from the National Center for HIV, Viral Hepatitis, STD, and TB Prevention (NCHHSTP) ADS Office on clearance.E-Clearance of publications: Communications with authors regarding document routing and status.E-Clearance of abstracts: Provide administrative support in creating a list of abstracts/authors who will be attending high profile conferences. Includes updating with additions and deletions and dissemination to DHAP.E-Clearance: Provide administrative support services for e-clearance Weekly Past due summary and track and monitor compliance from the DHAP authors.Clearance of publications outside e-clearance: Respond to clearance requests on various written communications, e.g., policy and media documents.Policy portal: Keep ongoing listing of articles for the policy portal. MMWR HIV Awareness Day publications: Provide assistance in processing MMWR submissions for MMWR Weekly Reports of HIV/AIDS Awareness Days. Charles C. Shepard Science Award: Provide administrative services for the Charles C. Shepard Science Award process. Research protocol processing: Prove administrative support services to the Deputy ADS in the electronic project determination process and IRB protocols which includes routing.Research protocol processing: Provide administrative support services for human subjects tracking forms.Provide office supplies as requested.Maintain office equipment for the ADS.Weekly TRIP Seminar: Provide administrative support services in coordinating and administering the weekly Turning Research into Prevention (TRIP) and ADS In-Service Seminars. Weekly TRIP Seminar: Provide support services for processing requests for TRIP travel and processing other invitations to speakers, e.g., for CDC Public Health Grand Rounds. Includes working with scientific staff inside and outside CDC to ensure that topics are appropriate and valuable for DHAP and that the speakers are well-supported when presenting to DHAP.Travel: Provide administrative support service for travel and registration for the ADS and Deputy ADS to attend high profile conferences. Purchasing: Provide administrative support services for purchases such as books, training guides, and one-day seminars.Scheduling: Provide calendar scheduling assistance for ADS office staff for meetings, for example, Vital signs, Charles C. Shepard Awards, etc. Epidemic Intelligence Services (EIS): Provide administrative support services for EIS recruitment and for the weekly DHAP Orientation Series. Non-Essential Duties:Other duties as assigned.Supervisory Responsibilities:None.Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.) Minimum of a High School diploma with some college is preferred. Minimum of 5-8 years of administrative support experience with 3-5 years of experience in a similar setting supporting several people simultaneously.Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Individuals must have strong organizational skills.Knowledge and experience related to the job function.Has excellent interpersonal and communication skills.Ability to work with a variety of staff to reach a common goal. Demonstrated technical expertise in Outlook. Must demonstrate proficiency in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, GovTrip/Concur, and A.S.K. Diversity:Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce.Ethics: Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.Physical Demands:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.Work Environment:The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise. Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Native preference under PL 93-638. We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",Executive Assistant CGC Job in Atlanta,"Full Time , Employee","CHENEGA GOVERNMENT CONSULTING, LLC Company Job Title:Executive Assistant - CGC Chenega Job Title:Administrator IV, OfficeClearance:NACILocation:Atlanta, GAReports to:Program ManagerFLSA Status:Regular, Full-time, Hourly, Non-exemptPrepared Date:12/12/2016Approved Date: 12/12/2016 Summary:Chenega Government Consulting, LLC is seeking an Executive Assistant to support the Center for Disease Control and Prevention's (CDC) Division of HIV/AIDS Prevention (DHAP). CDC's DHAP works to provide national leadership and support for HIV epidemiologic research and surveillance of the behaviors and determinants of HIV transmission and disease progression, and for prevention research and the development, implementation, and evaluation of evidence-based HIV prevention programs serving persons affected by or at risk for HIV infection. There are eight offices and 10 branches that support the Division's goals to prevent HIV infection and reduce the incidence of HIV related illness and death. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: (Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position)E-Clearance of publications: Provide coordination services for the publication clearance process as DHAP's Division Clearance Coordinator.E-Clearance of publications: Provide support services in administering a systematic process and tracking for publications, brochures, abstracts, fact sheets, power point presentations, website material, and training materials. This also includes cross-clearance of documents with the ADS offices in other divisions, centers, institutes and offices (CIO's).E-Clearance of publications: Respond to requests from the National Center for HIV, Viral Hepatitis, STD, and TB Prevention (NCHHSTP) ADS Office on clearance.E-Clearance of publications: Communications with authors regarding document routing and status.E-Clearance of abstracts: Provide administrative support in creating a list of abstracts/authors who will be attending high profile conferences. Includes updating with additions and deletions and dissemination to DHAP.E-Clearance: Provide administrative support services for e-clearance Weekly Past due summary and track and monitor compliance from the DHAP authors.Clearance of publications outside e-clearance: Respond to clearance requests on various written communications, e.g., policy and media documents.Policy portal: Keep ongoing listing of articles for the policy portal. MMWR HIV Awareness Day publications: Provide assistance in processing MMWR submissions for MMWR Weekly Reports of HIV/AIDS Awareness Days. Charles C. Shepard Science Award: Provide administrative services for the Charles C. Shepard Science Award process. Research protocol processing: Prove administrative support services to the Deputy ADS in the electronic project determination process and IRB protocols which includes routing.Research protocol processing: Provide administrative support services for human subjects tracking forms.Provide office supplies as requested.Maintain office equipment for the ADS.Weekly TRIP Seminar: Provide administrative support services in coordinating and administering the weekly Turning Research into Prevention (TRIP) and ADS In-Service Seminars. Weekly TRIP Seminar: Provide support services for processing requests for TRIP travel and processing other invitations to speakers, e.g., for CDC Public Health Grand Rounds. Includes working with scientific staff inside and outside CDC to ensure that topics are appropriate and valuable for DHAP and that the speakers are well-supported when presenting to DHAP.Travel: Provide administrative support service for travel and registration for the ADS and Deputy ADS to attend high profile conferences. Purchasing: Provide administrative support services for purchases such as books, training guides, and one-day seminars.Scheduling: Provide calendar scheduling assistance for ADS office staff for meetings, for example, Vital signs, Charles C. Shepard Awards, etc. Epidemic Intelligence Services (EIS): Provide administrative support services for EIS recruitment and for the weekly DHAP Orientation Series. Non-Essential Duties:Other duties as assigned.Supervisory Responsibilities:None.Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.) Minimum of a High School diploma with some college is preferred. Minimum of 5-8 years of administrative support experience with 3-5 years of experience in a similar setting supporting several people simultaneously.Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Individuals must have strong organizational skills.Knowledge and experience related to the job function.Has excellent interpersonal and communication skills.Ability to work with a variety of staff to reach a common goal. Demonstrated technical expertise in Outlook. Must demonstrate proficiency in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, GovTrip/Concur, and A.S.K. Diversity:Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce.Ethics: Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.Physical Demands:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.Work Environment:The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise. Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Native preference under PL 93-638. We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-cgc-job-atlanta-ga-us-177552521.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bf6c2961656cf7b4cf4d352afafce567
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionNewspapers, Web sites, broadcast television, and radio programs are an important source of general information about people and events in the Army National Guard. Broadcast journalists are involved in writing, producing, and presenting digital and broadcast news, entertainment, and music programming.In the Army National Guard, these duties are generally performed by the Public Affairs Broadcast Specialist. Public Affairs Broadcast Specialists are primarily responsible for participating in and supervising the operation of radio or television broadcast teams or the Armed Forces Radio Television Service. Public Affairs Broadcast Specialists learn how to operate a video camera, program a disc jockey show, and put on a live-to-tape television newscast in all positions (anchor, control room operator, director, and camera person).Plus, you'll be building a better future. The skills you learn as a Public Affairs Broadcast Specialist will help prepare you for a future with wire services, and radio and television stations. You'll be qualified to pursue a career as a journalist, newscaster, disc jockey, writer, director, producer, editor, or correspondent.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Public Affairs Broadcast Specialist consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and up to 12 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",R Public Affairs Broadcast Specialist Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30060",,http://jobview.monster.com/46r-public-affairs-broadcast-specialist-job-marietta-ga-us-178214255.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,a12ef6fbfe0069a9bd866353610325f8
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Document Solutions Consultants are outside sales representatives who focus on expanding the sales of Managed Print Services, small format and wide format equipment sales, reprographics sales and placements of the ARC Skysite SmartScreens. Document Solutions Consultants drive new business growth by scheduling presentations with new prospects as well as our existing clients with the goal of closing sales or expanding the solutions already in place. Job Duties and Responsibilities include:Identifies development potential in accounts by studying current business metrics; interviewing key customer contacts, uncovering and presenting additional new business opportunities.Utilizes salesforce.com on a daily basis to manage the sales pipeline and close opportunities consistently in all products assigned.Initiates and follows sales process by understanding client's business drivers, building relationships; qualifying potential opportunities; presenting and closing business. Is able to close business by overcoming objections.Is responsible for building and managing an active pipeline of opportunities within assigned territory.Is able to prepare and present to all levels within client organization.Interacts with sales leadership and operational leaders to develop sales strategies that win new business.Understands the ARC Document Solution's Value Proposition and competitive advantages with the ability to deliver it formally to clients.Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; training sessions; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in industry events and organizations.Understands components of margin and manages to maximize profitability.Performs position expectations as detailed in the ARC Standards of Performance document for this position.Ability to be a collaborative, consultative, innovative, positive professional who is customer focused, organized and self-motivated.Exhibits professional demeanor and is an effective verbal and written communicator.Performs other duties as assigned. Required Experience:Experience with prospecting, cold calling, use of Salesforce (salesforce.com), and managing a pipelineExperience working in a similar print industry is preferred2+ years of Outside Sales/hunting experienceKnowledge of the AEC (architect, engineering and construction) industry is preferredKnowledge of large and small format printing; as well as, managed print services Education: Prefer a Bachelor's degree in Business, Marketing or related field",Outside Sales - Document Solutions Consultant () Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Manufacturing - OtherPrinting and Publishing Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-document-solutions-consultant-1216-job-atlanta-ga-us-177934823.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,d3118c6589ae9810612f6b27be722c16
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching or an IT Audit Manager in Norcross, GA.Summary:The focus should be on improving the efficiencies of the regularly scheduled periodic audits while also looking to reduce risks associated with IT business processes. Refining and standardizing the processes across all of IT will optimize resources necessary for other initiatives and increase process reliability. Standardization will bring needed visibility the most significant risks and areas of opportunity.Day to Day activities include, but would not be limited to the following: Maintain all documentation of processes and change control procedures related to SOX compliance Supervise the periodic audits of departments and teams responsible for the specific areas Identify potential issues, make practical recommendations (such as revisions in workflows or development of monitoring tools) Managing or performing and documenting testing and walkthroughs, and assisting external auditors with interim and yearly substantive audit work Conducting specific audits as needed and appropriate Ensuring issues noted as a result of testing and periodic audits have been discussed and a response is made to reduce any repeat occurrences Stay up to date on the latest applicable laws and regulations. Supervise, plan, and report on audits of key business processes Researches technology standards (SOX, COBIT, ISO, ITIL, etc)Reporting to Leadership: Keep Leadership informed of the state of risk and compliance Coordinate annual audit risk assessments with Leadership and external auditors Analyze data obtained for evidence of deficiencies in controls, duplication of effort, extravagance, fraud, or lack of compliance with laws, government regulations, and management policies or procedures Provides consultation on audit, risk, and internal control guidance Communicate findings to senior management and draft comprehensive and complete report of audit areaREQUIREMENTS:The ideal candidate will have similar skills and abilities to perform the duties listed above. Any relevant education and/or training will be considered a plus.Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",IT Audit Manager Job in Norcross,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Norcross, GA 30092",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-audit-manager-job-norcross-ga-us-177162621.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=5,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),a350862800fb11292c24307e05347b76
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"With a wide range of knowledge, helps plan, conduct, and development efforts based on Microsoft SharePoint and Nintex workflows. Provides analytical support and technical advice during the conceptualization, development, and implementation phases. Continually assesses the performance of systems to identify and correct problems, which impact on operational efficiency and work qualityWith a wide range of knowledge, helps plan, conduct, and development efforts based on Microsoft SharePoint and Nintex workflows. Provides analytical support and technical advice during the conceptualization, development, and implementation phases. Continually assesses the performance of systems to identify and correct problems, which impact on operational efficiency and work quality 1-3 years experience as a SharePoint DeveloperExperience with HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and various JavaScript libraries (such as JQuery, JQuery UI, Ajax, etc) tStrong understanding of SharePoint out of the box features beyond document librariestDevelopment of solutions around SharePoint 3rd party products such as Nintex a plus.tMust be able to obtain a NACI clearance (Greencard or US Citizen)tKnowledge of 508 compliance requirements",SharePoint Developer Job in Atlanta,Full Time,Location:,Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/sharepoint-developer-job-atlanta-ga-us-177612174.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,f6acd6f9466e5f5b43222935435cf4cd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details:My client located in the Atlanta area is looking for a Solutions Architect to manage projects for  technology. They'll need to have strong problem solving skills and the desire and willingness to quickly learn new technologies.Required Skills:C# and PHP.NetSQLWeb and Mobile Applications Great opportunity to join a growing company!  Please reach out for more info on this role.  I have 150+ openings in all areas of IT.  Please add me on LinkedIn.Edgar Unthank, MBALiberty Personnel Services, Inc.410 Feheley Drive | King of Prussia, PA 19406Direct Line: 484.238.1943edgar@libertyjobs.comwww.libertyjobs.comwww.linkedin.com/in/edgarunthank",Applications Architect Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta , GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/applications-architect-job-atlanta-ga-us-177967568.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),62d4d9e77ce12660195a96c6c25f83c9
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Client Operations Representative Area of Interest: Administrative Department: 960000 - All Covered City: Atlanta State: Georgia Job Description: All Covered, IT Services Division of Konica Minolta Business Solutions (KMBS), is the leading national IT services company serving SMB to enterprise markets. Offering a wide variety of career opportunities, All Covered is an excellent choice for motivated IT professionals interested in a stimulating and progressive work environment.With over 1,000 employees across the U.S. and Canada, All Covered has a highly skilled team of professionals focusing on superior quality service delivery to our customers. We offer hands-on technical training on the most relevant technologies in the industry and career path advancement in all levels of the company.Please join us in our exciting growth and pursue a rewarding career with All Covered!The Client Operations Representative (COR) has primary responsibility for managing the schedules of the consultants, and managing customer service activities to ensure that all service appointments are recorded accurately in All Covered’s tracking system. Major emphasis is placed on facilitating outstanding customer service to internal and external customers. Maintaining accurate scheduling information within the scheduling system, informing customers of delayed arrival times, and acting as a pivot point of communication between the customer, account executive, and the primary computer consultant when situations or emergencies arise are crucial to this position.RESPONSIBILITIESGobase, Scheduling and DeploymentManage scheduling requests to maximize consultant productivitySchedule service requests and confirm with the customer in a timely mannerManage customers on ""credit hold"" status with appropriate management approval. Do not deploy consultants without proper approval.Work with the Manager of Client Operations to facilitate accurate and timely completion of the billing processCustomer Service, Account Management and Sales SupportProfessionally answer and direct incoming calls with a sense of urgencyProvide extensive assistance to Account Executives to facilitate customer relationship management, pricing requests, processing of new contracts, and other activities as neededMaintain a rapport with assigned customer accounts to identify and address issues, concerns and additional revenue opportunitiesMaintain an accurate database of client contacts and related account dataCoordinate internal resources to resolve service problems within customer accountsEnsure that account management documentation and required reports are timely and accurateOutbound CallsPlace outbound customer service calls each dayPlace welcome calls to each new customerPlace ""PLUS1"" follow-up calls to customers for all Level 1, 2 and 3 appointmentsContact every customer on ""credit hold"" at least once during every billing cycleContact every active ACC and On-Call customer at least once every 6 weeksContact inactive or never billed customers every weekEnsure weekly call log documentation are timely and accurateHuman Resources, Facilities and Branch OperationsImplement and adhere to company policies and proceduresProvide assistance with assigned facilities management tasksAttend Sales team meeting at least twice every three monthsAttend Consulting team meeting at least once a monthParticipate in company sponsored job related activities and training to further develop skillsMaintain confidentiality of personnel information including consultant cell phone numbersProvide assistance with assigned Human ResourceMaintain a strong relationship with local Human Resources Representativex Qualifications: Inside sales and outbound calling skills Customer account management and customer relationship skills Ability to work under pressure, meet deadlines and make decisions with minimal supervision Ability to develop a professional rapport, diffuse volatile situations and maintain a dynamic and professional demeanor and presence with customers and employees Informs management of difficulties and proposes solutions in a constructive manner Excellent grammar, written and verbal communication skills Excellent working knowledge of computer applications. Strong computer skills to master GoBase Dashboard and modules, and Client Operations Intranet Reports Moderate knowledge of computer and network hardware and software, Internet connectivity terminology Intermediate skills using Microsoft Outlook, Excel and Word and other office products Outstanding attendance record Strong work ethics of accountability, adaptability, self sufficiency and job effectivenessKonica Minolta offers: Competitive compensation program Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, life insurance) 401(k) plan with matching company contribution Excellent holiday/vacation plans. Tuition reimbursement. Employee Referral Bonus Program. Ongoing training opportunities. Visible, exciting work supporting the sales of cutting edge technology and workflow solutions.KMBS is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, sex, pregnancy, age, sexual orientation, transgender status, gender identity, disability, alienage or citizenship status, marital status or partnership status, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",Client Operations Representative Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/client-operations-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-177411502.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,,e5649fe537775e098043b163be671437
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Area: Information Security ConsultingTitle: Senior Consultant (Intermediate-level)Experience: 4-8 yrs in Information securityLocation: United StatesTravel: 50%-75% (mostly in region)Type: Full-timeCompensation: Depending on experience, 401(k), Health insuranceSecurity Clearance: Not RequiredJob Description:AT&T Security Solutions is a division of AT&T (a Fortune Global Top 10 company).  AT&T is looking for an information security practitioner with technical experience for the position of a Senior Consultant located in the western US to be a part of a dynamic team of experienced security professionals with varied experiences.  Candidate must be skilled in Secure Infrastructure Services such as secure network architecture design, implementation, device configuration review, and secure architecture reviews.  AT&T Security Consulting clients range from some of the largest companies in the world to small businesses requiring security consulting expertise.Job Duties:Key functions of this role will be to work on network security and architecture trusted advisor engagements for our customers involving segmentation and optimization, DDoS mitigation, firewall migration/optimization, detailed assessment and next-generation design recommendations.  Manual and automated configuration analysis for security weaknesses in firewalls, routers, switches, servers (Windows, Unix/Linux), IDS/IDP, Databases, and other platforms as well as VoIP infrastructures will also be required.  Successful candidates will have demonstrated experience in network security consulting and will have an understanding of network level risk assessments with the ability to write objective, detailed reports explaining security issues.  A background in Network Architecture and Engineering is required. Technical knowledge and experience with configuration review tools such as Nessus, Nipper, AlgoSec Firewall Analyzer, Tufin SecureTrack or NetBrain as well as Unix/Linux scripting (php, perl, shell, etc.) will be given preference.Requirements:Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related fields, Masters Degree preferredA minimum of four years of Information Security  consulting with mid to advanced level infrastructure security design experience requiredVery good understanding of security operations & management in a large customer environmentKnowledge of Virtualization and Cloud securityWorking Knowledge of SDN, IAM, NAC and DLPKnowledge of Linux, UNIX, Windows (including Active Directory) and other operating systemsKnowledge of popular databases such as MSSQL, Oracle, and MySQLAbility to write customized scripts using at least two of bash, Perl, PHP, Python preferredMust possess strong network device implementation/integration and troubleshooting skills Must be able to demonstrate in-depth expertise with multiple network device and firewall platforms, including at least 3 of the following:Palo AltoFortinetCisco ASA (w/FirePower)Cisco IOS and NX-OS routers/switchesCheck PointJuniper NetscreenJuniper SRXMust be a flexible team player, hard-working, and possess excellent communication and customer-facing skillsMust be self-directed, able to manage solo projects or participate as part of a larger teamStrong report writing skills and ability to explain complex security issues to customers in a formal presentation format requiredMust be able to interact confidently with all levels of technical and management client teamsOne Security certification such as CISSP, CISA, CISM, PCI QSA, CEH, SANS GSEC, etc., is required and willingness to pursue further certification preferred.Ability to travel 50%-75%, mostly within region, must possess drivers’ licenseTechnical SkillsStrong technical problem / resolution skills requiredKnowledge and experience with technical network and host-based security required.Knowledge and experience with technical virtual networking (VMware NSX, SDN), and cloud security preferredMid to advanced level infrastructure or security design capabilities for environments that include 10 to 20 security devices, processes or applications. Mid to advanced level knowledge of one or more of the following preferred: SOC OperationsSecurity event monitoringNetwork segmentation designrouting/switching, including BGP, OSPF,v2/3 RIPv2 & EIGRPAdditional RequirementsKnowledge and experience with risk and compliance assessmentsSCADA / Control systems network experience a plusVoIP Infrastructure knowledge a plusBi-lingual candidates a plus Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xattcorpwrapx/cjt/c1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xattcorpwrapx/cjt/c2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xattcorpwrapx/cjt/c3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","AT&T Job Application for Consultant Professional Services  ATC - Secure Infrastructure Services | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Job Area: Information Security ConsultingTitle: Senior Consultant (Intermediate-level)Experience: 4-8 yrs in Information securityLocation: United StatesTravel: 50%-75% (mostly in region)Type: Full-timeCompensation: Depending on experience, 401(k), Health insuranceSecurity Clearance: Not RequiredJob Description:AT&T Security Solutions is a division of AT&T (a Fortune Global Top 10 company).  AT&T is looking for an information security practitioner with technical experience for the position of a Senior Consultant located in the western US to be a part of a dynamic team of experienced security professionals with varied experiences.  Candidate must be skilled in Secure Infrastructure Services such as secure network architecture design, implementation, device configuration review, and secure architecture reviews.  AT&T Security Consulting clients range from some of the largest companies in the world to small businesses requiring security consulting expertise.Job Duties:Key functions of this role will be to work on network security and architecture trusted advisor engagements for our customers involving segmentation and optimization, DDoS mitigation, firewall migration/optimization, detailed assessment and next-generation design recommendations.  Manual and automated configuration analysis for security weaknesses in firewalls, routers, switches, servers (Windows, Unix/Linux), IDS/IDP, Databases, and other platforms as well as VoIP infrastructures will also be required.  Successful candidates will have demonstrated experience in network security consulting and will have an understanding of network level risk assessments with the ability to write objective, detailed reports explaining security issues.  A background in Network Architecture and Engineering is required. Technical knowledge and experience with configuration review tools such as Nessus, Nipper, AlgoSec Firewall Analyzer, Tufin SecureTrack or NetBrain as well as Unix/Linux scripting (php, perl, shell, etc.) will be given preference.Requirements:Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related fields, Masters Degree preferredA minimum of four years of Information Security  consulting with mid to advanced level infrastructure security design experience requiredVery good understanding of security operations & management in a large customer environmentKnowledge of Virtualization and Cloud securityWorking Knowledge of SDN, IAM, NAC and DLPKnowledge of Linux, UNIX, Windows (including Active Directory) and other operating systemsKnowledge of popular databases such as MSSQL, Oracle, and MySQLAbility to write customized scripts using at least two of bash, Perl, PHP, Python preferredMust possess strong network device implementation/integration and troubleshooting skills Must be able to demonstrate in-depth expertise with multiple network device and firewall platforms, including at least 3 of the following:Palo AltoFortinetCisco ASA (w/FirePower)Cisco IOS and NX-OS routers/switchesCheck PointJuniper NetscreenJuniper SRXMust be a flexible team player, hard-working, and possess excellent communication and customer-facing skillsMust be self-directed, able to manage solo projects or participate as part of a larger teamStrong report writing skills and ability to explain complex security issues to customers in a formal presentation format requiredMust be able to interact confidently with all levels of technical and management client teamsOne Security certification such as CISSP, CISA, CISM, PCI QSA, CEH, SANS GSEC, etc., is required and willingness to pursue further certification preferred.Ability to travel 50%-75%, mostly within region, must possess drivers’ licenseTechnical SkillsStrong technical problem / resolution skills requiredKnowledge and experience with technical network and host-based security required.Knowledge and experience with technical virtual networking (VMware NSX, SDN), and cloud security preferredMid to advanced level infrastructure or security design capabilities for environments that include 10 to 20 security devices, processes or applications. Mid to advanced level knowledge of one or more of the following preferred: SOC OperationsSecurity event monitoringNetwork segmentation designrouting/switching, including BGP, OSPF,v2/3 RIPv2 & EIGRPAdditional RequirementsKnowledge and experience with risk and compliance assessmentsSCADA / Control systems network experience a plusVoIP Infrastructure knowledge a plusBi-lingual candidates a plus",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/consultant-professional-services-3-atc-secure-infrastructure-services-job-atlanta-ga-us-177697189.aspx?mescoid=4100688001001&jobPosition=4,,,6e1f77d20f83c9ebc3df8c587d3cd97c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  716337Actively seeking two experienced Sr. Cisco Wireless Engineers. Would prefer an Egineer with a CCNP certification, but will take a resource with equivalent experience or someone that has all other qualities and is pursuing their CCNP. Experience in Cisco wireless networking to include WLC configuration and management. Resources will conduct WLC code upgrades for three months.Work MUST be performed in Austin Texas.75% of work will be conducted outside of regular business hours upgrading remote WLCs across the United States. Typical work duties would be performed from 4PM-Midnight.Scope:Review* Review WLC exciting IOS version* Identify issues, assumptions, and risks* Schedule IOS upgrade version and maintenance window with store and network teamDesign* Design WLC upgrade process for pilot storeso Pilot stores will be SW-DOM and SW-GWYo Validate new IOS versiono Download new WLC IOS version to store local deviceo Document exiting configuration and featureso Document active access pointso Document and validate existing wireless authentication keysImplement* Upgrade existing controllers to new IOS version* Verify authentication access keys* Verify features ware operational* Verify access points are operational* Verify wireless devices connecting to the network* Document final upgrade process* Provide fist day support for each storeEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Sr. Wireless Consultant WFM Austin Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-wireless-consultant-wfm-austin-job-austin-tx-us-178342438.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3f2910dde7f0bc315222b1e9f6ca36fc
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:20,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  97705 Jewell is a division of the Oldcastle Architectural Products Group (APG). APG is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Job Description Summary Transport construction material to job site in a safe and timely mannerAssist and supervise loading of truck to ensure proper order and weight distributionReceive from dispatcher invoice for materials, directions to job site and any special instructions and follow them to the detailMaintain complete and accurate records such as DOT drivers' daily logs, fuel receipts, delivery documentation and any other required documents according to state and federal regulationsBuild and maintain good customer relationshipsPerform pre-trip inspections of assigned vehicle and report immediately any concerns or problemsObtain shipping bills and necessary signatures and return completed paperwork to the shipping departmentProvide and document proper routine maintenance of assigned truck and loading/unloading equipmentSurvey job site and unload cargo in the best area available in a safe mannerDevelop very good knowledge of inventory, sizes, types, colors and pallet packageMonitor and immediately report problems with assigned product quality, customer satisfaction and traffic Requirements  High school diploma / equivalentExperience with moffettCDL A requiredMust have at least 2 years of experienceDetailed oriented and good communication skills a plusMust be at least 24 years of ageMust have a clean driving recordForklift certified a plusBi-lingual is a plus What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Jewell is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Jewell is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.#MAPG#PGCB#CAN",Flatbed Driver / Truck Driver / CDL A - Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/flatbed-driver-truck-driver-cdl-a-austin-tx-job-austin-tx-us-177803420.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=19,,,e15be98bbf55ee5595b09c26a251915d
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Career with Us Will Provide You with: ·         A marketing plan we help you customize to build your brand effectively·         A comprehensive training program focused on people and marketing strategy·         Financial support during your early years to help you build your business·         Compete with our elite and score trips to awesome places like Hawaii, Beijing  and Münich, Germany Realize Your Potential  Being a Mutual of Omaha advisor is a challenging yet rewarding experience.  Right away, you’ll meet prospects with your manager or another mentor to learn the business the right way.  This joint work will allow you to see what it takes to be successful and you can also start building relationships with your peers. Start making a name for yourself by creating a solid marketing plan, positioning yourself effectively in the community and on social media.  Speak passionately to people about helping them provide for their families for the rest of their lives.  We will encourage you to become a student of the industry so that you can use your expertise to help people in a way others can’t.  Start your way down a path that includes partnering with our broker dealer, Mutual of Omaha Investor Services, to help people obtain their wealth accumulation goals by offering them a wide range of insurance and investment products.  Getting started the right way is the key to success, and we will have specific goals for you during your first three years. We’re in the business of developing management talent, and it all starts here.  Later, you may have a shot at leading your own team if you feel you have what it takes.  Set an example for others with your hard work, determination and love for inspiring colleagues. We’re Looking for People with: ·         An appetite for success and natural leadership ability  Our best advisors make an impact with their clients and with their colleagues.  We believe in a grassroots approach, developing you into a mentor and ambassador for our company·         Charisma and strong conversational skills  Above all else, this is a people business.  Developing rapport with people easily is one of the main keys to success.  You’re going to need to invest a lot of energy into connecting with lots of different people, and we need people that can do it effectively·         Really thick skin and a motor that doesn’t stop  If this were easy, everyone would do it.  If you love chasing the finish line, and are motivated by setting your sights on ever-increasing goals, this is for you·         An entrepreneurial spirit and the solid determination to run their own business  We want someone that possesses business savvy skills and can make smart decisions.  Our advisors are also backed by an extensive support network in our home office.  If you bring your A-game every day, the home office promises to bring theirs Now, About Us…For more than 100 years, Mutual of Omaha has helped millions of families reach their financial goals and plan for a secure future. Here's what you can expect: ·         Access to a complete line of insurance and financial services products, including Life, Disability Income, Long-Term Care insurance and annuities.  Financial advisors appointed with our broker dealer offer 401(k), mutual funds, retirement plans and other variable products·         The backing of a strong, stable, and secure company.  Strong company ratings from insurance-rating and information agencies A.M. Best, Standard & Poor’s and Moody’s·         Solid consumer brand awareness, including Mutual of Omaha's Wild Kingdom, key national sponsorships like USA Swimming, PGA, LPGA and Nationwide tours, and IndyCar Racing",Financial Advisor Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-advisor-job-atlanta-ga-us-168709853.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,6f7ea2f55fef76471b4d0d825ff79361
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"# of Positions 2Job Type Professional/TechnicalFull/Part Time Full-TimeShift FirstWeekends Required Not Required Why State Farm®? Our commitment to customers makes us the No. 1 insurer of cars and homes in the United States.This same commitment to our work force is how we got here and how we stay here. Our 90-year track record highlights State Farm as an employer of choice committed to providing career opportunities that last a lifetime.From diverse backgrounds and talent, to meaningful work and comprehensive benefits, ""Like a good neighbor..."" isn't just a slogan. It's who we are and how we do business. Check out our Video Gallery to learn more. WHAT ARE THE DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THIS POSITION? •Convert mortgage leads or referrals to applications•Works with project teams to define scope of effort/business requirements for development of new initiatives and enhancements•Provide mortgage expertise to Residential Lending management, Mortgage Loan Services, and other SF departments•Provide product and price counseling for State Farm agents and State Farm customers•Maintain relationships and actively promote State Farm Bank with outside agencies, third party vendors, State Farm Agents, Agency Leadership, and other State Farm departments•Keep current with the State Farm Relocation and Affordable Housing Program guidelines WHAT KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS ARE NEEDED TO BE SUCCESSFUL IN THIS POSITION? •Experience in loan origination and sales experience•Extensive knowledge and experience with secondary market mortgage products and pricing, processing, underwriting requirements, closing and compliance regulation•Strong understanding of lending policies and practices, knowledge of acceptable loan documentation, and knowledge of product features and structure•In-depth knowledge of the mortgage industry•Hands on experience with banking/mortgage lending, mortgage underwriting, and/or training/teaching ITEMS OF NOTE •May be required to travel via commercial air or ground transportation and/or drive motor vehicles to various State Farm business locations, seminars, conferences, and/or industry meetings•May be required to work irregular hours during heavy workload or to meet deadlines, as well as may be required to work shift work ADDITIONAL INFORMATION Mortgage experience preferred, but not required.Bilingual Spanish candidates desired, but not required. 18 month incumbency period.Incumbents must satisfy all requirements (background and licensing) to become and remain registered in good standing with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry (""NMLS"" or ""The Registry"") and meet all current guidelines and or regulatory requirements maintained by Fannie Mae.Entry into a bank position may require passing additional background checks including a credit check. BENEFITS: TOTAL REWARDS Our Total Rewards benefits package includes: •Competitive starting salary •Annual merit reviews •Annual bonus potential You may also be eligible to participate in Medical, Dental, Life and Disability Insurance, Vision, 401(k) Plan, Credit Union, a fully funded retirement pension plan, and more. For more information about our company, careers and Total Rewards, visit www.statefarm.com/careers. You can also learn more about what to expect from our employment process here. State Farm Insurance is an equal opportunity employer PI96299674Apply Here",Mortgage Consultant Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 00000",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/mortgage-consultant-job-atlanta-ga-us-178083046.aspx?mescoid=1300113001001&jobPosition=8,,Other,86ac42e4ee7d772ffcf23d4f84079f06
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job ***CONTRACT POSITION FOR 3-5 MONTHS***This position is based in our Austin location and is a full-time, on-site position! We are an eCommerce company providing services for continued education and recertification in the insurance and risk management space. We're looking to upgrade and build out our CMS and need your help!What You Need for this Position- 3+ year web development in .NET Stack- C#/ASP.NET- JavaScript, HTML, CSS- SQL, OracleWhat's In It for You- Hourly Pay: $40/hr-$65/hr- Medical/Dental/Vision benefits after 30 daysSo, if you are a Web Developer with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Web Developer - ASP.NET | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Contact name Alec Pedersen,Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/web-developer-asp-net-job-austin-tx-us-177569745.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=8,,,5a115ec14ade1961a8220745c89a95fd
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Job Description: Record Center Specialists have to kneel, squat, reach, and bend forward frequently throughout their shifts. Their primary tasks include the moving, arranging, lifting and loading of storage boxes, bins and totes. Boxes, bins and totes range in weight from 24lbs 50lbs. Employees move boxes manually and via hand carts. Protective footwear is required and shall meet ASTM F2413-11 “Standard Specification for Performance Requirements for Protective ( Safety) Toe Cap Footwear” and have a slip-resistant rating designated as “Better or Best”Job Summary/Work ScheduleNormal Work Schedule: 5 days a week, 9 hours a day including 30-minute lunch and two 15-minute breaks.Description of position and job requirements: Employees process orders and move boxes of files, books, binders and other materials. The work is very physical requiring the manual lifting, carrying, and moving/arranging of boxes while standing, stooping, crawling, kneeling and twisting. Employees must be able to lift and carry boxes ranging in weight from 24-50lbs on a regular basis, without assistance. Employees must be able to load and safely operate hand trucks and pallet jacks while walking on uneven and concrete surfaces. Essential Functions:         -       Walk, stand, kneel, squat, stoop and bend for extended periods of time  -       Work without assistance in order to grip, lift, push, pull, and carry boxes including up and down inclines, stairs, and over changes in walking surface/elevation  -       Read and write English  -       Lift and move boxes, read labels, and process incoming and outgoing orders.  -       Operate hand held scanner  -       Climb and balance on Ladder Carts (not step ladders)  -       Lift and carry boxes weighing up to 50 lbs without assistance for prolonged periods  -       Employee must be able to load, operate and move hand carts, pallet jacks and various other material handling aids  -       Load and shrink wrap pallets at ground level, or on carts  -       Load boxes onto pallets and load pallets onto trucks manually and with material handling aids ",warehouse associate/shipping-receiving/Record center specialist Job in Norcross,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Norcross, GA 30071",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-shipping-receiving-record-center-specialist-job-norcross-ga-us-178003692.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=3,"20,000.00 - 21,000.00 $ /year",Manufacturing/Production/Operations,179ad4326420cf1157c2108832662d3f
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job DescriptionIn order to identify qualified candidates for potential future openings for our Facility Manager position, The Auto Club Group keeps a roster of interested applicants. If you are interested and fulfill the minimum requirements, please complete/apply online.   Registration into the Pipeline Roster does not constitute any form of a commitment on the part of The Auto Club Group. This roster is valid for 6 months. Candidates may be required to re-apply again after 6 months the of initial date of registration to be considered as an active pipeline applicant.”   The Auto Club Group (ACG) provides membership, travel, insurance and financial services offerings to approximately 9 million members and customers across 11 states and 2 U.S. territories through the AAA, Meemic and Fremont brands. ACG belongs to the national AAA federation and is the second largest AAA club in North America.    Primary Duties and Responsibilities (details of the basic job functions):   Operates the Car Care Center facility, overseeing the overall profitable operation and growth of the shop and ensuring smooth operation at all times. Includes achieving service and budgetary goals related to automotive repairs and related service to customers. Manages, maintains and builds quality customer relationships.  Maintains personal and store sales standards as set by management  Oversees Facility staff. Includes coordinating the recruiting and selection of candidates and recommending compensation changes, promotions, demotions and termination decisions.  Schedules staff and self to ensure smooth operation and appropriate staffing levels at all times.  Trains Employees and evaluates their performance. Makes decisions regarding performance issues, in accordance with Company policies and procedures. Responds to Employee issues and concerns.  Provides input into overall location scheduling to ensure the appropriate number of Technicians is designated to accommodate workload; determines which Employees will work which days and shifts.  Light to moderate travel (10% to 25%) is expected once a branch is open and established. Supervisory Responsibilities (briefly describe, if applicable, or indicate None): Supervises Service Advisor, Senior Service Advisor and all Service Technicians Work Environment:Exposure to loud noises and odors intermittently in the shop environment. Limited travel required. QualificationsRequired Qualifications (these are the minimum requirements to qualify): Education:   High School diploma, GED or equivalent successful business experience  Must possess a valid driver’s license   Experience:  3 or more years working with auto/truck systems and technical resources that included supervisory or management and project management experience   Knowledge and Skills:   Knowledge of equipment and tool operation and diagnostic/repair procedures  Sales skills and ability to make appropriate service recommendations  Good verbal and written communication skills  Ability to lead, train and mentor others in their work  Solid PC skills to enter data accurately and quickly  Ability to problem-solve in an efficient and effective manner  Ability to manage a variety of projects using available tools and business knowledge    The Auto Club Group offers a competitive compensation and benefits packages including a base salary with performance based incentives; medical/dental/vision insurance, pension, 401(k), generous time off, a complimentary AAA Membership and much more!   Interested in learning more about the AAA family? Take a minute to meet Emma: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_etZXAnB2dc   The Auto Club Group, and all of its affiliated companies, is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.   Important Note: The above statements describe the principal and essential functions, but not all functions that may be inherent in the job.  This job requires the ability to perform duties contained in the job description for this position, including, but not limited to, the above requirements.  Reasonable accommodations will be made for otherwise qualified applicants, as needed, to enable them to fulfill these requirements. Report","Auto Club Group Job Application for Pipeline Facility Manager - Car Care | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Talent Acquisition, ACG Address Marietta, GA 30007",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pipeline-facility-manager-car-care-job-marietta-ga-us-176272878.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=2,,,6bc1b39736845f7568ba86056c27e702
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:01:38:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job * We are looking for RN's for the following areas.​​ ER ICU Med Surg /​​ TelePsychOperating Room PACU NICUL/​​D       *One orientation opens the doors to multiple TOP facilities in the Austin, TX market.​​ We have contracts or full time per diem.​​ 7a or 7p shifts available.​​ Report",Medical One Staffers,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Contact name Edward Amorde Phone 877-621-1914 ext 1,,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-registered-nurse-all-specialties-job-austin-tx-us-168492008.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,,8371a738fe64ada5d66a534cf5e77a1d
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:00:53:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Role                 : Infrastructure Solution ArchitectLocation           : Atlanta, GAMode of Hire    : Full Time Looking for a skilled Senior Infrastructure Designer to develop and facilitate Infrastructure and Platform level designs by evaluating business strategies and requirements, collaborating with application solution designers and Ops subject matter experts, managing design standards, and facilitating integration and security solutions. Responsibilities will also include discovery and documentation of as-built end-to-end service mappings, gap analysis for reliability and availability, development of templates and standard reference architectures, procurement of Infrastructure components, and support for build submissions.   The individual will be able to collect and analyze design requirements to provide solutions while mitigating risk with deployment into production networks.Candidate should have a strong background with enterprise class datacenters, LAN/WAN, storage, virtualization, and cloud infrastructure/platform technologies from Cox’s strategic partners including Dell, Cisco, EMC, NetApp, Redhat, Oracle, Microsoft, and Citrix.  The candidate will also understand application and data security, application and infrastructure fault tolerance and high-availability designs, application/service level protocols and communication methods, and possess the soft skills necessary to communicate both at the technical and executive level to define budgetary estimates, provide cost benefit justifications, and provide technical expertise to influence solution designs with cross-functional team support.   ·         Architect, supervise and participate in the implementation of technologies and platforms supporting a complex corporate data and voice infrastructure.·         Ensure high availability of enterprise voice and data platforms that support internal employee business functions and external customer contact.·         Serve as one of the primary points of contact for telecommunication carriers and service providers and coordinate circuit design, provisioning, installation and troubleshooting.·         Planning and implementing systems and network integrations ·         Document the design, operation and troubleshooting of technology platforms and procedures.·         Prepare project level and/or solution level designs for moderately complex initiatives and solutions.·         Define and document architecture capturing and documenting non-functional requirements, preparing estimates and defining technical solutions to proposals.·         Provide technical leadership to project teams to perform design to deployment related activities.·         Provide guidance, perform reviews, prevent and resolve technical issues.·         Coordinate with internal teams and stakeholders on solution development that will drive technical change.·         Support assigned portfolios as the domain's lead ""go to"" contact around project pipeline, innovation and escalation, especially understanding and interpreting business requirements, and translating them into architecture, designs, and technical specifications.·         Assess the viability and feasibility of third party solutions to meet business requirements, and to advise and influence project sponsors and teams on the technical direction.·         Collaborate with colleagues within the domain architecture team to provide technical design guidance that aligns with the enterprise architecture vision and applicable technical standards.·         Work independently to evaluate and make strategic decisions that address specific technology design needs and issues within their technology area.·         Recommend improvements to existing data, application, and infrastructure architectures in areas of expertise.·         Facilitate or influence changes to product portfolio to improve competitive position and optimal product performance.  ·         EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE & SKILLS·         Bachelor’s degree in relevant field and 8+years of experience·         Expert level knowledge of VDI/IT Infrastructure/ Server/Storage/Back Up infra design and supporting technologies required for the delivery of virtual desktop services.·         Expertise in a Workplace technologies including but not limited to Printing, Email, Collaboration tools, MDM, Wi-Fi, and Identity management·         Broad knowledge of data and infrastructure technologies such as SAN, VMware, Blade, and Active Directory.·         Knowledge of architecture frameworks and methods·         Ability to plan, prioritize, organize, schedule and execute assignments·         Strong analytical skills, with strong problem-solving capability·         Excellent interpersonal, presentation and communication skills·         Ability to work independently and as a member of a team·         Ability to lead moderately complex initiatives and solutions·         Technical certifications a plus Report","GENPACT LLC Job Application for Infrastructure Solution Architect | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Role                 : Infrastructure Solution ArchitectLocation           : Atlanta, GAMode of Hire    : Full Time Looking for a skilled Senior Infrastructure Designer to develop and facilitate Infrastructure and Platform level designs by evaluating business strategies and requirements, collaborating with application solution designers and Ops subject matter experts, managing design standards, and facilitating integration and security solutions. Responsibilities will also include discovery and documentation of as-built end-to-end service mappings, gap analysis for reliability and availability, development of templates and standard reference architectures, procurement of Infrastructure components, and support for build submissions.   The individual will be able to collect and analyze design requirements to provide solutions while mitigating risk with deployment into production networks.Candidate should have a strong background with enterprise class datacenters, LAN/WAN, storage, virtualization, and cloud infrastructure/platform technologies from Cox’s strategic partners including Dell, Cisco, EMC, NetApp, Redhat, Oracle, Microsoft, and Citrix.  The candidate will also understand application and data security, application and infrastructure fault tolerance and high-availability designs, application/service level protocols and communication methods, and possess the soft skills necessary to communicate both at the technical and executive level to define budgetary estimates, provide cost benefit justifications, and provide technical expertise to influence solution designs with cross-functional team support.   ·         Architect, supervise and participate in the implementation of technologies and platforms supporting a complex corporate data and voice infrastructure.·         Ensure high availability of enterprise voice and data platforms that support internal employee business functions and external customer contact.·         Serve as one of the primary points of contact for telecommunication carriers and service providers and coordinate circuit design, provisioning, installation and troubleshooting.·         Planning and implementing systems and network integrations ·         Document the design, operation and troubleshooting of technology platforms and procedures.·         Prepare project level and/or solution level designs for moderately complex initiatives and solutions.·         Define and document architecture capturing and documenting non-functional requirements, preparing estimates and defining technical solutions to proposals.·         Provide technical leadership to project teams to perform design to deployment related activities.·         Provide guidance, perform reviews, prevent and resolve technical issues.·         Coordinate with internal teams and stakeholders on solution development that will drive technical change.·         Support assigned portfolios as the domain's lead ""go to"" contact around project pipeline, innovation and escalation, especially understanding and interpreting business requirements, and translating them into architecture, designs, and technical specifications.·         Assess the viability and feasibility of third party solutions to meet business requirements, and to advise and influence project sponsors and teams on the technical direction.·         Collaborate with colleagues within the domain architecture team to provide technical design guidance that aligns with the enterprise architecture vision and applicable technical standards.·         Work independently to evaluate and make strategic decisions that address specific technology design needs and issues within their technology area.·         Recommend improvements to existing data, application, and infrastructure architectures in areas of expertise.·         Facilitate or influence changes to product portfolio to improve competitive position and optimal product performance.  ·         EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE & SKILLS·         Bachelor’s degree in relevant field and 8+years of experience·         Expert level knowledge of VDI/IT Infrastructure/ Server/Storage/Back Up infra design and supporting technologies required for the delivery of virtual desktop services.·         Expertise in a Workplace technologies including but not limited to Printing, Email, Collaboration tools, MDM, Wi-Fi, and Identity management·         Broad knowledge of data and infrastructure technologies such as SAN, VMware, Blade, and Active Directory.·         Knowledge of architecture frameworks and methods·         Ability to plan, prioritize, organize, schedule and execute assignments·         Strong analytical skills, with strong problem-solving capability·         Excellent interpersonal, presentation and communication skills·         Ability to work independently and as a member of a team·         Ability to lead moderately complex initiatives and solutions·         Technical certifications a plus",,http://jobview.monster.com/infrastructure-solution-architect-job-atlanta-ga-us-177946557.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=13,,,feeae721d54a686951523e988ef6703c
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:00:32:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />Description The Diesel Mechanic (Entry Level) will be responsible for conducting maintenance on our fleet of company vehicles, trucks, and heavy equipment. Responsibilities Perform preventative maintenance tasks and inspections on company vehicles and equipmentPerform routine maintenance such as changing oil, checking batteries, tires, and lubricating equipment, vehicles, and machineryAssist drivers with addressing outstanding vehicle issuesAccurately record time, parts, inventory and inspection checklists using the computer systemsAbility to troubleshoot, diagnose and repair equipment and vehiclesDisassemble, inspects and replace worn or broken parts.  Fit and adjust new or repaired parts.Diagnose and repair engines, transmissions, clutches, electrical and pneumatic systems, gearboxes, hydraulics, cooling systems, exhaust, brakes, suspensions, lights, etc. on a variety of yard equipment, heavy duty trucks, trailers, and other equipment.  Qualifications:High school diploma or equivalent required1-2 +years’ vehicle maintenance experience with heavy trucks/Diesel MechanicsStrong computer skillsetsMust have own toolsExperience operating heavy equipment is a plus Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market.  For many positions, we have implemented a Competency Based Progression and Pay Program, which directly rewards employees for developing increased proficiency in their key job functions through training and experience. At Clean Harbors you are offered unique opportunities for all stages of your career.   Clean Harbors offers all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including: •      Competitive annual salary (CBPP Competency Based Pay Program) •      Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion •      Health, Dental and Life Insurance •      401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off •      Company paid certifications, licenses and training   To learn more about our company visit us at www.cleanharbors.com   We thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those that complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role.   Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company. *CH Potential Applicants: We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Diesel Mechanic (Entry Level) Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/diesel-mechanic-entry-level-job-norcross-ga-us-177558350.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=20,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a91cf062943250302fa04ae1f85c3e16
United States of America,US,02/Dec/2015:00:31:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Bilingual Accounts Payable Specialist in Atlanta, GA.Essential Functions: Review all invoices for appropriate documentation and approval prior to payment for Puerto Rico location - this includes matching purchase orders (P.O.'s) and receiving paperwork to invoices Apply the proper general ledger (G/L) coding to the invoice Prioritize invoices according to cash discount potential and payment terms Input all payables for scheduled check runs Reconcile vendor statements, research price/quantity discrepancies, and take corrective action to resolve the discrepancy Correspond with vendors and answer inquiries as neededREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years of experience in Accounts Payable and 3-way matching Must be fluent in English and Spanish Professional communication skills, verbally and in email communication in SpanishKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Bilingual Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA 30349",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-accounts-payable-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-177640565.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=13,,Entry Level,c08883b18f0957833b345d218f6a0afd
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:23:26:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client located in Reston, Virginia (VA) is seeking an Entry Level Accounts Payable Specialist.REQUIREMENTS: 1 year of Data Entry experience required Accounts Payable experience preferred Experience with ExcelKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Entry Level Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Herndon,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Herndon, VA 20170",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-accounts-payable-specialist-job-herndon-va-us-176327783.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e10d6157ee81d8a06928b422a977aff9
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:23:24:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you a motivated team player who can adapt quickly in a fast paced and dynamic environment? One of our reputable clients is looking to fill a Senior Accountant position in the Grand Rapids, MI area. If you are looking for your next big career move, be sure to apply today! Senior Accountant Responsibilities: Prepare monthly financial statements Provide variance analysis Ensure financial transcripts are recorded accurately and in a timely mannerAnalyze income statement activity Reconcile books and record to the general ledger. Preform month end cash conversion process and record standard month end close entriesForecasting, financial modeling and special projects  Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree in accounting required 3-5 years' accounting experience required Strong proficiency in Excel and ERP software systems  To learn more about this Senior Accountant job opportunity, please apply on our website at www.accountingprincipals.com!",Senior Accountant Job in Grand Rapids,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Grand Rapids, MI 49546",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-grand-rapids-mi-us-175450544.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=7,20.00 - 26.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,68c7b6b9850415d0e6902ae57acc9185
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:22:12:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking an Accounts Payable Clerk to join their team on a temporary basis in Fairhaven, Massachusetts (MA).Responsibilities for this position include: Enter accounts payable invoices Work closely with vendors by phone and email to verify accuracy of each invoice Research discrepancies and questions Post journal entries Mail all payments and file each payment Update spreadsheets Filing, faxing, and scanning Assist with additional projects, as requested Distribute mail when neededREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years of AP experience Strong MS Office skills Familiarity with PeopleSoft Must be organized, detail oriented, and accurate with data entry Strong oral and written communication skillsKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Accounts Payable Clerk Job in Fairhaven,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Fairhaven, MA 02719",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-clerk-job-fairhaven-ma-us-176345163.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),efefeb54da25a7fa9d58d69563ac7fe6
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:55:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis Finance is recruiting for a Tax Consultant for consulting engagement in Princeton, NJ. The Tax Consultant is primarily responsible for managing the income tax accounting activities including tax provision, tax compliance and tax account analysis Key Job Responsibilities Coordinate, review and manage sales & use tax, property tax, medical device excise tax, unclaimed property, and annual report compliance, Oversee third party service providers of tax services Serve as SME on indirect tax Coordinate and assist with tax audits and inquiries from tax authorities, Maintain tax calendar and tax payment schedules, Serve as the System Administrator for Sabrix, an Indirect Tax Engine, Research and respond to internal and external customers on tax-related matters, Interact with Financial Accounting and Business Units, Lead or assist with ad hoc projects or assignments. Key Job Requirements Bachelor's Degree in Accounting with 3-5 year experience in an corporate environment or public accounting, Proficiency in Sabrix, ( One Source) Oracle, as well as tax research engines, Knowledge of multi-state tax concepts, Ability to identify opportunities to resolve tax related issues, recommendations for tax mitigation, and for process improvement within the tax function, Strong problem-solving, analytical, negotiating, and decision-making skills and ability to root cause problems/inefficiencies within the tax function, Strong organizational skills and the ability to manage multiple service providersExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Tax Accountant Job in Princeton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Tax Accountant,"Princeton, NJ 08543",http://jobview.monster.com/tax-accountant-job-princeton-nj-us-176352777.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=10,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ee5b1632e7817664d9bd50b26a2e8808
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:54:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionOverview: The Seasonal Dishwasher’s primary responsibility is to clean and maintain the necessary supply of dishware, cookware, and utensils. Perform other duties as assigned. Essential Functions:Follows Food Division Standards and Best PracticesWash and distribute dishes, cookware, and utensilsSort plate ware, glassware, and flatware in the dish roomMonitor and maintain sanitation supply levels and machine performance in accordance with the Health Department standardsCollect trash and discard in the appropriate compacting receptacleResponsible for recycling when applicablePerform daily cleaning tasks as assignedDemonstrate MAGIC selling skillsFollow food safety standards and maintain work area and equipment in accordance with Health Department standardsOpen and close area following appropriate checklist, verifying completion with Manager on Duty prior to leaving the areaAssist other associates to ensure all kitchen duties are completed and customer service standards are maintainedMaintain safe work areaFollow station specific duties and responsibilitiesMaintain personal hygiene and professional dress code to comply with company and Health Department standardsRegular, dependable attendance & punctuality Qualifications:Education/Experience: No specific educational accomplishment is necessary. Previous restaurant/hospitality experience is preferred but not required. Health department license or certification and/or alcohol certification as required by state or local requirement. Per state law, a Food Handler's certificate may be required for all food service employees who prepare, store or serve food at restaurants, coffee bars or any other food service establishment. Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, reports, and procedure manuals. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to communicate in Spanish is preferred but not required.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to make change using American monetary units.Reasoning Ability: Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision. Must be able to follow instructions.Physical Demands: This position involves regular walking, standing, hearing and talking. May occasionally involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. Must be able to move and/or lift at least 30 lbs. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other skills: Must possess excellent customer service skills. Must be able to work effectively in a fast-paced environment.Work Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs.Working Conditions: Reasonable accommodations have been made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential job functions. Work generally occurs in an office environment with moderate temperature and noise level. _______________________________________________________________________________________________________________DisclaimerThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy’s, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Foodsculinaryarts Primary Location:United States-Minnesota-MinnetonkaJob:Restaurant/Food Service - Back of House.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Lakeshore Grill Restaurant Dishwasher** Part Time Macy's Ridgedale Center Job in Minnetonka,Full Time Employee,"Minnetonka, MN",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-lakeshore-grill-restaurant-dishwasher-part-time-macy's-ridgedale-center-job-minnetonka-mn-us-175808827.aspx?mescoid=3500617001001&jobPosition=11,,Food Services/Hospitality,435fa45663587b1a3bcf0d6344dccf50
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:40:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Needs someone that is a self starter, can work independently and be responsible for their own accounts.WHAT DOES THIS JOB ENTAIL?Firm handles accounting for small to medium firms (90% of businesses are S-corps). During Tax season their business is 80% Businesses-20% Individual Tax returns.DOES NOT WANT ANYONE THAT HAS WORKED IN MANUFACTURING!!Must be extremely organized and expect perfection from selfGood Computer Skills: Quick books, Pro Series, (for 1040s and Corporations)Good with Microsoft, Word, and ExcelAccounting Theories: “Tie Out” Balance Sheets numbers by analyzing the accounts and prepare AJEs as requiredTax/Small Business Strategies: S CorporationsProblem SolverManaging Budgets and ProductionClient ManagementIS IT RIGHT FOR YOU?Must have 3 to 5 years CPA experience ( no less than 3 verifiable years CPA or EA required)This position does require lots of overtime during tax season, 32 hour week (off Fridays) during off season.POSITION REQUIRES A CPA OR EA DEGREE. .Please Submit Resumes TO:Email: dwilliams@hartmanpersonnel.com Fax: 440-974-6627or Call 440-974-0800 ",Certified Public Accountant Job in Mentor,Full Time Employee,"Mentor, OH",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-public-accountant-job-mentor-oh-us-174742623.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,82d06327870acbb7e20d2a3f21b6d493
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:14:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Internal Auditor / IT AuditMulti-billion-dollar Insurance company is seeking a Senior Internal Auditor to join there Boston Team. The Senior Internal Auditor will be responsible for performing internal audit projects, as part of the comprehensive internal audit plan. This will be a blended role focusing on financial, Operational and IT audit testing and will be reporting directly to the Director of Internal Audit. Great opportunity to gain cross-over experience into different areas of audit coupled with an amazing work/life balance (NEVER staying past 5:30pm!). Responsibilities: Responsible for independently conducting and documenting complex audit projectsPerforms audit testing verifying the effectiveness of established processes and procedures and verbally communicates and confirms audit findings/observations identified through detailed testing. Develop internal audit scope, perform internal audit procedures, and prepare internal audit reports reflecting the results of work preformed Cover all functional and operating units, focusing on financial, IT and operational processes Perform follow-up on the status of outstanding internal audit issues Play a strong role in providing ongoing internal controls consulting, establishing strong partnerships with management in support of key initiatives Ad hoc projects Required Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance, or Business 3+ years of Audit or IT Audit Understanding of internal auditing standards, SOX, COSO and / or risk assessment practices Attainment or progression towards CPA, CIA or CISA a plus Strong organizational and analytical skills Strong working knowledge in using ACL or other data analysis tools Compensation: $70,000 - $90,000 (DOE) + Bonus Great work/life balance Excellent Benefits Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Senior Internal Auditor / IT Audit Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",InsuranceAccounting and Auditing ServicesFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-internal-auditor-it-audit-job-boston-ma-us-176353161.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=6,"0.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,78f96a7f675003b3c0e50bf0bbac510c
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:13:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Is It Time to Consider Something New?If you feel like you are moving too slowly along your career path and are inspired by the thought of helping people protect and enrich their lives, we can help you find your passion.With an average of 10,000 baby boomers reaching retirement age each day1, there has never been a better time to enter the financial services industry. Prudential is seeking professionals from a variety of backgrounds who are ambitious, people-oriented individuals with a desire to make a difference and own their own future. Overall Duties and Responsibilities ·Develop and implement sales and marketing plans·Prospect potential clients and discuss insurance and financial services·Build and execute strategies to help clients accumulate, preserve, and transfer their assets TrainingAt Prudential, you will receive coaching and mentoring from experienced managers to help you build a client network during a paid training program.Prudential provides individualized classroom training, as well as web-based learning resources that begin at the time of hire and provide continued development as you build your career. You will have the opportunity to work with dynamic teams to develop innovative solutions that address the diverse needs of clients.Compensation and BenefitsWe offer competitive compensation and generous work performance-based bonuses. This is an opportunity for you to potentially achieve a six-figure incomeNext StepsIf you are looking for a career with high earning potential – and are up for a new challenge – click “Apply” to connect with our management team. 1 Source: The Baby Boom Cohort  in the US:2012-2060,  accessed 2/27/2015,  *Candidates cannot be currently registered with another broker-dealer.  Securities products and services are offered through Pruco Securities, LLC.  Each is a Prudential Financial company located in Newark, NJ and is solely responsible for its own financial condition and contractual obligations. ©2015  Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Prudential, the Prudential logo, the Rock symbol and Bring Your Challenges are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc., and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide. Prudential is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. EEO IS THE LAW. The Prudential Insurance Company of America, Newark, NJ and its affiliates. Prudential is an Employer that participates in E-Verify.0272810-00002-00 Expires 10/10/2016                                                                      Version 1 – Revised 3/16/2015",Financial Professional Associate Job in Englewood,Full Time Employee,"Englewood, CO 80112",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-professional-associate-job-englewood-co-us-174730377.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=7,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,40895970d2097c7ec46221a43f0a76f2
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:07:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Prospects for new customers via phone, interactively and in-person within relevant industries to present and close on commercial pest control services and products. Creates new business at the local and regional levels, and follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction, increase existing business and obtain referrals. Collaborates with internal departments to deliver solutions and provide quality service to new and existing customers. Responsibilities 1. Prospects for new customers via phone interactively through tip groups, networking, cross-selling and referrals, and by canvassing for large potential customers in industries such as food grade, food processing, distribution/logistics, healthcare, manufacturing, and companies with multiple physical locations. 2. Presents commercial pest control services and products to potential customers through in-person presentations and electronic communications. 3. Creates new business at the local and regional and national levels through creative calls, leads, prospecting, networking, cross-selling and referrals. 4. Follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction of service and products and to obtain referrals for new business. 5. Collaborates with the National Accounts department to deliver solutions to multi-unit locations assigned as contract leads. 6. Works with Branch Managers, Sales Managers, Service Managers, Region Managers and service professionals to ensure quality service delivery to new and existing customers; assists in resolving customer issues. Education and Experience Requirements • High School Diploma or GED equivalent • Associate’s or Bachelor’s degree preferred, or equivalent combination of education and experience • Two or more years experience in business-to-business (B2B) sales; proven sales history with increasing sales amounts year after year Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Demonstrated knowledge of selling techniques (prospecting, overcoming objections, presentation skills, gaining commitment, negotiation) • Skill in taking independent action and being a self-starter • Skill in written and verbal communication • Ability to build customer relationships and provide appropriate levels of customer service • Business acumen and the ability to calculate numbers and amounts • Skill with Microsoft Office software applications (Word, Outlook, Excel, PowerPoint) • Skill in adapting to new company software and using the internet to research target industries and specific businesses • Ability to travel locally on an extensive basis Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Business Development Rep / BB Sales / Outside Sales Job in South San Francisco,"Full Time, Employee","South San Francisco, CA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-rep-b2b-sales-outside-sales-job-south-san-francisco-ca-us-175561313.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=6,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a46b0974294279843a88b4aad61a1850
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:07:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are looking to add a member to our team as we grow into a second and larger Chocolate, Fudge and Ice Cream shop. We need a member that has extensive knowledge and experience in chocolate and candy making.  The new shop is 3200 sq ft and it will have a candy work kitchen of about 600 sq ft and will have one wall all glass so customers can watch.  We will also have 2 other small work stations in front of windows in other parts of the store to make fudge, pralines, etc..  The candy kitchen will be climate controlled separate from the rest of the shop for obvious reasons.  In the candy kitchen we will have tempering machines with enrobing line and cooling tunnel, panning machine, kettle cookers, depositors, oneshot machine and other cooking and packaging machinery needed in the candy making process.  We would like someone that can work with chocolate and make our items as well as bring his / her own ideas, recipes and knowledge to our company.  We would like that person to have some knowledge in the operation of the machinery and candy making equipment.  We look forward to reading your resume and hope you will be a good fit for our work family. Report",Kayden's Candy Factory Job Application for Chocolatier,"Full Time, Employee","Contact name Stephen Vrondran Phone 2519795013 Address 26651 PERDIDO BEACH BLVD STE CORANGE BEACH, AL 36561",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/chocolatier-pastry-chef-candy-maker-job-orange-beach-al-us-174752157.aspx?mescoid=3500601001001&jobPosition=6,,,7174b89b3a8964ae3e145037f60f5a1c
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID 17578BR Job Title West Central Delivery Lead Job Site Location Utah - Salt Lake City Home Office Location St. Louis, MO Why CDM Smith? CDM Smith provides lasting and integrated solutions in water, environment, transportation, energy and facilities to public and private clients worldwide. As a full-service consulting, engineering, construction, and operations firm, we deliver exceptional client service, quality results and enduring value across the entire project life cycle. Job Description CDM Smith has an exciting opportunity for a West Central Delivery Lead.  This position is part of the leadership team of the West Central Group of the North American Unit (NAU) reporting to the West Group's Delivery Director, Ian Stott.  We are presently considering candidates who are currently based, or will relocate to a CDM Smith office residing in the West Central Area.  The key responsibilities of this position will be to: Lead, train, and develop project delivery teams working on West Central Group service and construction projects, such that annual revenue, profit and cash management goals are met Drive clilent satisfaction and repeat busienss opportunities through pre-eminent project execution Drive project quality through proactive, preemptive, and preventative business processes Manage the West Central Group's Project Portfolio Leaders and take on a Project Portfolio load equal to $20 to $30 million in annual revenue Support the sales process through the active development of leads as a part of the project delivery process Work effectively with West Central Group sales teams to support area sales and business development goals Identify, avoid and mitigate project delivery risks and know how to appropriately price residual risk Engage NAU, TSU, CCI, and OGC business partners, as applicable, and in a timely manner, to assist in project execution (e.g. legal reviews of RFPs and contracts, teaming agreements, JV agreements, financial reviews of potential teaming partners, quality reviews, pricing strategy, resource identification ect.) Foster a learning organization through teaching, coaching, and implementation of lessons learned Provide input and leadership during the annual budget process Drive staff retention, hiring and growth through improved staff engagement Manage the human capital needs of the West Central Group's delivery organization (ie. Project Portfolio Leaders, Project Managers, Financial Manager, and Administrative Personnel) Foster collaboration between TSU and CCI on project delivery issues, including the mentoring and development of TSU and CCI staff that may migrate to NAU in the future Manage the P&L of the West Central Group  in partnership with the West Central Group's Sales Leader Drive the business case for change in your own words and deeds **We are open to considering candidates to be based in one of the following West Central offices  - Houston, Dallas, Austin, El Paso, San Antonio, Ft. Worth, Oklahoma City, Wichita, Omaha,  Helena,  Denver, Albuquerque, Salt Lake City, St. Louis, or Kansas City**  Minimum Qualifications Bachelor’s degree in an engineering discipline At least 15 years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management experience in Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors PE License or AICP Certification Demonstrated abiltiy to communicate and operate effectively with peers in a matrix-type organization Demonstrated leadership experience in organizations associated with Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors Demonstrated understanding of financial project management tools and project execution policies, procedures, and best practices. Knowledge and understanding of Profit and Loss Statements. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Self-directed, motivated, mission-driven with a positive attitude. Preferred Qualifications Master's degree in an Engineering discipline and/or Business Administration 15+ years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management in Water, Environmental and Infrastructure sectors  PMP Certification Experience with Project Delivery Systems Experience in Program Management Systems Assignment Category Fulltime-Regular Amount of Travel Required 40% EEO Statement We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Agency Disclaimer All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.",West Central Delivery Lead Job in St. Louis,,"St. Louis, MO",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/west-central-delivery-lead-job-st.-louis-mo-us-174731565.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=1,,,23021d0a14203dac85ad2398f598d740
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a professional Patient Registration Specialist for one of the largest healthcare organizations in Indiana (IN). They are looking for a customer service oriented person that loves people interacting and helping others. The position would involve floating to Carmel, Fishers, and Tipton as scheduled. This is a day shift position but they need to be available to work every other weekend and holidays as well as a few days during the week.Responsibilities Include: Going to patients' hospital rooms in the Emergency Department Gathering demographic and insurance information and checking patients in/out of the hospital Processing related paperwork Interviewing patients, preparing standard registration forms, and performing other admission or transfer related tasks May be expected to perform clerical and secretarial work Call Insurance companies for verification of benefits Print charts, get patients admitted into their roomsREQUIREMENTS: Availability to commute to Carmel, Fishers, and Tipton as scheduled Previous experience in patient registration strongly preferredKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Patient Registration Specialist (Float) Job in Carmel,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Carmel, IN 46032",,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-registration-specialist-float-job-carmel-in-us-176349957.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a8ebcab0efbc66e113543bf233a751eb
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY:Assist the management team in achieving restaurant operational goals (5 Points of Focus), annual sales, and profit plan. Performs many of the same duties as the AM, with the exception of the hiring and termination of team members.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Supervise and direct staff (hourly team members) to assure guests are treated promptly and courteously; products are prepared as specified in both quality and quantity and the restaurant is maintained properly. Adherence to all standards for food safety and sanitation to insure restaurant to be maintained in clean and attractive manner.Utilize all company-training tools to provide hourly team members with training in all aspects of the restaurant operation.Assist the management team in maintaining restaurant equipment and facility per company guidelines; contacts General Manager to inform about needed repairs to equipment in restaurant.Performs regular administrative tasks including: Register and safe audits, deposit of company funds, proper accounting of restaurant funds, reporting of all guest and employee accidents. Investigates, resolves and responds to guest complaints. Attend regularly scheduled store, market and company meetings, training sessions and stay current with all federal, state and local certifications (alcohol, food safety, etc.).Recommend disciplinary action for hourly team membersOther duties as assigned.SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:Will supervise staff of up to 12 team members on the shift.QUALITIFICATIONS:An individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge skill and / or ability. Must also be certified by company in order to assume responsibilities of shift leader.?EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:High School Diploma or equivalent or6 months restaurant management experienceLANGUAGE SKILLS:Must have good written and oral communication skills.Must have good customer service skills.Must be able to perceive and react to the needs of others.Must be organized, flexible and able to deal with various personalities.COMPUTER SKILLS:Basic Computer skillsMicrosoft Word, Excel and OutlookPHYSICAL DEMANDS:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential functions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit, talk, or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to handle or feel, and also to reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to lift up to 50 pounds.WORK ENVIRONMENT:The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Temperature controlled restaurantThe noise level in the work environment is low to moderateEQUIPMENT USED:Computer, fax, calculator, copier, phone.Pollo Tropical is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Shift Leader Job in Homestead,"Full Time, Employee","Homestead, FL",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-leader-job-homestead-fl-us-175870883.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=3,10.00 - 11.00 $ /year,Food Services/Hospitality,e4fd4ae8f9f69d0290c06438961dc5da
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  The grill cook takes orders for grill food items, cooks and prepares the order, and gives the order to the customer.  Providing quality service is essential to customer satisfaction. Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down the grill station Provides friendly and helpful customer service Takes the customer's order and prepares the order according to recipe, keeping in mind additional customer specifications or dietary needs Cooks items according to the specified cook times to ensure that they are safe for customer consumption Uses the correct portions when cutting and serving items Anticipates peak and non-peak service times; batch cooks food items accordingly Responsible for the appearance of food when serving to customers Restocks the station with condiments and food product as needed Adheres to the weekly/monthly cleaning schedules by completing the assigned tasks Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Lifts food pans from warmer to the serving line Operates and cleans grill station (flat-top grill, char grill, hood vents, fryers, etc.) Safely operates a meat slicer and executes proper knife handling Additional Job Functions: Cross-trains at other stations at the location Works in other areas or departments as needed Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team Qualifications Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and ability to work in a team environment Time management skills Excellent customer service Minimum 1 year experience in the food service industry Ability to multi-task and work in a fast paced environment Ability to read, write, and follow instructions Desired Qualifications: ServSafe Certified Work Environment:  Mostly works in front-of-house.  Requires work in grill area with extreme heat conditions and frequent interaction with heated equipment, grease, and other at-risk conditions.  Involves repetitive motion; walking and/or standing for extended periods of time. Frequent lifting, pushing, and carrying.  ",Grill Cook- Sinclair Community College Job in Dayton,"Part Time, Employee","Dayton, OH 45402",,http://jobview.monster.com/grill-cook-sinclair-community-college-job-dayton-oh-us-175717206.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=4,,Food Services/Hospitality,2d434c7d37ea8c19c3fe425de92daf84
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionOverview: The Seasonal Prep Cook’s primary responsibility is to prepare hot and cold items into batches for future recipes use according to company and Health Department standards. Perform other duties as assigned. Essential Functions:Follows Food Division Standards and Best PracticesProduce craveable food products in batches by following recipes or build sheets according to company standardsDemonstrate a current working knowledge of all recipesPut away stock according to standardsFollow food safety standards and maintain work area and equipment in accordance with Health Department standardsEducate, sample, and serve customers food productsDemonstrate MAGIC selling skillsEffectively deal with multiple customers and communicate customer requests or concerns to other associates and manager on dutyFollow station specific duties and responsibilitiesOpen and close area following appropriate checklist, verifying completion with Manager on Duty prior to leaving the areaFollow production guides, maintain stock levels and standards in product presentationMaintain personal hygiene and professional dress code to comply with company and Health Department standardsAssist other associates to ensure all kitchen duties are completed and customer service standards are maintainedMaintain a safe work areaAssist with special eventsRegular, dependable attendance & punctuality Qualifications:Education/Experience: No specific educational accomplishment is necessary. Previous restaurant/hospitality experience is preferred but not required. Health department license or certification and/or alcohol certification as required by state or local requirement. Per state law, a Food Handler's certificate may required for all food service employees who prepare, store or serve food at restaurants, coffee bars or any other food service establishment. Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, reports, and procedure manuals. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to communicate in Spanish is preferred but not required.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to make change using American monetary units.Reasoning Ability: Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision. Must be able to follow instructions.Physical Demands: This position involves regular walking, standing, hearing and talking. May occasionally involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. Must be able to move and/or lift at least 30 lbs. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other skills: Must possess excellent customer service skills. Must be able to work effectively in a fast-paced environment.Work Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs. Working Conditions: This position is exposed to sharp objects such as knives and scissors. This position is also exposed to high levels of heat within an enclosed space. This position is required to use potentially hazardous equipment, such as grills and ovens. Reasonable accommodations have been made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential job functions. Work generally occurs in an office environment with moderate temperature and noise level. ______________________________________________________________________________________________________________DisclaimerThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy’s, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. foodsculinaryarts Primary Location:United States-Minnesota-EdinaJob:Restaurant/Food Service - Back of House.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Lakeshore Grill Restaurant Prep Cook** Part Time Macy's Southdale Center Job in Edina,Full Time Employee,"Edina, MN",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-lakeshore-grill-restaurant-prep-cook-part-time-macy's-southdale-center-job-edina-mn-us-175808931.aspx?mescoid=3500609001001&jobPosition=8,,Food Services/Hospitality,a6ba30a1a189726f71abac9c9ee4b5de
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"These are ENTRY LEVEL positions in Customer Service, Marketing, Advertising, Events, and Public Relations. Comprehensive training and development is provided to every team member in order be SUCCESSFUL in a career path with the company. College graduates are WELCOME!We are hiring for the following positions:Entry-level Management (Paid Training Provided)Customer Service (Paid Training Provided)Marketing to Management (Paid Training Provided)Public Relations (Paid Training Provided)Advertising (Paid Training Provided)Sales (Paid Training Provided)Events**NO SALES, D2D, B2B, OR TELEMARKETING INVOLVED WHATSOEVER!**Must have reliable transportation! RequirementsJOB REQUIREMENTS:1-2 years experience in marketing, sales or communicationsExcellent written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work in a fast-paced environmentLevel headed problem solver with a professional oriented attitudeOrganizational and tracking skills with attention to detailTeam player who also excels as an individual contributorAdaptable, dependable and responsibleBasic understanding of general marketing concepts and sales strategyPosition will be considered for senior campaign management rolesHIRING REQUIREMENTS:ONLY Entry and Junior Level positions available (will train into Management)RELIABLE MEANS OF TRANSPORTATION IS REQUIREDIMMEDIATE / DIRECT HIRE ONLYAPPLY TODAY TO BE CONTACTED FOR AN INTERVIEW",Entry Level to Management -  Open Positions! Job in Jenkintown,"Full Time , Employee","Jenkintown, PA 19046",Hotels and Lodging Government and Military Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-to-management-8-open-positions!-job-jenkintown-pa-us-174839372.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,Food Services/Hospitality,6e5c7585a2899a019d4ff1608e82aa36
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Company Description AXA is a leading financial protection company, committed to fostering and maintaining a diverse, multicultural and inclusive environment, and one of the nation’s premier providers of life insurance and annuity products. The organization was established in 1859 and we are committed now more than ever to helping clients meet financial goals in all stages of their lives. One of the hallmarks of our proud heritage is providing world-class customer service. We're always looking for smart and talented people to help us develop new and innovative ways to expand our product portfolio, reach new customers and serve well the clients already a part of the AXA family. .Job Purpose Summary:  (High Level Overview of position) The Business Planning Manager is responsible for proactively promoting the adoption and usage of Business Planning group services.  This highly visible role will act as the subject matter expert under general supervision offering case consultation targeting businesses and small business owners in the complex advanced market areas including business insurance, annuities, business valuation, retirement (SEPs, SIMPLE, IRA, 457(b) and 403(b)), 401k plan administration, and executive benefits planning. The Business Planning Manager is the primary field representative of the Business Planning function to targeted groups of advisors and acts as sales coach.  This individual is also responsible for meeting the group's outreach activity goals.     The individual will be responsible for ensuring Written Supervisory Procedures are maintained, and will also work closely with all other functional areas such as Operations, Legal/Compliance and IT.  Provides leadership and direction to a small team of case consultants.  Travel is required.      Responsibilities:  • Reviews sales concepts from both internal and external sources to determine their impact and risk to AXA Advisors and may be making recommendations that could drive significant amounts of revenue.   • Creates marketing material and client presentations illustrating the complex techniques used in planning addressing both legal and tax issues; many will be highly visible to external business partners  and must be coordinated with other divisions.   • Develop and maintain strong knowledge of AXA Equitable's Life, Annuity and Employer Sponsored Product portfolio, positioning and illustration systems. • Manage all aspects of the Business Planning group – from driving adoption to day-to-day activities. • Professionally represent AXA Advisors at Field and/or Industry events • Resolve conflicts and complex issues in a cross-functional setting  • Handle multiple tasks, initiatives or projects.  • Directly manage relationships with strategic internal partners to ensure effective communication and dissemination of information.   • Analyze marketplace, competitor/industry, and client trends to develop strategic insights and recommendations on developments influencing AXA Advisors’ planning business. • Comply with all rules and regulations of selling securities as outlined by FINRA and SEC as well as any established guidelines established by the company • Ensure that proper management practices are adhered to by providing ongoing performance and career discussions, on‐time completion of relevant people processes, and fostering Diversity and Inclusion. • Design and manage sales reporting activities • Ad hoc projects as needed. .  Qualifications Basic: • 5-8 years' financial services experience, with strong advanced markets experience (e.g., business insurance, qualified plans, executive benefits, etc.). • FINRA S7, S24, and S63/65 or S66 required    Education: • Bachelor's Degree required • Advanced designation (e.g., CFP, ChFC, JD, CLU) required   Preferred Qualifications: • Excellent telephone communication skills and etiquette. • Excellent interpersonal communication skills with proven ability to build effective relationships. • Strong working knowledge of retail financial services industry • Strong knowledge of insurance products (e.g., life, annuity and employer sponsored)  • Strong knowledge of industry standard planning concepts.  • Ability to work both independently and directly manage a small team.   • Detail oriented. • Experience with Microsoft Access, Excel and Project • Commitment to learning and expanding knowledge of financial services  .Other information NOTE: AXA participates in the E-Verify program.   In addition to competitive compensation and an outstanding benefits package including 401 (k) and medical programs, we offer the opportunity for continued professional development in a congenial corporate environment.   AXA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to our employees, applicants and candidates based on individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity and expression, age, national origin, mental or physical disabilities, sexual orientation, veteran status, genetic information or any other class protected by federal, state and local laws.   Report","AXA Job Application for Business Planning Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Careers, AXA Address Charlotte, NC 28202",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-planning-manager-job-charlotte-nc-us-176351648.aspx?mescoid=1101115002005&jobPosition=2,,,b53af766d7e1b7061882dd4cce75c976
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Grand Rapids, MI. Are you a motivated and driven accounting individual with a highly analytical mind?  If so, then you are the right candidate for our new Accounts Payable Specialist job in Grand Rapids, MI! Accounting Principals is currently seeking an immediate Accounts Payable Specialist who is positive, energetic, self-motivated and thrives in a fast-paced, deadline-driven environment.  Qualified candidates will have a minimum of one year recent accounting experience and have knowledge of processing a high volume of invoices, the 3-way match process and coding. The main responsibilities of the Accounts Payable Specialist include providing accounting support to the accounts payable department, general ledger accounting, financial analysis and account reconciliation.  Other essential responsibilities include coding invoices, vouchers, expense reports, check requests, ensuring accurate data entry into the financial system, handling all vendor correspondence in a professional and timely manner, prepare order requisitions, investigate and resolve discrepancies, assist with monthly reports, and reconcile various accounts.  Qualifications: Bachelor's degree preferred, but not requiredMicrosoft Excel proficiencyAt least 1 year of accounting experienceStrong communication skills  This job is moving extremely fast! If you are looking for the next step in your career with a company that offers growth opportunity, this contract to hire Accounts Payable Specialist job will be perfect for you! Please apply online at www.accountingprincipals.com for immediate consideration!!",Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Grand Rapids,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Grand Rapids, MI 49546",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-specialist-job-grand-rapids-mi-us-174725113.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=20,15.00 - 18.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ee28fd580160b0982d404d0b9ee21218
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID 17568BR Job Title West Central Delivery Lead Job Site Location Texas - Houston Home Office Location Houston, TX Why CDM Smith? CDM Smith provides lasting and integrated solutions in water, environment, transportation, energy and facilities to public and private clients worldwide. As a full-service consulting, engineering, construction, and operations firm, we deliver exceptional client service, quality results and enduring value across the entire project life cycle. Job Description CDM Smith has an exciting opportunity for a West Central Delivery Lead.  This position is part of the leadership team of the West Central Group of the North American Unit (NAU) reporting to the West Group's Delivery Director, Ian Stott.  We are presently considering candidates who are currently based, or will relocate to a CDM Smith office residing in the West Central Area.  The key responsibilities of this position will be to: Lead, train, and develop project delivery teams working on West Central Group service and construction projects, such that annual revenue, profit and cash management goals are met Drive clilent satisfaction and repeat busienss opportunities through pre-eminent project execution Drive project quality through proactive, preemptive, and preventative business processes Manage the West Central Group's Project Portfolio Leaders and take on a Project Portfolio load equal to $20 to $30 million in annual revenue Support the sales process through the active development of leads as a part of the project delivery process Work effectively with West Central Group sales teams to support area sales and business development goals Identify, avoid and mitigate project delivery risks and know how to appropriately price residual risk Engage NAU, TSU, CCI, and OGC business partners, as applicable, and in a timely manner, to assist in project execution (e.g. legal reviews of RFPs and contracts, teaming agreements, JV agreements, financial reviews of potential teaming partners, quality reviews, pricing strategy, resource identification ect.) Foster a learning organization through teaching, coaching, and implementation of lessons learned Provide input and leadership during the annual budget process Drive staff retention, hiring and growth through improved staff engagement Manage the human capital needs of the West Central Group's delivery organization (ie. Project Portfolio Leaders, Project Managers, Financial Manager, and Administrative Personnel) Foster collaboration between TSU and CCI on project delivery issues, including the mentoring and development of TSU and CCI staff that may migrate to NAU in the future Manage the P&L of the West Central Group  in partnership with the West Central Group's Sales Leader Drive the business case for change in your own words and deeds **We are open to considering candidates to be based in one of the following West Central offices  - Houston, Dallas, Austin, El Paso, San Antonio, Ft. Worth, Oklahoma City, Wichita, Omaha,  Helena,  Denver, Albuquerque, Salt Lake City, St. Louis, or Kansas City**  Minimum Qualifications Bachelor’s degree in an engineering discipline At least 15 years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management experience in Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors PE License or AICP Certification Demonstrated abiltiy to communicate and operate effectively with peers in a matrix-type organization Demonstrated leadership experience in organizations associated with Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors Demonstrated understanding of financial project management tools and project execution policies, procedures, and best practices. Knowledge and understanding of Profit and Loss Statements. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Self-directed, motivated, mission-driven with a positive attitude. Preferred Qualifications Master's degree in an Engineering discipline and/or Business Administration 15+ years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management in Water, Environmental and Infrastructure sectors  PMP Certification Experience with Project Delivery Systems Experience in Program Management Systems Assignment Category Fulltime-Regular Amount of Travel Required 40% EEO Statement We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Agency Disclaimer All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.",West Central Delivery Lead Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/west-central-delivery-lead-job-houston-tx-us-174731589.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,,,04e789a16448e64a1663c3b313a965bc
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Digital Content and Commerce Platform (DCCP) organization enables Amazon’s digital businesses to automate their financial transactions. We obsess over accuracy, consistency and completeness of financial data. We provide visibility to accurate and complete financial data to our customers.We are looking for a Senior Project Launch Analyst to join our DCCP Financial Operational Excellence team. The team’s primary mission is to drive financial operational excellence through a culture of continuous inspection in our processes, systems and key business initiatives. In this position, you will partner with digital businesses and assist in launching their projects with the highest level of controllership. You will ensure the necessary control elements are identified and incorporated into the systems or tools that are developed to support new business activities. You will work in a fast-paced environment, manage through ambiguity and complexity and support multiple, simultaneous project launches.Successful candidates for this position will have the equivalent of 6+ years of professional experience with financial processes, project management and process design. This position is expected to have a strong sense of ownership as well as the ability to identify process improvement opportunities and drive positive change across the multiple organizations.Key responsibilities will include:- Supporting and assisting digital project launch teams with the design of new products or offerings and the set-up of financial systems to ensure appropriate business support and controllership for digital royalties.- Defining controls and processes for new businesses and drive best practices.- Working with process owners on design and implementation of internal controls.- Evaluating processes and identify areas for improvement.- Analyzing and assessing systems for IT application controls.Reviewing project launches and develop SOPs to ensure we have a strong content provider audit trail.- Leveraging internal tools and processes to track and report status to leadership.- Evaluating lessons learned post launch to help drive process improvements.- Building training material to be delivered to key stakeholders.You must be able to understand complex business processes and technology. You should be comfortable interacting with software development engineers. You will need excellent communication skills and the ability to anticipate, identify and communicate risks to Accounting, Finance, business and IT leadership. You will have the opportunity to learn about all of our digital businesses and meet a wide range of stakeholders. We value personality, insight, intellectual flexibility and sound business judgment.BS degree in Accounting, Finance, Engineering or similar field6+ years of experience3+ years of project management skills, understanding of financial systems and accounting awarenessProven history of having worked effectively across cross-functional teams and business functionsExperience working in a fast paced environment similar to a high tech start-upTrack record of solving complex financial challengesRelevant certifications (CPA equivalent)Excellent analytical skills; ability to write SQLExperience with digital products and royaltiesAmazon is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer - Minority / Female / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation.",Senior Project Launch Analyst,,"Seattle, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-launch-analyst-kindle-content-job-seattle-wa-us-174734729.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,4b12536a11b9060c273c90f9a247a26f
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a Biopharma client that is looking for a Senior Accountant to join their accounting team based in Cambridge, MA!Essential Functions: Responsible for all Corporate accounting, including: Accounting for equity, stock options, bonus, payroll/benefits accruals, debt and interest expense, etc Consolidation of monthly financial statements Recommends financial actions by analyzing accounting options Actively participates in the month-end close process, owning preparation of journal entries, balance sheet and income statement reconciliations Proactively identifies, develops, and implements process improvements, documenting procedures to achieve efficiencies and scalability Complete ad-hoc reporting requests as necessary Maintains customer confidence and protects operations by keeping financial information confidential Reports to the Corporate Controller at corporate headquartersREQUIREMENTS: BS in Accounting 4+ years of experience preferred The optimal candidate will demonstrate a good working knowledge of accounting, payroll, and expense reportingKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Senior Accountant (Biopharma) Job in Cambridge,Full Time Employee,"Cambridge, MA 02139",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-biopharma-job-cambridge-ma-us-176271658.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f27a0ab9144ccefcd3649264b8401872
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Oversee and assist in preparation of food items for the day and dating products Oversee and assist in setting up and breaking down of stations designated by the manager Cook and otherwise prepare foods according to recipes and directions Responsible for use of correct portions when preparing and serving items on the line Maintain daily temperature logs Responsible for taking samples of all food items on the line prior to serving the customers Alert management and pull food items that do not meet quality expectations Complete opening and closing station checklists Greet customers as they approach and leave the serving line Ask customers about the quality of their service and handle any complaints (with assistance from the manager on duty) while maintaining a positive attitude and smile Oversee and assist in maintaining a clean work station (including floors, work areas, equipment, walls, refrigerators, and meat blocks) Ensures that all work areas and serving utensils are cleaned and sanitized Responsible for proper disposal of waste from the service line Transfers supplies and equipment between storage and work areas by hand or by cart Assist with daily STEP observations and report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Cross-train in areas as required by your manager Able to work in concessions, catering, and special events required by your manager Perform task as requested by your manager on a weekly, bi-weekly or monthly basis Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Supervisory Responsibilities: Oversee and direct the employees working on the line to ensure timely and effective service of the customers. Request support from utility workers for sanitation issues of the line as needed. Qualifications Required Qualifications: Great customer service and communication skills Strong leadership and supervisory skills Ability to work in a team environment Serve Safe Certification Ability to follow detailed written and verbal instructions Desired Qualifications: Food service experience High school education or equivalent Work Environment: Most often works in front-of-house. Requires frequentlifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, loud noise, chemicals and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion.",Food Service Lead Worker- Crowley Independent School District Job in Crowley,"Full Time, Employee","Crowley, TX 76036",,http://jobview.monster.com/food-service-lead-worker-crowley-independent-school-district-job-crowley-tx-us-175790745.aspx?mescoid=3500611001001&jobPosition=4,,Food Services/Hospitality,a4f345271bc6e386bb7bfc73616ed193
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking anAssistant Restaurant Managerwith a minimum of 1 year of management experience to run quality shifts and drive sales/profit performance for the restaurant. This role is to primarily assist with the opening or closing of the restaurant. This position supervises and oversees daily store operations to ensure profitability through outstanding store presentation and Guest service.Job Responsibilities:Makes daily decisions that involve time management (must have a sense of urgency), upholding product quality, cleanliness, and all other Company standards.Builds sales and maximizes profits by effectively interviewing, developing, and communicating Company and Guest expectations to the entire team.Coaches, teaches and motivates team to maintain high-quality Guest service and safety.Understands cost control procedures, financial accounting, inventory levels, and labor management.Minimum Qualifications:Must be able to work 40 hours a week.Must have a high-school diploma or GED.Must be at least 21 years of age (20 years of age may be allowed if restaurant does not serve alcohol).Minimum of one (1) year experience managing people, preferably in the food service industry, OR experience as an Opening Coordinator for at least six (6) months.Key Competencies:Coaching and Developing OthersEffective CommunicationComposureResourcefulnessDemonstrates Ethics & IntegrityTime and Priority ManagementEssential Job Functions and Work Environment:Must be able to lift or carry objects weighing 0-50 pounds during scheduled shift.Must be able to stand, bend, kneel, reach, push/pull, walk and squat during scheduled shift.In addition to the essential job duties stated above, the ability to handle job stress and interact effectively with others, including guests and co-workers, are essential functions of the job. The work environment includes flashing and flickering lights, moving mechanical parts, and loud noises.Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.The CompanyFor more than 35 years, CEC Entertainment has served as the nationally recognized leader in family dining and entertainment and the place Where A Kid Can Be A Kid®. As the award-winning, number-one, kid-friendly restaurant for millions of families across the world, the company and its franchisees operate a system of more than 575 Chuck E. Cheese's stores located in 47 states and 10 foreign countries or territories. CEC welcomed Peter Piper Pizza to its portfolio in October 2014. More than 15,000 employees are dedicated to ensuring Every Guest leaves Happy!BenefitsCEC Entertainment offers a wide variety of benefits including medical, dental, vision, life, disability and 401(k) to eligible U.S. employees as part of their overall employment package. We also offer job training and career growth opportunities.* * *At CEC Entertainment, we believe that our workforce should reflect the diverse backgrounds, experiences and perspectives of the many guests we serve. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we do not discriminate against applicants due to race, ancestry, color, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, religion, age, physical or mental disability, genetic information, pregnancy, veteran status, or on the basis of any other federal, state or local protected class. Employment is contingent upon a successful background and reference check, and drug testing. Applicable positions also require a Motor Vehicle Review and Credit Check. Applicants must be eligible to work in the United States.",Assistant Restaurant Manager Job in Cupertino,"Full Time , Employee","Cupertino, CA 95014",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-restaurant-manager-job-cupertino-ca-us-175537113.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,4585ac1617824fcf6e870d29a0008636
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:23:27:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-knoxville-tn-us-171363803.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6f16e0a128120f64e5ee629788cd2788
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:23:25:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job General Managers in Training & Shift Leaders Come Join the # 1 Market Share Leader for Pizza in Knoxville and Maryville. We continue to grow in both sales and units. We need 15 General Managers in Training who want promotion opportunities and 10 full or part time shift leaders. You must: Enjoy a fast paced environment that is drug free. Have a valid driver license with a safe driving history, a dependable vehicle and insurance, ability to pass a CBC You will earn $8.50 -$13.00 per hour as a GMIT depending upon experience and skills. As a General Manager you will earn $14.00 - $15.00 per hour plus a substantial bonus potential of $15K -22K annually. Excellent health insurance available, dental and life insurance. Paid Vacation for GMIT Come Join Our Winning Team!! Send Resumes to: Domino's PO Box 23288, Knoxville, TN 37933 Apply online: jobs.dominos.com Apply in person at any West Knox County or Maryville location Posting provided by: Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address KnoxvilleKnoxville, TN 37922",All,http://jobview.monster.com/general-managers-job-knoxville-tn-us-171418882.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=16,,,caac940f391d330530fcb358069514a7
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:22:57:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you searching for a great work/life balance? Would you like to have a Monday-Friday schedule? Then let us put you to work!Randstad is currently hiring temp-to-hire Machine Operators, Welders, and Forklift Drivers in the Clinton, TN area and we would love to hear from you! We have several openings available.Pay rate starts at $11.00 for Machine Operators and $14 -$15 for WeldersCome join this established company who offers competitive wages, great career advancement opportunities and a Medical / Dental benefit package once you are hired. Temporary benefits are also available through Randstad. Positions are full-time (40 hours) Monday-Friday with possible overtime.1st shift: 6:30 am- 3:00 pm2nd shift: 3:30 pm- 12:00 amWorking hours: 2nd shift 3:30p-12:00amSkills:High School Diploma or GEDMust complete required screenings prior to placement.Environment: An employee and customer supportive team environment with emphasis on safety, quality, on-time delivery, and value-add with significant investments made to protect each employee.Apply online or at 130 Eagle Way in Clinton, TN. 37716We want you to be a part of our great team!Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Manufacturing Positions Job in Clinton,Full Time Employee,"Clinton, TN 37716",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/manufacturing-positions-job-clinton-tn-us-171151976.aspx?mescoid=5100920001001&jobPosition=16,11.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,,a32219791e3c584245b9d1a6f6e6974c
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:22:57:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Would you like to work for one of the most progressive companies in the career education industry? Are you excited about giving committed students the skills they need to be successful? Then consider joining us at Virginia College.Virginia College is a private institution of higher education committed to offering associate degrees, diploma courses, and baccalaureate degrees at its various campuses. These programs strengthen the student's ability to enter or advance in a chosen career. The student's learning experience and placement opportunities are enhanced through studies that provide a balance of general academics, technical skills and personal growth.We keep education relevant by employing staff and instructors with real-world experience in the field, who bring their career backgrounds to the classroom. Our programs are continually assessed by faculty, staff and members of the business and education communities to help ensure students studies align with their career goals. Programs offered by Virginia College focus on local employment needs, in areas such as allied health, nursing and technical and professional programs.To learn more about our school, please click here:www.vc.eduTo learn more about our company, please click here:www.ecacolleges.comServes as the academic leader and manages the administrative functions of a single or multiple programs. Responsibilities generally include course scheduling, faculty development and evaluation, development and implementation of operational procedures, student management and retention, and special projects. Serves as leader to program instructors and sets tone for overall quality, community involvement, and performance results of the program.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Advising Students –Responsible for developing and sustaining student relationships through participation in student orientations and through providing proper counseling, coaching, mentoring, scheduling, and advisement.Supervising Instructors –Participate in hiring, training, instructor orientations, mentoring program instructors; provide faculty development and in-services opportunities; and, provide growth opportunities for teaching methodologies.Supporting Operations –Monitor student attendance, grades, retention, academic metrics, program budget, classroom observations, instructor evaluations, and provide actionable information to the Dean, Campus President, and Corporate Academics.Teaching Classes –Responsible for teaching courses as prescribed by the academic staffing guidelines.Ensuring Compliance –Responsible for adherence to accreditation criteria, programmatic accreditor criteria, and corporate and college policies and procedures.Reviewing Curriculum –Participates in program and curriculum review and development.Supporting Program Enrollment –Provide product knowledge to admissions quarterly and interview applicants as requested.Supporting Graduates –Provide Career Services and the Campus President with the type and number of externship requirements and manage the placement and supervision of students in the externships.Supporting Campus Events –Attend campus/corporate events.Other Duties As Assigned –Complete other duties as assigned.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED:Ability to communicate effectively, both orally and in writing.Provide strong leadership and management of overseeing program.Strong interpersonal and communication skills and the ability to work effectively with a wide range of constituencies in a diverse community.Ability to supervise and train staff, including organizing, prioritizing, and scheduling work assignments.A track record of delivering successful results.Ability to effectively utilize technology (eg. CampusVue, MS Office, electronic email, electronic calendar)Strong presentation skills with the ability to clearly define actionable information.SUPERVISOR RESPONSIBILITY:Instructors: Adjuncts and full time salaried instructors.REPORTING:This position reports to the Academic Dean.The duties and responsibilities above are intended to describe the general requirements of this position and are not intended to be an exhaustive statement of duties.*MSTR.MINIMUM EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:Master’s Degree in Business.Teaching experience preferred.Minimum of 3 years’ work experience in business, management, marketing Human Resources.Proprietary education background preferred..",Program Director - Business and General Education Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/program-director-business-general-education-job-knoxville-tn-us-172118199.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=9,,Education/Training,31fed6d22f36cb441e1463f89eab8b66
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:22:57:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job PROFESIONAL PROGRAM COORDINATOR POSITION Sunrise Community of TN a DIDD provider contract agency is expanding to include the addition of two PROGRAM COORDINATOR positions. We are seeking experienced professionals who demonstrate a commitment to working with individuals with disabilities. The Program Coordinator will insure that all programmatic requirements for services, documentation, reports, and person centered meetings, are coordinated fully to maximize the lives of individuals served and meet state and federal mandates. Must possess a minimum of a HS diploma, with a strong preference given to applicants with an advanced degree, or a minimum of one year of human services, DIDD and supervisory experience. Please submit your resume and cover letter to jbest@sunrise group.org no later than September 9, 2016 or apply in person at: 5645 Merchants Center Blvd, Knoxville, TN 37912. Posting provided by: Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address 5645 Merchants Center BlvdKnoxville, TN 37912",All,http://jobview.monster.com/program-coordinator-job-knoxville-tn-us-171831577.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,,7a95644928234ed5e1bac3d9b68f8200
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:22:25:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Driver Regional Drivers Based in Knoxville, TN Earn up to $65,000 / Year Free Medical Benefits Avail. Excellent 401K Plan 11 Paid Holidays CDL-A w/1 yr. T/T Exp. Req'd 800-879-7826 www.ruan.com/jobs Dedicated to Diversity. EOE. Posting provided by: Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address KnoxvilleKnoxville, TN 37921",All,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-drivers-job-karns-tn-us-171418891.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=9,,,cc6df7843a5044986057c65a2ba1b886
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:22:23:52,No,jobs.monster.com,Report this job About the Job Janitorial Positions ServiceMaster is now accepting applications for Full Time evening commercial janitorial positions in the health care field. Call 865-281-0220 for more information. Posting provided by: Report,Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Fax 8656883129 Address KnoxvilleKnoxville, TN 37912",All,http://jobview.monster.com/janitor-positions-job-knoxville-tn-us-171820597.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=5,,,43ed333bd89e6210e432362746b595e2
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:21:22:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England has been hiring and training drivers since 1920. We are also one of the oldest and largest refrigerated trucking company in the nation. The majority of the freight you haul for us is no-touch – our clients will do all of the loading and unloading. You can choose to drive solo (OTR, regional, dedicated or intermodal) or as part of a team (OTR and regional). Experienced drivers also have the opportunity to earn extra income by becoming a truck driver trainer for the C.R. England team. There are many dedicated routes available for experienced C.R. England company truck drivers. Dedicated runs provide a stable income and predictable home time. Over the last few years, the Dedicated division has grown swiftly and will continue to grow in years to home. Benefits:Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Awards for SafetyLiberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Paid Time Off Retirement Plan 401k w/Company ParticipationHome Time-C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C.R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today!",Truck Driver – CDL ( Class A ) Transportation – Full Time / Training Provided Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-cdl-class-a-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-knoxville-tn-us-171214238.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=5,,Logistics/Transportation,eda6804deaa4bc6122c722cfdcafae97
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:21:01:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job AS WE CONTINUE TO GROWWe Have IMMEDIATE openings for“CALL CENTER CUSTOMER SERVICE REPS”WE OFFER:1) FULL Time Position with BENEFITS2) $12.10/hour to start3) SetWork Schedule4) Paid Training5) Casual Work EnvironmentCALL (865)824-1190 to schedule an interview!Become part of the First Tennessee Call Center Team Today! WE OFFER:1) FULL Time Position with BENEFITS2) $12.10/hour to start3) SetWork Schedule4) Paid Training5) Casual Work EnvironmentFor schedule, job description, & application visit us online at www.fhncareers.com Once online follow these 3 steps:1) Click ‘Job Search’2) Enter “16-1026” in the Keywords box3) Apply!! Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 8658241190 Address KnoxvilleKnoxville, TN 37929",All,http://jobview.monster.com/call-center-customer-service-reps-job-knoxville-tn-us-171177351.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=3,,,1a7b3e07fca7557ffd63ccefbc3d38ed
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:21:00:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job East Tennessee PBS seeks a Chief Development and Marketing Officer (CDO).  The CDO serves as the principal development and communications leader of a broad-based public media organization that delivers television and web content.  The ideal candidate will expand and grow existing donor partnerships; promote national, regional, and local public media content; and engage with and grow community partners while working collegially with an experienced leadership team, professional board, and community advisory council dedicated to ensuring East Tennessee PBS has the resources to serve our viewing area.Ø  Prepare an annual integrated development and marketing plan that effectively coordinates all development and marketing efforts to serve East TN PBS strategic and operational goals.Ø  Implement and operationalize this integrated annual development and marketing plan and ensure performance goals and outcomes are met.Ø  Maintain and communicate departmental goals, timelines, and accountability measures to guide and sustain efforts of development and marketing staff. Ø  Prepare an annual departmental budget and oversee the appropriate expenditure of department funds.Ø  Oversee and pursue large corporate and foundation gifts through development of plans and programs to support local, educational and overall community endeavors.Ø  Oversee and/or assist with some aspects of individual giving including major giving, planned giving, endowment growth, direct mail, on-air pledge, donor and special events. Individual and planned, major and endowment giving programs have department heads, however job would require you to be team leader. Ø  Assist with marketing materials, proposals and strategies for corporate support as needed.Ø  Oversee and/or assist with community engagement and special event activities.Ø  Oversee and/or assist with marketing materials, proposals and strategies to promote East TN PBS in the community via television, radio, web, social media, and print platforms.Ø  Write and/or assist with grants and contracts to support fundraising and community engagement initiatives.Ø  Oversee and manage grant fulfillment processes.Ø  Collaborate and communicate with other East TN PBS departments and colleagues to ensure cooperation and appropriate assignments for all development activities.Ø  On-camera pledge host as directed; guest speaker at local community/corporate events to promote East TN PBS. Represent media station at local, regional and national meetings and seminars; maintain active involvement in community organizations.Ø  Build a donor-centered development culture that provides two-way communication between East TN PBS staff, board, and volunteers.Ø  Seek out and initiate professional development opportunities.Ø  Collect and analyze benchmarks and performance data to provide a basis for company-wide planning and department improvement.  Provide quarterly reports to senior management team based on performance against agreed revenue goals.  Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 8655950235 Fax 8655950300 Address 1611 E. Magnolia AvenueKnoxville, TN 37917","Broadcasting, Music, and Film",http://jobview.monster.com/chief-development-marketing-officer-job-knoxville-tn-us-171789229.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=17,,,5a443e1834405eea26961b9bbdf53e34
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:20:29:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Technology Specialist IDescriptionThis entry level person will assist internal and external customers by providing exceptional customer service with regards to technology.  This person shall work under minimal supervision to resolve customer issues related to software, hardware and systems.  Must be able to quickly and effectively solve issues submitted via electronic tickets or phone calls.  This position will also involve some system administration in a mixed Windows/Linux environment.Required·        Associate’s Degree in Computer Science or related discipline·        A passion for providing world class customer service·        Ability to troubleshoot and resolve complex user technology issues·        Ability to troubleshoot Windows, Mac, Android, and IOSPreferred·        Microsoft or CompTIA certifications·        Experience in a help desk environment·        Experience in system administration with Linux and/or WindowsResponsibilities·        Provide first level of technical support via phone, email, and tech tickets·        Escalate advanced issues to higher tier support personnel ·        Resolve issues relating to multiple third party applications·        Local and remote troubleshooting of Windows and Mac operating systems·        Troubleshooting and configurations of mobile applications on Android and IOS·        Assist with daily system administration tasks·        Provide exceptional customer service               Provide follow up on customer support issues",Technology Specialist Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN 37932",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technology-specialist-job-knoxville-tn-us-171615698.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=14,"28,000.00 - 32,000.00 $ /year",Other,9ffbc570cb18b581b6e834a936d12866
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:20:27:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job WDVX seeks a full time Events Coordinator. $11/hr + benefits. See wdvx.com/about-us. Send resume and cover letter by 9/19 to GM@wdvx.com or WDVX, 301 S. Gay Street, Knoxville, TN 37902. Posting provided by: Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address KnoxvilleKnoxville, TN 37902",All,http://jobview.monster.com/events-coordinator-job-knoxville-tn-us-172072074.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=7,,,0cccad735f5c7db5a0c8bc516d894467
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:19:52:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",Crisis Services Peer Support Program Counselor Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/crisis-services-peer-support-program-counselor-job-knoxville-tn-us-172092757.aspx?mescoid=2100317001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,99b7d2f690fae81f63c0b262a2a8c774
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:19:37:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Earthbound Trading Company is now looking for dynamic, high-energy people to join our teams at the #463 Market Square, #398 Sevierville, and #362 Gatlinburg locations!Company Profile:Since 1994, Earthbound Trading Company has provided an eclectic assortment of products at great prices in an environment that creates a sense of adventure and variety for our customers. In order to create that sense of adventure we do several things that are outside the norm of retailers. These things provide each customer with that unique shopping experience that keeps them coming back for more. Our stores are staffed with friendly, motivated, and well-trained salespeople. We have built a high level of quality and performance into everything we do so that we will gain the respect and loyalty of our customers. It is important to Earthbound Trading Co. to give back to its communities. We participate in multiple charities such as the Heifer Fund, Arbor Day Foundation, and Dog for Dog to name a few. Key Holder:Part-TimeJob Benefits: • Hourly wage• 401K available • Positive, fun work environment Job Responsibilities:Key holders are in charge of: • Assisting the Assistant Store Manager and Store Manager with all day-to-day operations of the store• Making sure the floor is properly merchandised with freight to floor within 48 hours• Inventory control and banking responsibilities • Completing all tasks assigned to them, such as, but not limited to: o Housekeeping dutieso Stocking and pricing productsJob requirements:• Must be a great salesperson and possess excellent customer service skills• Previous sales experience preferred • Ability to work a flexible schedule, have dependable transportation and self-motivation skills• Possess a personality that supports efficiency, inspirational leadership qualities, and a can do attitude.Sales Associates:Part-TimeJob Benefits: • Hourly wage• 401K available • Positive, fun work environment Job Responsibilities:Sales Associates are responsible for:• Assisting customers with the emphasis of total and exemplary sales service• Ringing sales and completing all routine sales transactions• Completing all tasks assigned to them, such as, but not limited to: o Housekeeping dutieso Stocking and pricing productsJob requirements:• Ability to work a flexible schedule, have dependable transportation and self-motivation skills• Possess a personality that supports efficiency, inspirational leadership qualities, and a can do attitude.To learn more about us and to apply:Visit: http://www.earthboundtrading.com/careers Please be sure to choose store location (#463 for Market Square, #398 for Sevierville, and #362 for Gatlinburg ) in the ""can't find what you are looking for?"" section-- then select the search magnifier icon.",Earthbound Trading Co./Retail Keys and Sales - # Market Square,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37902",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/earthbound-trading-co-retail-keys-sales-463-market-square-398-sevierville-362-gatlinburg-job-knoxville-tn-us-172008805.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=12,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,44e5fcd74fda824c5f515d9d14305a0b
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:19:30:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Wheel Recovery Systems, LLC is based in Knoxville and currently looking to add more laborers to our growing business.Laborers will work Monday through Friday and enjoy weekends off.Duties include but may not be limited to shipping and receiving, loading and unloading box trucks, stock and pick the inventory, and any other necessary duties.Applicant must be able to:-Lift 50 lbs continuously -Pass a physical and Drug screenA valid driver's license is a plus but not mandatory.If interested please apply in person at the address belowWheel Recovery Systems, LLC 1805 Jackson Road Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address 1805 Jackson RoadKnoxville, TN 37921",,http://jobview.monster.com/laborers-job-karns-tn-us-171968954.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=2,,,ca298e0bee4f77bea3949627561da8a9
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:19:28:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company backgroundRegus is the World’s largest provider of flexible workplace solutions. Established in 1989, and based in Luxembourg, the company offers a wide range of products and services which allow individuals and companies to work however, wherever, and whenever they need to. Regus is listed on the London Stock Exchange and is a part of the FTSE 250.Although we operate in over 200 countries, 900 cities and 3,000 locations, we’re still expanding rapidly. In fact, we’re currently opening over 2 new centers every day, achieving over 20% year-on-year growth.We achieve our outstanding results through our people. It is our customer focused people who are making business happen. They are behind our fantastic success and incredible growth.The Role The world’s largest provider of workplace solutions has an opening for an Area Manager (AM)The AM is responsible for growing the overall profit performance (EBIT) across a number of Regus centres, whilst maintaining and improving customer service (NPS).  The AM will hire and manage worldclass teams within their cluster centres to help deliver these objectives.  The AM will also be the primary person responsible for new sales with a prospective customers and will present the best range of options to suit that customer’s needs. Converting sales for their cluster.Primary Objectives Profit (EBIT) and Customer service (NPS) improvement Hiring and motivating great talent measured by employee net promoter score ( ENPS) Deliver brilliant tours as per the Regus Required Standards hitting revenue targets Key responsibilities Touring customers to show the range of options available to suit their needs and closing the sale where possible Managing a group (cluster) of business centres to include: Manage by visiting centres (Visit Customers, Ensure centres look great, Ensure inventory is maximized) Managing cluster performance: EBIT, NPS, ENPS Business review planning of the centres monthly Danaging Community Managers (SCSRs) in each centre, including training and recruitment Dealing with escalated customer requests/issues Hold Networking events The candidates should have the below experience or background in order to be considered for the role: - Experienced at managing teams - Previous experience of managing P&Ls - 3 years previous experience selling products or service solutions through direct sales within a business-to-business sales environment.  - Experienced at presenting to groups of prospects.  - Experience of delivering excellent customer service in multiple locations through leadership and implementation of company standards  - Professional and clear communication skills coupled with the ability to network at a high level and build strong business relationships.  - Comfortable making decisions, evaluating options and considering consequences. - Strong organisational skills, including the ability to prioritise, multi-task, delegate and work effectively with minimal supervision. - Proven objection handling, prospecting and negotiation skills.  - Commercial/ results driven",Area Manager Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37929",All,http://jobview.monster.com/area-manager-job-knoxville-tn-us-171302582.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a0ff9cdf4cc148110d511b0ee902a2ab
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:19:25:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionNEW CDL-A CAREER OPPORTUNITIES in KNOXVILLE, TN** LET US PUT YOU IN THE DRIVERS SEAT ***WE MATCH YOUR NEEDS TO THE DRIVING POSITION** $750-$950 Weekly Average + Benefits & Home Daily* $850-$1200 Weekly Average + Benefits with overnight runs* Local drivers must be able to stay overnight on occasion* Monday thru Friday with occasional weekend work* Great Pay - Steady Work - Good EquipmentAPPLY NOW or Call 865-977-4156TransForce Drivers are Respected Professionals. Join the TransForce TeamThousands of TransForce Drivers - 53 Branch Offices - 24 Years of Service!• We have an excellent reputation with our drivers and our customers.• TransForce shows genuine concern for your career objectives.• Safety is our priority. We comply with DOT and FMCSA.BENEFITS:• Competitive Weekly Pay - Direct Deposit or Debit Card• Medical - Dental - Vision Insurance• Life & Disability Insurance• Paid Time Off• 401KREQUIREMENTS:• 1-2 years of recent tractor trailer driving experience• Minimal violations & accidents• Not cited for a D.O.T. defined accident in the previous 3 years• No serious offenses in the previous 7 years or pattern of unsafe practicesTruck Driver - CDL Driver (Transportation)As a CDL Truck Driver you will be responsible for the safe operation of a commercial vehicle and the reliable delivery of our clients… products.TransForce, Inc. is seeking full time and part time local and regional CDL Truck Drivers at our 53 branch offices located throughout the U.S. We are the nation…s leading transportation staffing company and our drivers are respected professionals; safe, reliable, and profitable. Join TransForce and see why our 3,500 drivers are proud to be on the TransForce team. We offer steady pay, benefits, and good equipment. In addition you…ll enjoy assignment flexibility that you won…t find anywhere else. With TransForce you have the unique ability to consider a change in assignment rather than a change in employment if situations change.Keywords: tractor trailer driver, commercial driver, Class A cdl driver, professional driver CDL-A Driver, CDL A Truck Driver, Class A CDL Driver, Class A CDL Truck Driver, CDL Truck Driver, CDL Commercial Truck Driver*cb*",TRUCK DRIVER - CDL A Driver (Transportation) Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-driver-transportation-job-knoxville-tn-us-172115989.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=15,,Logistics/Transportation,e870c5725aeb9517cf0d9623c5c257c7
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:19:21:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking a Public Relations Assistant to join our team! You will be responsible for the public relations initiatives of the organization for a consistently growing event marketing company providing marketing, advertising and consulting services to large national companies and corporations. This firm identifies and develops new streams of revenue for clients through on-site promotions, innovative marketing strategies and advertising campaigns with a personal touch. Every product campaign is executed uniquely for each client researched target market.Responsibilities:Design and maintain a favorable public image for clientsCoordinate all promotional activities and eventsLeverage existing consumer relationships and cultivate new business contactsWork with other departments to help promote brand recognitionAssist in the selection of marketing and promotional materialsRequirementsPrevious experience in marketing/advertising/public relations or other related fieldsStrong problem solving and critical thinking skillsExcellent written and verbal communication skillsDeadline and detail-oriented",Public Relations Assistant Job in Knoxville,"Full Time , Employee","Knoxville, TN 37922",Advertising and PR Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/public-relations-assistant-job-knoxville-tn-us-171082992.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=14,,Marketing/Product,421eb82041ff439e15c7a4e1c20dcb29
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:19:21:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY: To assist in the management of the Credit Union’s website, email platform and  social media channels and interpreting the Credit Union’s brand and design solutions with a high visual impact. Creates visual concepts to communicate ideas that inspire, inform, and captivate to Members, potential Members, and staff. Ensures accurate and consistent information across diverse segments, touch points, devices, and other sales channels. PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES: Assist in developing and implementing social media strategies to promote the Credit Union for maximum exposure. Stay abreast of emerging social channels, trends and reporting tools.   Assist in writing creative content for Credit Union publications, including but not limited to: Website, Emails, Print, Facebook, Instagram, YouTube, Pinterest and blog.  Assist in monitoring social media and online channels on a regular basis. Ensure all content meets compliance standards and regulations.  Assist in managing the Credit Union’s Content Management System (CMS) website and continually look for ways to increase the ease of use. Ensure the website meets all compliance standards and regulations Help translate Credit Union goals into campaigns by determining key messages and designs that portray the Credit Union’s brand. Develop graphics/visual images and audio messages for product illustrations, logos, and websites. Manage all Credit Union brochures to ensure they are on brand. Maintain an updated brochure inventory to ensure proper stock levels.   Assist in writing, scheduling and analyzing the success of email campaigns.   Stay abreast of design trends and incorporate into marketing materials.  Maintain the Credit Union’s Brand Guidelines and ensure all materials are in accordance with brand guidelines.  Manage the Credit Union’s business card portal. Review and approve business card requests. Update business card design as needed.  Assist in obtaining bid and/or coordinating bids and managing vendor relationships and contracts for the production and printing of marketing materials. Continually maintain high morale in the department as well as the Credit Union.   Perform other job-related functions depending on operational needs.Follow all Credit Union policies, procedures and regulations. Represent the Credit Union in a professional manner (including but not limited to appearance, behavior and performance). Maintain regular and predictable attendance. Work cooperatively with others. All other duties as assigned. KNOLWEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES: Ability to look at creative work from the point of view of the Member and potential Members and examine how designs will be perceived to ensure a clear message is conveyed.  Familiarity with Social Media Channels including, but not limited to Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, and blogs.  Possession of creative flair, versatility, conceptual/visual ability and originality. Ability to interact, communicate and present ideas.  Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, members and the general public. Ability to maintain positive and professional relationships with employees, peers, Members, supervisor(s), and all other internal and external contacts. Knowledge of Credit Union products and services and the ability to present them to Members in such a way that they understand and consider them. Working knowledge of industry leading software and technologies (InDesign, Illustrator, Photoshop, Dreamweaver, etc.) Demonstrate professionalism regarding time, costs, and deadlines.  Must represent the Credit Union in a professional manner and be able to correspond in a professional manner verbally, in writing, and in a timely manner with any and all potential Members, dealers, etc. Travel to various work locations, both local and surrounding counties.WORK CONDITIONS: Able to routinely stand, sit; occasionally bend, stoop, and crawl; and rarely push/pull, lift or carry loads up to 20 pounds, drive as required to accomplish assignments. Movements frequently and regularly require using back, legs, wrists, hands, and/or fingers. Average, ordinary, visual acuity necessary to prepare or inspect documents or products, or operate machinery. Ability to hear average or normal conversations and receive ordinary information.  The noise level in the work environment will vary based on location. Work is typically done in the office at the company’s principal place of business or branches.  May be required to travel to various work locations, both local and surrounding counties.  Maintain access to reliable transportation. Responsibilities may require off site attendance at seminars or meetings with consultants, professional, or community groups. Position requires flexible hours, including on call assignments to monitor social media and Saturdays. QUALIFICATIONS: EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION:             High School diploma or equivalent required. Bachelor’s Degree in GraphicDesign/Marketing/Advertising/Public Relations or related field preferred or anequivalent combination of education and previous experience.   Valid driver’s license.REQUIRED KNOWLEDGE:        Knowledge, skills and ability to execute the position requirements in a satisfactory manner.                                               EXPERIENCE REQUIRED:                     Design experience preferred. Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. D/V.  Drug-Free Workplace.  E-Verify Participant. ",Creative Content Specialist Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37901",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/creative-content-specialist-job-knoxville-tn-us-170692509.aspx?mescoid=2700441001001&jobPosition=15,,Marketing/Product,d94378155d366c66750faa717f6eb01b
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:17:55:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""You're independent, driven by performance, and looking for more than a job. We Are TruGreen, and as the nation's largest and most comprehensive provider of lawn services, we have bigger opportunities for people like you.We're seeking Residential Outside Sales Representatives, offering a guaranteed base plus commission to prospect and generate sales.  This isn't your ordinary sales job. With TruGreen, you'll learn the essential skills to launch a successful career in sales Responsibilities: • Sells programs and services to current and prospective customers through traveling around assigned territory. • Conducts follow-up of leads and customer retention/service calls through means of telephone and person-to-person contact to identify customer needs. • Develops customized solutions based on customer needs, using the TruGreen suite of lawn care products and services. As a TruGreen Employee, you'll enjoy: • Guaranteed base plus commission  • Top performers earn $65K in the first year • Paid vacation time and holidays • Medical, dental, vision and prescription plans • 401(k) with company matching At TruGreen we value our employees just as much as our customers. The result? Almost forty years of careers centered around the people who matter most -- You. Apply Now. TruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesTo learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdfTruGreen performs pre-employment testing.",Sales Representative -  Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-100677-job-houston-tx-us-171470690.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,34123a524ac612d00f64db0212d4be25
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:17:55:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, an international services company, is seeking an Indirect Tax Supervisor due to company growth and acquisitions. This position offers a reputable and multi-faceted business environment to the employee interested in building his or her career with this growing company. This company offers a competitive compensation package including: 401k matching, tuition reimbursement and an ESPP plan. Responsibilities:* Oversee tax compliance for sales and use tax including data collection and review of third party preparer* Oversee unclaimed property and business licenses for all company locations* Maintain indirect tax calendar to manage filings and due dates* Research sales and use tax liability and taxable status* Review monthly general ledger account reconciliations* Implement tax savings strategiesRequirements: * Bachelor's degree in Accounting or Finance is preferred* 6+ years of indirect tax experience with a focus on sales and use tax* Prior supervisory experience* Oracle/Vertex experience preferred* Organized, strong communication skills and ability to manage competing priorities",Indirect Tax Supervisor,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/indirect-tax-supervisor-317211-job-houston-tx-us-172050669.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=12,,,49fef9f6eddbffba66c5fd5896aeb47b
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:17:54:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Devils Lake  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Devils Lake 58301,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-DEVILS-LAKE-166732850.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=15,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,2994ebaa0041288e78ae7d4a134d4bde
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:17:23:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY: The Communications & Marketing Coordinator facilitates designs and edits marketing and communications printed materials including invitations, postcards, newsletters and brochures, and acts as quality control for adherence to hospital graphic standards. In addition, plans and coordinates hospital events that support the hospital's marketing, public relations and community relations efforts. The Communications & Marketing Coordinator works in conjunction with the Director of the department to offer quality communications vehicles for key internal stakeholders, including employees, management, and the Hospital Board of Directors.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS/EDUCATION: Bachelor's degree in relevant field required; and/or a combination of experience and education.CERTIFICATION/LICENSES: NoneSKILLS:* Ability to work independently* Demonstrated oral and written communication skills with writing styles appropriate to, background documents and newsletters, brochures.* Understanding of internal and external communications* Computer skills including competency in Word, Power Point and Excel* Knowledge of St. VincentHospital and community resources* Desktop PublishingEXPERIENCE: Five years of, copy editing and production experience; some experience in the Northern New Mexico market preferred, and hospital experience desirable.NATURE OF SUPERVISION:-Responsible to: Director of Marketing and Communications, works closely with the leadership team of the organization on an as-needed basis.ENVIRONMENT:- Bloodborne pathogen AFrequent contact of a significant nature with hospital personnel, medical staff, and the community. Contacts require knowledge of the hospital setting and day-to-day operations. Primary workspace is office and community settings.PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: Frequent prolonged periods of sitting. Extensive use of hands for writing and use of computer. Moderate physical effort (able to lift/carry up to 25 lbs and move equipment for events).Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Communications & Marketing Coordinator Job in Santa Fe,Full Time Employee,"Santa Fe, NM 87505",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Communications-Marketing-Coordinator-Job-Santa-Fe-NM-US-166715235.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,55ec0c67e05c3232be18f6721320d9a2
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:17:16:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Senior Accounts Payable Specialist in Menlo Park, California (CA).Overview:The Finance Operations Team is looking for a highly motivated individual with 4-5 years of experience in Financial Process and Project management. The ideal candidate has experience working at technology companies and is comfortable in a fast-paced -start-up- type of environment. Primary responsibilities will include working closely with the client's external and internal business stakeholders to ensure they are provided with the necessary support, training, and communication to understand the procure to pay financial processes.As a liaison to the client's customers, the candidate will assist in handling escalations and troubleshooting issues. In addition to liaising with the customers this person will be responsible for assisting the regional operations manager in day-to-day activities as well as data analysis, process improvement related projects, and the execution and upkeep of process documentation used by the Finance Operations team's outsourced provider.REQUIREMENTS: Experience working in Oracle financials (specifically invoice entry) Customer Service: Experience working issue resolution with internal and external customers; ability to provide high-touch level of service whether in person, over email or on the phone; keeps cool when emergencies arise and are able to guide a customer through issue resolution from start to finish Communication Skills: Excellent verbal and written skills; understand one's audience and know how to tailor communication to get the message across clearly Detail Oriented: Have a supreme appreciation for the detailed and understand the importance of getting the little things right when it comes to executing a process; ability to focus in on the details means this person has excellent skills at documenting processes and making sure that they are executed according to instruction; excellent at troubleshooting issues because this person can get to the root of the issue by drilling down to the details Quick Learner: Comfortable working in a fast-paced environment and are adept at picking up new information quickly; understand how to adapt to shifting priorities and are able to quickly pivot on issues Financial Process Management Experience: Have managed or been responsible for executing financial processes and understand how to balance both process efficiency with compliance to regulatory controls such as SOX Data Analytics: Comfortable working with large amounts of data, performing analysis and presenting conclusions of findings in a coherent, meaningful fashion Team Player: Experience working in highly collaborative environment; thrive working in groups and know how to partner with other team members to drive successful outcomes for the team and the business Project Management Experience: Experience working on high-visibility, high-impact projects; pro-active in driving projects forward, hold project partners accountable for their actions, and know how to execute again",Senior Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Menlo Park,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Menlo Park, CA 94025",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Accounts-Payable-Specialist-Job-Menlo-Park-CA-US-166761072.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),91583a67e7b8687e7989bbb8fc1224eb
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:17:14:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ashland is seeking a Business Development Manager to join our team. Ashland Performance Materials (APM) is a leader in thermosetting resins and gelcoats for the composites industry. From our significant global presence, APM serves customers throughout the world with differentiated polymer solutions. APM prides itself on the ability to partner with these customers to drive their business while driving its own business through strategic marketing tools and strategies, best in class business and technical training, and industry leading innovation within the categories in which it competes. The current approach has yielded strong growth within this channel, but has also identified substantial growth opportunities moving forward. This is a very exciting place to enter the Ashland family with exceptional opportunities for visibility and advancement.**This job is based on a ladder structure and the job level (salary) will be determined by the quantity and quality of your experience. The Business Development group within our Performance Materials business focuses on medium to long-term growth beyond normal new product development and customer acquisition. The group is also involved in strategic planning, marketing strategy and special projects. The Business Development Manager will be responsible for a variety of projects including but not limited to Merger and acquisition identification and assessment.External technology identification and assessmentNew application development in the composites marketMarketing strategySpecial projects such as pricing analysis, market segmentation, market expansion plans, channel analysis, etc. as needed in the businessBuild Organizational Capability – Grow the capability of the organization by improving processes and approaches, and building organization knowledge in marketing and innovation process management Candidate competencies:An ability to distill customer insights, competitive challengers and value chain understanding into a strong value proposition. Has a demonstrated strategic ability developing new solutions based upon customer insightsHas a strong grasp of core marketing concepts and applies them with great effectivenessStrong analytical skills including business and financial managementStrong leadership competencies and ability to collaborate with cross-functional teams to attain business objectivesDemonstrated success in project managementStrong networking, communication and presentation skills *This position is located in Dublin, OHQualificationsBachelor's degree in Chemistry; MBA or advanced degree is preferred5-10 years relevant industry or functional experience in B2B rolePreference for experience dealing with highly technical productsApplicants must be authorized in the United States TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION, please select the Apply button. If no Apply button is provided, please visit Ashland's Career Center. Once there, enter job number {2016-5958} in the Keyword Search field to find this posting and apply online. NOTE: We do not accept resumes from external staffing agencies or independent recruiters for any of our openings unless we have a signed recruiting agreement in place to fill a specific position. In more than 100 countries, the people of Ashland Inc. (NYSE: ASH) provide the specialty chemicals, technologies and insights to help customers create new and improved products for today and sustainable solutions for tomorrow. Our chemistry is at work every day in a wide variety of markets and applications, including architectural coatings, automotive, construction, energy, personal care and pharmaceutical. Visit www.ashland.com to see the innovations we offer through our three commercial units - Ashland Specialty Ingredients, Ashland Performance Materials and Valvoline. At Ashland our vision is to be a leading, global specialty chemicals company whose inspired and engaged employees add value to all we touch. In fact our people, employees, customers and vendors define who we are. They are the driving force behind everything we do. Not only do we value our customers but we value our employees, and we work to offer them a dynamic and challenging environment. We hold ourselves to high standards at Ashland, and we value integrity and honesty. Ashland has a history of attracting the best people and keeping them. The reasons are simple: industry competitive salary and benefits, pay-for-performance incentive plans and a diverse work environment where employees feel challenged and valued. People come to Ashland and stay. As a growing Fortune 500 specialty chemicals company, we offer opportunities for development and advancement throughout our global organization. Our values define who we are and what we care about as a company. If you are looking for a relationship with a company instead of simply a job, this may be a great fit. Ashland is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation. Ashland is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability. PI93623260Apply Here",Business Development Manager Job in Dublin,,"Dublin, OH 43016",,http://jobview.monster.com/Business-Development-Manager-Job-Dublin-OH-US-166463934.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=10,,,6d556c8fda0ff88ef1d56b26a0558c2b
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:16:25:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"A host of equipment is used by Army National Guard medical personnel to provide health care to our Soldiers. As a Medical Equipment Repairer, you will do your part to make sure the Soldiers get the very best health care possible by servicing and maintaining all medical equipment.The equipment you'll be working with will possibly involve mechanical, hydraulic, pneumatic, electronic, digital, optical, and radiological principals. Specific duties may involve: performing preventive maintenance checks; troubleshooting malfunctioning or defective medical equipment; determining power and space requirements for medical equipment installations; installing medical equipment; and preparing and submitting medical equipment reports.Plus, you'll be building a better future. The skills you learn as a Medical Equipment Repairer will prepare you as an electronic instrument repairer with civilian manufacturing, medical research, and satellite communications firms, or even commercial airline companies. And with additional study, you may be able to qualify for the International Society of Certified Electronics Technicians certification as a Certified Electronics Technician at the Associate Level or Journeyman Level-Medical.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for a Medical Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn basic Soldiering skills, and 15-30 weeks of Advanced Individual Training, including practice in repairing and replacing equipment parts. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Medical Equipment Repairer Job in Riverton  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Riverton 84065,,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Equipment-Repairer-Job-RIVERTON-166741117.aspx?mescoid=4900894001001&jobPosition=8,,General/Other: Medical/Health,5daced9a8370af958d5bb1c94a40c3c3
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:16:24:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Executive Director/Administrator is responsible for the overall direction of the hospice services.  He/she is responsible for the employment of qualified hospice personnel; is responsible for the provision of hospice services, directly, and the delegation to and coordination of hospice personnel evaluations; is responsible for establishing standards of care to comply with federal and state regulations and guide­lines.  The Executive Director /Administrator establishes, implements and evaluates goals and objectives for hospice services that meet and promote the standards of quality and contribute to the total organization and philosophy. REQUIRED EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE:  A Bachelor's degree in Business Administration Masters’ degree in health care or related field preferred.  Three (3) to five (5) years’ experience in health care management.   REQUIRED KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES: Demonstrates an ability to supervise and direct professional and administrative personnel.  Has an ability to deal tactfully with the community.  Has knowledge of corporate business management.  Understands hospice care and the services provided to patient and family/caregiver through an interdisciplinary group.  Intimate knowledge of Medicare Hospice Certification   OTHER REQUIREMENTS: Must be able to travel Must be flexible in work hours",Bristol - Executive Director Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time,"Salt Lake City, UT 84124",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Bristol-Executive-Director-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-166163618.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=19,,,c0e333da0a823ab91ac2cc8a5c2e4fcc
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:16:23:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development. 1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families.  Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members. a.       Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents. b.      Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately. c.      Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain.2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices.  Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures.  Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals. a.      Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems. b.      Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs. c.      Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure.   d.      Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization. e.      Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements. f.       Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements.3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments.  Performs timely re-assessment and documentation: a.      Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed.  b.      Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge. c.      Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.4. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow. a.      Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change. b.      Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed. c.      Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs. d.      Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration. e.       Expedites admission/discharges/transfers. f.       Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care.Job Requirements 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS, ACLS and NRP certifications required.3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal. 5. Minimum 1 year of previous RN NICU experience.    ",RN,"Full Time, Employee","New Braunfels, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-NICU-Job-New-Braunfels-TX-US-166644018.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,84936d9946e64dd0fc34a9a2662bdee2
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:39:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionDesktop support personnel must provide a broad and in-depth working knowledge of information technology products and services. They are required to assist in complex assignments and assist staff in the application of technical concepts, practices and procedures. This tech supplies support to many departments, many times on a high level, and works with clients over the phone and onsite to troubleshoot, analyze, diagnose and engage appropriate technical resources to resolve client issues.Job RequirementsREPRESENTATIVE PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES- Ensures that customer issues are promptly addressed, documented and resolved in a timely and professional manner consistent with the highest customer service and professional / technical standards.- Briefs customers as well as management on the status of current resolution efforts and attends daily/weekly meetings.- Works with corporate resources to insure equipment meets requirements and is maintained per requirements.- Serves as technical adviser, providing front telephone, remote desktop, and onsite desktop support for system users with complex issues by resolving or conferring with the appropriate technical or systems personnel.- Initiates tracking and reporting of issues, as well as recommends means for system improvement including procedural steps, increased training, and enhanced documentation.- Serves as a mentor to lower level help desk technicians providing guidance during the troubleshooting process, training on new products and assistance in the development of their skills. Maintains daily tickets and reports to ensure the highest service levels are maintained.- Serves as on-site technical support for networking and server teams as needed when problems occur.",Desktop Engineer Job in Hendersonville,Full Time,"Hendersonville, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Desktop-Engineer-Job-Hendersonville-NC-US-166616236.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),931fc36d3a18f99747caebe23a36fe81
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:35:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tech support needed for aerospace company in Southwest Fort Worth. We are needing candidates with skills in ""break/fix"" of computers, A+, and Network+. Role is to be support for major company to assist employees of hardware/software needs. Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer Must have 2 years previous tech support experience 1 year of customer service in call center environment Must pass security clearance and criminal background check",Help Desk Support (Tier  - Tier ) Job in Fort Worth,Full Time Employee,"Fort Worth, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Help-Desk-Support-Tier-3-Tier-1-Job-Fort-Worth-TX-US-166688838.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=10,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,c03b7e37ee782ad0f27daa2537003b43
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:35:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Manager of Application Administration is responsible for leading a team responsible for building and operating enterprise applications as well as 3rd party applications. The application administration team will ensure application are stable and operate with high performance. The Manager of Application Administration will plan, design, analyze and monitor application administration policies and processes. The Manager of Application Administration will partner with other managers at Sleep Number to ensure a level of customer experience and satisfaction.Responsibilities:Manages and provides technical guidance to the admin team in the following technology areas – Oracle eBS, Oracle Fusion, Siebel, Vertex, Trillium and other technologies.Manages good customer relationship, partners with IT teams in implementing standard practices and guidelinesSupports project execution, system integration testing, capacity planning, and application performance tuningManages SLA, System Availability, Capacity Management and Performance KPIs.Collaborates with other IT teams on system design, system enhancement and system maintenanceManages system and application migration processes from development to productionWorks closely with application development teams and 3rd party vendors to tune and troubleshoot applicationsWorks closely with Release management, Project Management, Change Management and other governance teams.Plans and coordinates testing changes, upgrades and new services, ensuring systems will operate correctly in current and future environmentsManages Level 3 support for the applications. Team must be able to support 24x7Qualifications:5-7 years of IT experience1-2 years of management experienceExperience with Oracle eBS, Oracle Fusion, SiebelExperience with application administrationExperience with Trillium and/or VertexExperience working with 3rd-party vendorsAble to lead a team of technical resourcesAble to understand and work towards business objectivesStrong technical knowledge across multiple systems and platformsAble to organize, prioritize work, meet deadlines and work independentlyAble to work well in a fast-paced, ever-changing environmentAble to follow schedules and complete required documentation and reportsAble to be flexible and to handle multiple projects in an organized, timely mannerFour year BS degree required",Application Administration Manager Job in Minneapolis,,"Minneapolis, MN 55442",,http://jobview.monster.com/Application-Administration-Manager-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-166616084.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=3,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e4917524f052d285ab1e6dfcc69abf1a
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:35:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking Physicians with the following specialities for prestigious healthcare facilities in Iowa. CT SurgeryOB/GYNPsychologistsEmergency Medicine, Residency Trained PhysiciansUrgent Care (ER or Family Medicine experience)Family Medicine Infectious DiseaseInpatient PsychiatryPhysiatryPulmonary, Critical CarePulmonary/Critical Care, Nurse PractitionerAll the applicants must be Board certified or Board eligible with a minimum of 2 years of experience in the specialty. Offered:Permanent PositionsFull-Time  Competitive compensation packageRelocation packageSign on bonusNot all positions located in Davenport",Physician Multiple Specialities Great Perks Job in Davenport,Full Time,"Davenport, IA 52804",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physician-Multiple-Specialities-Great-Perks-Job-Davenport-IA-US-166627565.aspx?mescoid=2900470001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9196aae7de5687fe9eb064f0d3f916f0
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:35:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",Katie Miller Team Leader Residential Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Katie-Miller-Team-Leader-Residential-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-166130385.aspx?mescoid=5100938001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,bebf743155f0a2812414484f80dd7c3d
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:25:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRN Occupational Therapist for Brookdale's Trinity Towers Skilled Nursing FacilityBrookdale Trinity Towers - 101 North Upper Broadway, Corpus Christi, TX 78401 Job #: prnOTcorpcTX057514A career with Brookdale has never been so rewarding! Brookdale's Skilled Nursing Home Care and Rehabilitation communities offer an atmosphere that that feels more like a family than just a job. With locations all throughout the country, we get the opportunity to enrich thousands of lives every day. We are a trusted partner because we truly listen to the needs and wishes of our residents and their families, then customize a solution that puts that life within reach. We help residents recover with dignity while receiving compassionate care, personal attention and professional services. As with all other Brookdale solutions, those who serve our residents in skilled nursing and rehabilitation environments do so because it is their calling to serve others with passion, courage and true sense of partnership.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities: * Provide and direct occupational therapy services to patients, including assessment, treatment, program planning and implementation * Work in accordance with physicians' orders and adhere to applicable principles and practices of physical therapy, Brookdale policies/procedures, and state regulations * Coordinate treatment plan with patient, family and other team members * Document results of patient's assessment, treatment, follow-up and termination of services * Review the quality and appropriateness of the total services delivered and individual occupational therapy programs using predetermined criteria Required skills and qualifications: * Bachelor's degree in occupational therapy from an accredited program * Successful completion of the National Certification Examination for Registered Occupational Therapists * License to practice occupational therapy in the state * Two years occupational therapy experience preferred If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Occupational Therapist / OT Job in Corpus Christi,Part Time Employee,"Corpus Christi, TX 78401",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Occupational-Therapist-OT-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166611865.aspx?mescoid=2900486001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,fb99b3e62233e1eb82af7c97341e25c8
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:25:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID  2016-721600 Category  Radiology Position Type  Full Time Shift(s)  Days Department  Breast Center Location  US-OK-Oklahoma City Under the direct supervision of the Director of Operations and under the direction of the Mammography Medical Radiology Director, is responsible for patient care and technical activities within the Breast Center. Responsible for quality assurance as required by the FDA/MQSA standards.Performs duties and responsibilities in a manner consistent with our mission, values, and Mercy Service Standards.     Under the direct supervision of the Director of Operations and under the direction of the Mammography Medical Radiology Director, is responsible for patient care and technical activities within the Breast Center. Responsible for quality assurance as required by the FDA/MQSA standards.Performs duties and responsibilities in a manner consistent with our mission, values, and Mercy Service Standards.     Organizes and manages daily work flow including staffing to meet patient care needs and productivity standards. Oversees check-in and registration functions and maintains work queues. Collaborates with Mercy Central to ensure the timely, accurate scheduling and billing of Breast Center patients. Responsible for all HR related functions within the Breast Center including hiring, coaching and evaluating staff. Responsible for implementing action plans to meet department targets around quality of care, service and stewardship as well as actively engage co-workers in improvement efforts.With guidance from Medical Director evaluates new and existing technologies and operational models to continuously improve Mercy Breast Center strategic positioning in the market. Organizes and manages daily work flow including staffing to meet patient care needs and productivity standards. Oversees check-in and registration functions and maintains work queues. Collaborates with Mercy Central to ensure the timely, accurate scheduling and billing of Breast Center patients. Responsible for all HR related functions within the Breast Center including hiring, coaching and evaluating staff. Responsible for implementing action plans to meet department targets around quality of care, service and stewardship as well as actively engage co-workers in improvement efforts.With guidance from Medical Director evaluates new and existing technologies and operational models to continuously improve Mercy Breast Center strategic positioning in the market. Education: Graduate of an accredited Radiology program. Licensure: Certified in Radiology and Mammography by the ARRT registry. Experience: At least seven years mammography experience and two years of supervisory experience. Has worked along with personnel that are knowledgeable with ACR/MQSA Certification/Registration: CPR Certification Other Skills and Knowledge: Computer literate. Good communication skills. PACS knowledge is preferred.   Preferred Qualifications Other Skills and Knowledge: Maintains CME's according to ACR/MQSA guidelines.  M1   Options: Apply for this job Apply Share Email this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed What if I am not ready to apply? Submit your resume here and be considered for future opportunities!",Manager - Breast Center (Radiology) Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time,"Oklahoma City, OK",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Manager-Breast-Center-Radiology-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-166717335.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5e8e179ea082a935847b68604742982e
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:25:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"KIK Custom ProductsKIK is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer.Job ID 2016-3713# of Openings 1Job Location US - IN - Elkhart Posted Date 4/9/2016Division KCMOverview: Performs analyses of raw materials, batches, and finished products following specified analytical methods. Develops analytical procedures, troubleshoots, and validates laboratory methodologies and instrumentation.Essential Job Functions: Conducts routine analyses of raw materials, batches, and finished products following specified analytical methods.Develops analytical procedures employing various laboratory methodologies and instrumentation.Maintains accuracy and reliability of all laboratory instruments. Conduct instrument calibrations as required.Troubleshoots instrumentation and methodologies when mechanical or procedural difficulties occur. Validates newly developed methods to meet CGLP requirements. Performs assigned procedures for processing laboratory reports, documentation, customer paperwork, and any other clerical laboratory functions as required.Investigates customer complaints and internal technical services problems, reports findings, and recommends solution(s).Able to perform analysis using HPLC, GC, FTIR, UV-Vis, AA, wet chemistry, and numerous other analytical methodologies/ techniques.Maintains a working knowledge of all KIK and customer procedures, requirements, and CGMP's/CGLP's.The above statements describe the general nature and level of work only. They are not an exhaustive list of all required responsibilities, duties, and skills. Other duties may be added, or this description amended at any time. Qualifications: Bachelor degree (or higher) required in area of discipline1 - 2 years experience in wet chemistry, willing to train new graduate with good instrumentation knowledgeStrong analytical skills, good interpersonal skills and collaborative team attitudeDetail oriented and organizedSelf-motivated, Customer focused and Quality-mindedBenefitsKIK offers you and your family comprehensive benefits including options such as health, wellness, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance. KIK offers retirement savings options including employer match. KIK also recognizes the importance of continuing education and offers Education Assistance to our employees to encourage continued personal development and growth.Thank you for your interest and consideration of a career with KIK!PI93517085Apply Here",QC Chemist Job in Elkhart,Full Time,"Elkhart, IN 46516",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/QC-Chemist-Job-Elkhart-IN-US-166176101.aspx?mescoid=1900259001001&jobPosition=13,,,c145f398ef6747831d71bd162cb18294
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Director of Quality and Performance Excellence               Reports To: Senior Vice President and Chief Operating Officer             Organization: LeadingAge Minnesota                                                    SUMMARY Minnesota’s premiere association of older adult service providers seeks a dynamic Director to provide leadership and member support in the areas of quality improvement and performance excellence. The Director of Quality and Performance Excellence is primarily responsible for: 1) Providing strategic and technical assistance to members on quality and performance improvement activities, compliance with quality assurance regulations, and effective use and collection of quality measures/indicators; 2) Advising and representing the Association on state and federal policy issues related to quality; and 3) Developing tools and resources to assist members in their quality improvement activities. This new position is designed to position LeadingAge Minnesota and its member organizations as demonstrated leaders in quality and performance excellence. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following. Other duties may be assigned. ·         Provide accurate, timely and thorough technical assistance to members on a variety of quality and performance improvement topics. ·         Proactively represent member interests and concerns with various stakeholders including state agencies.  ·         Direct and support the work of the Association’s Quality & Performance Improvement Council. ·         Gather and analyze quality data to identify trends, measure improvement, and develop effective Association strategies.  ·         Provide advocacy support by: 1) Identifying quality issues for the Association’s annual legislative agenda; 2) Recommending Association positions on related public policies; 3) Preparing and coordinating formal comments on federal quality initiatives; and 4) Providing expert legislative testimony as needed.  ·         Develop products and resources for members in response to, or in anticipation of, their needs.  ·         Manage the Association’s quality recognition programs. ·         Share and translate updated information on quality through the weekly electronic newsletter, content on the Association’s website, and presentations to member organizations. QUALIFICATIONS  To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Knowledge: (1) Command of the strategies, processes and systems that result in quality improvement; (2) Experience in the successful use of quality measures/data to improve performance; (3) Understanding of the vital role quality plays in creating and sustaining integrated care partnerships along the continuum and in achieving the triple aim; and (4) Familiarity with the spectrum of older adult settings and services, including skilled nursing facilities, home care, assisted living and adult day services. Customer Service: Excellent customer service skills to provide timely, thorough, accurate, friendly and effective technical assistance in response to member questions and requests for assistance. Critical Thinking: Ability to understand, analyze, synthesize and communicate proposed changes to federal and state policies and their implications for members; as well as an ability to problem solve when addressing member quality concerns and outcomes. Effective Relationships: Must establish and maintain trusted working relationships with state and federal agency staff, including CMS, DHS, MDH, etc.; professional boards; quality improvement organizations; and various consumer and provider stakeholders. Communications: Excellent written and verbal communication skills capable of effectively presenting issues to members, stakeholders, media, etc. Personal Traits: The Director of Quality & Performance Excellence is a dynamic professional who is passionate about quality care and services to older Minnesotans. They are committed to serving and supporting the members of the Association. In addition, they are an effective listener and spokesperson—exhibiting integrity and honesty at all times. They must be self-motivated, intellectually curious, diplomatic, creative and able to balance competing interests and priorities. Being able to function well in a team environment is essential. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE A Bachelor’s Degree from a four-year college or university is required along with a minimum of five years’ experience in a related field including health care, quality improvement, etc. preferably in older adult services. Experience as an RN, an advanced degree, or LEAN/6 Sigma training is a plus.    Apply online at: www.dohertyhrdirect.com using the following username and password:Username = MCCAPassword = applicantAfter entering your name and other personal data, you will be prompted to enter the following code: 111110   Make sure to enter the code correctly so the hiring manager receives notification of your application. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, genetic information, disability, age, or any other status protected by state or local law, for qualified applicants who fall within the jurisdiction of such law. We are Affirmative Action, Equal Opportunity Employer.",Director of Quality and Performance Excellence Job in St. Paul,Full Time,"St. Paul, MN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Quality-Performance-Excellence-Job-St.-Paul-MN-US-166113252.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),afa336341de8fb63207051ef5a631bf2
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Client Service Specialist? Highly Successful Local Company? Convenient Suburban Location? Career Opportunity? Competitive Starting Pay RateThere is an immediate need for a Client Service Specialist in a highly successful local high-tech company with a convenient suburban location. This is a career opportunity. Applicant must have 2 years+ of college, excellent English and math skills, and prior experience in a technical support role. Ideal candidate will be responsible for taking technical software support calls and managing support tickets; communicating verbally and via e-mail with engineers, analysts and other upper-level management types; and determining the root cause of issues and creatively solving problems. Highly qualified applicants are needed. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1032203 Job Experience:Candidates who have worked for utilities (water, gas, electric) are a PLUS",Client Service Specialist - Top Shelf Tech Company Job in Shreveport,Full Time,"Shreveport, LA 71101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Client-Service-Specialist-Top-Shelf-Tech-Company-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166608194.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=1,Up to $25.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),296661c2a89db33da996f3aa38d13cf7
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"OUTPATIENT PRIVATE PRACTICE THERAPIST. Seeking skilled licensed therapist (LICSW, LMHC, LMFT, Psy.D, Ph.D) to join a private practice group in Barrington, RI. The ideal candidate will be equipped to see any of combination of children, adults and families, specialties are encouraged. Flexible schedule offered. We provide referrals, consultation, office space, billing, coverage, and seek paneling for you. Please send resumes to Lauren at lauren@palmacciotherapy.com or call 617.866.0589 with questions.",Licensed Professional Counselor Job in Barrington,Full Time,"Barrington, RI 02806",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Professional-Counselor-Job-Barrington-RI-US-166111354.aspx?mescoid=2100312001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),dd0cb8e37023dcd88d3d6639b0509234
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"The importance of efficient and qualified administrative personnel in the medical field can't be overstated because accurate information is crucial for planning and managing hospital operations. This means that you make it possible for patients to receive the proper care.As a Patient Administration Specialist, you will make sure that hospital and patient information is recorded, stored, and delivered in order to keep everything running smoothly. Your responsibilities will include scheduling office visits and keeping patient records up to date at Army hospitals or other medical facilities.Health care is one of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Patient Administration Specialist experience to prepare for jobs in civilian hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, or rehabilitation centers. You may even qualify for related careers with insurance carriers, public health departments, or Government agencies.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Patient Administration Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and seven weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Patient Administration Specialist Job in Lenexa  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Lenexa 66219,,http://jobview.monster.com/Patient-Administration-Specialist-Job-LENEXA-166727360.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=14,,General/Other: Medical/Health,cb19c4f39e97f91fe232aea262012a4f
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Build a brighter future for your patients and for you. At Golden LivingCenters – Delano, our commitment to our nursing staff is substantial. It’s more than compensation and benefits; more than training and education. It’s giving our nursing staff the freedom and the opportunity to have real control over their careers. Join us and see what our commitment can mean to you.  Registered Nurse (RN) / Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) / Skilled Nursing6am – 2pm, 2pm – 10pm and 10pm – 6am Shifts Available  Certified Nursing Assistant (CNA) / Nurse Aide (NA/R)6am – 2pm, 2pm – 10pm and 10pm – 6am Shifts Available Excellent Medical * Competitive Wages * PTO * 401(k) * Tuition Reimbursement Please contact: Deb Conzet Golden LivingCenters - Delano433 County Rd. 30, Delano, MN 55328T: 763-972-2987; F: 763-972-2457E: debra.conzet@goldenliving.comOr apply online: http://jobs.goldenliving.com/delano-jobs.aspx&iniurl.src=BLD-200084 Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status. DrugFree Workplace. ",RN,Full Time,"Delano, MN 55328",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-LPN-CNA-Job-Delano-MN-US-166614727.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=19,,Entry Level,2921e7740029566700fda3abe46fa363
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sr. Technical Support NAS EngineerSan Jose, CADirect HireWe are recruiting for one of the hottest cloud storage companies in the Bay Area. They specialize in innovative and enterprise storage solutions in a fast paced environment. They are a company who values work/life balance for their employees. Their mission is to provide excellent customer service with an ever growing market!The Position:As the Technical Support Engineer you will be responsible for providing high level of support and strong troubleshooting expertise. You will be working on client and network connectivity issues. You will also be responsible for internal and external debugging and technical issues on hand. This position allows you to really connect throughout the customer interface.Desired Experience & Skills:· Extensive NAS storage system experience· Strong domain storage systems· Experience with networking, such as routing, firewall, and load balancer· Proven ability to balance the intersection and impact of back end technologies in user interface solutions· Proven ability to provide fix analysis and problem resolution· Excellent communication skills: ability to work effectively with internal engineering team, product managing teams, and customer interfaceDesired Background and Training:· 5 or more years experience in back end Technical Support· Bachelors Degree and/or equivalent experience in computer science or· Excellent verbal and written communication, throughout the customer support frameAt Option 1 Technical, we are committed to your professional and financial success. We’ll evaluate your background, experience and qualifications, and then recommend direct or contract jobs that are the best match for your goals.About Option 1 Technical Staffing & Recruiting:Founded by industry professionals, Option 1 Staffing is a local, established, privately-owned technical staffing leader in the Bay Area. With a reputation as one of the most trusted staffing names on the Peninsula, Option 1 delivers coordinated technical staffing solutions with unparalleled service. Since 1991 Option 1 Staffing serves Bay Area employers in need of Contract, Contract-Hire, and Direct Hire employees to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors.  Check out our jobs @ www.option1staffing.com Option 1 Staffing is an equal opportunity employer.  ",Sr. Technical Support NAS Engineer Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Technical-Support-NAS-Engineer-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-166748604.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e6f04b2ad85cb91bf32a8231ef072548
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a full time position, can live anywhere in the US but must be available to travel approx. 25-30%.  Oracle HCM Cloud (Fusion) Consultants with Absence Management/OTLAbout eVerge Group:  As an Oracle Certified Platinum Partner, eVerge Group delivers premier consulting services with the highest level of expertise. We partner with organizations in both the private and public sectors within a variety of industries to deliver technology solutions that produce optimal business results. For over 20 years and hundreds of successful engagements, eVerge Group has developed strategic alliances and deep domain expertise and has consistently exceeded client expectations. Our success hinges on our most valuable asset--our people. We know that in order to provide outstanding service, we must employ the best and brightest in the industry. Based in Dallas and founded in 1993, eVerge serves a nationwide client base and offers a challenging entrepreneurial environment in which employees can excel both personally and professionally. We recognize that an employment relationship is an investment. Employees invest their knowledge, skills, and time with us, and in return, we provide competitive pay, comprehensive benefits, training, and a challenging environment with a path for growth.JOB DESCRIPTIONFunctional Leads will provide expertise and work collaboratively with the business partners and technical leads in support of the Fusion HCM Implementation . Functional Leads report directly to the Project Managers.Functional team members will take the lead in managing users through design discussions and support OCM and training related to this area. Other responsibilities include:Knowledgeable and experiences in Fusion Benefits Admin , Absence Management , Benefits Integrations , Reporting , Fast Formulas , Key Flex Fields (R7 +)Ability to configure all applicable requirements in support of the Business Processes Work collaboratively with all cross functional leads to ensure all deliverables are ready and presented on time Assist with the prioritization of work. Lead and/or participate in project requirements analysis, functional design, reports development, and UAT testing. Completes all agreed deliverables on the SOW, keeps PM up to date on status of deliverables, risks, issues and change requestsOur comprehensive benefits include:Medical and dental insuranceLife and long-term disability insurance401(k) planPaid time off and HolidaysFlexible spending accountESOPPaid training",Oracle Fusion HCM OTL/Absence Management Functional Consultant Job in Plano,Full Time,"Plano, TX 75093",,http://jobview.monster.com/Oracle-Fusion-HCM-OTL-Absence-Management-Functional-Consultant-Job-Plano-TX-US-165544702.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=7,,,9178a99865bc2be8284556d3818f1eff
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"o Manage the labels.o Manage and produce the program books (12) that are updated quarterly.o Produce specification sheets and other marketing collateral materials.o Assist the Sr. Marketing Creative Designer and Sr. Web Designer with graphic projects.Volt is an equal opportunity employer.o Ability to communicate professionally with sales reps and customers.o Manage multiple projects, prioritize tasks, works well under pressure.o Familiar with graphic design programs on a MAC to include, In-Design, Photoshop, Quark, Illustrator and Acrobat.",Graphic Designer Job in Greenville,Full Time Employee,"Greenville, SC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Graphic-Designer-Job-Greenville-SC-US-166687480.aspx?mescoid=2700410001001&jobPosition=1,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,9e246ebc8f3fc43ad0f926e91f1f63fc
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:15:24:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"                Data Center operator (Data center Build and Implementation) Opportunities   We have a Data Center operator (Data center Build and Implementation) position open within Cognizant. Following is the Job description: Location: Westbury, NY Type of hire: Full Time   Job Roles / Responsibilities: 1-3 years’ experience in Data Center operations Monitor systems, applications, and infrastructure components on multiple platforms. Monitor, execute, and modify batch job schedules Initiates and coordinates Incident resolution triaging Performs tape rotation activities as required Maintain and control tape inventory Work with the data center team to deploy new data center infrastructure Develop and maintain computer operations documentation and procedures Provide onsite hands and feet support for basic Data center activities as requested by the support teams NOTE: Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V. Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment. We will only be able to respond to those candidates that most closely meet our criteria   A Snapshot about Us: Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 217,700 employees as of March 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: @Cognizant.   Additional Information:",Data Center operator (Datacenter Build and Implementation) Job in Westbury,Full Time,"Westbury, NY 11590",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Data-Center-operator-Datacenter-Build-Implementation-Job-Westbury-NY-US-166664204.aspx?mescoid=4300750001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6074d7125da868acfbd05bec3ad0a77c
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:58:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Physical Therapist, FT $84,000-$104,000 / PT $52,000 / Per Diem negotiableWorcester based home health agency seeks motivated and reliable full time PT who has at least two years experience in his/her field. Home health experience a plus.Responsibilities include:Provide physical therapy services in accordance with the plan of care and in coordination with the Interdisciplinary TeamFollow all company policies and proceduresDetermine patient’s individualized needs including mobility, ambulation, stability, balance, strength and endurancePerform functional therapy exercises and activities with the patientRevise patient’s plan of care as necessary, document clinical and progress notes for the patient and report any changes in patient’s condition to the Case Manager and/or Director of NursingRequirements:Current license to practice physical therapy in MassachusettsCurrent driver's licenseSalary: $84,000-$104,000 full time, $52,000 part time, Per Diem negotiable. Based upon skill set and experience.Please apply via Monster for immediate consideration.",Physical Therapist,Full Time,"Worcester, MA 01603",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physical-Therapist-FT-PT-Per-Diem-Job-Worcester-MA-US-164048233.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=3,"84,000.00 - 104,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),be59dce40aa804b55e4f9e548dbb8236
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:54:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"What makes us different? Our People, Our Pride, Our Passion.  If you are wanting to make a difference in the lives of residents and grow your nursing career, LaCrosse Health & Rehabilitation center in Coeur d'Alene is for YOU!  Look no further and apply today at our 99 bed center.  Our nurse leadership team instills a fun, welcoming environment which has allowed for longevity and success amongst our nursing team. Visit our website to learn more about these great opportunities and have the potential to be working at our Award winning center soon http://lacrosseskillednursing.com/ In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for FT Licensed Nurses and all non-union positionsPAY BY EXPERIENCEMedical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/monthOver 1 week vacation (eligible after only 90 days) PLUS 1 week of sick timeEducational Assistance up to $2,500/yr401 (k) Retirement Program, ST and LT Disability as well as FREE Life InsuranceNew attendance program where you can earn up to 4 ADDITIONAL DAYS OFFAt our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.At our center, you will be able to grow your career. At our center, we provide support and resources. At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans.POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the DON the Care Manager assumes responsibility and accountability for assigned core programs.  Leadership is provided to all nursing staff through daily oversight of nursing care on the assigned unit(s).  Care Managers adhere to the standards of care, manage the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervise the resident/patient care activities performed by RNs, LPNs and Nursing Assistants.  May act on behalf of the DON in her/his absence.  Follows all Center policies and procedures and performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees all nursing staff of an assigned unit.   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.    Supervisory Responsibilities•             Makes daily work assignments.•             *Directs the work of employees.•             Schedules lunch and rest breaks•             Authorizes early departure from work.•             Authorizes overtime.•             Reassigns employees from one area to another area as facility needs dictate.•             Prepares written evaluations of assigned employees.•             Enforces facility policies with authority to issue Disciplinary Action Reports as needed.•             Authority to suspend employees for rules violation.•             Initials time records to authorize variances.•             Interviews applicants that will be assigned to his/her area of responsibility.•             Receives and handles employee complaints.•             *Participates in training programs and assists in orientation of new staff.•             Review all daily physician Orders  check follow through•             Attends standup and reviews 24-hour report•             On call as scheduled•             Assist with resolution of resident/family concerns 2.            Responsible for over seeing assigned Center core programs3.            *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and act in accordance with Center Health Services, Inc.’s Corporate Compliance Program.4.            Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.5.            *Attends and participates in in-service training, performance improvement (“PI”) committees and other meetings as scheduled and directed.6.            Follows facility dress and hygiene policies.7.            Safety•             Knows and follows facility rules.•             *Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.•             Follows facility-smoking policies.•             Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.•             Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.•             *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.•             Uses required protective equipment.•             Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.8.            Resident Rights•             Knows Resident Rights.  Helps the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.•             Reports resident/patient complaints to management.•             Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information. Other Duties: •             Participates in evening manager program as assigned•             Support and assist with Mentor and Greeting programs•             *Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             *Participates in marketing events.•             *Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Possesses a current license to practice in the State as an RN. Experience: At least one year of prior supervisory experience preferred.  Prior experience working in a long-term care facility required. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Ability to relate positively, effectively and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff.  Possess special interest in, and a positive attitude about, working with long-term care residents and the elderly. Ability to read, write, speak and understand English. Meets all health requirements, as required by law. Knowledge of long term rules and regulations.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, pushing, pulling and twisting.  The tasks on this position description marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities.  All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents.  Lifting and/or transferring some residents will require use of a lifting device and /or assistance of other staff.",RN Resident Care Manager $,Full Time,"Coeur D'alene, ID",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Resident-Care-Manager-15-000-Sign-ON-Lacrosse-Health-Rehab-Job-Coeur-d'Alene-ID-US-166707002.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=17,,,e6043feb10d7ac71737735d35621ac7f
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:50:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"     The Henderson Group Unlimited, Inc., a government contractor, is currently seeking a Technical Database Editor in the Washington, D.C. area. Duties and Responsibilities: Supports the development and production of a variety of documents to include but not limited to Operational Plans, Concept Plans, Strategic Plans, Work Plans, and doctrine and guidance documents. Assists with the development of work plans and spend plans, and statistical analyses. Writes and edits the results of surveys and statistical studies. Prepares minutes of facilitation meetings and produces meeting summary reports. Writes and edits material for online access and dissemination via the internet/intranet. Individual shall provide support that also includes the following: Develop project related material (e.g., Project Plan, Design Plan, Test Plan, etc), performs document quality assurance by reviewing and editing documentation materials, incoming and outgoing, for accuracy, consistency, repeatability, and detail, assists Program Managers, Project Leads, Team Leads, and associated personnel with creating and disseminating written materials, maintain and update the supporting documentation (Functional and Technical) for the project, scribes minutes of meetings to preserve the actions items, commitments, and discussion held in meetings.Minimum/General Experience: Six (6) years of demonstrated experience writing and editing publications, including technical documents such as operational plans, strategic plans, needs assessments,  research reports policy and information papers. Excellent writing skills required, as is the ability to analyze, synthesize, and condense text that includes technical information that is intended for use by non-technical lay audiences. For publications printed and distributed by government clients, also requires demonstrated knowledge of writing, editing, and style guidelines and printing regulations of the Government Printing Office.   Minimum Education: Bachelor’s degree.Qualified candidates should submit resumes and salary requirements to resumes@hendersongroupinc net. EOE",Technical Database Editor (Key Personnel) Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, DC 20001",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Database-Editor-Key-Personnel-Job-Washington-DC-US-166654016.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f5c369c5b74bcd4193132c900a9126eb
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:47:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Pointe West - 6101 Pointe West Blvd Bradenton, FL 34209 Job #: AEDSEbraFL057902We're passionate about serving seniors?are you? Now's your chance to build your leadership career with Brookdale.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities: * Under direct supervision of an Executive Director, responsible for all operations, acting as contact for all staff, residents, prospects, community organizations, government agencies and the public* Maintain high degree of resident satisfaction and retention through consistent delivery of high quality services* Maintain budget accountability to the Executive Director, aggressively anticipates and minimizes negative budget variances and deficits* Review hires, promotions, disciplinary actions and termination of employment of associates with attention paid to consistency in the selection and retention of quality personnel* Develop and maintain a positive image with communityRequired skills and qualifications: * Bachelor's degree in gerontology, business or related field is preferred* Three years proven management experience in retirement housing, hospitality or health care is required* Ability to read and interpret financial statements and manage a budget * Work history demonstrating strong ability to hire, direct and manage associates Brookdale is the largest senior living solutions company in the country, with 1,150 communities in 47 states serving 110,000 residents around the country. That translates to lots of career opportunities for you! We offer independent living, assisted living, Memory Care, skilled nursing, continuing care retirement, in-house therapy, hospice, home health, and personalized living.If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone though the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Associate Executive Director Job in Bradenton,Full Time Employee,"Bradenton, FL 34209",Healthcare Services Business Services - Other Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Executive-Director-Job-Bradenton-FL-US-166719669.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,5b6a340d5701786f67398fe9573ec894
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Chemical Operations Specialist, you'll be there and prepared whenever a community is flooded, an earthquake shakes the foundations of a city, a hurricane makes landfall, or an enemy uses biological or chemical warfare. You will know what to do to evacuate the area, control the situation, and solve the problem.In order to perform these functions, you will be trained to expertly handle nuclear, biological, and chemical (NBC) detection and decontamination equipment so you can assist in the application of NBC defense measures. You will also be asked to maintain disaster plans, operate and perform maintenance on smoke generating equipment, and coordinate with civilian personnel on what to do in an emergency. These are skills that are in demand by federal, state, and local governments, as well as civil defense agencies. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Chemical Operations Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend 19 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn defensive procedures for NBC warfare and preparation of emergency plans. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Chemical Operations Specialist Job in Devils Lake  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Devils Lake 58301,,http://jobview.monster.com/Chemical-Operations-Specialist-Job-DEVILS-LAKE-166732888.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,ece611902ce4bb7187bed0e6625c5689
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:47:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment. We're currently hiring a Computer Technician Level III to work for our client in Millington, TN!Job Responsibilities: Responsible for processing all new & complex builds that go through the configuration center. Must be able to work any shift- regularly stand, walk, reach and crouch. Processing all new & complex builds that go through the configuration center Research and resolve hardware and software compatibility issues. Must be able to work any shift and overtime as business demands. Must have experience with configuring Cisco, Juniper and Sonic wall (routers, switches and firewalls) Must have experience with configuring/customizing all aspects of Operating Systems Linux, VMware, Cisco and Microsoft certifications are a plusFull Time on 1st and 2nd ShiftComputer Technician Requirements:Associate must have degree in Science/Engineering or at last 5 years of related experienceAble to Lift 50 poundsBackground CheckDrug TestStand for Shift DurationMust be at least 18 years oldComputer Technician Benefits:Direct Deposit or Cash Card pay optionsMedical / Dental Insurance401kLife InsuranceWeekly paycheckspaid weeklyPlease bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or Passport.Please e-mail resumes or call ",Computer Technician Level  Job in Millington,Full Time,"Millington, TN 38053",,http://jobview.monster.com/Computer-Technician-Level-3-Job-Millington-TN-US-166672462.aspx?mescoid=4900853001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4c76bfe93e9675390b148af9b9bff32a
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:46:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.  Why you want to work in the ICU at CHRISTUS NB: Sign-on - Bonus Relocation Assistance Bronze Beacon Award UnitHealthy Work environment initiativesExceed or meet national benchmarks for quality outcomes.Tuition reimbursementCollaborative work with unit IntensivistCritical care versant residency program for GN'sPrep programShared governance Job Responsibilities   Nursing Process   1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families.  Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members.     a.       Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents.     b.      Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately.     c.      Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain.2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices.  Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures.  Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals.     a.      Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems.     b.      Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs.     c.      Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure.      d.      Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization.     e.      Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements.     f.       Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements.3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments.  Performs timely re-assessment and documentation:    a.      Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed.    b.      Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge.    c.      Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.Patient Throughput/ Patient Flow Process   1. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow.    a.      Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change.    b.      Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed.    c.      Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs.    d.      Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration.    e.       Expedites admission/discharges/transfers.    f.       Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care.   Unit Operations   1. Demonstrates good stewardship in proper use and maintenance of equipment and supplies.    a.       Coordinates the selection of supplies and equipment in a cost effective manner.    b.       Charges for supplies/procedures appropriately.    c.       Ensures availability and organization of supplies and equipment for patient care.    d.       Performs and documents emergency equipment checks as assigned.    e.       Removes and returns discontinued supplies and equipment.    f.        Removes broken equipment from area immediately and initiates a work order.    g.       Ensures and documents that all alarms (patient and equipment) are functional.   Safe Practice/ Quality Care/ Regulations   1. Incorporates patient safety practices/guidelines to promote a safe environment resulting in positive patient outcomes.    a.      Demonstrates accountability for nursing research and quality improvement Activities.    b.      Demonstrates knowledge and skill in administering medications.2. Completes medication reconciliation upon admission, transfer, and discharge.3. Reviews physician's orders for clarity and accuracy, legibility & appropriate authenticity (name, title, date, time, etc.).4. Follows the restrictions on abbreviations and does not use abbreviations on the ""Do Not List"". Uses only approved abbreviations.5. Transcribes telephone orders per policy.6. Administers, documents, and evaluates medications according to policy and procedure.7. Instructs patient on medication including: expected effects, side effects, and possible food or medication interactions and documents instructions.8. Recognizes, reports, and documents medication errors and adverse drug reactions.    a.      Uses patient identifiers as defined by policy.    b.      Communicate patient information effectively across the continuum of care.9. Uses an approved hand-off communication format consistently.10. Follows the universal protocol, e.g. time out.11. Uses SBAR to communicate changes in patient condition.12. Follows the Chain of Command.13. Critical values are reported in a timely manner in accordance with policy.14. Sets clinical alarms according to equipment parameters and responds rapidly to the alarms.    a.       Initiates the Rapid Response team in response to deterioration in patient condition.    b.       Demonstrates safe patient handling practices.    c.       Promotes a safe patient care environment including compliance with restraint policy and rounding.    d.       Implements processes to prevent falls, pressure ulcers, and other hospital-acquired complications.    e.       Assures compliance with core measure implementation and documentation, e.g. SCIP, CHF, AMI, CAP.    f.       Identifies, corrects and/or reports patient safety and/or environmental safety hazards at the time of discovery.    g.       Demonstrates proper infection control and isolation techniques including providing appropriate information concerning isolation precautions and patient status to patient, family, and/or significant others and/or other disciplines.    h.       Adheres to CHRISTUS policies and procedures and the standards of the Joint Commission, OSHA, DHHS, HIPAA, etc.   Leadership   1. Serves as a leader of patient care.    a.       Guides and supervises other nursing staff in the operational activities in assigned area.    b.       Promptly recognizes and attempts to reinforce appropriate behavior and attempts to correct inappropriate behavior in self and co-workers.    c.       Delegates nursing and non-nursing functions according to standards.    d.       Participates in leadership activities including community activities, e.g. charge/team leader, council participation, preceptor/coach, unit education, staff/council meetings.    e.       Assumes responsibility for currency of knowledge and skills including participating in unit-level meetings and all mandatory education activities sponsored by the facility.    f.       Identifies and corrects inconsistencies in nursing procedures/techniques.    g.       Participates in implementing performance improvement and change activities.    h.       Assists in teaching and evaluating other personnel as assigned.    i.       Contributes to the learning experience of students and new employees.    j.       Acts as a resource person.    k.       Communicates the intensity of work load and collaborates with nursing leadership to meet patient care needs and unit activity.Job Requirements Qualifications    1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required.3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.Bachelor of Science in Nursing (BSN) Preferred ""Working Conditionsand Physical Requirements""    1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area.  There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone.    Other    1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","New Braunfels, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Intensive-Care-Unit-Job-New-Braunfels-TX-US-166644016.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,e21198adb8452d063ecfc5f304052aca
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:14:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Systems Administrator IV & V in Fort Belvoir, Virginia (VA).Summary: The success candidate will support testing efforts by creating and maintaining test environments in a virtual environment, creating test plans, executing test cases and test scripts and providing reports detailing findings. Tests include everything from Microsoft patches, software and OS upgrades, software installation, software integration with other projects and full scale, end to end, systems testing. Tests can last anywhere from several minutes to weeks. The Test Team is also responsible for supporting development environments including domain controllers, HBSS, virus scanning, IA scanning and developer support. Typically, the development environments are in support of software/hardware projects for installation of large software and/or appliance suites. Occasionally the environment will need additional servers installed along with configuration changes.This position often requires extensive interaction with project and system owners and other test engineers. Projects can range but often includes evaluation and test of new vendor products requiring the ability to learn quickly and adapt to new situations and experiences. Duties will include tuning system performance, installing system wide software and allocating mass storage space.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college in a related discipline, or equivalent experience/combined education, with 2 years of professional experience; or 0 years of professional experience with a related Master's degree. Windows 2008R2/2012R2 Virtualization techniques Basic networking knowledge Troubleshooting skills To support these needs we are seeking an SA with hands on experience in installation and operation of Microsoft Windows 2008R2 and 2012R2 servers Must have some experience with most of Microsoft Roles, including DHCP, DNS, DC, Printer Server, File Server, etc. Experience with virtualization of Microsoft Windows on VMWare platforms required Linux skills including installation and support of various Linux operating systems is a plus Basic networking knowledge required Requires strong analytical and troubleshooting skills Attention to detail required Ability to secure servers to DoD standards using DISA tools",Systems Administrator IV & V Job in Fort Belvoir,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Fort Belvoir, VA 22060",,http://jobview.monster.com/Systems-Administrator-IV-V-Job-Fort-Belvoir-VA-US-166736344.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6a2864f56fec34dc9bda5b340fe40008
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:14:14:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you results oriented? Then a career as a Medical Laboratory Specialist could let you provide the results doctors and nurses need to provide treatment to their patients. In order to detect and identify many patient diseases, clinical laboratory tests need to be performed. The Medical Laboratory Specialist conducts tests on the tissue, blood, and body fluids of patients. Medical Laboratory Specialists examine blood and bone marrow samples, test for bacteria or viruses, and analyze tissue, blood, and fluid specimens for diagnostic information.Health care related fields are some of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Medical Laboratory Specialist experience to prepare for a future with privately owned laboratories, hospitals, clinics, or research institutions.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Medical Laboratory Specialist consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 26 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Medical Laboratory Specialist Job in Darlington  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Darlington 29532,,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Laboratory-Specialist-Job-DARLINGTON-166737924.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=5,,Laboratory/Pathology,e3a3c6561d99a276283c2f59ebd7448f
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:50:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department. CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Corpus Christi-Memorial CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Corpus Christi-Memorial is the region's only Level II Trauma Center and one of only 10 Level II Trauma Centers in Texas. CHRISTUS Spohn Memorial is a 387 bed hospital, offering 24 hour coverage for all surgical / medical emergencies by board certified surgeons and physicians. Memorial services include Emergency Care, Critical Care, Adult Psychiatric Services, Orthopedic, Surgical, Diagnostic, Dental and Ophthalmology services, Family Health Centers and Clinics. All CHRISTUS Spohn hospitals are served by Halo-Flight air ambulance services covering a 26-county area. CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Memorial is affiliated with Texas A&M University System Health Science Center College of Medicine -- Family Practice Residency Program and Emergency Medicine Residency Program. * Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. * Current Texas State RN license. * CPR (American Heart Association). * ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. * CPI within 90 days of hire/transfer date. * TNCC within 18 months of hire/transfer date. * ENPC or PALS within 18 months of hire/transfer date * One year experience in emergency department or critical care nursing preferred *Sign On Bonus and Relocation Assistance Available - *Sign On Bonus amount determined by years of experienceEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse - Emergency Room Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX 78405",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Emergency-Room-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-165520845.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,3d9ac4f31a91fba918fd162dd5173a48
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:49:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Security Compliance AnalystLocation: Miami, FLDuration: Direct Hire Compensation: $70,000-$80,000/year + BonusWork Requirements: US Citizen, GC Holdersor Authorized to Work in USOverview:TekPartners has some of the most sought after InformationTechnology positions available. As areputable company in the IT staffing industry, you can trust us to place you inthe right position. We currently have an opportunity for a Security ComplianceAnalyst our client in Miami, FL.Security Compliance AnalystThe SecurityCompliance Analyst will assist with the management, development,implementation, and annual review of various compliance programs, compliancetraining programs, as well as risk analysis and mitigation strategydevelopment.Requirements:? 4-6 years' experience working with compliance programs such as SOX? 4-6 years technical experience with global company environments.? Experience with database monitoring tools and processes ?preferable ImpervaPluses:? Experience with Oracle Financials or similar systems? Ability to perform some database administration functionsResponsibilities:  Perform security monitoring functions for databases.  Review Database Monitoring System reports to identify I/U/D activity, reconcile to change requests/incidents, and/or escalate when suspicious activity is noted.  Must ensure that the independent monitoring control is performed in a timely manner and operational at all times throughout the year.  Coordinates the submission of filtering requests, gathering appropriate rationale and approvals.  Lead compliance initiatives to ensure operational effectiveness with applicable laws and regulations as well as internal policies and procedures.  Conduct/support periodic risk assessments and develop appropriate mitigation plans in support of deliverables.  Work with the IT management in establishing processes to insure that all compliance efforts are considered when making changes or installing any application enhancements, server set-ups and infrastructure changes  Manage the remediation efforts for internal audit findings and action plans.Our benefits package includes:· Comprehensive Medical Benefits· Competitive Pay· 401K Retirement Plan· And Much MoreAbout TekPartners:TekPartners is one of the fastest growing privatestaffing firms in the United States. We are a premier provider of highlyqualified IT talent, Workforce Solutions and Business Intelligence Solutions tomany enterprise organizations across the nation. As experts in the industry,our team continues to match proven talent to the right job opportunity everyday. TekPartners is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Security Compliance Analyst Job in Miami,Full Time,"Miami, FL 33101",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Security-Compliance-Analyst-Job-Miami-FL-US-166667623.aspx?mescoid=1300073001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,22c97a0a2d9ff849d72fbccae92e9e1d
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:40:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sr Research Engineer-POS_70021777-0001JCDescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families. Genzyme Corporation (a Sanofi company) and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.Job Responsibilities/Department Description:Bio pharmaceutics Development at Sanofi develops and implements manufacturing processes for biologics starting with an early and strong interface with Biologics Research. It encompasses cell line development, GMP cell banking, upstream- downstream and formulation development, assay development, GMP clinical biologics production for toxicological and clinical studies, release and stability testing (QC). Biopharmaceutics development drives identification, development & introduction of new state-of-the-art technologies, and provides launch capable processes and analytical methods at the interface to biologics manufacturing.Within Biopharmaceutics Development Group in Framingham, the Upstream Process Development group is responsible for the development, characterization, scale-up, and tech transfer of robust and manufacturable cell culture processes for the production of early and late stage clinical and commercial therapeutic proteins. To continuously improve future production processes and to remain competitive in the industry, this group is also committed to technology innovation, platform development, and working with colleagues from other development functions to streamline process development. Major Job responsibilities:We are looking for candidates for a position at the level of Senior Research Engineer. This individual will join a dynamic and motivated team to develop cell culture processes in support of early and late stage drug development programs, as well as tech transfer of the developed process into clinical manufacturing team or the Industrial Affairs organization. You will also provide technical expertise and support to improve on-going commercial manufacturing process when appropriate, as well as evaluate new technologies and develop platform technologies suitable for incorporation into our upstream process. He/she will ensure that the highest standards of safety and environmental compliance are maintained in the workplace; and operate under the regulatory requirements for biologics product development and manufacturing.Work with supervisor to design, plan and conduct cell culture experiments using high throughput cell culture models, benchtop bioreactors and/or pilot scale Single Use Bioreactors.Perform data analysis, prepare technical reports, SOPs, internal and external presentationsDevelop, maintain and demonstrate significant knowledge of principles, theories and techniques in area of responsibilityStay abreast of relevant new technologies and published literature, including attending external technical forums and publish in first class technical journalsMaintain good communications and collaboration with colleagues in other groups and departments Must be able to work one of the two weekend days to support ongoing lab activities (Sunday – Thursday or Tuesday – Saturday)QualificationsBasic QualificationsM.S. in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Biochemistry or equivalent related fields with 0-2 years of relevant industrial experience, or a B.S. with 2-4 years of experienceMust be able to work Sunday – Thursday or Tuesday – SaturdayPreferred Qualifications:Logical and critical thinking skills, as well as innovative problem solvingDemonstrated ability to function in a matrix and collaborative/team oriented environmentExperience with cell culture technologies and operationsExperience with bioreactor systems of various scalesA thorough understanding and application of scientific and technical knowledge in mammalian cell culture processesExcellent organization, written and oral presentation skillsJob:Engineering & MaintenancePrimary Location:United States-Massachusetts-FraminghamJob Posting:Apr 29, 2016, 7:51:00 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Sr Research Engineer Job in Framingham,,"Framingham, MA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Research-Engineer-Job-Framingham-MA-US-166752073.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,2e24c971662b25a83b08544a80b3fe25
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:40:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Located in our Charlotte, NC office, this is a full-time opportunity offering a competitive salary with full benefits providing desktop support to our offices nationwide as part of the Allen Lund Company.   Job Description: The primary responsibility of a Desktop Support Technician is to maintain and upgrade personal computers company-wide.  Desktop responsibility is shared by other IT team members.  Areas of responsibility include the following: Desktop Support·         Responsible for all personal computers in the Allen Lund Company, nationwide.  This includes building, upgrading, troubleshooting, and repairing of PC’s·         Attends IT hotline calls·         Responsible for troubleshooting MS Office issues·         Set up, maintain, and troubleshoot Google Apps for work accounts·         Manage IT lab/storage·         Travel to outside sales offices to support office moves and equipment upgrades as needed Other Functions·         Work together with the other members of the IT Department as a cohesive and coordinated team.·         Other duties as assigned by IT manager. Requirements:·          One to two years experience in a similar role in the desktop environment (desktop support, customer service, etc.)·         Excellent communication skills (verbal & written)·         Strong customer service orientation and excellent work ethic.·         Excellent time management with the ability to multitask·         Highly organized and detail oriented·         Proven ability to problem solve effectively and efficiently·         College education highly desired·         Prior experience in computer training facilitation highly desired Benefits:·         Competitive base salary·         Bonus possibilities·         Benefits (100% Paid Premiums for Employee & Eligible dependents)·         Stock purchase plan·         401K Plan (with generous employer match) Please include ""CP7-Desktop Support"" in the subject line of your email. ",Desktop Support Analyst Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC 28226",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Desktop-Support-Analyst-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-166162555.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=3,,IT/Software Development,67e704c50cfd14cb06297b78ea09c143
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:26:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"A journey starts with the first step; take your first step to a great nursing career with US TODAY!  Puget Sound Healthcare, which has been serving the area since 1989, offers a team environment with longevity in our nursing team.  We have won AHCA Awards for quality care, maintain a history of good compliance and provide a full continuum of services and care focused around each resident. Don't miss out on these great opportunities,  stop in at our center today for a tour and to fill out our application or visit our website at http://pugetsoundskillednursing.com/ In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:•             FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for FT Licensed Nurses and all non-union positions•             PAY BY EXPERIENCE•             Medical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/month•             Over 1 week vacation (eligible after only 90 days) PLUS 1 week of sick time•             Educational Assistance up to $2,500/yr•             401 (k) Retirement Program, ST and LT Disability as well as FREE Life Insurance•             New attendance program where you can earn up to 4 ADDITIONAL DAYS OFF At our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.At our center, you will be able to grow your career. At our center, we provide support and resources. At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans. POSITION SUMMARY: The Director of Education and Training is responsible for the education, training and growth of current staff and new employees.  This position develops and coordinates validation of the competencies of nursing staff and Health Center staff to ensure proper care and treatment of residents/patients.   Adheres to federal and state regulations, and follows all Center policies and procedures.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: No direct reports. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.            Assesses the learning needs of the staff through direct observation, formal learning assessments and indirectly through review of quality improvement and/or program evaluation.2.            Plans, conducts, monitors and tracks training to meet the staff’s training needs.3.            Coordinates and participates in the orientation of all new employees. Provides modules during orientation to all employees using the appropriate materials.4.            Plans, schedules and implements training for Health Center's new staff.5.            Coordinates, implements and maintains records of all in-servicing for all staff.6.            Coordinates the use of educational equipment and resources.7.            Performs other staff education duties as required or directed for compliance with State and Federal Regulations.8.            Participates in clinical meetings per Center policy and procedure.9.            Prepares supplementary education materials as required.10.          Tracks, evaluates, and measures the impact of training programs and learning activities on staff.11.          Treats all residents/patients, visitors and staff with courtesy.12.          Attends and participates in in-service training, Quality Performance Improvement (“QPI”) committees and other meetings as scheduled and directed.13.          Continuously communicates with NHA and other team members.14.          Participates and shares “on call” status with other center nursing managers.15.          Safety·         Knows and follows health center rules.·         Demonstrates proper use of equipment. Reports equipment needs or repairs.·         Follows health center smoking policies.·         Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate personnel.·         Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in the Health Center  Disaster Plan.·         Uses required protective equipment.·         Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.·         Follows Health Center dress and hygiene policies.·         Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment and initiates action to correct the issue and reports to appropriate department head.16.          Resident Rights·         Incorporates Resident Rights in daily job performance. Helps residents exercise and/or protect their rights.·         Reports resident complaints to management team.·         Maintains confidentiality of resident information.17.          HIPAA·         Follows and adheres to the Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·         Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks.·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Health Center Privacy Designee and to the Milwaukee Corporate Compliance Officer or representative.18.         Complies with all laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance    with the Center’s Corporate Compliance ProgramOther Duties: Performs other duties as assigned and as necessity dictates. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Currently licensed in the state as Registered Nurse. Experience: Minimum of two years nursing experience, preferably in a long-term care setting.   Prior role in training or education preferred. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Demonstrable clinical competency and current RN skills.  Strong oral/presentation, written communication skills and basic computer skills.  Ability to work with diverse groups of people: residents, families, community members, other staff and volunteers.  Meet all health requirements imposed by law.  Must have current CPR certification.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: •             The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, twisting, pushing and pulling.  All employees of nursing centers may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents/patients. Lifting and/or transferring some residents/patients will require use of a lifting device and/or assistance of other staff.•             May be exposed to illness, blood, and body fluids, therefore personal protective equipment must be worn as necessary.",RN Education & Training Director Puget Sound HCC Job in Olympia,Full Time,"Olympia, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Education-Training-Director-Puget-Sound-HCC-Job-Olympia-WA-US-166715452.aspx?mescoid=1100029001001&jobPosition=13,,,26b7bc5791b740252520ddedba0f3684
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:26:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. As a Clinical Supervisor, you will: Supervise field Registered Nurses, Licensed Practical Nurses, Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Speech Therapists, Medical Social Workers, and Home Health Aides and may supervise some branch staff.Supervise the implementation of a physician's Plan of Care, coordinating activities with available resources.  Conduct or delegate a periodic reassessment of client needs, and revise the Care Plan accordingly.Evaluate the level of healthcare staff skills and services provided, through regular review of client notes, feedback acquired from the client and family, and interaction with staff during case reviews.  Oversee the maintenance of complete, current, and accurate client records.Assist Clinical Manager with the selection and orientation of new healthcare staff members. Participate in planning and presenting regular in-service education programs, keeping staff current on changes in healthcare procedures, and government regulations.  Maintain records of in-services presented and employee attendance to assure any related government requirements are met.Assist in staff development, through the annual reviews of employee performance, and recommendations for promotion.  Provide input in implementing staff disciplinary, probationary, or termination procedures.Keep informed of current caseloads in maintaining a balance between program service demands and priorities utilizing staff resources.Maintain on-going communication with staff through participation in conferences, and assistance in establishing short and long range goals.Counsel on interpreting nursing standards and company policies and procedures with all levels of the healthcare staff.Participate in regular Utilization Reviews, as required by the Clinical Manager.Interface effectively with referral sources and community resources.  Active in local professional organizations and activities, staying current on new developments or techniques and promoting the company in the marketplace.Required SkillsQualificationsBachelor’s degree or equivalentRegistered NurseSix months of supervisory experience, or one year of experience in home care is preferred Knowledge of home health agency regulationsStrong communication and leadership skills, with the ability to maintain a flexible scheduleRequired Experience keywords: registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, home care manager, homecare manager, home health manager, home care supervisor, homecare supervisor, home health supervisor, home care director, homecare director, home health director, clinical director, clinical manager, clinical supervisor, RN clinical director, RN clinical manager, RN clinical supervisor, nurse clinical manager, nurse clinical director, nurse clinical supervisor, clinical administrator, nurse administrator, RN administrator, patient care manager, patient care director, patient care supervisor, director of nursing, manager of nursing, supervisor of nursing, DON, DOCS, director of clinical services, field case manager, RN manager, RN supervisor, RN director, registered nurse director, registered nurse manager, registered nurse supervisor, nurse management, home health management, homecare management, home care management, hospice manager, hospice director, hospice supervisor, hospice nursing, hospice management, hospice RN manager, hospice RN director, hospice RN supervisor, home health management job, home health management jobs, homecare management job, homecare management jobs, home care management job, home care management jobs ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationWinter Haven, Florida, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Clinical Supervisor Job in Winter Haven,,"Winter Haven, FL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Supervisor-Job-Winter-Haven-FL-US-166611006.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=19,,,8c159ea4d104dbc88951ce8a6d23be55
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:26:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"BECOME a Pharmacy Technician in 9 months! As a Pharmacy Technician you'll assist pharmacists in hospital and community pharmacies. Attend a Pharmacy Technician Information Session to learn how you can earn your degree at a technical college near you. April 6 or April 21. All sessions 6-7 p.m. at your local technical college. Register at gotoltc.edu/pharmacy-tech/ or call 920-221-1157. Lakeshore Technical College - LLC offers its Pharmacy Technician program in cooperation with the following technical colleges: Foxy Valley, Park, Nicole Area, Northeast Wisconsin, Southwest, Western.",Pharmacy Technician Job in La Crosse,Full Time,"La Crosse, WI 54601",Education,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Pharmacy-Technician-Job-La-Crosse-WI-US-165585976.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=2900524001001&jobPosition=14,,,4578c51a521084cf93103f624889ffe0
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:26:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department.Job Requirements Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. Current Texas State RN license. CPR (American Heart Association) ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. PALS within 6 months of hire/transfer date.  One-year experience in surgical services nursing preferred.  Able to assess, plan, implement and evaluate nursing care. *Sign On Bonus and Relocation Assistance Available - *Sign On Bonus amount determined by years of experience",Registered Nurse - Recovery Room PACU Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Recovery-Room-PACU-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644178.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,6184b5b5a3b15590854234cbda0ff99d
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:26:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Substance abuse counselor trainee Turning Point Treatment Center600 Commercial CourtSavannah, GA  31406  Requirement: Eligible for obtaining certification in the State of Georgia as a Substance Abuse Counselor    Work hours:  5:00 am to 1:30 pm Monday through Friday.  This position will be expected to work approximately 35 hours per week.    MedMark Services has an opening for a  Substance abuse counselor at their outpatient clinic in Savannah to work about 35  hours per week. Individual will conduct individual and group counseling sessions. Coordinate care of assigned patients and present patient status and concerns with treatment team accordingly.  Conduct comprehensive patient assessments and the development and implementation of patient treatment plans according to State regulatory requirements.Provide clinical services and patient care and education and opiate addiction counseling services to patients receiving methadone maintenance and detoxification treatment. Experience in addiction counseling a plus.   MedMark Services, Inc. is committed to Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and to compliance with all Federal, State and local laws that prohibit employment discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, natural origin, ethnicity, religion, gender, pregnancy, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship, genetic disposition, disability or veteran’s status or any other classification protected by State/Federal laws. ",Counselor Inten-Savannah,Full Time Employee,"Savannah, GA 31406",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Counselor-Inten-Savannah-GA-Job-Savannah-GA-US-165981345.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,74d50da3d54b593741f6f9c9fda87664
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:15:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Social Media Intern will be responsible for building and managing online and social media projects and channels. He/she assists the Social Media Supervisor with coordinating monthly and weekly content development, scheduling and publishing.The Social Media Intern assists in determining metrics required to identify the success of online and social media projects.Other DutiesObtain content assets from agencies, communications team and other stakeholders for publishing on UPS branded channelsKeep key stakeholders appraised of content schedules and advise of any unique engagement needsSupport Social Media Supervisor with content evaluation for SEOAssist with community management coordination and performance trackingSupport Social Media Supervisor with coordinating advertising programs designed for social media channelsPreferred CompetenciesWorks with others to develop communications strategies for small-medium tactics and programs; crafts basic, effective messaging and visuals tailored to target audience(s).Demonstrates a basic understanding of the different media available for communication and social media channels.Assists management and implementation of basic projects; communicates plan, schedule, baselines, and metrics to stakeholders.Utilizes effective project management to deploy resources and ensures projects are on schedule.",UPS Social Media Intern Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA 30328",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Social-Media-Intern-Job-ATLANTA-GA-US-166124239.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,d23ac408d01457507945af6785480423
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:15:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Everything begins with solid communications. And in this hyper-networked world, that won't change anytime soon. So set yourself up in a promising civilian career by learning the Information Technology skills you need in the Army National Guard.Computers are essential to every division of the military. In the Army National Guard, you will learn what you need to know to maintain, process, and troubleshoot military computer systems and operations. The skills learned as an Information Technology Specialist can easily be transferred to the civilian workforce. You'll be able to work as a network support technician, data processing technician, or computer programmer in just about any company that uses computers.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for an Information Technology Specialist consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and approximately 15 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT) with classroom instruction.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHelpful attributes include an interest in working with radios, fiber optics, and transmission equipment; an ability to apply electronic principles and concepts; as well as a general understanding of math and physics. You must meet the following requirements to qualify for service:High School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekendPrograms and benefits are subject to change.",Information Technology Specialist Job in North Riverside  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,North Riverside 60546,,http://jobview.monster.com/Information-Technology-Specialist-Job-NORTH-RIVERSIDE-166726462.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=8,,Computer/Network SecurityGeneral/Other: IT/Software Development,8eaa45694e1dd2a47f995014211e6561
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Is in need of an experienced RN supervisor with the minimum of 2 years experience in LTC. Looking for one full time RN Supervisor for 7-3 and one part time RN Supervisor for 11-7. Must be available the minimum of every other weekend. IMMEDIATE HIRE WITH THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS:Updated ResumeORIGINAL: Social Security CardORIGINAL: Non expired State Identification orOriginal Proof of Citizenship / Immigration(Example of documents:Birth Cert, Green Card, Resident Card)UPON REQUEST WE WILL PROVIDE A LIST OF ACCEPTABLE DOCUMENTS2 Reference Letters ( 1 Business(with letter head) / 1 Personal ) Must be typed and signed.ORIGINAL:RN License & RegistrationMalpracticeCPR Card (RN)Physical, Flu shot MMR Lab Reports(Measles Mumps Rubella and Varicella), PPD (if PPD is Positive a copy of chest X-ray is required)***CURRENT PHYSICAL & PPD(Must be within the year)***You can call Kaity at office line: 631-863-8005 or cell 1-374-971-2883 to schedule an appointment.ADDRESS: 1 WEST MAIN STREET, SMITHTOWN, NY 11787WE ARE LOCATED IN THE TEACHER FEDERAL CREDIT UNION BUILDING, SIDE ENTRANCE, GLASS DOORS LABELED OFFICES ON TOP, ACROSS THE STREET FROM WALGREENS We look forward to meeting with you!!!",./hr Experienced RN supervisor (Smithtown) Job in Smithtown,Full Time,"Smithtown, NY 11787",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/40-00-hr-Experienced-RN-supervisor-Smithtown-Job-Smithtown-NY-US-163649936.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=11,40.00 - 40.00 $ /year,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),2c594aad12dc6ae51125bff47d6c6e9a
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job ID: 257698 Our client is a management consulting and government contractor with over 80 offices throughout the United States.  With over 100 years of experience, our client has been repeatedly been ranked at the top of their field, year after year.  They are currently looking for a IDAM System Engineer to join their talented team.  Who You Are: 4+ years of experience with engineering in UNIX and Windows environments  Experience with working as a lead, providing solutions, and driving change  Experience with working across multiple platforms with a variety of vendors and teams  Knowledge of PKI, encryption, and authentication standards  Knowledge of the engineering life cycle and change management  Ability to work independently and as part of a team  Ability to obtain a security clearance  HS diploma or GED  Security+ or CISSP Certification Preferred Qualifications: Experience with designing, implementing, and troubleshooting PKI  Experience with Online Certificate Status Protocol (OCSP)  Knowledge of Microsoft Forefront Identity Management  Knowledge of RSA Authentication Manager, MyID, MS PKI, or PingFederate  Possession of excellent oral and written communication skills  BA or BS degree Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information About Eliassen Group: Eliassen Group has been driving the success of our clients, consultants, and employees within Technology Staffing and Consulting Services since 1989. For over 25 years, we have been at the forefront of innovation by uniting talented people and quality solutions within successful companies to help them attain their business objectives. Our solution oriented approach to understanding your needs ensures that we identify and represent the best possible talent available in the market, personally selected and matched to your requirements by our highly-tenured, extraordinarily capable recruiting team. Our consulting divisions include expertise focused on Agile, Big Data, Biometrics & Data Solutions, Creative Services, Government Services, Life Sciences and Workforce Management. Eliassen Group is privately held and headquartered in Wakefield, MA. Don’t miss out on our referral program! If we hire a candidate that you refer us to then you can be eligible for a $1,000 referral check!",IDAM System Engineer Job in Mclean,Full Time,"Mclean, VA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/IDAM-System-Engineer-Job-McLean-VA-US-166675211.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=20,,IT/Software Development,16876b88c1eeba1641734d48f55ce013
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Company:Planet Dental & Orthodontics serves the Laredo community with compassion, clinical excellence, value and professionalism. We are here to improve the oral healthcare of our patients through dental education and advanced dental care, which will lead to an improved quality of life. We believe in a 100% customer service approach, we are willing to go above and beyond, and we pride ourselves on having a staff that treats every patient/parent with kindness.  We are currently searching for a full time qualified dental assistant who possesses a positive can-do attitude and is willing to put their best foot forward in ensuring total patient satisfaction. Our office mainly treats children and teenagers, but we do treat adults as well. New dental assistant graduates are welcome. We offer a variety of different dental assisting roles throughout our large office. Duties can include:o Assists at chair sideo Takes x-rayso Applies topical fluoride treatmentso Takes impressions and bite registrationso Applies pit and fissure sealantso Adaptation of temporary crownso Places topical medicationso Removes excess cement from fabricated restorations and orthodontic bandso Pours impressions to make stone and plaster modelso Trims modelso Fabricates mouth guards, temporary crowns, custom impression trays.o Prepares casting models and dieso Fabricates orthodontic retainers and other applianceso Manages the dental office infection control plan to meet OSHA, CDC and standards.o Handles instrument cleaning, sterilization/disinfection, and re-circulationo Performs dental treatment room disinfectiono Patient coordinator (Works with each patient from their exam through dismissal) Preferred Qualifications: - Bilingual in English and Spanish- Strong verbal communication skills- Current dental assisting license in the state of Texas- Able to work weekends",Dental Assistant Job in Laredo,Full Time,"Laredo, TX 78040",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Dental-Assistant-Job-Laredo-TX-US-166752358.aspx?mescoid=3100555001001&jobPosition=13,,,6f5534d9fa6c7906f49fe2d186bf8450
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:42,No,jobs.monster.com," Our client, a well established consulting firm in the Buffalo area, is looking for an AS400/iSeries Developer for a contract of approximately 6 months, with potential for a longer term. This company is a full service provider for AS400/iSeries companies providing operations, administration, support, installs of hardware/software, upgrades, annual maintenance, configuring to other software and to mobile software.  The right Contractor for this position will have several years experience in RPGIV development on an AS400 system.  They will be providing maintenance and enhancement of current systems.   Potential exists for eventual hire to a permanent situation.         ",#NAME?,Full Time Employee,"Buffalo, NY 14202",,http://jobview.monster.com/6-Month-Contract-for-an-RPG-Developer-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-166656468.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,41563e10da75f582b98c7fda34aa7929
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Apply now. Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Bilingual Spanish Required Retail Sales Consultant Queens West HIT Job in Jackson Heights,,"Jackson Heights, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Bilingual-Spanish-Required-Retail-Sales-Consultant-Queens-West-HIT-Job-JACKSON-HEIGHTS-NY-US-166659758.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=5,,,4ebf3706094dc691f739f5e880a7df11
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeSan Antonio, TXJob #: PTAsaaTX053377We are seeking a full time PTA at Guadalupe River Plaza SNF and Home Health in the Kerrville area. A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Physical Therapy Assistant to provide therapy services in the San Antonio area. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients.Your responsibilities: * Provide and direct physical therapy services to patients by assisting in the assessment, treatment, program planning and implementation * Work in accordance with physicians' orders and adhere to applicable principles and practices of physical therapy, Brookdale policies/procedures, and state regulations * Under the direction of a licensed physical therapist, assist in the screenings of patients, deliver treatment and appropriately document progress* Assist with selecting Physical Therapy techniques and sequence of activities, and adapting such techniques as indicated by patient performance * Help develop appropriate home or community programming to support the patient's continued recovery in his or her own environment Required skills and qualifications: * Associate's degree from an acredited Physical Therapy Assistant program * Completion of the state exam* Physical therapy assistant license in the state of practice* One year physical therapy experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidaysIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.  ",Physical Therapy Assistant Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78232",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Physical-Therapy-Assistant-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166612196.aspx?mescoid=3100552001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,e54888c365e811f564455a14b210ffd6
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Coordinator Job in Martinez, CA Are you looking to further your career within project management and administration within the construction industry?  We have an exciting job opportunity for a Project Coordinator in Martinez, CA.  You will be supporting the project management team as well as assisting other areas of the organization. Ideally, you will have a minimum of 4+ years of experience in a similar role.  This is a Temp to Hire opportunity with a pay of up to $27 an hour based on experience.  Your Job Responsibilities include:  Create invoices and input data into systemRequest retention paymentsMaintain project filesTrack all change orders and work authorizationsProvide job updates to clientOther special projects and related duties as assigned   Your Qualifications and Key Competencies include:  4+ years experience in a similar role, Associates degree preferred but not requiredPrevious experience in the construction industryMust be flexible to company needs and be able to handle multiple projectsHigh level of accuracy and attention to detail   If you are interested in this or other job opportunities available through Ajilon Professional Staffing, please visit our website at www.Ajilon.com and submit your resume today! ",Project Coordinator Job in Martinez,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Martinez, CA 94553",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Coordinator-Job-in-Martinez-CA-Job-Martinez-CA-US-166036425.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,69134a24dd86986fe5959c1c8a08b70a
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY: The Service Desk Analyst I (SDAI) is responsible for supporting the functional and operational efficiency of Information Management and the Service Support Division. SDAI's will take ownership of resolving first level customer service requests related to both hardware and software and will use excellent problem-solving, communication, and interpersonal skills along with a patient, positive, and customer-friendly attitude within a team environment. SDAI's will be highly customer service orientated and proactive in anticipating and resolving problems while maximizing efficient use of computer resources. The Service Desk Analyst I is also responsible for supporting the business goals and objectives of the Service Desk, the Service Support Division, Information Management, and the CHRISTUS organization as a whole. The SDAI is expected to cooperate with other personnel and workgroups, to practice ongoing self-development, and to demonstrate behaviors that are aligned with the CHRISTUS Mission, Core Values, and Vision. MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES: * Provides first level hardware and software technical support to include password resets in a professional and timely manner, while ensuring Five-Star Customer Service to both CHRISTUS Health and external customers seeking assistance from the Service Desk through phone calls, emails, or self service tickets. * Provides effective Five-Star Customer Service by being polite, courteous, and friendly towards all customers at all times. Acknowledges customers immediately in order to determine need and helps the customer resolve issues or requests. Participates in departmental programs that promote and deliver exceptional customer service. * Provides customers with assistance in understanding and making appropriate use of software tools and various applications and equipment such as, but not limited to MEDITECH, Microsoft Office Suite, WYSE/PC terminals, and printers to support end user and/or customer requests. * Answers customer questions and concerns regarding system operations and responds proactively in resolving system issues by assessing the extent of problem and escalating the issue to next level support when necessary. * Determines higher tiered or second level support group responsible if First Call Resolution does not occur. Adheres to all established Service Desk policies, procedures, and guidelines for processing, escalating, notifying and closing customer calls. * Fully documents all associated resolutions and/or actions taken in the ticketing software system, including but not limited to, description of incident, information on the customer and hardware used, troubleshooting methods performed, and actions taken to final resolution and furthermore communicates resolution/escalation to the customer. * Manages Support Teams Service Desk dockets to ensure customer SLAs are being adhered to. Follows up with internal and external support technicians and analysts for ticket status updates. * Facilitates knowledge sharing by creating Knowledge Base Articles and Wiki entries for Information Management support teams to utilize in resolving reoccurring issues. * Assists Service Desk Analyst II's and III's and second level support analysts in evaluating change management resolutions on new products and technologies for the organization. * Serves as a liaison between Information Management Department and all customers. * Performs other duties and special projects as assigned by the Service Desk Team Leads, Service Desk Supervisor, or Service Desk Manager. POSITION QUALIFICATIONS: A. Education/Skills: * High School Diploma or GED required. * Associate degree in Computer Science or related field preferred. * Knowledge of basic PC skills, familiarity with computer technologies, network environments and activities a plus. * Good typing skills with a minimum of 35 wpm required. * Strong oral and written communication skills - minimum passing grade of 70 on basic grammar test. * Problem solving skills. * Patience, compassion, strong customer service skills. * Multi-tasking ability. * Time Management skills. B. Experience * One year Customer Service experience required. * One year Call Center/Help Desk/Service Desk preferred. * Successful completion of all Service Desk Operator competencies required. C. Licenses, Registrations, or Certifications: * None required. A+, Network + or other industry certifications a plus. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Service Desk Analyst I Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78251",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Desk-Analyst-I-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166681329.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,19bd060d386f85ed3d399bb5b22a1f5c
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress.Job Requirements Graduate of a State Board accredited School of Nursing or equivalent. Experience: Six (6) months experience preferred. Licensure: Current license or permit to practice professional nursing in the State of Texas.",Registered Nurse,"Part Time, Employee","Beaumont, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Outpatient-Surgery-Job-Beaumont-TX-US-166643962.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,d9fd038ae46038730fa4315b8590cce7
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"* Experience - The person needs to have sound experience on System Admin activities in either Wintel   or Non-Wintel environment along with an understanding of general network, web, application,   database,  storage, backup technologies, Automation Tools and infrastructure architecture Technologies(Preferred)/Primary Skills :·         HPSA(Opsware),·         OS (Windows and/or any Unix flavor),·         windows/Unix System Administration,·         Understanding of VB Scripting/Shell Scripting/Python ITIL Understanding Good Understanding of System Admin Automation/Orchestration Tools * Secondary Skills :·         Oracle, MySQL, VMWare, Solaris LDOMS, Business Objects, LDAP,etc.·         Protocols: HTTP, FTP, SMTP, AFS, SNMP, WMI and SSH Protocols·         Languages: PERL, VB SCRIPT, SQL, XML, T-SQL, PL/SQL, Unix scripting, Java, Python·         Software: HP SA (Opsware), CA PAM/HPOO,  HP UCMDB, ServiceNow(Operations)",System Admin Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH 45201",,http://jobview.monster.com/System-Admin-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-166756200.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=17,,,068ec1d836134ad955d20aeddfe8a0d0
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:13:13:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client, an international social media company, is looking for a Diversity Project Lead, who will support and help drive efforts to develop:• Global facilities design standards that address needs of employees and candidates with disabilities•Etiquette and awareness training for HR & Recruiting, managers and employees•An employee self-id campaign•Events and partnerships focused on engagement and retention of people with disabilities•Recruiting resources and strategies for attracting qualified people with disabilitiesIn today’s job market, “who you know” matters more than ever – and that’s why you should get to know Volt. We’re one of the world’s largest recruiting companies, yet our success is built one successful placement at a time. Each of our recruiters has niche industry expertise, committed to connecting top talent with respected companies.Through Volt's Military Heroes Program, Volt secures the talents of American's veterans and encourages their dependents and spouses to contact Volt. Volt is a member of the Military Spouse Employment Partnership and is proud to support the Wounded Warrior Project. http://www.voltmilitary.com/site/8417/commitment.html For more opportunities, connect with us online at volt.com/NorCal.Volt is an equal opportunity employer.* Proven experience in comprehensive People with Disabilities program management space, in-house• Project management experience• Ability to execute• Global vision and ability to execute globally• Success in multitasking• Ability to work cross functionally",Diversity Project Lead Job in Menlo Park,Full Time Employee,"Menlo Park, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Diversity-Project-Lead-Job-Menlo-Park-CA-US-166692915.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,64bed61ee944c1834f114281891c2d7b
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:54:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Chemical Operations Specialist, you'll be there and prepared whenever a community is flooded, an earthquake shakes the foundations of a city, a hurricane makes landfall, or an enemy uses biological or chemical warfare. You will know what to do to evacuate the area, control the situation, and solve the problem.In order to perform these functions, you will be trained to expertly handle nuclear, biological, and chemical (NBC) detection and decontamination equipment so you can assist in the application of NBC defense measures. You will also be asked to maintain disaster plans, operate and perform maintenance on smoke generating equipment, and coordinate with civilian personnel on what to do in an emergency. These are skills that are in demand by federal, state, and local governments, as well as civil defense agencies. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Chemical Operations Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend 19 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn defensive procedures for NBC warfare and preparation of emergency plans. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Chemical Operations Specialist Job in Fargo  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Fargo 58102,,http://jobview.monster.com/Chemical-Operations-Specialist-Job-FARGO-166732970.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,297229fb15db6b134ed6017c0eb8ec6d
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:30:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Patient Access representatives facilitate a welcome and easy access to the facility and are responsible for establishing an encounter for any patient who meets the guidelines for hospital service. Patient Access staff ensures that all data entry is accurate including demographic and financial information for each account. Patient Access has numerous procedural requirements including data elements, insurance verification, authorization for services, and collections for all patient portions including prior balances. Patient Access staff is responsible for the successful financial outcome of all patient services. Patient Access is responsible for ensuring the hospital maintains compliance with Federal regulations, JCAHO, and Department of Health and Hospital compliance standards. Patient Access communicates directly with patients and families, physicians, nurses, insurance companies and third party payers. This position requires professional appearance, and behavior, good communication skills and effective organizational skills. Patient Access representatives require dependability, flexibility, and teamwork.Major Responsibilities: A. Accurately inputs all required data elements for scheduling and registration, including patient demographic, financial information, guarantor information, and relevant notes associated with the encounter. B. Verifies insurance eligibility and obtains necessary authorizations for services rendered. C. Calculates and collects the estimated patient portion based on benefits and contract reimbursement as well as prior balances. D. Performs financial assessment for appropriate program assistance. E. Communicates the purpose of and obtains patient/legal guardian signatures on all necessary hospital documents. F. Represents the Patient Access department in a professional, courteous manner at ALL times. G. Required to assist the hospital in the event of an internal or external disaster. H. Supports the flexible needs of the department to accommodate patient volume in all areas of the hospital. This may require assignment to another area of the department, and shift change. I. Supports the department in achieving established performance targets. J. Completes required training as needed and as mandated. K. Maintains the team discipline of following all elements of established standard processes L. Works with HPWT (High Performance Work Teams) to maintain an efficient, clean, and orderly workplace using 5S principles and practices once implemented in the work unit. M. Coordinates, communicates, and assists in monitoring work flow and work tasks necessary to manage fluctuating volumes. N. Provides feedback to the team to help identify educational needs, and mediation needs by reporting IPOs (issues, problems, and opportunities). O. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned responsibilities is a manner that meets the population-specific and developmental needs of the members served by the department. (E) P. Appropriately adapts assigned assessment, treatment, and/or service methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each member served. (E) Q. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities. R. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties. S. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of Santa Rosa Health Care. (E)T. Performs other duties as assigned. (M) Education: High school diploma or equivalent required. Experience: One year experience in Patient Access, hospital registration, medical office, billing/collection functions, or a comparable customer service related position preferred. Licenses, Registrations, Certifications: NoneEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Patient Access Rep I Job in New Braunfels,"Full Time, Employee","New Braunfels, TX 78130",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Patient-Access-Rep-I-Job-New-Braunfels-TX-US-166681213.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,2f9a819b40993b87b3c5785201b24f05
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:19:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is seeking uncommon and elite innovators who possess both the development skills and business acumen to operate at a hyper-fast and accurate speed. The elite rapid innovation team is responsible for using the latest, cutting edge technologies to combine any and all global data, software, and services to create innovative concepts and solutions that will help our customers gain a competitive edge in the digital world.OVERALL ARCHITECTURE TEAM GOALSWe set the bar for technology.We build easily refactorable solutions.We focus on enabling agility for all other teams.We automate everything.”No” is not part of our vocabulary.We prove our designs with hands-on development.We provide standards, frameworks, and components for re-use across the company.We operate like a startup: Fast, hungry, and agile.What you will do:You will work with the latest and greatest technologies with some other brilliant technologists. You will tackle the challenges associated with building things that have never been done before in relation to the connected car, connected home, IoT, wearables, etc. You will utilize your deep technical knowledge to deploy really cool things.The ideal applicant is spending their time on:Data structure design and optimizationData sourcing, cleansing, and normalizationData services, toolkits, and analysisQUALIFICATIONSTechnical must haves:Expert in relational, document, and graph databases, as well as modern persistency mechanisms (e.g. Hadoop)Previous experience with transforming and merging large data feedsExceptional ability to design and document data structures and relationshipsComfortable with interfacing with internal and external resources for data and discovery; existing contact network (within Solera) a plusExpert understanding of agile change management for databases and structuresOther must haves:Understands that architecture is a hands-on craft; wants to write code and build ITStartup developer mindsetHas been in charge of technology for at least one product in the pastClear understanding of the differences in production and development needs; ability of compromising between the twoObsessed about streamlining development and operationsKnack for finding solutions that reduce effort for the rest of the teamStartup mindset in problem solving; throwing money at it isn’t a solutionHates mediocre software / technologyStandards adoption through leadershipDocumentation, transparency, knowledge transfer focusLargely cross-functional; able to jump in other architectural roles where neededCultural fit (Humble, Hungry and Hunting)Able to stay on mission some nights/weekends during team sprints",Data Architect Job in Westlake,"Full Time, Employee","Westlake, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Data-Architect-Job-Westlake-TX-US-166683455.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,17b351e6ce10cdb95128f1b992af5fd8
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:19:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Java Software DeveloperLocation: Minneapolis, MN Duration: 6 months (Contract to Hire)Interview process: Telephonic and then F2F  Responsibilities:  • Analyzes, designs, codes, tests, and implements complex programs; develops appropriate programs and systems documentation according to established standard systems delivery methodology. Adheres to all organizational and IT policies and process for software development and project management.  • Develops technical design specifications based on functional requirements; develops and maintains mainframe and/or client server applications.  • Builds and maintains systems with current and emerging technologies while leveraging and expanding system capabilities. Conducts decision support systems tests, monitors test results, identifies appropriate issues and takes corrective action.  • Provides creative solutions to moderately complex, cross platform technical problems, partnering with customers to establish requirement and closing the gaps identified in the project.  • Provides onsite and offsite support for the processing cycles of production systems.  • Participates in system development planning and monitoring; enhances existing systems; actively participates in structured walkthroughs and technical reviews. Provides technical direction and coaching to Associate Software Developers in application development activities.  Must Haves:  • Proven development ability in Java 1.6 or higher.  • Experience with Java Web Services, Soap, REST, etc…  • Experience with JBOSS version 5 or higher Qualifications:  • Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent in Computer Science, MIS, Engineering or a directly related field.  • 4 years of Java software development or related IT experience.  • Proven development ability in Java 1.6 or higher.  • Experience with Java Web Services, Soap, REST, etc…  • Experience with JBOSS version 5 or higher  • Proven ability of structure analysis and technical design techniques, database and file access methods.  • Experience in agile environment a must.  • Experience in Financial Services, preferably life insurance. Please send profiles to gunjan@vlinkinfo.com to apply.",Java Developer Job in Minneapolis,Full Time,"Minneapolis, MN 55401",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Java-Developer-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-166613942.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),662eb5573a23c3c99e0087a90d0856dc
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:19:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Primary Occupation: Self Pay Customer Service Representative. **NO WEEKENDS!  NO MANDATORY OT!  COMPLETE BENEFITS PACKAGE!** Come join our family!  We are a longtime established (30+ years), professional, clean and excellent company to work for.  We are offering full-time positions in our Self Pay Division.  These positions offer fantastic opportunities for good base pay ($13 per hour / 40 hours per week).We work full, 40-hour shifts each week.  Our office(s) are open Monday through Friday.  This position requires 2 evening shifts (10:00am until 7:00pm) to be worked each week. Every work day includes two (2) 10-minute paid breaks, and one (1) lunch break that is one-hour in length.We are different from many collections and receivable management organizations.  If you have great listening skills and voice tone with quality customer service attributes, we have a job for you.  Treating others as we ourselves desire is expected.We never work weekends, and we will never require any mandatory overtime.  We offer a full benefit package that includes:  Blue Cross Blue Shield coverage entailing:  health, dental, paid-time-off, 401k, vision, life, supplemental pre and post-tax plan options, HSAs, and various internal benefits like paid birthday holidays.  We truly are a great company to work and establish your career with.  We hope to see you very soon!                 Qualifications:·         Must have excellent communication skills!·         Proficiency in data entry and computer knowledge·         Ability to handle a fast-paced work environment·         A high school diploma or GED or relevant experience in the field·         Bilingual skills are a plus!!!",Self Pay Customer Service Representative Job in Chattanooga,Full Time,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Self-Pay-Customer-Service-Representative-Job-Chattanooga-TN-US-145058859.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,$13.00+ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),79a23ea895f271ce2ae446d33c9547b1
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:19:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Army National Guard Soldiers are under all the stress of everyday citizens, plus bear the additional weight of military service and combat-oriented situations. This stress can understandably wear on the mental well-being of a Soldier.The Mental Health Specialist assists the Guard's health care team with the management and treatment of inpatient and outpatient mental health care. Under the supervision of an Army psychiatrist, social worker, psychiatric nurse, or psychologist, you will assist with the care and treatment of patients with psychiatric, drug, and alcohol problems; collect and record patient data; counsel and treat patients with personal, behavioral, or mental health problems; and provide bedside care in hospitals.You'll be able to use your Mental Health Specialist experience to prepare for a future with civilian hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, or rehabilitation centers. With a Mental Health Specialist background, you may consider a career as a psychiatrist's assistant, a medical assistant, or a physician's aide, or even use your experience as a stepping stone to earn a higher degree.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Mental Health Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 20 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Mental Health Specialist Job in Columbus  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Columbus 43213,,http://jobview.monster.com/Mental-Health-Specialist-Job-COLUMBUS-166735095.aspx?mescoid=2100312001001&jobPosition=11,,Mental Health,ba62025150e1d6d50f3fe3dc49cf1b0e
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:19:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"You will work with the latest and greatest technologies with some other brilliant technologists. You will tackle the challenges associated with building things that have never been done before in relation to the connected car, connected home, IoT, wearables, etc. You will utilize your deep technical knowledge to deploy really cool things. The ideal applicant is spending their time on: Build and release automation Automated testing frameworks Technical quality control QUALIFICATIONS Technical must haves: Expert in designing fully automated build, release, and deployment systems on Jenkins, Bamboo, and similar software Master of Continuous Delivery and Continuous Integration paradigms Perfect understanding of various test automation systems, including unit testing, functional, and load/performance frameworks Deep understanding of TDD and BDD Outstanding rollback strategist Other must haves: Understands that architecture is a hands-on craft; wants to write code and build IT Startup developer mindset Has been in charge of technology for at least one product in the past Clear understanding of the differences in production and development needs; ability of compromising between the two Obsessed about streamlining development and operations Knack for finding solutions that reduce effort for the rest of the team Startup mindset in problem solving; throwing money at it isn’t a solution Hates mediocre software / technology Standards adoption through leadership Documentation, transparency, knowledge transfer focus Largely cross-functional; able to jump in other architectural roles where needed Solera cultural fit (Humble, Hungry and Hunting) Able to stay on mission some nights/weekends during team sprints",Delivery Architect Job in Westlake,"Full Time, Employee","Westlake, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Delivery-Architect-Job-Westlake-TX-US-166683452.aspx?mescoid=1700157001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,617be935c111782e5eb758f47e65d556
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:18:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Family Care Visiting Nurse is hiring directly for full time experienced Registered Nurses for the Norwalk location.  Those who accept full time 36-40 hours a week may qualify for a sign on bonus!!!Requirements:Connecticut RN/Associates, RN/BSN license. 6 months- 1 year clinical experience. Previous experience in the home care setting is a plus.Weekend availability.Benefits:Sign on bonus!!!Tablet provided for EMR documentation!!Immediate benefits. PTO, Medical, Dental, Life, Disability, 401K.Mileage reimbursement.Tuition reimbursementFlexible Scheduling.Individualized Orientation.Re-certification Staff, Quality Assurance Assistance.",Registered Nurse (RN) Job in Norwalk,Full Time,"Norwalk, CT 06851",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Job-Norwalk-CT-US-165361703.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a023a74508a66d01abbf71ae1a8ffe5d
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:05:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a PHP WordPress Developer in Mundelein, Illinois (IL).Essential Functions: Custom short codes, custom plugins and custom theme development on WordPress Developing and consuming Web Services for display on WordPress sites Code and implement responsive WordPress templates from provided layouts through HTML/CSS to a custom theme Plan, code, and test new feature and functions then publish / integrate approved code to various environments Create and update re-usable code libraries to streamline WordPress development cycle Other projects as assignedREQUIREMENTS: 5 years of Web Application Development experience Advanced knowledge of using current web development languages (including HTML5, CSS3, JS frameworks, PHP/MySQL) to create web standards complaint sites Three or more years developing sites in WordPress, theming, and creating custom plug-ins Three or more years writing PHP including back-end development Two or more years' experience with jQuery, ajax, Bootstrap, Node.js, etc. Experience with developing and consuming Web Services Experience interacting with WordPress REST API and formats (JSON, XML) is a must Experience with Agile/SCRUM is a plus Experience in creating and testing cross-browser compatible web pages (including IE 8 and above) Ability to handle multiple tasks in a fast-paced environment Willingness to take initiative and to follow through on projects with a strong attention to detail Online portfolio must show custom widgets / plug-ins that you have developed",PHP WordPress Developer Job in Mundelein,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Mundelein, IL 60060",,http://jobview.monster.com/PHP-WordPress-Developer-Job-Mundelein-IL-US-166752097.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),766eeded88a8b0934b7aed91dc507793
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:12:04:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides respiratory care procedures under medical direction specifically focused on the assessment, treatment, management, control, diagnostic evaluation, education, and care of patients with deficiencies and abnormalities of the cardiopulmonary system as well as on the prevention of the development of these deficiencies. Therapy includes but is not limited to application and monitoring of medical gases (excluding anesthetic gases) and environmental control systems; mechanical ventilatory support; artificial airway care; bronchopulmonary hygiene; pharmacological agents related to respiratory care procedures; basic hemodynamic cardiovascular support appropriate to ages served: primarily adults 18 -- 65 or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0 -- 1 year, child ages 1 -- 12 or adolescent ages 13 -- 17 years. Care is provided within an assigned unit of the hospital, in accordance with accepted clinical practices and established policies and procedures. The focus of patient and family education activities is to promote knowledge of disease process, medical therapy and self-help. Works with other disciplines to ensure a collaborative approach to the care of the patient. May have other duties assigned as required. * Graduate of an accredited Registered Respiratory Therapy Program. * RCP-TDH required. * CPR -- (American Heart Association). * ACLS certification within 90 days of hire/transfer date. * One year general adult care experience preferred. * One year Critical Care experience preferred. * One year pediatric care experience preferred. * Good verbal communication, interpersonal and organizational skills; computer skills, prior experience in respiratory care preferred. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Respiratory Therapist - Cardiopulmonary Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX 78404",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Respiratory-Therapist-Cardiopulmonary-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166627300.aspx?mescoid=2900493001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,45fa2d38dbba08bcadd54f289aa6e71a
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:11:33:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an ETL Developer II who is passionate about development and who enjoys taking ownership of assigned tasks in Sunrise, FL. This position is primarily responsible for developing and maintaining ETL for an Oracle data warehouse. The ideal candidate should work well independently and with business users. There is a lot of opportunity for personal growth in this role as the selected candidate will play an active role in shaping and enhancing the overall ETL architecture while adhering to ETL best practices. This is a development intensive position requiring focus and patience.Responsibilities Include: Work as part of the Business Intelligence team in the implementation/support of Oracle BI Applications and Enterprise Performance Management modules Design and develop ETL/ELT mappings/packages using Informatica / ODI / Pentaho Work with BI Team to model appropriate star schemas solutions in data warehouse to best meet end users customization request Troubleshoot bugs, enhance and support existing ETL mappings/packages for the data warehouse Monitor DAC (Data warehouse application console) runs on a daily basis correcting any issue that may arise. Work to minimize DAC run times through effective performance tuning. Participate in requirements gathering and design of ETL/data integration solutions Create and maintain documentation for developed ETL processes Participate in Quality Assurance activities, collaborate with DBAs to test, deploy and support ETL packages Perform as an Informatica / ODI / OBIEE Administrator, responsible for RPD changes, DAC administration, ETL deployments and general BI supportREQUIREMENTS: 7+ years Informatica v 9.x & DAC 5+ years working with Oracle 10g/11g/12c databases 5+ Experience working with data warehouse SQL tuning techniques 2+ years working with Pentaho Data Integration (PDI) preferable Proven Data Warehouse design / deployment experience designing Star Schemas, reporting and analytics for enterprise Data warehouse implementations Ability to effectively prioritize and manage In-depth knowledge of star schema/dimensional modeling and data warehouse methodology Knowledge of ETL/ELT design principles such as change data capture, slowly changing dimensions, surrogate keying and fact aggregation Ability to translate user requirements into technical architecture vision and implementation plans Ability to Integrate Informatica with multiple Source / Client, Error Management Exposure to WebLogic is a plus Required Expertise with TOAD, or Oracle SQL Developer Experience in Oracle SQL, SQL Tuning Strong communication skills interfacing with technical and non-technical audience, internal and external stakeholders",ETL Developer II Job in Sunrise,"Full Time, Employee","Sunrise, FL 33323",,http://jobview.monster.com/ETL-Developer-II-Job-Sunrise-FL-US-166749892.aspx?mescoid=1500143001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9e81cc82558df42a23b250ffab65a4fb
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:11:31:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"* Responsible for effective management of patient care delivery: * Completes and documents assessment within period established by policy/procedure. * Completes and documents reassessment of patient needs according to department standard. * Initiates, updates and communicates an appropriate multi-disciplinary plan of care based in identified problems and/or patient needs * Collaborate with patient/family/physician and other disciplines to coordinate the plan of care * Evaluates patient response to care, revises plan of care as necessary and documents appropriately * Administers and documents medications/treatments safely following Medication Administration Policy and Procedure * Recognizes change or urgent situations in patient condition and intervenes appropriately. * Provides patient and/or family with information relative to treatment plan, diagnostic/surgical procedures, disease process, and care after discharge. Initiates collaboration and documents appropriate teaching, considering age, cultural and religious beliefs, and barriers to learning. * Evaluates effectiveness of teaching and provides appropriate follow-up. * Provides leadership and direction in accordance with departmental goals and objectives. * Delegates duties based on position and level of competence and the complexity of patient's needs. * Performs Point of Care Testing within scope of licensure; accurately performs testing according to the approved procedure and limits testing to only those tests for which competency has been assessed and operator is deemed qualified by designated trainer. * Healthstream (HLC) modules completed by assigned date. * Complete Associate Self-evaluation and give to Supervisor by assigned date. * Attend 2 of the Associate Round Tables per fiscal year. * Maintain licensure or certification without lapse, if required for the position. * Maintain BCLS/ACLS certification, if required for the position.Education/Skills: Graduate from an Accredited School of Nursing. Experience: As required by Staff RN Level and assigned area. Licenses, Registrations, or Certifications: Current registration with eh Louisiana State Board of Registered Nurse Examiners. BLS provider, ACLS provider as required by departmental policy.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse - Critical Care Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA 71105",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Critical-Care-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166135588.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,74e36fcd5a47c113fd28fd4ed703382f
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:11:30:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is seeking an experienced .Net Developer for their client located in Minneapolis, Minnesota (MN).Responsibilities: Responsible for development of web application systems for Centralized Receivables Service, ensuring high quality work Interact with development leads and Business Analysts to understand the requirements, create design documents and implement the solutions Work with development leads to complete assigned tasks and with expected quality and on timeREQUIREMENTS: 10+ years of experience Knowledge of authoring tools and human interface Must be experienced with performance aspects of application development Knowledge of SQL Server, development methodology, standards, design tools and specification representation MCP +internet or other certifications like Win 95/98/NT/UNIX, JavaScript, VBScript, PERL, XML, and HTML Knowledge of web design principles and standards Also need experience in both ASP.Net MVC and .Net batch and background processing in a high volume environment Understanding of current .NET technological trends Demonstrable detailed understanding of design principles and methods, technology and standards",.Net Developer Job in Minneapolis,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Minneapolis, MN 55423",,http://jobview.monster.com/Net-Developer-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-166755658.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),375cfdfed83ee2cbd96673875d52b519
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:11:09:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Gadsden  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Gadsden 35904,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-GADSDEN-166720880.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=4,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,fc8d7583ef312f58c424824de8da703a
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:10:32:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Plymouth Meeting  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Plymouth Meeting 19462,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-PLYMOUTH-MEETING-166737053.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=6,,General/Other: Medical/Health,6474299a023130e4c1292ee7544fb7cb
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:10:20:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Care AidePosition available for 2nd shift care aide/med pass. Part/Full time. Experience preferred,will trainContact Shelley at Auburn Fields 989-662-4100",Care Aide Job in Auburn,Full Time,"Auburn, MI 48611",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Care-Aide-Job-Auburn-MI-US-166701760.aspx?ch=midlanddailynew&mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=12,,,64f151eabccc68eaabb8374594903244
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:10:18:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Desktop Support Technicians-Charlotte, NC-4 Month ContractAt CompuCom, you're more than just a number. Our employee relationship managers support you throughout your engagement, provide career guidance and reemployment assistance. Join CompuCom!Our high-visibility client is seeking three (3) Support Technicians to support end users at the corporate level. Professional attitude, manners and demeanor are critical along with a solid knowledge of mobile device support, remote dial in, and on-call support. Possible travel to remote sites will be estimated less than 5%. Requirements: * Enterprise desktop support experience required * Must be able to support iOS, PC, Android devices * Knowledgeable about PCs, printer connections, and phone issues * Experience with MS Office 2010 and Windows 7 * Must have excellent communication and presentation skills * Highly professional customer service skills and demeanor required * A+ certification a plusW2 only, no Corp to Corp. We are unable to sponsor H1B visas at this time.**CompuCom supports Employment Equity and Diversity** CompuCom Systems, Inc., a global company headquartered in Dallas, Texas, provides IT managed services, infrastructure solutions, consulting and products to Fortune 1000 companies committed to enhancing their end users' experience. Founded in 1987, privately held CompuCom employs approximately 11,500 associates. For more information, visit www.compucom.com",Desktop Support Technician Opportunities Job in Charlotte,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","Charlotte, NC 28205",Computer Hardware Computer Software Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Desktop-Support-Technician-Opportunities-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-166675985.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a886f3ef29b8b5959da68ffbfbd72d59
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:10:12:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client in Cleveland, Ohio(OH) is looking to bring in an Implementation Project Manager for a 6+ month project.Responsibilities: This person will be responsible for identifying and designing the Service Desk organization consolidation needs and developing the integration plan for an integrated shared services model across the enterprise This individual will need to learn and understand the Core IT Business and work with support and Service Delivery Teams to perform gap analysis, work plan development, policy writing and adherence and full implementation Multiple implementations will be occurring simultaneously and efforts need to be coordinated with available resources and time frames Deliverables include an overall project work plan, individual support team plans, budget, time lines, resources utilized, etc. The Implementation Manager will utilize Project Management Methodologies for each implementation while acting as primary point of communication for the service desk manager and internal stakeholders The responsibilities include managing requirements, containing scope, consistent project updates, schedule/plan, monitoring the quality of the deliverables/milestones, issue escalation, and internally ensuring appropriate resource allocationREQUIREMENTS: Minimum of 5 years proven experience driving large scale enterprise Service Desk/ Shared Services consolidation experience; includes designing plan, approach, operating measures, tools and staff integration Strong Project Management discipline, including development of project plans, assessment and mitigation of risk, effectively meeting management and tracking actions and issues Develop implementation strategies for process improvement Strong competency utilizing MS Office Tools, including Word, Excel, MS Project 2010, and Visio",Implementation Project Manager Job in Cleveland,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Cleveland, OH 44131",,http://jobview.monster.com/Implementation-Project-Manager-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-166599325.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5caa1bb9a2d622811136bfb601beae14
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:09:24:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to individuals and families of varied ethnic and cultural backgrounds, ages, educational levels and economic circumstances with respect and dignity.  Excellent verbal, written and computer skills are necessary in order to work effectively and collaboratively with clients, collaborating agencies and community professionals, as well as, maintaining proper documentation.  Clinical staff members must be able to take and pass without major modification a course in Handle with Care, which requires hands-on, physical components to ensure the safety of the clients and staff. Clinical staff members must possess reliable transportation, ability to acquire an F endorsement on driver's license and transport clients.HRMC is an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers License Record, Degree Verification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingent upon clean drug screen, background check and driving record. Additionally, certain programs are subject to TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingual applicants are encouraged to apply.HRMC is currently seeking a qualified and enthusiastic professional for the following position:  Cocke County CCFT Case Manager.Job SummaryJob Summary:  The CCFT  Case Manager serves as a clinical member of the multi-disciplinary team, providing treatment, rehabilitation, and support for SPMI client population. This person will provide primary case-management for an assigned group of clients, including on-going assessment, rehabilitation and support services. Must have a strong commitment to the SPMI population where the goal is to help the client and family maintain within their natural environment, home, school, and community, and to learn to access appropriate support services.This individual will also be responsible for:Act a liaison with community agencies and families to advocate for the rights and preferences of clients and to facilitate the treatment process.Provides advocacy, linkage, and referral servicesProvides mental health status assessments, evaluations, and consultative services Maintains appropriate chart recordsUpholds center policy and procedures, SSOC, and CARF standardsCompletes all documentation in a timely mannerParticipates in treatment team meetings with a psychiatrist or other med providerParticipates in IEP and other school related meetings as needed or as requested by familiesInterfaces professionally with other agencies involved in the ecology of the familyProvides therapeutic support and crisis intervention, including on-call crisis services 24/7Job RequirementsJob Requirements:  Masters degree preferred in a health-related field of counseling, psychology or social work.  This position also requires that the employee has an F Endorsement on his/her Driver License to be available to transport individuals as needed. This position requires certification in and adequate implementation of verbal and physical de-escalation techniques that include a wide range of bodily movements including but not limited to grasping, holding another person, going down on knees, running and walking.Experience: Must have course work and or experience in the areas of cultural diversity, human development, etiology and treatment of mental illness, alcohol and drug abuse, physical and sexual abuse, suicide, and mental retardation. Two years experience preferred. Experience working with children is preferred although applicants may have other skills and experiences that could accommodate this position. Skills/Physical: Ability to effectively and ethically counsel children and families.  Ability to present professionally and work within a team format to plan, implement, and evaluate successful interventions.  Ability to effectively run and process groups with children and families.  Ability to work within a team format to meet positive goals for children and interface with other agencies involved in the ecology of the family.  This position requires certification in and adequate implementation of verbal and physical de-escalation techniques that include a wide range of bodily movements including but not limited to grasping, holding another person, going down on knees, running and walking. Must be capable of assisting in utilizing non-violent methods of crisis intervention including therapeutic holding. Must have mental ability to exercise sound judgment under pressure.  Ability to exercise effective decision-making, ability to set and demonstrate appropriate boundaries, ability to be an empathic listener, flexibility, willingness, and adaptability to working with diverse populations.  Must also have the ability to communicate effectively and possess good time management and organizational skills.  Demonstrated ability to abide by professional/ethical code of conduct and to establish supportive and respectful relationships with clients.Hearing of normal and soft tones.  Close eye work. Valid driver's license. Lifting up to 50lbs. Frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending, stooping, and reaching.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1284&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Cocke County CCFT Case Manager Job in Newport,Full Time,"Newport, TN 37821",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Cocke-County-CCFT-Case-Manager-Job-Newport-TN-US-166706429.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,8ca2146ec9ff9e2c8cc2bd4c2d0be3ff
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:09:22:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking a Clinical Laboratory Technologist/ Medical Technologist for a Clinical Flow Cytometry Laboratory.  Duties Include:·         The technologist will perform a variety of both administrative and technical procedures to support clinical sample processing·         Primarily process and run patient blood samples on a Beckman Coulter Gallio and/or BD FACSCanto II ·         Perform a preliminary analysis of the clinical flow cytometry data under the direction of the laboratory supervisor and technical director Minimum qualifications/requirements: ·                 B.S. in Biology, Clinical Laboratory Science or a similar scientific field, or a Medical Technologist degree·                 Able to work in a fast-paced matrix team environment·                 Prior experience with Flow Cytometry equipment and techniques is required",Clinical Laboratory/Medical Technologist (Flow Cytometry,Full Time,"Fairfax, VA 22030",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Laboratory-Medical-Technologist-Flow-Cytometry-FACS-Job-Fairfax-VA-US-166220262.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=1,18.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),7c4cb811766224f94a841dff8b985a73
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:09:21:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"The client is looking to add to their managed services team with a multi faceted individual with a well rounded skill set. This person will need to be able to work on his/her own and as part of a team to service high profile customers. The successful candidate must be able to act as a technical lead for a small team of engineers and must be able to multi-task between projects. When not on site at customer locations this candidate is expected to fill a senior role. This is a high level role with deep technical skill required to manage cisco based client support offerings. The primary function of the role is to be the trusted technical advisor for select clients. The role requires onsite presence and an understanding of each clients business needs and how relate to the technologies being supported. Must be adept and be able to speak to and implement the majority of following technologies (cisco unified communications, cisco routing and switching, wireless, cisco ASA firewalls, cisco UCS, and other technologies). Enterprise architecture methodologies are a plus. Must be able to work independently and fill a leadership role as part of a team. The successful candidate will have primary responsibility for ensuring overall client support satisfaction and managing client expectations. As a seasoned expert, you will accept issues that are escalated to them from various entry points. RequirementsMust have at least 2 years of experience administering, engineering, and debugging cisco voice solutions. A higher degree of understanding of modern cisco unified communications, cisco routing and switching, and cisco wireless.EducationNot specifiedClientThis company provides IT staffing solutions more than 25 yearsIf you are interested in this position, send your resume to apply@kochdavis.com Original Job Posting: http://www.kochdavis.com/cisco-voice-design-engineer /",Cisco Voice Design Engineer Job in Lynchburg,Full Time,"Lynchburg, VA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Cisco-Voice-Design-Engineer-Job-Lynchburg-VA-US-166683681.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=6,,,023608b7ad62ae818e6de77de96ee004
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:09:13:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Freelance Production Designer Opportunity !! Our client is looking for a stellar graphic designer who can create clean, beautiful, and restrained designs while properly representing the company's brand. The Production Designer will be responsible for addressing a wide range of creative needs within the company while maintaining a consistent brand across all touches. Mainly provide design extension on concepts from Art Directors, and designs and manages the implementation of a wide variety of marketing related collateral, including brochures, flyers, manuals, newsletters, and presentation materials. On occasion, may develop and create concepts and visual ideas for all forms of communication, advertising, and promotional materials. Position summary:This position assumes tasks that are moderately complex in nature. Works on a wide range of projects from new jobs with re-flowed copy to updates to existing pieces. May also implement designs or approaches developed by others under minimal supervision and general direction. Responsibilities:• Must be detail-oriented, self-motivated, team-centric, confident, and possess the ability to follow directions, ask questions, and strictly adhere to established processes.• Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Ensure work is consistent within company's brand, and supports marketing strategies.• Ensure execution of work meets creative needs. • Prioritizes and coordinates multiple projects independently.• Partners internally and with outside vendors.• Pre-flights files to prepare for release to vendor.• Expert knowledge of Adobe CC software including InDesign, Photoshop, Illustrator, and Acrobat DC. Marketo experience a plus. • Well-versed in all Microsoft Office 2013 programs such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook.• Typically requires a minimum of 2 to 4 years related agency, design firm, or internal creative group experience.• Must be comfortable on a PC platform  ",Production / Graphic Designer Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Francisco, CA 94120",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Graphic-Designer-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-166675747.aspx?mescoid=2700410001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,7362fe850c32299c1674267538880559
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:08:29:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"JAVA DEVELOPER – CONTRACT - HEATHROW, FLJava Developer Skills & Requirements:• 1+ year - Java• 1+ year - Rest services• 1+ year - EJB• 1+ year - JSF• 1+ year - JavaScript• 1+ year - Experience with multiple languages in addition to Java (Mobile, Angular, App server etc.)Pluses:• JBOSS – major plusFollow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://orlando.vereduscorp.com / Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. . Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Java Developer Job in Heathrow,Full Time,"Heathrow, FL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Java-Developer-Job-Heathrow-FL-US-154905106.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,30.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,d52e9899d62b3dc46d7423bce0cb1a69
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:08:28:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Proposal Writer / Coordinator  To support sales and proposal writers to develop timely, high-quality, and competitive marketing proposals. To format and design proposals and presentations. To use a keen eye for detail and skills in copy-editing, grammar, style, spelling, and punctuation throughout the proposal development effort. To read and analyze requests for proposal (RFPs) and requests for information (RFIs) and produce responses that meet customer specifications. To manage a database consisting of hundreds of records and content.Major Activities: Establishing consistency and providing administrative support during the proposal development process. Working closely with individuals across the company in developing winning proposal responses. Providing word-processing, desktop publishing, graphic design skills, and proofreading to produce proposals and presentations. Preparing the proposal work plan, coordinating assignments and collect and organizing proposal content. Producing cohesive, well-organized proposals and presentations that are focused and responsive to customer-defined requirements. Using organization skills to manage simultaneously occurring tasks. Using creative flair, expert knowledge of MS office, RFP software, and graphics to contribute to the production of high-caliber proposals. Managing Qvidian proposal system and database. Working in a flexible, fast-paced, high-pressure environment. Irregular hours to meet deadlines are required.Requirements:Bachelor’s degree in journalism, marketing communications, public relations, or comparable creative discipline, or equivalent work experience. Proficient in Microsoft OfficePrior experience with Qvidian proposal system preferredExcellent written and oral communications skillsHandles multiple tasks and deadline pressures well Strong interpersonal, organization, and creative skills are a must",Proposal Writer Job in Center City,"Full Time, Employee","Center City, PA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Proposal-Writer-Job-Center-City-PA-US-166763206.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,3191f27db088a1266c00f296b9afcfe0
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:07:28:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Chemical Operations Specialist, you'll be there and prepared whenever a community is flooded, an earthquake shakes the foundations of a city, a hurricane makes landfall, or an enemy uses biological or chemical warfare. You will know what to do to evacuate the area, control the situation, and solve the problem.In order to perform these functions, you will be trained to expertly handle nuclear, biological, and chemical (NBC) detection and decontamination equipment so you can assist in the application of NBC defense measures. You will also be asked to maintain disaster plans, operate and perform maintenance on smoke generating equipment, and coordinate with civilian personnel on what to do in an emergency. These are skills that are in demand by federal, state, and local governments, as well as civil defense agencies. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Chemical Operations Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend 19 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn defensive procedures for NBC warfare and preparation of emergency plans. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Chemical Operations Specialist Job in Miami  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Miami 33127,,http://jobview.monster.com/Chemical-Operations-Specialist-Job-MIAMI-166723871.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,13cc42cd1b9ffe86bd4d079b41c48e4e
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:07:06:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Lincoln  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Lincoln 68508,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-LINCOLN-166733466.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=20,,General/Other: Medical/Health,8e7ff1268db532bf5c87b82b7796f643
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:07:05:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"General CharacteristicsResponsible for Tier I software and hardware support. Diagnoses and resolves problems using documented procedures and checklists in the performance of most responsibilities. Enters call data into a tracking system. Escalates problems to higher level technical support professionals when necessary. Assists in the resolution of application, hardware and software problems. DimensionsEducation:    Associate’s or Bachelor’s Degree, or technical institute degree/certificate in Computer Science, Information Systems, or other related field. Or equivalent work experience.Experience: Typically has 1 to 2 years of IT work experience in computer systems or support with demonstrated working knowledge of basic hardware and software products and problem solving/troubleshooting skills.Active Directory and/or Comptia A+ is desiredComplexity: Learner/entry level role. Provides Tier 1 support of low to medium complexity. Functions, somewhat independently, under general direction of more senior customer service representatives, supervisors or managers. Generally follows documented procedures and checklists.US Citizenship required If interested; forward a resume in word document format along with hourly salary requirement to mawesley@motentate.com.  ",IT Customer Support Technician Job in Tampa,Full Time,"Tampa, FL 33601",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Customer-Support-Technician-Job-Tampa-FL-US-166273506.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),923b558878def006a14a43fc6b406d85
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:06:42:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"CyberData Technologies, Inc., an established technology solution provider based in Herndon, Virginia, is looking to expand its growing team. We are an industry leader in delivering enterprise class solutions for our federal clients.CyberData ranked 30th Fastest Growing Federal Contractors in Washington Technology 2008 Fast 50, and is an Inc. 500 company.  Our employees are our greatest asset and we are committed to their professional development and growth. We provide competitive salaries, bonuses, generous benefit packages, and paid time off to balance work and personal commitments. Job Location: Bethesda, MD  Job Duties (include but not limited to):Successful candidate must have great written and verbal communication skills. The functions that will be performed include:·         Partner with customer’s technical staff and leadership to identify and define scope, objectives and requirements·         Conduct business analysis to identify business needs, issues and / or gaps·         Partner with customer leadership and technical staff to develop and document business deliverables for new / enhanced capabilities including software development lifecycle (SDLC) and architecture and capability plan areas·         Participate in technology solutioning and development process by providing requirements documentation, SOP, subject matter expertise, and design input·         Ensure timely and effective execution of all deliverables·         Perform other dues as assigned by managementJob Requirements (include but not limited to):·         Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent work experience·         3+ years of experience in writing of which at least 2 years in technical writing (SOP experience is a strong plus)·         2+ years of business analysis experience·         Intermediate level of proficiency with PC based software programs (Word, Excel, Visio, PowerPoint, etc.)·         1+ years of experience gathering requirements from the client / business and providing clear documentation·         1+ years of experience in working with SDLC methodology. EPLC a strong plus. ·         1+ years of experience work with project methodology (requirements, design, development, test and implementation)Please submit your resume in Word format with salary requirement to career@cyberdatainc.com. Principals only: NO 3rd PARTY, no employment agencies. No telephone calls please. CyberData is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.                         CyberData Technologies, Inc.career@cyberdatainc.comCyberData TechnologiesWeb: http://www.cyberdatainc.com",Business Analyst Job in Bethesda,Full Time,"Bethesda, MD 20892",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Business-Analyst-Job-Bethesda-MD-US-166653819.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7ace84f7575b9d0828c4c87a6d8938f3
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:06:42:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Kent  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Kent 98032,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-KENT-166742201.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=20,,General/Other: Medical/Health,da343be6d08590e433b5ab51a866b016
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:06:07:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hillside Children’s Center has openings for Skillbuilders in Batavia, NY.  ·         Part Time - 25 hours - Afternoon/Evening hours. Required Team Meetings on Monday. Will be required to be on call after 120 day provisional period is over.·         Relief/Per Diem hours – will be called on an as needed basis The Skill Builder I performs functions that assist in the care and treatment of children/youth and families and assisting children/youth to develop life and social skills in a community based setting and in establishing a safe physical and emotional environment for children/youth and families in care. The Skill Builder I recognizes differentiating youth/families behaviors, participates within designated treatment teams to develop service and behavior management plans, and executes such plans aimed at assisting youth/families to achieve their personal goals and objectives. Candidates must have the ability to engage youth/families in trust-based relationships, have well developed skills as an advocate for youth/families and be an effective communicator (written and verbal).Required: High School Diploma/GED and 1-2 years of relevant experience working with youth or at least a Bachelor's degree if no prior experience.  Preferred: Bachelor’s degree with 1-2 years of relevant experience working with youth. Candidates must have the ability to engage youth/families in trust-based relationships, have well developed skills as an advocate for youth/families and be an effective communicator (written and verbal).Valid NY State Driver's License required.  Candidates must meet agency driving and insurance standards.",Life Skills Counselor Job in Batavia,Part Time Employee,"Batavia, NY 14020",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Life-Skills-Counselor-Job-Batavia-NY-US-164728435.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,4c58f446a733774860a4d74a3a2fe69f
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:06:06:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Physical Therapist Assistant, you will:Provide therapy services planned, delegated and supervised by the qualified Physical Therapist consistent with the patient's approved Plan of Treatment.Observe patients during treatment, compiles data and report patient's progress to Physical Therapist.Act as a liaison and maintains contact with patients, Physical Therapist, Clinical Manager(s), other members of the healthcare team and the community in assuring effective care coordination and appropriate resource referrals.Recommend to Physical Therapist possible modification to existing physical therapy treatment plans and training needs to achieve maximum results.Maintain and submit documents as required by the Company and/or facility.Accurately and thoroughly document patient care observations, interventions and evaluation on the day services are rendered.  Assist qualified Therapist with preparation of patient progress notes.Participate in Performance Improvement activities as assigned.  Communicate information that enable collection and root cause analysis of data to identify opportunities for improvement.Maintain the highest standards of professional conduct in relation to information that is confidential in nature.  Share information only when recipient's right to access is clearly established and sharing of such information is in the best interest of the patient.Maintain/enhance clinical practice skills by attending, participating in/conducting staff development/continuing education program.Required SkillsQualifications Degree from an accredited Physical Therapist Assistant Program (approved by the APTA) A minimum of six months physical therapist assistant experience preferred Home Health experience a plus Current and unrestricted PTA licensure Current CPR certification Good organizational and communication skillsRequired ExperienceKeywords: Acute care, ADL, ADLs, ALF, Balance dysfunction, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, clinical rotation, geriatric, geriatrics, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, inpatient, inpatient PTA, inpatient P.T.A., inpatient physical therapist assistant, inpatient physical therapy assistant, inpatient therapist, licensed therapist, licensed PTA, licensed P.T.A., licensed physical therapist assistant, licensed physical therapy assistant, modalities, neuro, neurological, ortho, ortho PTA, ortho P.T.A., ortho therapist, ortho physical therapist assistant, ortho physical therapy assistant, orthopedics, orthopedic, orthopedic PTA, orthopedic P.T.A., orthopedic physical therapist assistant, orthopedic physical therapy assistant, outpatient clinic, PTA, P.T.A., physical therapist assistant, physical therapy, physical therapy assistant, medical, medical care, therapist, therapy Care Manager, therapy case manager, therapy case management, therapy Job, therapy Jobs, PTA job, PTA jobs, P.T.A. job, P.T.A. jobs, physical therapy assistant job, physical therapy assistant jobs, physical therapist assistant job, physical therapist assistant jobs, Oasis, outpatient, out patient, outpatient rehab, outpatient PTA, outpatient P.T.A, outpatient physical therapy assistant, outpatient physical therapist assistant, PRN, PDM, rehab, rehab PTA, rehab P.T.A., rehab physical therapist assistant, rehab physical therapy assistant, rehab setting, rehabilitative, therapeutic, safe strides, safe strides PTA, safe strides P.T.A., safe strides physical therapist assistant, skilled visit, SNF, subacute, sub acute, post acute, therapy, travel PTA, travel P.T.A., travel therapist, travel physical therapist, traveling PTA, traveling P.T.A., traveling physical therapist assistant, traveling physical therapy assistant ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVAJob LocationBirmingham, Alabama, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Home Health Physical Therapist Assistant Job in Birmingham,,"Birmingham, AL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Home-Health-Physical-Therapist-Assistant-Job-Birmingham-AL-US-166746301.aspx?mescoid=3100552001001&jobPosition=9,,,68c2e134d8f3b3f0e744bd090a774fa0
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:05:54:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:SkyePoint Decisions, Inc. is seeking a highly motivated team player to fill the role of Subject Matter Expert III – IA, Governance, Risk & Compliance. This position will work closely amongst other security professionals supporting a local government agency.Responsibilities:Demonstrate comprehensive, in-depth experience in risk advisory services with a focus in information security, cybersecurity and information technology risk management and compliance including:Vulnerability Assessment and ManagementSecurity Strategy Assessment and ManagementInfrastructure & Operations Security and Risk ManagementPrivacy & Data ProtectionUse and compliance with frameworks and regulations such as FISMA, NIST (800-53, cybersecurity), ISO, ITIL, OWASP, PCI, GLBA, HIPAA, CobIT, and other data privacy and security standards and regulationsPenetration TestingIdentify and mitigate risks throughout the scheduleCoordinate the day-to-day activities required to deliver all projects on timeHost regular project meetings and deliver crisp status updates to all stakeholdersManage external dependencies and logisticsWork with senior technical leads, and client counterparts to develop technical innovation strategy for the programAssist the Program Manger with preparation of status reports and briefingsActively participate in client discussions, meetings, and business development opportunitiesPerform other tasks consistent with the goals and objectives of the department/contractPerform other duties as assigned by the Program ManagerQualifications:Active Secret clearance at minimum.10+ years of working experience in security related fieldKnowledge and experience with NIST Risk Management FrameworkPMP, CISSP, CISA, SANS, or other relevant certificationExperience and Competency with:CSAM (or similar tool i.e. TAF, Archer, Xacta, etc.)Security Authorization and Assessment (SA&A)Privacy Risk Assessment (PRA) Agency’s processesFirewallsEnterprise anti-virus managementStrong understanding and demonstrated experience applying a risk-based approach to information security and IT assessmentsDBProtectWebInspectTenable Security CenterParticipation in the CCB, TRB, and SAR Board, review change requests, and support engineering activities for projectsAbility to work in a fast-paced, demanding environmentExcellent organizational skills and strong attention to detailAbility to prioritize duties based on shifting demandsStrong analytical and problem-solving skillsExcellent verbal and written communication skillsPreferred:College degree in Information Security or relevant fieldSkyePoint Decisions is an established ISO 9000:2008 certified small business headquartered in Dulles, Virginia, with local offices across the Washington, DC, metropolitan area. SkyePoint Decisions has grown into a successful federal contractor by combining industry best practices with innovative solutions that consistently meet or exceed customer requirements. We understand and integrate our customer’s technology and mission requirements to successfully deliver high quality, cost effective services on time and on budget. SkyePoint Decisions empowers a secure dynamic workforce to complete any mission -- anytime, anywhere. It’s what we call Agency Anywhere®. SkyePoint Decisions delivers Agency Anywhere® by tightly integrating our technical competencies (cybersecurity, cloud services, remote access, collaboration, system & network optimization, device management and more) to provide our customer’s operating environments with the security, flexibility, availability, and operational continuity required to enable today’s on-the-go federal workforce to successfully and securely complete any mission – anytime, anywhere. SkyePoint Decisions is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",Information Assurance Subject Matter Expert III Job in Crystal City,"Full Time, Employee","Crystal City, VA 22202",,http://jobview.monster.com/Information-Assurance-Subject-Matter-Expert-III-Job-Crystal-City-VA-US-166403529.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,af31521c473831aa7e04b5a184ab9958
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:05:53:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"ESSENTIALJOB FUNCTIONS:· Gatheringtechnical requirements to ensure project success· Createdocumentation of the physical and logical design· Createimplementation and testing plans· Whenever possibleautomate processes and implementations· Train staff toimplement and administer solutions· Provide Tier 3Support when needed· Work within ateam environment · Responsibilitiessometimes require working evenings, weekends and holidays, sometimes withlittle advanced notice KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:· Thoroughlyfamiliar with administering Linux and Microsoft Operating Systems· Skilled inworking with AWS EC2 and/or Azure VM via API/Command Line· Hands-onexperience in VMware ESXi configuration and administration· Proficient in creatingscripts to automate process using one or more of the following: powershell,perl, python, php, bash· Skilled inproviding user instructions with various media including presentations, videotrainings, and documentation· Hands-on experiencemoving workloads into the cloud· Solidunderstanding of system monitoring approaches, logging concepts, data miningand regular expressions· Thoroughlyfamiliar with the OSI Model and TCP/IP networking fundamentals· Proven skillsowning a project and overseeing it to completion including the documentation,implementation and testing of the solution· Highly committedto cloud capacity reporting and analysis· Excellentcommunication skills EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE: Certifications in any of the following MCSE Private Cloud AWS DevOps Engineer AWS Certified Solutions Architect VMware Certified Professional VCP-Cloud VMware Certified Design Expert VCDX-Cloud · 5 years'experience working with Linux and Microsoft Environments· Expertise withscripting languages is required· Experienceworking in an enterprise server environment· Experienceconverting workloads from legacy environments to cloud",System Engineer Job in Plantation,Full Time,"Plantation, FL 33388",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/System-Engineer-Job-Plantation-FL-US-166626166.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=15,,IT/Software Development,198ce880caac2ca50924bfd8cb0dfdca
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:05:34:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in North Little Rock  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,North Little Rock 72114,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-NORTH-LITTLE-ROCK-166721697.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=1,,General/Other: Medical/Health,2f326fdf04ecd8ae76eaa88059e86e40
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:05:30:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Head of Continuous Manufacturing Process Development Group-POS_00470885-0001JCDescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families.Genzyme Corporation (a Sanofi company) and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.Job Responsibilities/Department Description:Biopharmaceutics Development at Sanofi develops and implements manufacturing processes for biologics starting with an early and strong interface with Biologics Research. It encompasses cell line development, GMP cell banking, upstream- downstream and formulation development, assay development, manufacturing drug substance and drug product for toxicological and clinical studies, releaseand stability testing (QC). Biopharmaceutics development drives identification, development & introduction of new state-of-the-art technologies, and provides launch capable processes and analytical methods at the interface to biologics manufacturing.Seeking a highly motivated and innovative individual to lead a process development group focused on continuous manufacturing, within the Biopharmaceutics Development department. This position reports to the site head of the Biopharmaceutics Development group in Framingham. The main focus of the group is to develop and implement cutting edge continuous manufacturing solutions for a variety of biological candidates. Technology development is the primary focus of this group, with some support provided to projects. The role involves significant cross functional collaboration with other functions, including Research and Development, Manufacturing, Regulatory and Quality, to ensure platforms have a strong regulatory and technical foundation as well as being robust and well-controlled. The role will have global impact through collaborations across various groups within the organization.QualificationsBasic Qualifications:· Ph.D. in Chemical or Biochemical Engineering, Chemistry or Life Sciences with12 years biopharmaceutical industrial experiencePreferred Qualifications: Experience with continuous manufacturing platformsDemonstrated technical proficiency, scientific creativity, and innovation individually and in collaboration with others. Demonstrated understanding of biopharmaceutical process development, scale-up and validationExperience with clinical and commercial drug substance manufacturingMammalian cell culture, purification and assay development and analytical characterization experienceProcess validation, including process characterization studies, and process performance qualification Understands the importance/relevance of various health authority requirementsExcellent problem solver and ability to think creatively Ability to evaluate new technologies Excellent communication skills and ability to influence across the organization Ability to set ambitious targets and successfully drive resultsHighly flexible, works well in a team environment, and has the skills necessary to organize, communicate and influence, with an unquestionable level of integrity.Demonstrated proficiency in oral and written communication and an innovative problem solver #LI-GZJob:Laboratory/Process/Device DevelopmentPrimary Location:United States-Massachusetts-FraminghamJob Posting:Feb 24, 2016, 12:00:00 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Head of Continuous Manufacturing Process Development Group Job in Framingham,,"Framingham, MA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Head-of-Continuous-Manufacturing-Process-Development-Group-Job-Framingham-MA-US-166670769.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,b7bfcd4507accdb63df2ba7d2693331b
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:04:27:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Seymour  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Seymour 47274,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-SEYMOUR-166727041.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=15,,General/Other: Medical/Health,1c21e59fd0d1b280306c3d52cad4bc81
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:04:25:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Apply now. Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Bilingual Spanish Required Retail Sales Consultant Queens West HIT Job in Astoria,,"Astoria, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Bilingual-Spanish-Required-Retail-Sales-Consultant-Queens-West-HIT-Job-ASTORIA-NY-US-166659271.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=16,,,bf517c3343dc727831a9cef19b2af0bc
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:03:21:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Project ManagerWe have an exciting opportunity in Minneapolis with our household name, Fortune 500 client. We are seeking a Project Manager that has experience managing enterprise software development projects. In this role, you will be responsible for project definition, scope, and overall delivery of a multi-million dollar project focused on a high availability, global reservation system.  This is a highly visible project and multi-million dollar initiative that will interact multiple groups within the organization and ultimately generates hundreds of millions in revenue for this organization.  You will be working with teams of Business Analysts, Developers, third party vendors, and onshore and offshore resources to manage these projects from inception to completion.  While software development is the primary focus of this role, you will also be working on some smaller work streams that are infrastructure related.  That said, candidates with a mixed background in both will certainly be considered!   Requirements/Responsibilities:        Extensive experience within cross matrixed projects/environmentsMust have experience managing multi million dollar budgets (preferably over $3mm) Develop integrated baseline project plans applying estimating models, identify resources and skills required, document estimating assumptions, refine plans and manage performance against them Business acumen as well as ability to communicate effectively with technical teams, project sponsors/stakeholders, and other lines of business.Collaborate with project team members, stakeholders, customers, and sponsors to identify and monitor budget, goals, scope, project plan, issues, risks, and milestones; establishes measures to determine success of projects (e.g., costs, scope, time, intended results).Experience with MS Project, Primavera, Clarity, or similar Project Management toolsExperience reviving existing projects or managing enterprise projects from inception to completionPMP desiredFor immediate consideration, email your MS Word resume to brendon.helms@principlesolutions.com. If you’re a confidential candidate – please visit and apply through www.linkedin.com/in/bmh34 Related Terms: Senior Project Manager, PMP, PMI, MS Project, Project Server, Million, $, Program Manager, Delivery, Budget, risk, SDLC, Infrastructure, Software Development, Application development, server, hardware, web application, systems development, vendor, vendor management ",Senior Project Manager Job in Eagan,Full Time,"Eagan, MN 55121","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Project-Manager-Job-Eagan-MN-US-166745469.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,"70.00 - 80.00 $ /yearFull benefits, 401k with company match.",Experienced (Non-Manager),ca43e26b5d04c3c428172f8dbed915cd
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:03:20:43,No,jobs.monster.com,".pageborder{border-right-width: 3px;border-left-width: 1px;border-top-width: 1px;border-bottom-width: 3px;border-right-style: solid;border-left-style: solid;border-top-style: solid;border-bottom-style: solid;border-right-color: #000000;border-left-color: #000000;border-bottom-color: #000000;border-top-color: #000000;background-color: #FFFFFF;}.bulletlh {line-height:1.2em;} Associate Account Executive The Cambridge Don The Cambridge Don is a research organization that specializes in helping Clients improve productivity. One of the services that we offer our Clients is to advertise the open positions that they are interested in filling.One of these job opportunities is listed below.If this position is of interest to you, please use the link provided in the ad to apply. The link will take you to the job application form. Serving nearly 2.5 million people in southeastern Pennsylvania, our client is the leading health insurance company in the Philadelphia region, and is expanding across the country. It's mission is to build healthier lives for you, your family, and your employees shapes our actions and decisions every day.Key responsibilities:•  Assists Account Executive and Management in the management of external customer relationships•  Assists Account Executive in the development and execution of sales strategy for each group customer or prospect•  Participates in sales meetings, presentations and site visits to cultivate account relationships.•  Works with Account Executive to ensure that all sales and account related issues are addressed. Communicates status, issues, risk, exposure and recommendations to same on a timely basis. •  Builds effective relationships with brokers, consultants and group leaders which maximize sales opportunities•  Responsible for strategic and consultative presentations of AHA/IA (AmeriHealth Administrators / Independence Administrators) products to customers and prospects. •  Provides professional presentations and/or open enrollments (where applicable) to a variety of audiences•  Works collaboratively with Management and Account Executive to understand and meet all strategic initiatives and goals within the segment•  Develops high level of expertise with the Marketing competencies to ensure they are modeling the ideal behaviors and skills.•  Works with Account Executive to understand and effectively communicate rating alternatives and funding arrangements•  Actively demonstrates comprehensive understanding of AHA/IA products, the competitive environment and the industry.•  Responsible for on-going account management, including renewals, settlements, proposals, benefit exceptions and customer reporting.•  Identifies trends, actively seeks to work for resolution of customer issues.•  Performs other duties and special projects as assigned.Skills•  Strong strategic and analytical skills•  Strong presentation skills•  Excellent ability to build relationships, both internal and external to an organization•  Able to work collaboratively with functional areas within segment•  Self-motivated and goal oriented•  Flexibility in a variety of settings and ability to work under pressure•  Able to work independently with drive to excelAn undergraduate degree in Business, Marketing/a related field, or equivalent experience is required.  A minimum of two years work experience, preferably in sales or marketing or fast paced environment where building relationships/repeat customers is essential.  Excellent oral and written communication skills required. Must have the ability to develop and facilitate presentations. Demonstrated ability to function in a high-volume, highly visible, deadline-oriented environment is essential. Comprehensive knowledge of IBC Family of Companies products and services a plus. Health insurance experience preferred. Demonstrated experience with the MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint).  Demonstrate technical aptitude to learn other systems proprietary systems.State Health, Life, and Workers Compensation (where applicable) License required.  If not available upon date of hire, individual must pass examinations within the first 90 days of employment. Valid driver’s license and a reliable car for extensive visits to account/broker locations required.Our Client is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, or disability.  Click Here to Apply $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Associate Account Executive AA-- Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Account-Executive-AA2205-145-24-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-166686132.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4e18669c69071dab5a97bab832a20065
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:03:20:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Monroe  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Monroe 71203,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-MONROE-166728439.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=11,,General/Other: Medical/Health,283b3dbd6236c9d3a3c65c23222fd319
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:03:11:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENERAL PURPOSE OF JOB: Implement the formal process of early assessment of patients calling or arriving at CCBH to ensure that they receive appropriate attention, in a suitable location, with the requisite degree of urgency. Make appropriate referrals to CCBH programming or other suitable treatment interventions to best meet their needs. Provide quality and timely crisis intervention, referral and assessment services to all patient populations. To deliver quality patient care to adult, adolescent and geriatric patients who may need psychiatric, or chemical dependency related treatment. SUMMARY OF JOB DUTIES ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: • Uses nursing knowledge to conduct appropriate assessments. • Makes proper diagnoses and interventions with patients. • Ability to develop therapeutic relationships with patients and families. • Prepare and maintain appropriate medical documentation. • Utilize and apply current DSM nomenclature. • Maintain patient confidentially in accordance with HIPAA regulations and hospital policy. • Knowledge of the treatment continuum of care for mental health patients. • Familiar with clinical terminology and patient rights pertaining to mental health. • Able to effectively manage crisis situations while maintain personal and emotional composure. • Attends Mandatory Training. • Assists patients who are prone to fall when walking or sitting. • Participate in restraint and seclusion of patients when required. • Push patients in wheelchairs when required. • Administers patient medications prescribed by physician. • Maintains a safe, orderly, and therapeutic physical environment for patients. • Maintains desirable pattern of attendance, punctuality, and productivity. • Supports facility service excellence standards. • Complies with facility safety, infection control and security program. • Collect and analyze patient data • Develop and attain assessment department goals and objectives • Orient new patients to Unit program and milieu. • Train and orient new staff. • Carry out general nursing care assistance, appropriate to the patient population as assigned. • Carry out clerical and administrative assignment to support patient care and department and organization operations. • Participates in activities which enhance development of professional knowledge and skills. • Demonstrates conduct in keeping with CCBH’s ethical standards. Fulltime, Part-time and PRN openings are available for First, Second, Third and Weekend shifts. QUALIFICATIONS AT ENTRY: Must possess current RN license in the stateof practice. Must demonstrate sound leadership skill and utilizethese skills in organizing the activities and schedules for medicaland/or non-medical tasks of the patient population for a given shift.Must have a record of consistently high quality of clinical andinterpersonal skills to be an exemplary role model to others.Displays basic knowledge of treatment procedures; displays knowledgeof interventions common to acute psychotic as well as to non-violentcrisis intervention practice; basic knowledge of abnormal psychologyand application of this knowledge through the provision of nursingcare; basic knowledge of medical terminology especially those termsassociated with the treatment of psychiatric and addictive diseasecare; thorough familiarity of psycho-pharmacy and the use ofpsychotropic medications as a part of the treatment of psychiatricand addictive disease care; basic teaching and training skills; skillin facilitating or co-facilitation psycho-educational groups,eligible for CPR certification; ability to establish and maintaineffective working relationships with peers; flexibility regardingschedule and work assignment; willingness to maintain allmedical/treatment as highly confidential. Oral and writtencommunication skills are required. Ability to utilize interpersonalskills to overcome denial and resistance to treatment. Basic computerskills are required. Able to work independently and also workcooperatively in a team environment.Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=186331&site_id=35",RN Triage FT,"Full Time, Employee","Greer, SC 29650",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Triage-FT-PT-PRN-in-INTAKE-Job-GREER-SC-US-166647354.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,ce7dc8ed2563e0baac661b0dc8c538df
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:03:07:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Washington  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Washington 20003,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-WASHINGTON-166723372.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=10,,General/Other: Medical/Health,e39400b0da892e592e94f44f863da802
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:03:07:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client in the Greater Boston, Massachusetts (MA) area is currently searching for a Senior Business Analyst to join their team. Tasks & Responsibilities: Work as a liaison between key business stakeholders and the different development teams Work with the business stakeholders to understand their business needs, and work with development teams to implement solutions that meet these needs, goals and objectives Work on multiple projects/sub-projects as a project team leader Provide functional and technical expertise and direction for the development of complex enterprise-wide solutions Coach teams to ensure project remains focused on the solution scope Identify how to assess the progress of the work across all components Oversee and consult on system and integration testing activities to ensure the system is developed according to the defined requirements and specifications Oversee user acceptance testing and obtain sign off from business customers* Unit testing and integration testing of all solution modules Root cause identification; problem definition. Troubleshoot issues; recognize and resolve system related problems Work independently and make necessary decisions throughout the systems process within guidelines Perform multiple tasks concurrently and respond to emergency situations* Communicate technical and complex information both orally and in writing Documentation: Develop functional and technical specifications, installation procedures, system administration and maintenance procedures, training to business usersREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree required in a Computer-Related Discipline, Mathematics or Engineering Good working knowledge of SQL Expert in SDLC Activities and Methodologies Solid foundation in Project Management MethodologiesBusiness Analyst Skills: Ability to comprehend the desired functionality from the end user perspective and the underlying technical design; and develop / test accordingly Anticipate customer's expectations and meet or exceed these expectationsExcellent Communication Skills: Ability to communicate effectively with several individuals (20+) and sub-teams (5+); including business as well as technical project team members Proficient in making abstract concepts, issues and information clear and understandable to a wide variety of audiences through a variety of communication formats Able to span from big picture to detail Capable of influencing without authority Flexibility and adaptability to change and ambiguous situations Manage time effectively; balancing multiple priorities Display a strong sense of urgency Take initiative and act without waiting for direction Analytical thinking skills; ability to break down and solve complex problems Exposure to a range of technologies and tools Energetic, enthusiastic, willing to learn attitude A wide degree of creativity and latitude is expectedH1B Candidates are encouraged to apply and Green Card process started after 6 months",Business Analyst Job in Chicago,"Full Time, Employee","Chicago, IL 60290",,http://jobview.monster.com/Business-Analyst-Job-Chicago-IL-US-166749914.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),315a51da906cde62548e1d0c46c7f4f1
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:03:05:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pulmonary Management is looking for dependable, caring, licensed respiratory therapists to work at one of our long term nursing facilities in Shelbyville, Indiana. Full Time/PT 12 hour shifts and weekend option are available. Interested parties should fax resume to 317-849-6351 attention Pat. You may also email your resume to: ljohnson@pulmonarymanagement.com.",Respiratory Therapist Job in Shelbyville,Full Time,"Shelbyville, IN 46176",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Respiratory-Therapist-Job-Shelbyville-IN-US-166668797.aspx?mescoid=2900493001001&jobPosition=14,,,07bff9f39f0393509387d45b25b8b383
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:02:37:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department.Job Requirements Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. Current Texas State RN license. CPR (American Heart Association) ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. One-year experience in surgical services nursing preferred. Able to assess, plan, implement and evaluate nursing care.",Registered Nurse - Surgical Services Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Surgical-Services-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644152.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,3206b869e9fb530e90e4d8805a1dcb18
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:02:36:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Penn Medicine is dedicated to our tripartite mission of providing the highest level of care to patients, conducting innovative research, and educating future leaders in the field of medicine. Working for this leading academic medical center means collaboration with top clinical, technical and business professionals across all disciplines.Today at Penn Medicine, someone will make a breakthrough. Someone will heal a heart, deliver hopeful news, and give comfort and reassurance. Our employees shape our future each day. Are you living your life's work? Position Description The Corporate Materials Management Department is responsible for over $400M in annual supply purchases and services encompassing all entities of the Health System. Information Services (IS) annual support agreements exceed $40M annually. The Information Services portfolio of contracts and capital acquisitions is one of the largest within the Health System and it continues to increase with the continued integration of Healthcare IT. The Contract Manager will need to have an extensive knowledge and background in vendor negotiations, contract law, data analysis, contract development and project management/implementation for Information Services technology and support services. Incumbent must have demonstrated value analysis, expense reduction and customer service skills to operate within a complex and multi-facility purchasing environment. Ability to work independently at times and assume responsibility for and direct the work of others. A highly organized individual is needed who can handle multiple complex projects with aggressive deadlines and prioritize workloads on an on-going basis. Will have responsibility for Corporate Information Services, including Radiology Information Services. Minimum Requirements Minimum Degree Requirements and Experience Required: •  Minimum of a Bachelor’s Degree in Health Policy, Administration, Finance, or Accounting.•  Minimum of five years support services experience in Purchasing/Materials Management in a complex integrated delivery network, academic medical center.•  Previous management and/or supervisory skills required. Candidate should have strong leadership skills, and be able to define and resolve critical issues•  Minimum of two years contract negotiating experience in healthcare required.•  Strong written and verbal communication skills are required.•  Ability to manage and execute projects timely, efficiently and cost-effectively.•  Previous experience contracting for Information Services products, services, and support preferred  Skill Requirements:• Demonstrated ability in using PC’s and Microsoft Office Suite.• Demonstrated experience in use of material management information systems (e.g. Lawson or PeopleSoft).• Working knowledge of medical terminology and/or products in assigned commodity areas is desirable.• Demonstrated experience and savings in the value analysis/cost containment principle and process.Minimum Certifications, Registry and/or Licenses Required:• Purchasing/Professional certification preferred Additional Information We believe that the best care for our patients starts with the best care for our employees. Our employee benefits programs help our employees get healthy and stay healthy. We offer a comprehensive compensation and benefits program that includes one of the finest prepaid tuition assistance programs in the region. Penn Medicine employees are actively engaged and committed to our mission. Together we will continue to make medical advances that help people live longer, healthier lives.  Penn Medicinehttp://www.pennmedicine.org/careers/Live Your Life's WorkAA/EOE, M/F/D/VMWW#LI-CE1 We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Contract Manager,"Full Time , Employee","Philadelphia, PA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Contract-Manager-Information-Services-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-166738393.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,5c620d23c9add7dec72cdccd63e130c6
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:02:07:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Responsibilities   Nursing Process   1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families.  Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members.     a.       Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents.     b.      Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately.     c.      Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain.2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices.  Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures.  Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals.     a.      Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems.     b.      Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs.     c.      Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure.      d.      Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization.     e.      Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements.     f.       Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements.3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments.  Performs timely re-assessment and documentation:    a.      Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed.    b.      Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge.    c.      Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.Patient Throughput/ Patient Flow Process   1. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow.    a.      Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change.    b.      Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed.    c.      Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs.    d.      Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration.    e.       Expedites admission/discharges/transfers.    f.       Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care.   Unit Operations   1. Demonstrates good stewardship in proper use and maintenance of equipment and supplies.    a.       Coordinates the selection of supplies and equipment in a cost effective manner.    b.       Charges for supplies/procedures appropriately.    c.       Ensures availability and organization of supplies and equipment for patient care.    d.       Performs and documents emergency equipment checks as assigned.    e.       Removes and returns discontinued supplies and equipment.    f.        Removes broken equipment from area immediately and initiates a work order.    g.       Ensures and documents that all alarms (patient and equipment) are functional.   Safe Practice/ Quality Care/ Regulations   1. Incorporates patient safety practices/guidelines to promote a safe environment resulting in positive patient outcomes.    a.      Demonstrates accountability for nursing research and quality improvement Activities.    b.      Demonstrates knowledge and skill in administering medications.2. Completes medication reconciliation upon admission, transfer, and discharge.3. Reviews physician's orders for clarity and accuracy, legibility & appropriate authenticity (name, title, date, time, etc.).4. Follows the restrictions on abbreviations and does not use abbreviations on the ""Do Not List"". Uses only approved abbreviations.5. Transcribes telephone orders per policy.6. Administers, documents, and evaluates medications according to policy and procedure.7. Instructs patient on medication including: expected effects, side effects, and possible food or medication interactions and documents instructions.8. Recognizes, reports, and documents medication errors and adverse drug reactions.    a.      Uses patient identifiers as defined by policy.    b.      Communicate patient information effectively across the continuum of care.9. Uses an approved hand-off communication format consistently.10. Follows the universal protocol, e.g. time out.11. Uses SBAR to communicate changes in patient condition.12. Follows the Chain of Command.13. Critical values are reported in a timely manner in accordance with policy.14. Sets clinical alarms according to equipment parameters and responds rapidly to the alarms.    a.       Initiates the Rapid Response team in response to deterioration in patient condition.    b.       Demonstrates safe patient handling practices.    c.       Promotes a safe patient care environment including compliance with restraint policy and rounding.    d.       Implements processes to prevent falls, pressure ulcers, and other hospital-acquired complications.    e.       Assures compliance with core measure implementation and documentation, e.g. SCIP, CHF, AMI, CAP.    f.       Identifies, corrects and/or reports patient safety and/or environmental safety hazards at the time of discovery.    g.       Demonstrates proper infection control and isolation techniques including providing appropriate information concerning isolation precautions and patient status to patient, family, and/or significant others and/or other disciplines.    h.       Adheres to CHRISTUS policies and procedures and the standards of the Joint Commission, OSHA, DHHS, HIPAA, etc.   Leadership   1. Serves as a leader of patient care.    a.       Guides and supervises other nursing staff in the operational activities in assigned area.    b.       Promptly recognizes and attempts to reinforce appropriate behavior and attempts to correct inappropriate behavior in self and co-workers.    c.       Delegates nursing and non-nursing functions according to standards.    d.       Participates in leadership activities including community activities, e.g. charge/team leader, council participation, preceptor/coach, unit education, staff/council meetings.    e.       Assumes responsibility for currency of knowledge and skills including participating in unit-level meetings and all mandatory education activities sponsored by the facility.    f.       Identifies and corrects inconsistencies in nursing procedures/techniques.    g.       Participates in implementing performance improvement and change activities.    h.       Assists in teaching and evaluating other personnel as assigned.    i.       Contributes to the learning experience of students and new employees.    j.       Acts as a resource person.    k.       Communicates the intensity of work load and collaborates with nursing leadership to meet patient care needs and unit activity.Job Requirements Qualifications    1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required.3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.Bachelor of Science in Nursing (BSN) preferred ""Working Conditionsand Physical Requirements""    1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area.  There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone.    Other    1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Intensive-Care-Unit-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644034.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,ebff7a100da64781db038ba46e7af072
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:01:57:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development. 1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families.  Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members. a.       Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents. b.      Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately. c.      Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain.2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices.  Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures.  Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals. a.      Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems. b.      Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs. c.      Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure.   d.      Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization. e.      Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements. f.       Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements.3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments.  Performs timely re-assessment and documentation: a.      Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed.  b.      Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge. c.      Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.4. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow. a.      Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change. b.      Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed. c.      Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs. d.      Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration. e.       Expedites admission/discharges/transfers. f.       Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care.Job Requirements 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS, ACLS and NRP certifications required.3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal. 5. Minimum 1 year of previous RN L&D experience.    ",RN,"Full Time, Employee","New Braunfels, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Labor-amp-Delivery-Job-New-Braunfels-TX-US-166644015.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,dc193deb56157eb98fcad74f2a950259
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:00:23:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"No prior psychiatric experience required.Benefits Include:  Heath insurance,pension fund available,401k tax-deferred retirement with employer contribution,37.5 hour work week, paid sick leave, paid vacation, 11 paid holidasy per year, 1 class per semester tuition paid All applicants must pass a drug screen and background check.  Apply online at: http://www.tn.gov/hr/topic/employment-opportunitiesFor further information contact:Linda DarbyPhone:  (423) 785-3339               “The state of Tennessee is an Equal Opportunity, Equal Access, and Affirmative Action Employer.”           “An Accredited Psychiatric Facility.” ",Registered Nurse  Job in Chattanooga,Full Time,"Chattanooga, TN 37405",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-2-Job-Chattanooga-TN-US-166705367.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=14,,,edcafafd8b7dcde8cb8e7889b5e3c593
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:00:22:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Superior  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Superior 54880,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-SUPERIOR-166742809.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=13,,General/Other: Medical/Health,0187d91a377408e5a1bbf81abb8976e1
United States of America,US,03/Dec/2015:00:01:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Chemical Operations Specialist, you'll be there and prepared whenever a community is flooded, an earthquake shakes the foundations of a city, a hurricane makes landfall, or an enemy uses biological or chemical warfare. You will know what to do to evacuate the area, control the situation, and solve the problem.In order to perform these functions, you will be trained to expertly handle nuclear, biological, and chemical (NBC) detection and decontamination equipment so you can assist in the application of NBC defense measures. You will also be asked to maintain disaster plans, operate and perform maintenance on smoke generating equipment, and coordinate with civilian personnel on what to do in an emergency. These are skills that are in demand by federal, state, and local governments, as well as civil defense agencies. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Chemical Operations Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend 19 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn defensive procedures for NBC warfare and preparation of emergency plans. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Chemical Operations Specialist Job in Starke  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Starke 32091,,http://jobview.monster.com/Chemical-Operations-Specialist-Job-STARKE-166724134.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,6c9382af9e80685ee849e1b81e753f4b
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Collections Analyst The successful candidate will take ownership in managing an accounts receivable portfolio of diversified customers. It is essential to build effective customer relationships and collaborate with internal and external business partners to maximize collections. This individual must embrace change and be willing to work as a change agent to continually improve the credit & collections process. Functions  Make collection calls to customers that are delinquent  Credit approvals on customers up to $35,000  Collections Analyst will be required to negotiate, effectively communicate judgment decisions, possess excellent interpersonal skills to build relationships  Responsible for effectively researching, tracking and resolving invoice discrepancies  Process credit card and EFT payments  Perform credit checks on clients Qualifications  B.S. or B.A in Business or Finance from an accredited college or university, will consider 2 year associate degree or equivalent business experience  PC literacy required, excellent written and oral communication skills  Strong problem solving capabilities  This individual must be able to work in a fast paced environment where the ability to prioritize is key and teamwork is a must  Must be proficient in Microsoft Word and Excel  Related work experiences with risk analysis and receivable collection a plus.  French speaking is a plus. See our website at www.ingersollrand.com To view the full job description and to apply online go to: http://careers.ingersollrand.com and search job number 1609225 Trane is an EEO/AA Employer",Collections Analyst Job in La Crosse,Full Time,"La Crosse, WI 54601",All,http://jobview.monster.com/collections-analyst-job-la-crosse-wi-us-176375209.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=19,,,29edd254e9ae055f3ebb3f26dbcad951
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Payable Job in Boston, MA Accounting Principals has partnered with a top AmLaw firm to help with an Accounts Payable Job in Boston, MA. They are looking for an individual to start immediately on a temporary basis reporting directly to the Accounting Manager. Applicants should be extremely open minded to direct hire opportunities within this capacity. Ideally, you will have 1-3 year’s experience and a bachelor’s degree is required. This is an excellent opportunity for someone who is looking to gain exposure to the Accounting field and provides opportunity for professional development.  Responsibilities:  Coordinating all incoming cash and posting receipts to the general ledgerAccounts payable vendor invoice entry and processingEntry of all client billable costs and batch finalizationAccount reconciliation Client collection callsCost entry and finalization of other general accounting functionsAdditional projects and tasks as assigned  Required:  Bachelor’s Degree (Accounting or Finance preferred)1-3  years of general accounting experience Ability to multi-task with a strong sense of urgencyHigh attention to detail Excellent written, verbal, and interpersonal communication skillsExperience with Elite preferredSuperior knowledge of  MS Office Suite ( Excel, Word, Power Point )  How to apply:  For immediate consideration, please submit your resume to Angelena.tentilucci@accountingprincipals.com AND apply directly to the Accounting Principals website.   ",Accounts Payable Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02111",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-job-in-boston-ma-job-boston-ma-us-175622578.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=3,16.00 - 23.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,400e0fccd205ba3b98847927351e3983
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Silver Lake 2015 Lake Heights Dr Everett, WA 98208-6034Job #: BSL157127Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Assist Manager with daily operations and supervision of dining services associates * Directly supervise and monitor servers to ensure quality of service and customer satisfaction * Plan daily menu for residents in accordance with company standards and procedures* Adhere to all safety and sanitation standards* Assist service staff during mealtime as neededRequired skills and qualifications:* High School diploma or GED * One to two years of relevant dining experience required* Current ServSafe certification required* Obtain/hold any local, state, and/or county required food handling licenses * Flexibility with schedule including evenings, weekends, and holidays* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Dining Services Supervisor Job in Everett,Full Time Employee,"Everett, WA 98208",Healthcare Services Restaurant/Food Services Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/dining-services-supervisor-job-everett-wa-us-175795088.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=11,,Food Services/Hospitality,a6f704b95e659eaa5c87e9fd401f6030
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionOverview: The Seasonal Line Cook’s primary responsibility is to prepare hot and cold food for customer’s consumption according to company and Health Department standards. Performs other duties as assigned. Essential Functions:Follows Food Division Standards and Best PracticesProduce and present cravable food products, cooked to order by following recipes to the letter or build sheets according to company standardsDemonstrate a current working knowledge of all recipes, and executing within time standardsPut away stock according to standardsFollow food safety standards and maintain work area and equipment in accordance with Health Department standardsEducate, sample, and serve customers food productsEffectively deal with multiple customers and communicate customer requests or concerns to other associates and manager on dutyDemonstrate MAGIC selling skillsFollow station specific duties and responsibilitiesOpen and close area following appropriate checklist, verifying completion with Manager on Duty prior to leaving the areaFollow production guides, maintain stock levels and standards in product presentationMaintain personal hygiene and professional dress code to comply with company and Health Department standardsAssist other associates to ensure all kitchen duties are completed and customer service standards are maintainedMaintain a safe work areaAssist with special eventsRegular, dependable attendance & punctuality Qualifications:Education/Experience: No specific educational accomplishment is necessary. One year of previous restaurant/hospitality experience is required. Health department license or certification and/or alcohol certification as required by state or local requirement. Per state law, a Food Handler's certificate may be required for all food service employees who prepare, store or serve food at restaurants, coffee bars or any other food service establishment. Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, reports, and procedure manuals. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to communicate in Spanish is preferred but not required.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to make change using American monetary units.Reasoning Ability: Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision. Must be able to follow instructions.Physical Demands: This position involves regular walking, standing, hearing and talking. May occasionally involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. Must be able to move and/or lift at least 30 lbs. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other skills: Must possess excellent customer service skills. Must be able to work effectively in a fast-paced environment.Work Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs.Working Conditions: This position is exposed to sharp objects such as knives and scissors. This position is also exposed to high levels of heat within an enclosed space. This position is required to use potentially hazardous equipment, such as grills and ovens. Reasonable accommodations have been made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential job functions. Work generally occurs in an office environment with moderate temperature and noise level. _______________________________________________________________________________________________________________Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy’s, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. foodsculinaryarts Primary Location:United States-Minnesota-MinnetonkaJob:Restaurant/Food Service - Back of House.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Lakeshore Grill Restaurant Line Cook** Part Time Macy's Ridgedale Center Job in Minnetonka,Full Time Employee,"Minnetonka, MN",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-lakeshore-grill-restaurant-line-cook-part-time-macy's-ridgedale-center-job-minnetonka-mn-us-175808949.aspx?mescoid=3500606001001&jobPosition=6,,Food Services/Hospitality,a0925a5e49c8e5c8586ebd9f862ed3ed
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Payable Specialist Job in San Diego, CA  Do you want to work for a company that thrives on empowerment and integrity? Accounting Principals has partnered with a wellness company that is located in Central San Diego, and they are searching for a like-minded individual to join the team. This company offers a start-up feel, but do not let that fool you because they are growing like crazy. They value each and every member of their team and do all they can to help them succeed. This is an extremely supportive and team oriented environment, and the energy is always upbeat and positive. This is a DIRECT HIRE opportunity, and the pay will be around $20 per hour, depending on experience. Responsibilities include: - Process up to 300 invoices weekly- Accurately enter and process a large amount of data- Ensure accurate coding of invoices- Maintain vendor relationships Qualifications:- At least one year of accounting experience- Proficient in Microsoft Excel- Ability to work in a team- Willingness to take on tasks- Excellent attention to detail  If you are interested in an Accounts Payable Specialist Job in San Diego, CA then please click “apply now” or e-mail your résumé to Nicolette.Miller@accountingprincipals.com  To view our other opportunities in the Greater San Diego area, please visit our website at www.accountingprincipals.com.  ;",Accounts Payable Specialist Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92122",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-specialist-job-in-san-diego-ca-job-san-diego-ca-us-176050902.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=15,0.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1c33f66b1f86afb1aa1ebe4e80160f7a
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Qualifications Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion.",Cook- Bennington College Job in Bennington,"Full Time, Employee","Bennington, VT 05201",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-bennington-college-job-bennington-vt-us-174844278.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,6129666597512728c0d27e3972d06dc8
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:21:05:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Administrative Assistant in Radnor, Pennsylvania (PA).Job Summary:A non for profit company is searching for an experienced assistant to support VP level executives. The ideal candidate provides technical support in formatting, design and document management, handling confidential information with discretion.REQUIREMENTS: Three to five years of experience in assistant executive level Exceptional proficiency of MS Office and Adobe Calendar Management experience Travel arrangement experience Excellent written, verbal and customer service skills required Team player Must have demonstrated experience in priority management, analytic, problem solving, and decision making skillsKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Administrative Assistant Job in Villanova,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Villanova, PA 19085",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-villanova-pa-us-176354901.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cdef4c0555f3732efba423620adc31b0
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:20:33:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Is It Time to Consider Something New?If you feel like you are moving too slowly along your career path and are inspired by the thought of helping people protect and enrich their lives, we can help you find your passion.With an average of 10,000 baby boomers reaching retirement age each day1, there has never been a better time to enter the financial services industry. Prudential is seeking professionals from a variety of backgrounds who are ambitious, people-oriented individuals with a desire to make a difference and own their own future. Overall Duties and Responsibilities ·Develop and implement sales and marketing plans·Prospect potential clients and discuss insurance and financial services·Build and execute strategies to help clients accumulate, preserve, and transfer their assets TrainingAt Prudential, you will receive coaching and mentoring from experienced managers to help you build a client network during a paid training program.Prudential provides individualized classroom training, as well as web-based learning resources that begin at the time of hire and provide continued development as you build your career. You will have the opportunity to work with dynamic teams to develop innovative solutions that address the diverse needs of clients.Compensation and BenefitsWe offer competitive compensation and generous work performance-based bonuses. This is an opportunity for you to potentially achieve a six-figure incomeNext StepsIf you are looking for a career with high earning potential – and are up for a new challenge – click “Apply” to connect with our management team. 1 Source: The Baby Boom Cohort  in the US:2012-2060,  accessed 2/27/2015,  *Candidates cannot be currently registered with another broker-dealer.  Securities products and services are offered through Pruco Securities, LLC.  Each is a Prudential Financial company located in Newark, NJ and is solely responsible for its own financial condition and contractual obligations. ©2015  Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Prudential, the Prudential logo, the Rock symbol and Bring Your Challenges are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc., and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide. Prudential is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. EEO IS THE LAW. The Prudential Insurance Company of America, Newark, NJ and its affiliates. Prudential is an Employer that participates in E-Verify.0272810-00002-00 Expires 10/10/2016                                                                      Version 1 – Revised 3/16/2015",Financial Professional Associate Job in Chalfont,Full Time Employee,"Chalfont, PA 18914",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-professional-associate-job-chalfont-pa-us-174730241.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,eb0fc00ceb004bc0be2fa0ecda92de86
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:20:32:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Tampa, FL that is searching for a Data Entry candidate.REQUIREMENTS: Strong data entry Great on the phone (inbound) Desire for a long term opportunityKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Data Entry Job in Tampa,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Tampa, FL 33602",,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-job-tampa-fl-us-176267826.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),32640324d6863c7c7f207a67186f376a
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:20:21:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Maryville,Part Time Employee,"Maryville, TN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-maryville-tn-us-177006337.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ef68e541ac6ff587ae93f56a21761650
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:20:17:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"HIRING - PART TIME ALTERATIONS SPECIALISTA Career That’s Meant to BeAt David’s Bridal, we empower our customers and our employees to stay true to their dreams and find the one, whether that means the wedding dress that matches her personal style—or the career that’s a perfect fit.We’re looking for people with diverse backgrounds and fresh ideas to help create a uniquely personal retail experience.Now Accepting Applications for Part TimeAlterations SpecialistThe Alteration’s Specialist is responsible for completing all alteration fittings and sewing services necessary to meet our customers’ needs. The Alterations Specialist suggests product options to our customers to help each one complete the overall look of her event.Our most successful Alterations Specialist are self-motivated individuals with outgoing personalities, and excellent technical sewing and fitting skills. They love special occasion fashion and have expertise on how to tailor a garment to ensure the best fit possible. Through the Alterations Specialist skills, vision, and informed recommendations, they will give our customers the confidence they need to choose the “one”, her dress.If you would like to be part of a dynamic team, help our customers dress for the most important days of their lives, and earn a competitive income, we would love to discuss your future at David’s Bridal.Our store will host interviews over the next two weeks.Alterations SpecialistResponsibilities:Perform all necessary customer garment fittings to David’s Bridal standardsPerform all types of alterations on bridal gowns, bridesmaid dresses, flower girl dresses, special occasion dressesPress, steam, and spot clean garments/merchandise as necessaryFollow quality control guidelines and inspect all garments to verify pristine condition before final delivery to customerSchedule alterations appointments in person or by telephone as neededFill out alterations tickets accurately and completely, ensuring correct fees and pricingResolve alterations customer service issues or complaints and refer any unresolved matter to floor managerAssist in closing sales by partnering with stylists to validate garment fit and suggest product additionsCommunicate supply needs to the Alterations Manager to ensure all supplies are available at all timesEnsure preventative maintenance of equipment and report any damage or broken equipment immediatelyFlexibility to work retail schedules such as weekends, evenings, and holidaysManual dexterity to perform non-selling responsibilities, such as use of POS (Point of Sale) terminals, counting money, accessing computers and initiating and receiving telephone callsManual dexterity to sew and perform fittingsAbility to move throughout the store, lift up to 10 pounds, stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, stand, and reach with armsPart Time AvailableProfessional EnvironmentGenerous Employee Discount After First Pay PeriodIf you are interested in working in our stores, please note that the online application process will take approximately 30 minutes.Now that we’ve popped the question, please say “I do”.<br />#CJT_jobBodyContent p {<br /> margin: 10px !important;<br /> min-height: 13px !important;<br />}<br />",Alterations Specialist [Part-Time] Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37919",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/alterations-specialist-part-time-job-knoxville-tn-us-176014302.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,541b72a33b95b9755e5b9f9a04bd60e0
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:20:17:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org)is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  TheCenter provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, earlyintervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services.The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability torelate to individualsand families of varied ethnic and cultural backgrounds, ages, educational levelsand economic circumstances with respect and dignity.  Excellent verbal,written and computer skills are necessary in order to work effectively andcollaboratively with clients, collaborating agencies and communityprofessionals, as well as, maintaining proper documentation.  Clinical staff members must be able totake and pass without major modification a course in Handle with Care, whichrequires hands-on, physical components to ensure the safety of the clients andstaff. Clinical staff members must possess reliable transportation, ability toacquire an F endorsement on driver's license and transport clients.HRMCis an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers License Record, DegreeVerification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingent upon cleandrug screen, background check and driving record. Additionally, certainprograms are subject to TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingual applicantsare encouraged to apply.HRMC iscurrently seeking a qualified and enthusiastic professional for the following position:  PleasanTree Supervisor.JOBREQUIREMENTSEducation/Knowledge: Must have a High School Diploma/GED with 5 years experience as anapartment manager or a Bachelors Degree in the social services field.Bachelors degree preferred.Experience:Previous experience as an apartment manager preferred.Physical:Exposure to biological hazards. Hearing of normal and soft tones. Close eyework.  Lifting up to 50 lbs.Pushing/pulling up to 150 lbs. Frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending,stooping, and reaching. Required to be certified in, and effectively implement,verbal and physical de-escalation techniques that include a wide range ofbodily movements; including but not limited to, grasping, holding anotherperson, going down on knees, running, and walking.JOB SUMMARYDirectly manages theday-to-day operations of the Helen Ross McNabb Centers rental properties. Actsas the primary contact for all current and potential tenants. Manages theapplication process, the project-based voucher program, and ensures that alltenants adhere to the requirements of the lease. Ensures that the Helen RossMcNabb Centers Housing Program adheres to all local, State, and Federalregulations. Directly supervises weekend and evening milieu counselors. This position requires utilizing a personaldependable vehicle to conduct Center business. Maintaining a dependable vehicleand certified driver status is a condition of employment.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1536&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",PleasanTree Bachelor Program Coordinator Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pleasantree-bachelor-program-coordinator-job-knoxville-tn-us-176371728.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,f71d37d50e9a07a67590e99ebe31e224
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:19:54:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"North Knoxville company has a Direct Hire Opportunity for an experience Maintenance Manager. The desired candidate must have HVAC and refridgeration experience. A stable work history as a Maintenance Technician or Manager is preferred. The candidate will be responsible for managing a team of 6 - 8 technicians. Set up repair routes for associates. Scheduling repair orders. and managing inventory. Ordering parts and servicing various locations. Managing day to day activities. Interviewing and hiring new maintenance technician when needed and training these asscociates. Must have excellent communication and client services skills. For immediate consideration please send your resume to kendra.askew@randstadusa.com Working hours: 7 am - 5 pmSkills:*Must have a stable work history * Must have 2 positive professional references * Must pass a drug screenRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Maintenance Manager Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37912",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-manager-job-knoxville-tn-us-176625902.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=4,"55,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",,bf4c24aee70a59faafab11aecf9f148b
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:19:29:45,No,jobs.monster.com,Please apply only if you are qualified.,Please apply only if you are qualified.,,"Mondelez InternationalKnoxville, TN",,http://job-openings.monster.com/monster/1584bfe7-6755-407e-a325-ce326443d03b?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=15,,,97e230c230ab4487572b29971a217130
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:19:27:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Ophthalmic Technician Baptist Eye Surgeons is a multi-physician practice accepting applications for an ophthalmic technician. Ophthalmology Experience Required - must be able to refract. Must have an excellent work record, be friendly, efficient, task oriented, pay close attention to detail, and work as a team member. We offer competitive pay and a generous benefits package. Please email resume to RUtheone4us@gmail.comPosting provided by: Report","Baptist Eye Surgeons Job Application for Ophthalmic Technician | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name BAPTIST EYE SURGEONS PLLC noname,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ophthalmic-technician-job-knoxville-tn-us-175684037.aspx?mescoid=5101011001001&jobPosition=1,,,a9edb8b97de85835fefb38b9f8c9f38a
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:19:25:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job CUSTOMER SERVICE REPRESENTATIVE Mediserve Medical Equipment of Knoxville seeks a Customer Service Rep to join us. Selected candidate Serving as the initial contact to customers/referrals, the selected candidate will process necessary information for qualification/insurance requirements and convey this information to MST/RT's. Experience is not necessary, training provided. To apply visit: www.mshjobtour.com EOE Posting provided by: Report","Mountain State Health Alliance Job Application for Customer Service | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name SHAKER ADVERTISING AGENCY noname Address KnoxvilleKnoxville, TN 37919",All,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-job-knoxville-tn-us-176398371.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=13,,,fb8c320e909249b5b2471954397d30ce
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:19:17:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Resin/Injection Molding - Production EngineerProduction engineer responsible for the injection molding process using resin materials. Qualified candidates will have a background that includes making the injection molding production process as efficient as possible; using various principles of engineering, technology, manufacturing and management science to achieve production goals.Experience as an injection molding production engineer in the automotive parts industry is highly desirable, The Production Engineer will be expected to work hand-in-hand with production technicians where you will develop, install, procure and maintain the injection molding equipment used in the manufacturing process.Additional responsibilities may include:Handling budget and expenditure.Ensuring project deadlines are met.Analysis of the data found in charts, graphs and other forms of measuring information.Analysis of operational issues and installation of new equipment.Providing your team with technical support and training. As the injection molding production engineer, you will have an extremely important role as you must ensure the company’s injection molding, manufacturing process runs as efficiently as possible. You will be expected to regularly check equipment to see it is in good working order; to help create as much product as possible with a minimum of leftover scrap.This position has a 1st shift (8:15 AM till 5:15 PM) work schedule but this plant does run 24/7 so you may need to be on call in case of an emergency with the manufacturing production line.Bachelor’s Degree in an engineering discipline from an accredited university or a minimum of 5 years’ experience working as a production specialist is required. This is a direct hire opportunity and our customer is located within the surrounding area of Knoxville, TN.  Benefits include holidays, vacation, insurance and retirement investment options.",Production Engineer - Injection Molding Job in Clinton,Full Time Employee,"Clinton, TN 37716",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/production-engineer-injection-molding-job-clinton-tn-us-176085771.aspx?mescoid=1700194001001&jobPosition=20,,Engineering,bbeedaf17a128901ee6d32cf5d5c0a99
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:19:09:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for an IT Asset Analyst in Mount Laurel, NJ.Overview:The IT Asset Management team is responsible for the daily and long-term strategic management of software and technology assets within the organization. The ideal candidate will work collaboratively with members of the team including IT, Service Providers, Finance and the business in support of programs to control, manage, and report on corporate IT hardware and software assets. Operating within a strict ITIL process framework, the IT Asset Management team provides the overall direction for IT Asset Lifecycle Management. This includes the integrity of asset inventories and reporting, and establishing procedures for proper oversight. It will also include planning, monitoring, and recording software license and/or hardware assets to ensure compliance with vendor contracts. The Technology Asset Management Analyst will be involved in the management of software and hardware asset compliance, maintenance renewals, life cycle planning and costing.Responsibilities: Facilitate the business' needs for ongoing technical support and upgrade protection on selected products by providing relevant information on support agreement and license agreement terminations and expirations Support IT end-of-life -EOL- program by developing asset inventory analysis to identify support agreement and license agreement terminations and expirations Perform periodic reconciliation of contract and license entitlements with software installations Collect information for budgeting, software and hardware compliance and inventory, contract summaries, and cost comparisons to maximize value creation and costs for software licensing, maintenance, and service offerings Enter and maintain information in a tool to address budgeting, software and hardware compliance and inventory, contracts, and cost. Assist in the development of reporting to address management requirements to obtain informationREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in information technology, accounting or business administration and/or five years of equivalent experience (Financial services IT experience preferred) Minimum three years of experience working in IT Asset Management role Experience with ITAM inventory and discovery tool (ServiceNow preferred) Expert Excel skills Good analytic skills including problem definition, research, assessment and presentation Working knowledge of IT components; software, network, server, workstation, printers, etcKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",IT Asset Analyst Job in Mount Laurel,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Mount Laurel, NJ 08054",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-asset-analyst-job-mount-laurel-nj-us-179115537.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),898f3f1cefd90ca1d83921a7b8f6eb50
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:18:51:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Sales Professional Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89106",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-professional-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178803619.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,b5215ea5e6578feb83f05f114af57479
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:18:51:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Staff Accountant. Immediate opportunity for Staff Accountant with gaming experience to assist with month end close and revitalize the record keeping process. This role will report to the Gaming controller and will work closely with the Director of Finance.EmployerWork for rapidly growing diverse publicly traded gaming company that offers an unmatched blend of gaming opportunity. They own and operate gaming properties and operate more than 12,000 gaming devices.Staff Accountant Job DutiesAs a staff accountant you will perform monthly, quarterly and annual accounting activities to prepare financial statements, operate in accordance with GAAP policies and procedure, and analyze and reconcile balance sheet accounts.Ideal CandidateThe ideal candidate will have gaming experience, strong excel skill set, and general ledger knowledge and understanding of financial statements.Job RequirementsBachelor's Degree in Accounting or Business Administration.At least 3 years of Accounting Experience.Requires detail-oriented, self-motivated, team player with the ability to work in an environment with multiple concurrent deadlines.Salary Range & Benefits$50K-$60K, DOEHealth Benefits401KApplication ProcessOnce we know you are interested, a Randstad Recruiter will review your resume and contact you to better understand your skills and toll you more about the opportunity. We will meet qualified candidates face to face and our best talent interview with the employer fact to face-we will move quickly.Interviewing now! Click Apply to submit your resume or email jennifer.parkhurst@randstadusa.com. Not ready to apply but want to learn more; please call Jennifer Parkhurst at 702-734-1110",Staff Accountant Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178779372.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=19,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,854a8a7b7b8226fae9cb9b730425bcc0
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:18:40:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for a Business Analyst I in Oak Brook, IL.Duties Include: Provide business function support in various power delivery settings Provide clerical and some administrative support Develop customized reports provided by integrated systems, including Passport, PeopleSoft, Impromptu, etc, and MS Office applications Use oral and written skills to present informationREQUIREMENTS: High School diploma with minimum of 5 years of experience in specific area of expertise Able to utilize PC and mainframe applications, such as Microsoft Office, PeopleSoft, Time, EERS, and PassPort proficiently Familiarity with power companies a plusKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Business Analyst I Job in Oak Brook,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Oak Brook, IL 60521",,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-i-job-oak-brook-il-us-179171689.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),21e316b856c704ea93decf447dc2c007
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:18:21:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Delivers patients’ meal trays and food items in assigned areas according to established procedures, quality standards, sanitary food service practices, and universal precautions. Greets patients in a courteous and professional manner and offers assistance with meal trays according to established procedures. Communicates relevant information in a responsive manner to personnel in other departments to ensure quality patient care. Identifies patients correctly by checking bed/wrist identification against the name written on the patients’ menu. Maintains floor stock inventories, as assigned, and restocks cart daily. Maintains sanitation of floor supplies stock cart. Makes recommendations for nourishments to clinical staff. Cleans patient rooms daily and provides trash removal. Offers refills on hot beverages and substitutions or corrections on meal trays (according to menu). Adheres to all Aramark appearance standards and maintains a professional dress at all times while working. Reports any problems found during meal service to dietitian or zone manager and takes corrective action to resolve any issues as they arise. Qualifications High School Degree or GED preferred. Current student considered. Previous experience in food service or related field is preferred. Must be able to read and write to facilitate proper communication with others. Mathematical ability required. Must be able to perform simple mathematical calculations.",Host/Hostess- Baylor Medical Center at Grapevine Job in Grapevine,Full Time,"Grapevine, TX 76051",All,http://jobview.monster.com/host-hostess-baylor-medical-center-at-grapevine-job-grapevine-tx-us-178889439.aspx?mescoid=3500618001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f35d6534f5d8710e436ad9e9a7cd98ad
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:18:21:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lead Teacher 1-2 yrs exp, Imagination Station ELC in Lake Worth seeking experienced lead teacher for Preschool Three classroom. Must have active staff credential. Excellent pay. Are you looking for a change? Come join our team. Send resume and/or apply in person 561-642-4262",Lead Teacher Job in Lake Worth,Full Time,"Lake Worth, FL 33463",All,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-teacher-job-lake-worth-fl-us-177962627.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cfc0f91998c601d9872175be338192ee
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:18:15:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a seasoned hotel General Manager, please read on! Based in Calistoga, CA we are one of the most exciting full-service management companies to hit the news. We are a well-funded company with a unique strategy targeted towards urban lifestyle retreats and visionary destinations worldwide. We have 15 locations nationwide and we are quickly moving to double that number in the next few years.Top Reasons to Work with UsWe are willing to offer excellent compensation packages including a base salary that ranges between 65k – 75k, Bonuses, Benefits, and Employee discounts for stays at hotels within our companies swiftly expanding portfolio. We are located in the heart of Calistoga and are a stone’s throw from some of the greatest wineries.What You Need for this PositionRequirements: -Must have minimum three (3) years varied management experience in the hospitality industry-Must be able to analyze profit and loss statements as well as STR reports, and extrapolate information from them and related reports-Must have working knowledge of accounting systems, property and spa management systems and housekeeping products and procedures-Must be familiar with OSHA, local Department of Health regulations, and relevant current laws governing handling of hazardous substancesWhat's In It for You- Vacation/PTO- Medical- Dental- Vision- Bonus- 401(k)So, if you are a strong General Manager with a strong accounting background and have outstanding customer service skills. please apply immediately for this amazing opportunity. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Hotel General Manager - Hotel General Manager,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Chris Gieske,Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/hotel-general-manager-hotel-general-manager-hotel-managemen-job-calistoga-ca-us-178911590.aspx?mescoid=1100046001001&jobPosition=7,,,fdefcbae20be524aa78c3e0295655540
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:18:14:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Staffing Recruiter Position Features: Salary: DOE? Will assist with all Office Staffing needs by interviewing and supporting our Account Executives with interviewing and filling job orders. Source, evaluate, and review potential candidates and new clients utilizing cold calls, job boards, social networking and internal database etc. Interview prospective candidates via phone/in person to assess skill set, work history, and salary requirements. Recruiter will also be responsible for developing and maintaining a strong pipeline of qualified talent to submit to current and future job needs. Select well-matched candidates to fulfill client job orders and maintain on-going contact with them.need to have exceptional customer service. Resolve any candidate issues quickly and efficiently to maintain the highest level of customer satisfaction.Will generate leads and market intelligence to enhance our new client development. Maintain relationships with candidates to gain industry knowledge and obtain referrals and new business opportunities.**Qualifications:** 2+ years of staffing experience in related field is preferred.* A combination of business development and account management skills very helpful.* Ability to multi-task and persevere in a fast paced dynamic environment, while maintaining a sense of urgency.* Must have a prov en track record of success and be a competitive, and self-motivated individual. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1107516 Job Experience:,, Word, Excel,Typing, D/E and great customer skills along with Sales.Years of Experience Required:",Staffing/ Sales Recruiter - Job in Las Vegas,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Las Vegas, NV 89146",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/staffing-sales-recruiter-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178966998.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f9a98ff7bfcc9ef9f85e470f4fa9a9b8
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:17:55:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Android Front End DeveloperLocation: Las Vegas, NVSalary: $85k-$110kTop Reasons to Work with Us1. We are rapidly growing and envision our user base to be close to 2 million by middle of 20172. Have the chance to join a funded start-up with the ability to make an immediate impact from day one on the future direction of the company3. Great compensation package and benefits with unlimited PTOWhat You Will Be DoingCreate easy-to-use applications in an agile environmentPlan and execute user research with design, engineering and product management teamsInfluence design decisions through analysis and design choicesCreate prototypes and validate designs through formal and informal user testingParticipate in 30% design and 70% developmentWhat You Need for this Position- Visual / Interaction / UI / UX Design- Consumer facing, product development experience- Mobile design/ DevelopmentUser Testing / Information ArchitectureHTML / CSS / Front End Web DevelopmentStrong portfolio demonstrating design capabilities and experienceSo, if you are a Mobile Front End Developer with 3 years of web development experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to: Lauren@Cybercoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Android Front End Developer - UI/UX,"Full Time, Employee","Android Front End DeveloperLocation: Las Vegas, NVSalary: $85k-$110kTop Reasons to Work with Us1. We are rapidly growing and envision our user base to be close to 2 million by middle of 20172. Have the chance to join a funded start-up with the ability to make an immediate impact from day one on the future direction of the company3. Great compensation package and benefits with unlimited PTOWhat You Will Be DoingCreate easy-to-use applications in an agile environmentPlan and execute user research with design, engineering and product management teamsInfluence design decisions through analysis and design choicesCreate prototypes and validate designs through formal and informal user testingParticipate in 30% design and 70% developmentWhat You Need for this Position- Visual / Interaction / UI / UX Design- Consumer facing, product development experience- Mobile design/ DevelopmentUser Testing / Information ArchitectureHTML / CSS / Front End Web DevelopmentStrong portfolio demonstrating design capabilities and experienceSo, if you are a Mobile Front End Developer with 3 years of web development experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to: Lauren@Cybercoders.com",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/android-front-end-developer-ui-ux-prototyping-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178911825.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,,29e082ea23b8c383c5b17efe904cbc52
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:17:19:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager and leader of the General Ledger Accounting Department. Strategically and creatively manage any function in the accounting arena, build and develop strong teams, design and implement processes to improve effectiveness, identify and address areas of risk, solve problems, and manage projects. Responsibilities :• Responsible for reviewing and approving all aspects of the accounting process, which includes deposits, utility tracking and turnovers and direct credit payments.• Responsible for year-end reporting and production of accounting information. Ensures timely and accurate reporting and assists the VP of Accounting with financials.• Works closely with the VP of Accounting through all phases of the accounting process.• Follows quality system procedures.• Other duties as assigned.• Oversees staff of key accounting departments.• Guides staff in ensuring monthly tasks are completed accurately and timely.• Assesses effectiveness of processes; probes as needed; plans and implements improvements.• Reviews department work product on a daily basis.• Ability to manage and lead staff in the department.• Strategic planning for company and department.• Goal setting and implementation.• Excellent relationship skills with external and internal clients.• Persuasive and patient personality, listens well.• A strategic thinker that is able to prioritize.• Uses sound judgment and decision-making.• Strong internal control skill set, creative and takes initiative; takes ownership.• Effectively plans and organizes; manages projects skillfully.• High level of proficiency in Microsoft Office, Word, Access, Outlook, Excel and Yardi.• Excellent written and verbal communication skills.• Report writing and database skills.• Strong reasoning ability and a critical thinker.• Ability to investigate and solve problems.• Ability to identify risk and determine steps necessary to minimize risk. Requirements :• BS in Accounting, Finance, Business or related.• 5-8+ years of total experience and 3+ years of management experience.• Property Management and/or HOA experience helpful.• Multi-entity experience.• Experience managing/leading a staff of 5 or more staff members.• Experience producing multiple sets of Financial Statements.",Controller Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/controller-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178900229.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=13,"70,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e806d0f6f0bbec4cb0e705d86d5630ab
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:16:04:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a well funded established IT start-up company located in Las Vegas. If you are looking to join a company that is growing at tremendous pace this is definitely the opportunity for you. We're looking for strong creative, motivated developers who are up on the latest IT trends and are looking for new and exciting opportunities. We're currently looking to hire a full-time Android Engineer to join our team.What You Will Be DoingYou will be responsible for new features and improvements for the mobile app, working as a part of our in-house mobile team which covers Android and iOS development.- Develop mobile applications for the Android mobile operating systems.- Develop user interfaces that are intuitive, usable, visually appealing and easy to learn.- Develop software requirements specifications and software design specifications.- Develop working, readable, testable, scalable, maintainable, and quality source code.- Deliver materials on time, on budget, and of high quality.What You Need for this Position- BS in Computer Science or Computer Engineering or equivalent experience.- A solid foundation in data structures, algorithms and software design.- At least two years experience in Android development.- Passionate about Android and always up to date with platform changes, new features, and new user interactions as they are released by Google.- 3+ years of native mobile app development experience.- You know Java like the back of your hand and can consistently deliver testable, scalable, highly-readable code using OO best practices.- You understand the nuances of developing on Android across multiple hardware devices.- You have at least one native Android app in the Google Play store.- You are good at evaluating and integrating libraries, SDKs and APIs on Android.- You are comfortable with GIT or other source control software.So, if you are an Android Developer with a passion for mobile application development and at least 1 published application, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Android Engineer - Mobile Development | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Hedi Fazai,Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/android-engineer-mobile-development-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178220451.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=13,,,002860cc40435801dbbec48fb620329f
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:15:57:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a .NET Developer with a few years of experience, please read on!Located in Las Vegas, Nevada, we are a leading global provider of technology solutions to the hospitality industry by designing, creating, and integrating cutting-edge technology. If you are looking to join a passionate and motivated team that also knows how to have fun with amazing growth potential, then look no further!What You Will Be Doing-We’re developing products in the cloud that would have traditionally been desktop applications. -Understanding the latest AJAX, JQuery, and various JavaScript frameworks is a key to success.-You are very well versed with each tool in your possession, and could teach someone a new trick with each.-We know we can’t rush great things, but we’ve got some serious deadlines. Your organization and project management make it happen.-You will have many projects that you are part of, as well as a few you are responsible for.What You Need for this PositionRequired:- Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Software Development, or of an work experience- At least 3 years of relevant experienceSkills that we are looking for:-Visual Basic.NET-C#-Visual Basic 6 -HTML5-Javascript-JQUERY-JSON-AJAX-XML/SOAP-Web Services (WCF, ASMX, REST)-Entity Framework-T-SQL-MS SQL Server-ASP.NET-ADO.NET-DAO-Client/Server programming-TCP/IP NetworkingPlus:-Web Forms-MSTEST/XUnit-Angular-Photoshop, graphics skills-Telerik Controls -DevExpressWhat's In It for You- Competitive Salary ($60k - $80k) DOE- Vacation/PTO- Medical- Dental- Vision- 401(k)So, if you are a .NET Developer with experience, please apply today! **You can also send your most updated resume to Ivan.Woo@CyberCoders.com** Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for .NET Developer - Excellent Growth Potential! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Ivan Woo,Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/net-developer-excellent-growth-potential!-job-las-vegas-nv-us-179144948.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,,07e6652e250c98398635e675236570d9
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:15:56:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"EMPLOYER PAID PENSION PLAN OF 28% OF YOUR ANNUAL SALARY!GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE!SIGN-ON BONUS & RELOCATION! GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE!This position is considered AT-WILL and will serve at the pleasure of the CEO. Develops and administers programs to ensure employee safety and agency compliance with safety, health and environmental regulations for UMC facilities, employees, patients and the visiting public. Responsible for inspecting facilities; observing operations and activities; investigating and tracking actual or potential risk incidents or complaints; ensuring hospital and related agencies are in compliance with OSHA and EPA regulations, applicable building codes, fire codes, TJC standards and guidelines; development of policies, procedures and manuals; development of safety training and drills.  Job Requirement: Education/Experience: Equivalent to a Bachelor's Degree in Industrial Safety, Occupational Health, Public Administration, Health and Safety or a closely related field and three (3) years of professional experience in Safety Management. Licensing/Certification Requirements: Valid Class C Nevada Driver's License.  Additional and/or Preferred Position Requirements: Experience as a hospital safety officer serving in a 250-500 bed hospital will be crucial!  CSP and/or CHSP certification. (Board certified safety professional and/or certified healthcare safety professional.) Working knowledge of Life Safety, Hazardous Materials/Waste Management and Fire Requirements and Codes. Two years Management experience in Safety Management. Experience working in a hospital or large healthcare environment in the area of safety management.  Knowledge, Skills, Abilities, and Physical Requirements: Knowledge of: Principles, practices and applicable equipment related to industrial safety and hygiene and hazardous materials management; standard occupational hazards, including accident analysis and prevention techniques; data sampling and statistical analysis techniques; project management and research methods and practices; applicable state, federal and local safety laws, codes, regulations and standards; TJC standards for plant, technology and safety management; hospital systems and organization; related community organizations, such as local fire department, county emergency management coordinators, etc.; hospital safety practices and procedures; patient rights; infection control policies and practices; department and hospital emergency response policies and procedures. Skill in: Developing and implementing an effective safety, hazard control and industrial hygiene program; assessing risks and hazards and making effective recommendations for action and correction; interpreting, applying and explaining applicable laws, codes, regulations and guidelines; preparing clear and concise reports, educational and informational materials; using initiative and independent judgement within established procedural guidelines; developing policies and procedures; conducting safety investigations; coordinating subordinates, physicians, peers and community organizations; organizing and implementing tracking systems; organizing and coordinating drill events; communicating effectively with people from diverse socio-economic and ethnic backgrounds; establishing and maintaining effective working relationships with all personnel contacted in the course of duties; efficient, effective and safe use of equipment. Physical Requirements and Working Conditions: Mobility to work in a typical office setting and use standard equipment, stamina to remain seated and maintain concentration for extended periods of time, vision to read printed materials and a VDT screen, hearing and speech to communicate effectively in-person and over the telephone. Strength and agility to exert up to 20 pounds of force occasionally, and/or up to 10 pounds of force frequently, and/or a eligible amount of force constantly to move objects.Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this classification. Please note: This is an EXEMPT position which is not covered by the union. Applicants for employment to non-union eligible positions are not eligible for longevity benefits. Current UMC employees who have not qualified for longevity payments (do not have 8 full years of creditable service) and who voluntarily transfer, promote, demote or are reassigned into a non-union eligible position will not receive the longevity benefit.   MPUMCLVSMUMCLV   #TrackingJobBody p{margin:10px 0 5px !important;}",Safety Program Manager Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/safety-program-manager-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178296771.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,4487f1c0bb264ec4d98c8d693bbd2430
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:15:37:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Disney, Ikea and The Home Depot. XPO is a leading provider of transportation and logistics services throughout the supply chain, including freight brokerage, intermodal, contract logistics, expedite, last mile and global forwarding. We're passionate about helping our customers operate efficiently - and we've put tremendous resources in place to support our commitment. (NYSE: XPO) Job Overview and Responsibilities: The ideal candidate will have the ability to take complete ownership over every aspect involved in running a delivery business. Extreme commitment is required to be successful. Proven experience in the delivery or trucking industry is required. Specifics: Manage contract drivers operating up to 7 days per week in multiple locations around the region Experience in the developing of a Contractor base team. Experience in the direction and delegation of frontline management staff Complete P/L responsibility Ability to multi-task various functions simultaneously Manage daily operations. Hire Contract Carriers. Build relationships with customers to ensure continued operating improvements Work with national sales team to facilitate new avenues of growth Excellent communication skills are required Proficient in the Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word, PowerPoint) Experience in the hiring management and Office personnel. Job Description Qualifications Qualifications/ Requirements- 4 Year degree or equivalent work experience. Excellent written/ verbal communication skills. Must be willing to work flexible schedule. Computer proficiency 2 years logistics management experience. Excellent interpersonal skills, and problem solving ability. Knowledge of DOT regulations a plus Previous P&L experience Previous Supervisory experience. XPO Logistics  is an Equal Opportunity Employer All candidates are subject to criminal background, drug and alcohol screenings We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",General Manager Job in Edison,"Full Time, Employee","Edison, NJ 08817",,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-job-edison-nj-us-179173975.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=19,,Business/Strategic Management,71ff6be837868af5ec6c1caf79bb4dd6
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:15:04:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Franchised Sales Manager MARRIOTT INTERNATIONAL, INC. - Bellevue, WA 98007 Posted: 12/15/2016 - Expires: 2/13/2017 Job ID: 177689236",Franchised Sales Manager Job in Bellevue,Job Type Full Time Employee,"Bellevue, WA 98007",,http://jobview.monster.com/franchised-sales-manager-job-bellevue-wa-us-177689236.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=3,,Education Level High School or equivalent,d56e0e5eb270b236f99283fc262be074
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:14:53:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Facilities Project ManagerUline – Shipping Supply Specialists  ""The people I work with are as passionate as I am."" ""I came to Uline for a job. Instead, I found a career."" Uline is North America's leading distributor of shipping, packaging and industrial supplies. We're a family-owned company known for our incredible customer service and quality products. Our people make the difference. We're looking for the best and brightest to take our Facilities department to the next level. If you have passion and expertise in MEP, HVAC, building automation systems, real estate, building engineering or construction, Uline is the company for you.Uline seeks a Facilities Project Manager at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, Wisconsin (just over the IL / WI state line).  Join us to experience why Uline has been designated with the Forbes 2016 America’s Best Employers award. POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES Review and manage project planning, budgets, schedules and deadlines for a number of departments including Finance, Operations, Distribution and Facilities.Analyze project plans and establish critical objectives.Host meetings with key stakeholders and company leaders.Manage multiple projects simultaneously.Manage deadlines and conduct weekly status meetings with Operations.Coordinate project phases, review financial statements and assure on-time delivery of projects.Complete ad hoc projects as assigned. MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS Bachelor's degree. Major in an analytical field desired.5+ years analysis, financial or operations experience preferred. PMP certification a plus.Microsoft Access and/or SQL experience strongly preferred.Extremely organized with a strong ability to multitask.Superior writing skills. BENEFITS Complete insurance coverage – medical, dental, vision, life.401(k) with company match.Generous paid time off.Tuition reimbursement.3 bonus programs. Please visit www.uline.com/jobs to learn more about our job openings and benefits package. HOW TO APPLY Please click the “APPLY” button to submit your resume for immediate consideration! EEO/AA Employer/Vet/DisabledUline is a drug-free workplace",Facilities Project Manager Job in Pleasant Prairie,"Full Time , Employee","Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/facilities-project-manager-job-pleasant-prairie-wi-us-178970451.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8e24dd307a09442b10c29be441296b77
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:13:44:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking to fill several Entry Level positions in entry level marketing, entry level advertising, entry level event promotions, entry level sales and entry level management. We have rapid advancement opportunities with all promotions from within and are searching for the right candidates to grow with us!SEEKING A CAREER CHANGE?JUST GRADUATED AND LOOKING FOR A CAREER PATH?JUST LOOKING TO GET YOUR FOOT IN THE DOOR?We are the perfect transition from student to professional offering various training and development opportunities ranging from Marketing, Event Promotions, Advertising, and Business Management Development at an Entry Level with self paced rapid advancement. We have recently expanded again and are looking to fill entry level positions in entry level management, entry level marketing, entry level advertising, entry level sales and entry level event promotions.We are looking for the right people to lead in expanding and growing our marketing and sales divisions. The right candidate will be self-motivated, have natural leadership abilities, and be career-oriented. MAIN JOB RESPONSIBILITIESProfessionally representing clients in all areas of business at the local retail locations our events take place at as well as in our office.Contribute to the growth and performance of the division by leading by example and hitting company goals.Train and develop new marketing professionalsManage promotions and materialsEducate retail consumers on the products and services our clients offer.  **No experience is necessary, training is provided for those candidates that qualify. **WE ALSO OFFER FLEXIBLE WORK HOURS TO ACCOMMODATE ANY LIFESTYLE RequirementsJob RequirementsENTRY LEVEL MARKETING / ENTRY LEVEL EVENT PROMOTIONS AND ENTRY LEVEL BUSINESS MANAGEMENT DEVELOPMENTAll applicants must be: 1. COMPETITIVE, individuals to take our company to the next level.2. DETERMINED to satisfy client needs3. DEMONSTRATE GREAT COMMUNICATION & PERSONAL SKILLS4. LEADERSHIP qualities5. TAKE CHARGE personality6. BUSINESS MINDSET Monthly opportunities for performance-based non-monetary rewards, such as luxury vacations, high-end electronics, gift cards and tickets to concerts and sporting eventsInsurance plans and paid vacation days available after 90 DaysAccess to paid training classes to develop your professional skillsetsA dynamic social program filled with can’t miss events, parties, and activities, including an annual bonus in the form of a company trip to a Mexico, Jamaica or Puerto Rico each November for you and a significant other and other fully expense paid vacation activities.",ENTRY LEVEL MARKETING AND BUSINESS MANAGEMENT DEVELOPMENT Job in Romeoville,"Full Time , Employee","Romeoville, IL 60446",Retail Management Consulting Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-marketing-business-management-development-job-romeoville-il-us-178283496.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=20,,Business/Strategic Management,d3179c6a85428f38c0a36974e209d3f8
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:13:44:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Senior Database Administrator with experience, please read on!Based in Las Vegas, NV, we are a global and one of the largest eBingo and eGaming solutions provider. We are rapidly growing and offer solutions that allow our clients to provide superiority quality offerings to their customers in the gaming markets. We are quickly expanding and want to hire talented people to help us grow even more. We are a vibrant company with a casual work environment.What You Will Be DoingNow that we have expanded, we need an experienced Senior DBA. In this new role, you will join a small team of developers and be an integral part of developing and improving our existing DB solution. This position will require an individual who is energetic, enthusiastic and able to work under minimal supervisionResponsibilities Include:•Identify database requirements by analyzing department applications, programming, and operations; evaluate existing systems and design proposed systems.•Recommend solutions by defining database physical structure and functional capabilities, database security, data back-up, and recovery specifications.•Install revised or new systems by proposing specifications and flowcharts; recommend optimum access techniques; coordinate installation requirements.•Maintain database performance by calculating optimum values for database parameters; implement new releases; complete maintenance requirements; evaluate computer operating systems and hardware products.•Maintain quality service by establishing and enforcing organization standardsWhat You Need for this PositionYou will need:•MS SQL, (FoxPro nice to have)•5+ years MS SQL Server Administration experience required•Experience with Performance Tuning and Optimization (PTO), using native monitoring and troubleshooting tools•Experience with backups, restores and recovery models•Knowledge of High Availability (HA) and Disaster Recovery (DR) options for SQL Server•Excellent written and verbal communication•MCTS, MCITP, and/or MVP certifications a plus•Experienced in Agile development•Experience working in the online Gaming industry an advantage•Diploma/Certificate in Computer Science, Engineering or related disciplineGaming Experience is a major plus along with architecture on a web based platform experience. This job is more than IT as you will need soft skills to communicate with the company.What's In It for YouIn addition to an amazing culture and a chance to join a rapidly expanding company, we offer a base salary of between $80K-$120K DOE. We also offer $500/month for you to spend on benefits as well as potential stock options. Our product is released all over the globe so this is a chance to work with an international product.So, if you are a Database Administrator with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Senior Database Administrator - Expanding Gaming Company! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Blake Condon,Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-database-administrator-expanding-gaming-company!-job-las-vegas-nv-us-179145504.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=4,,,ca9e45a7e8b56a26b9ab793cb71ddf5e
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:13:38:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Are you a proven Recruiting Manager who has managed staffing teams and started up a recruiting department from scratch? If this sounds like you, please read on!We are a well established and growing publicly traded company located in the greater Las Vegas area. We are looking for a stellar Recruiting Manager who has been successful in building teams and managing recruiting objectives. This is a new role so we need someone who can roll up their sleeves and hit the ground running. This is a very dynamic role. We are interviewing immediately!We will assist in relocation!What's In It for You- Excellent benefits- Fast paced company and family type environment- Collaborative work environmentWhat You Need for this Position- 5+ yrs progressive experience in the recruiting/staffing environment with demonstrative responsibilities managing and building teams- Superb written & verbal communication skills- Email/Internet whiz - Outlook, Word, Linked In RecruiterIf you a proven Recruiting Manager who has managed staffing teams and started up a recruiting departments, apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Manager of Recruiting - In House - RELO | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Sophia Koo,Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-of-recruiting-in-house-relo-job-las-vegas-nv-us-179144191.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=6,,,78af7a8a334388e789fb50055621e773
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:13:37:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Irvine, CA that is searching for a Business Systems Analyst - Sales Operations.Responsibilities: Perform application development and maintenance support of application systems under direct supervision Will work closely with coworkers in a team oriented environment Act as lead on small enhancements and support items Provide analytical and application development support of applications for Sales Operation systems under direct supervision Design, develop and maintain systems Meets with end usersREQUIREMENTS: Must have mainframe application development experience Must have experience adhering to SDLC methodologies Extensive knowledge in mainframe based development Experienced with Hyperion (implementation experience a plus) Experience with Java and Web Services Must be able to communicate effectively with customers and coworkers to enhance customer satisfaction Must be a sound team player with initiative, resourcefulness and high level of professionalismKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Business Systems Analyst Job in Irvine,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Irvine, CA 92618",,http://jobview.monster.com/business-systems-analyst-job-irvine-ca-us-179181238.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=6,40.00 - 40.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),51a9d0a777ef493781750f7e1b8a551b
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:13:04:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Outside Sales – Established TerritoryCompany: Mac ToolsDescription: Automotive technician tools & equipment salesMac Tools doesn't just offer a job. Our company provides entrepreneurs with opportunities for fulfilling careers where they can build their own businesses selling our world-class automotive tools to automotive professionals. Imagine running your own mobile tool store, on a protected route, selling one of the most recognizable & respected brands in the world. We are always looking for great people to be part of the driving force behind Mac Tools and contribute to the ongoing success of our mobile distribution model. Mac Tools is a worldwide supplier of automotive repair tools and is part of Stanley Black & Decker, one of the largest tool companies in the world. Founded in 1938, Mac Tools is an international business with Distributors and Franchisees in the United States, Canada, Europe and Japan. Mac Tools® has the power of Stanley Black & Decker Inc behind us, allowing us to be stronger than ever. With a product line in excess of 42,000 items, Mac has the right tools for every automotive technician. Mac Tools® has a focus on innovative, first-to-market automotive tools that are exclusive to and only available on a Mac Tools® Truck. Also, you will have access to great brands such as Dewalt®, Stanley Vidmar®, Proto®, Lista®, Cribmaster® and more!WE CURRENTLY HAVE A LOCAL ROUTE AVAILABLE.________________________________________WE GIVE YOU THE TOOLS TO RUN A SUCCESSFUL BUSINESS:Your own route within protected territory of approx. 325 customersNo Experience necessary, we offer comprehensive training Your Mac Tools truck, which will become your own personal mobile tool storeInitial Inventory of top-selling, high-transaction toolsMobile business software to operate your business100% Financing for Qualified CandidatesWorking capital to help your business growThe power of Stanley Black & Decker behind usNational marketing supportMonthly flyers and promotions to help grow your businessOngoing field support, training & mentoring________________________________________ NO EXPERIENCE NECESSARY You don't need an automotive tools background to be a high-performing franchisee. People from all walks-of-life have found success with the Mac Tools brand! COMPREHENSIVE TRAINING & SUPPORTThe Mac Tools training program consists of classroom and field-based training to ensure that you have all the tools you need to establish and run a successful business. Although you operate an independent business, you're far from being alone. You'll have one of the most extensive support systems in the industry with an ongoing training and support.AWARD WINNING#1 New Franchise 2014-2016 #3 Fastest Growing Franchise 2015 Top 100 Franchise  2017 *Entrepreneur MagazineOVER 75 YEARS OF KNOWLEDGEMac Tools® has been operating in mobile tool distribution for over 75 years, creating a well-established brand with a long history. In this time, we have refined the model to help you be successful as a franchisee. Additionally, Mac Tools® has the power of Stanley Black & Decker Inc. behind us, allowing us to be stronger than ever.LOW START UP COSTMac Tools franchises have lower start-up costs than many other franchise opportunities. With our low start-up costs, we offer a variety of options to fit your unique financial needs. We offer up to 100% financing for qualified individuals. DISCOVERY DAY WITH MAC TOOLSFind out what it’s like to be your own boss. We invite you to participate in a Discovery Day with an already successful Mac Tools franchise owner so that you can learn more about the mobile tool business. These events will help you to experience the business and learn about the full potential of the opportunity. There is no cost or obligation to participate in a Discovery Day. VETERANS PROGRAMOur Veterans Program offers vets or their spouse discounts of up to $10,000 off their starting tool inventory for a Mac Tools franchise. The International Franchise Association has recognized this incentive as part the Veterans Transition Franchise Initiative (VetFran).So what are you waiting for? If you've always aspired to run your own business and be a part of one of the leading mobile tool companies in the industry, then you owe it to yourself to learn more today! Mac Tools®, a division of Stanley Black & Decker Inc. 505 N Cleveland Ave. Westerville, Ohio 43082 The offer of a franchise can only be made through the delivery of a Franchise Disclosure Document. Certain jurisdictions require registration prior to the offer or sale of a franchise. We do not offer franchises in jurisdictions where we are not registered (or exempt from registration)",Outside Sales / Territory Manager - Established Route Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-territory-manager-established-route-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178483193.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=20,,,48d5431ef4066d235ab2e98a468f01c7
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:13:04:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Advance Enterprise Inc. is currently hiring candidates for our entry level Management position, with an emphasis in customer relations and sales we have a base line for career growth in the management field. Our talented team of professionals represent our clients with unparalleled integrity, and are always looking for opportunity. Advance Enterprise Inc. is a marketing firm based in San Diego, CA and is getting ready to expand into numerous retailers within the next year.  This position involves responsibilities in  Entry-level managementRetail Sales and PromotionsCustomer ServiceFace to face marketing Our  team at Advance Enterprise cross-trains all employees in leadership and business development which includes: InterviewingTrainingTeam DevelopmentCompany Culture RequirementsDuties and Responsibilities:- Sell products and services in a retail store environment- Maintain professional interaction with both customers and fellow employees- Meet or exceed personal sales goals on a monthly basis- Courteously welcome customers and offer assistance- Direct customers by escorting them to displays; assess needs and suggests products to fit those needs- Advise customers by providing information on products and services- Help customers make selections by building customer confidence- Accurately document and report sales- Contribute to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed  As a company, we offer advancements base solely on individual/team performance. We are looking for candidates that fit these criteria:Enjoy a team environmentLeadership skillsBusiness management, time management skillsPerformance driven individualsProfessionalism and strong verbal communicationStrong Work-Ethic and Superb AttitudeTeam Player that can contribute to our company success**WE STRICTLY DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN DOOR-TO DOOR, NO B2B, and NO telemarketing conducted!** Also Visit Us online:http://www.advanceenterpriseinc.com  ",Entry Level Management-*Paid Training* Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92121",RetailManagement Consulting ServicesOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-management-paid-training-job-san-diego-ca-us-178852685.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Business/Strategic Management,ddcad1c2f24b14df09ab275f62f5813a
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:12:39:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description The Opportunity The Vehicle Maintenance Mechanic will be responsible for conducting maintenance on our fleet of company vehicles, trucks, and heavy equipment. Responsibilities Include: Perform preventative maintenance tasks and inspections on company vehicles and equipmentPerform routine maintenance such as changing oil, checking batteries, and lubricating equipment, vehicles, and machineryAssist drivers with addressing outstanding vehicle issuesAccurately record time, parts, and inspection checklistsMove company equipment safely on yard as neededAbility to troubleshoot, diagnose and repair equipment and vehiclesDisassemble, inspects and replace worn or broken parts.  Fit and adjust new or repaired parts.Diagnose and repair engines, transmissions, clutches, electrical and pneumatic systems, gearboxes, hydraulics, cooling systems, exhaust, brakes, suspensions, lights, etc on a variety of yard equipment, heavy duty trucks, trailers, and other equipment.Safely operates gauges, forklifts, shunt truck, torches, grinders, and various hand and power toolsPerform other duties and tasks as assigned from time to time by management and will be required by the needs of the Clean Harbors business. Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent requiredMechanics with electrical experience, brakes and engine overhaulMust have own tools3+ years’ experience with heavy-duty trucks and equipmentRead and understand technical blueprints is requiredValid driver’s license with a clean driving record Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market.  For many positions, we have implemented a Competency Based Progression and Pay Program, which directly rewards employees for developing increased proficiency in their key job functions through training and experience. At Clean Harbors you are offered unique opportunities for all stages of your career. Clean Harbors offers all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including:•      Competitive annual salary (CBPP Competency Based Pay Program)•      Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion•      Health, Dental and Life Insurance•      401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off•      Company paid certifications, licenses and training To learn more about our company visit us at  We thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those that complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role. Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company.*CH*SK Potential Applicants: We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Vehicle Maintenance Mechanic - Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/vehicle-maintenance-mechanic-las-vegas-nv-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178536965.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,886903d4dda03046c2a826c44bfff3dc
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:12:30:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amazon is continuing to expand globally into new marketplaces and new businesses. Amazon Fresh Global Product and Technology organization is the tip of the sward in the expansion effort. The team is responsible for re-imagine and delivering next generation of grocery shopping experience to customers around the globe. In this role, you are responsible for designing and driving technical changes to the Amazon websites so to support customers worldwide Responsibilities include collection of business and systems requirements from internal and external customers, writing specifications, driving project schedules from design to release, and responsible for the production launch. You will lead and coordinate design/implementation efforts of technology solutions for grocery shopping experience between multiple internal teams across the globe to develop optimal solutions for a localized grocery shopping experience, You will be expected to make educated tradeoffs to optimize time-to-market, clearly communicate goals, roles, responsibilities, and desired outcomes to internal cross-functional and remote project teams. A strong candidate will possess a strong program management background, will have demonstrated experience leading large sized projects, and will have a well-rounded technical background in current development technologies. You must enjoy an entrepreneurial environment, and driven by strong desire to solving for ambiguity or multiple competing priorities. You are not only able to develop and drive high-level strategic initiatives, but can also roll up your sleeves, dig in and get the job done. As a TPM, you will work to understand the details of business desires, match with technology, and balance the business needs versus technical capability. An ability to take large, complex projects and break them down into manageable pieces, develop functional specifications, then deliver them in a successful and timely manner is expected. Maturity, high judgment, negotiation skills, ability to influence, analytical talent, and leadership are essential to success s in this role. 7 years of software related program management experience in a related industry. A bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science or equivalent. The ability to comfortably and confidently present to all levels within the enterprise and to work with both technical and non-technical individuals. A proven track record for being detail-oriented with a demonstrated ability to self-motivate and follow-through on projects. Proven track record in researching, developing and shipping software solution. 7 years of Technical consultancy, technical program management experience in a related industry. 4 years of experience with current software engineering/development experience. Project management, Process Improvement or Quality certifications desired (e.g. PMP, Lean or Six Sigma). Knowledge of the technical and UX requirements for international software deployments Experience deploying localized software in multiple countries worldwide",Sr TPM,Full Time,"Seattle, WA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-tpm-international-expansion-job-seattle-wa-us-178383303.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e685af4f76a72cd342dbf89892174eff
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:12:03:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides respiratory therapy modalities per protocol and those ordered by physicians to improve the cardiopulmonary conditions of patients from neonatal to geriatric ages. Duties include assessment, administration and evaluation of respiratory care treatments, coordinating with physicians on treatment care plans, performing intubations, airway management and provision of life support intra-hospital and inter-hospital transportation to critical patients may include both adult and pediatric patients.  Job Requirement: Education/Experience: Equivalent to graduation from high school and successful completion of an approved school of Respiratory Therapy. The ARCP will be able to complete primary job duties in either PICU or NICU, AND will be able to at least complete job duties as a secondary in the other unit at the time of hire or within 90 days from the hire into this classification. Licensing/Certification Requirements: Credentialed by the NBRC as a Certified Respiratory Therapist (CRT) with 5 years of NICU/PICU primary experience OR a Registered Respiratory Therapist (RRT) with NICU/PICU primary experience at time of hire. Current licensure by the Nevada State Board of Medical Examiners as a Respiratory Care Practitioner. Basic Life Support (BLS) and Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS)Certificate From the American Heart Association (AHA). State of Nevada Blood Gas Technologist or Blood Gas General Laboratory Supervisor license at time of hire or within 90 days from date of hire into classification. NRP (AHA) required within 90 days of hire.  Knowledge, Skills, Abilities, and Physical Requirements: Knowledge of: Anatomy and physiology; blood gases; advanced respiratory and cardiology principles; dynamics of aerosol and IPPB therapy; respiratory care modalities for adults, pediatrics and neonatal patients when trained and competent; respiratory drug pharmacology; respiratory care equipment in use at facility; pulmonary rehabilitation techniques; patient acuity assessment methods; Hospital standards of care; department and hospital emergency response policies and practices; patient rights; age specific patient care practices; infection control policies and practices; handling, storage, use and disposal of hazardous materials.Skill in:Using mechanical ventilators; performing arterial blood gas sampling and analysis; applying cardiopulmonary resuscitation; surfactant replacement therapy administration; using computers for data entry and reporting; maintaining airway adjustments; transporting critical patients; maintaining ventilation equipment; communicating with a wide variety of people from diverse socio-economic and ethnic backgrounds; establishing and maintaining effective working relationships with all personnel contacted in the course of duties; efficient, effective and safe use of equipment; establishing and maintaining effective working relationships with all personnel contacted in the course of duties.Physical Requirements and Working Conditions:Mobility to work in a typical clinical environment and use standard equipment, stamina to remain standing and/or walk for extended periods of time, vision to read printed materials and a VDT screen, and hearing and speech to communicate effectively in person and over the telephone. Strength and agility to exert up to 50 pounds of force occasionally, and/or up to 20 pounds of force frequently to move objects, and/or up to 10 pounds of force constantly to move objects. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this classification. MPUMCLVSMUMCLV  #TrackingJobBody p{margin:10px 0 5px !important;}",P/D Advanced Respiratory Care Practitioner Job in Las Vegas,"Per Diem, Employee","Las Vegas, NV",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/p-d-advanced-respiratory-care-practitioner-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178857826.aspx?mescoid=2900493001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,2e39a794c0a3ac1f15dc7072d3cb5521
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:12:02:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maryland Creek Ranch Builders, LLC Vice Presidentof ConstructionMCRB is team oriented, high quality development and construction company in Silverthorne, CO. Qualifications: A minimum of 10 years of mountain construction experience. Multi-family and custom homes preferred. Ability to manage staff and daily operations for a significant long term construction project in Silverthorne, CO. Excellent communication skills. Microsoft software & PC knowledge. Full Time, Year Round Position with great benefits. Salary based on experience. EOE. Qualified applicants can email a resume to:lknightdaigle@mcrbuilders.com",Vice President of Construction Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,80498,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/vice-president-of-construction-job-silverthorne-co-us-179069949.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,bbbd3c1932fbcc49855e23610e42b6c5
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:12:01:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have experience in the RESTAURANT, RETAIL or HOSPITALITY industry and are looking for a CAREER rather than just a job?The Job Window is hiring a Marketing & Customer Service Assistant on behalf of our progressive marketing client in the Las Vegas area. This firm is looking to build its organization around a high-energy, hardworking individual with excellent customer service and communication skills. This firm respects the high level of people skills and hard work it requires to succeed in the customer service industry and they are looking for that experience to aid in servicing clients through creative marketing and promotional solutions.No more shift hours or doubles! No more relying on the tips that people give you!Our client is the leading marketing and advertising firm in Las Vegas. They work with clients from leading industries across the country with a strong focus in the promotional marketing industry! This firm has an internal training program where they create the next generation of branch managers from within! Our client is in immediate need of a Marketing & Customer Service Assistant who is passionate about sales & marketing, advertising, special events, and promotions to help manage new campaigns and acquire new clients.Responsibilities:Interact with consumers and represent some of the nation's largest clients to promote products and create a positive brand experience.Proactively identify new customer service techniques to increase brand loyalty and increased profit.Demonstrate key features of products on behalf of a large portfolio of consumer accounts.Collaborate with Client Relations Manager to support marketing campaign objectives.Complete subscription transaction paperwork to initiate or update any customer subscription setups, changes, etc.The Marketing & Customer Service Assistant should be a highly personable, ambitious, and proactive leader looking to excel within an entrepreneurial environment. Extensive training and full support of the management staff is provided. This is a career path that will require a high level of dedication and commitment from the candidate, and in return will result in great experience, accomplishments, and financial freedom!RequirementsStop working double shifts and start working for a company that offers:Advancement opportunities from entry level into human resources, management and consulting.Fun & exciting team environment.Full paid training.Fun company events and opportunity for travel.Qualifications:1-2 years’ experience in customer service, retail, restaurant/food service, sales, hospitality, and other customer service associated environments providing front-line, interactive customer support preferred.Understanding of customer service and promotional fundamentals including product positioning, pricing, market research, and distribution preferred.A positive and cheerful attitude towards customers and their requests.An ability to clearly communicate with other team members.Well organized with a high attention to detail.If you're tired of rotating shifts, no growth, or ""Last Call"" hours... Let this firm be your answer! For immediate consideration, submit your resume by hitting the APPLY button! Thank you for your interest and good luck!",Marketing & Customer Service Assistant Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89130",Retail;Advertising and PR Services;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-customer-service-assistant-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178570870.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,Customer Support/Client Care,08c15ed39f2db5ecb80ad8dd1c42445b
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:11:31:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Phlebotomy Manager is responsible for the day to day management of staff and operations related to biological specimen collection, processing and shipping activities for clinical research investigations.  This will include ensuring compliance according to protocols, Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs), Good Clinical Practices (GCPs), FDA regulations and other regulatory standards.HS Diploma with at least 3 years of management/supervisory experience with full and part time staff in a laboratory/medical, research or similar setting are required.  Must be able to prioritize projects and work schedules to ensure timely completion of projects.  Candidate must have very high attention to detail and follow up skills along with excellent communication skills both written and verbal.  Good computer skills including MS Word, Excel and experience using computerized clinical laboratory systems.  Candidate must be flexible to work all shifts including evenings and regular weekends as needed.  Current CPR certification is required.EOE",Manager,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-phlebotomy-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178146308.aspx?mescoid=3100561001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,82afa2a056853b8be7b2cc2da7d31807
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:11:29:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Henderson,Part Time Employee,"Henderson, NV",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-henderson-nv-us-178665663.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,bf8f633eba8f4074ced84bbff62689f7
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:10:05:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a BI with Oncology in Coral Gables, FL. The Business Intelligence Consultant is responsible for both Data Warehouse and non-Data Warehouse BI systems development, with some guidance from Supervisor or Team Lead. The Business Intelligence Consultant is also responsible for ensuring high levels of BI availability through support function design of data structures and in-depth testing. Responsibilities: Assess and cultivate long-term strategic goals for BI development in conjunction with end-users, managers, clients and other stakeholders Works closely with customers to understand business requirements and translate to appropriate technical solution to implement a BI solution to end users Develop and generate standard and ad-hoc reporting capabilities from new and existing data sourcesREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree and minimum 3 years of experience is required Experience in oncology is a must Excellent written and verbal communication skills Self-motivated with ability to learn new concepts and job requirements quickly In-depth knowledge of IS implementation life cycle with extensive analytical and Business Intelligence design skills Solid project management skills in planning and monitoring small to large projects in a cross-functional environment Strong problem-solving skills Knowledge and understanding of BI tool architectures, functions and features The BI main role is to strategically design and implement BI applications, including integration with databases and data warehouses This includes gathering requirements, selecting, blueprinting, designing, testing, and rolling out BI solutions to end users Experience in Clinical and Healthcare IT preferred Knowledge of relational database management, Data Warehouse Architecture, and BI tools are a must Experience in at least three of the following areas is essential: Create reports and report templates, Design, code, extract, manipulate, and load into a data model/data warehouse Strong project management skills and experience in all stages of development life cycle requiredKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",BI with Oncology Job in Coral Gables,"Full Time, Employee","Coral Gables, FL 33143",,http://jobview.monster.com/bi-with-oncology-job-coral-gables-fl-us-178897465.aspx?mescoid=2900544001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),24149ca0f5a201c93454aded00b6e0f1
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:09:58:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Data Entry Clerk Position Features:? Business Casual Environment? Variety Of Duties? Close To Great Lunch SpotsImmediate need for data entry specialist seeking business casual environment, variety of duties and close to great lunch spots. Strong attention to detail, ability to work independently and great typing speed will be keys to success in this stable organization. Will be responsible for fast & accurate data entry, efficiency in a fast paced working environment and general office duties for Hotels and Lodging company. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1107180 Job Experience:,,, Ability to type 50 WPM, enter 10000 KPH and proficiency in Microsoft Suite are a major plus!!!Years of Experience Required:",Data Entry Clerk - Business Casual Environment Job in Las Vegas,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-clerk-business-casual-environment-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178906988.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cc458bd0243113031895511ea53c2bb6
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:09:47:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description: Southwest Region – District Vice President Opening – North Texas DistrictThe following opportunity is for a qualified candidate to join the management team in the Southwest Region. We have an immediate opening for a District Vice President in our North Texas District. The district office is located in Plano, Texas. The District Vice President position will report directly to the Regional Vice President.The demographics of North Texas District include:•25 full-time advisors •Outstanding growth potential Job responsibilities associated with the District Vice President position include: •Motivate and lead financial advisors •Recruit, select and train all new financial advisors •Grow the business through new group acquisition •Coach and assist with ongoing advisor development •Embrace and promote company initiatives •Facilitate the sales of all products offered by AIG •Maintain current groups and increase participation levels •Address and solve business-related challenges as needed Additional duties and responsibilities as assigned by the Regional Vice President MON123 Position Requirements: The Ideal Candidate Should Have: •Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience •Extensive knowledge of Retirement Plan types and law •Minimum of 5 years’ experience in a similar role •Series 7, 24, 66, 51 and Life and Health licenses To be successful in this position, candidates must demonstrate strong communication and relationship-building skills in working with advisors, clients and the community. Candidates must also be a team player and embrace change.In addition, the successful candidate must possess and effectively demonstrate: strong leadership skills;knowledge of all VALIC product offerings;mentoring and coaching skills;ability to build customer loyalty; andsuperior planning and organizational skills About Us: American International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in more than 130 countries and jurisdictions. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. In addition, AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the United States.AIG Property Casualty is a global market leader, one of the few truly global property casualty franchises.AIG Life and Retirement is one of the largest life insurance organizations in the U.S., and provides protection, investment and income solutions needed for financial and retirement security.United Guaranty Corporation is the marketplace leader in mortgage insurance in the U.S.Additional information about AIG can be found at www.aig.com | YouTube: www.youtube.com/aig | Twitter: @AIG_LatestNews | LinkedIn: http://www.linkedin.com/company/aig",Job Details,,Location(s):,,http://job-openings.monster.com/monster/8abedfbb-78b5-4b87-90ec-7400ba74fab2?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,,8aff3609fc8a21867325672efa45140a
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:09:28:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Golden Corral®, we know that successful people are the foundation of our very successful company. We hire managers with the talent, integrity, and passion to promote our Caring Culture. We provide an environment that supports and empowers our people - not only to exceed our guests' expectations, but also to achieve their professional and personal goals. Golden Corral is always in search of excellent leaders for restaurant management opportunities. Talent...Focus...Commitment....Passion  These are just a few of the traits our most accomplished managers have in common. At Golden Corral, your ability to succeed is limited only by your energy and drive. Unequalled Opportunity at the Best Buffet in the USA! Job Responsibilities: In this entry-level, hourly management position, you are cross-trained in all skill positions within the restaurant and gain knowledge of operational tasks including ordering, receiving, storage, and menu planning. You work closely with the General and Associate Managers and complete a one year certification program including a series of modules designed to teach in-store management skills and a one-week classroom development course. Golden Corral offers paid training, benefits upon completion of training, and the opportunity for upward mobility. We are looking for hardworking individuals with some restaurant management experience who want to grow and develop with a top company.Other Requirements:  Position requires standing and walking for periods of 2-5 hours without a rest break, and task sequencing and the completion of complex administrative responsibilities. Frequent heavy (in excess of 25lbs.+) lifting and carrying, bending and reaching overhead is required. Work environment includes heavy customer contact, working with cooking equipment and slippery walking surfaces. Position is under minimum levels of day-to-day supervision. The successful completion of a background investigation and drug screen is also required. Compliance with position uniform standards and adherence to all company policies and house rules are required. One - two years' experience in the foodservice industry, preferably in a management capacity in a high volume restaurant with diversified menu offering.  Education and training associated with completion of a high school diploma and college coursework in hospitality or business is preferred.Golden Corral offers a variety of benefits designed to meet the particular needs of employees and their families. Benefits packages for Certified Assistant Managers include:Medical Insurance Dental Insurance Vision Insurance 5-Day Workweek Paid Vacation Education Fund Continual Training and Development during Career Are we the company for you? If so, please click on the application link to take a few minutes to complete our official online application so that our recruiters can evaluate if we have a position that may be the best fit for you. Upon completion of the application, you will be asked to complete a brief online assessment for further consideration for opportunities with Golden Corral. Your application will be kept on file for consideration for future openings. We thank you in advance for providing this detailed information and appreciate your interest in Golden Corral Corporation. Our commitment to valuing diversity helps create an environment where everyone can be successful. Find us on Facebook at:  http://www.facebook.com/pages/Golden-Corral-Careers/53336067800?ref=ts $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Assistant Restaurant Manager Job in Monroeville,"Full Time, Employee","Monroeville, PA 15140",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-restaurant-manager-job-monroeville-pa-us-178770454.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=9,,Food Services/Hospitality,5f4c2cf243539a9758716d42ae4959fe
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:09:22:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dynamic career opportunity with a growing organization.Client DetailsMy client is a market leader in gaming technology.DescriptionAct as a subject matter expert for the business and as a point of reference to address related queries in regards to AMLPerform review of client files on a periodic basis. This includes the review and sign-off of any Enhanced Due Diligence and Political Exposed Persons (""PEP"") as well as sample testing make sure the on-boarding was done correctly.Conduct investigations of suspicious behavior.Lead and conduct SAR committee meetings.Lead and maintain AML risk assessments.Provide expertise and support to the various Race and Sports Books.Develop and enhance internal processes by monitoring systems to ensure controls are effective and adequate. This includes identifying best practices, participation in external forums, and staying up-to-date of regulatory changes.Oversee and implement the company's KYC and due diligence compliance program.Ensure appropriate supervisory controls and oversight of the Controls & AML process in place for the Company.File and review SARs in addition to investigating SAIRs.Develop and maintain relationships with the industry on matters relating to financial crime and compliance in general. Profile5+ years experience of Gaming environment.Previous experience with AML within the Gaming/Corporate environment.Extensive experience with Title 31.Excellent experience with and knowledge of FinCEN regulations.Experience working with senior management is required.Law degree or advanced degree.Knowledge of LexisNexis, New Wave.Excellent PC skills including Word, Excel and PowerPoint.Job OfferFull benefits: health, vision, dentalDaily, catered lunchCar and cell phone budget401(k)",VP AML Compliance Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time , Employee","Las Vegas, NV",,http://jobview.monster.com/vp-aml-compliance-job-las-vegas-nv-us-179099444.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=4,,,421469b99beb92a72025f8504e8dabf9
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:09:21:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Head of Oncology Business Development and Licensing-POS_75043517-1DescriptionSanofi, an integrated global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi is organized around 5 Global Business Units (GBUs) that reflect its core areas of strengths: Diabetes/Cardiovascular, Sanofi Genzyme (focused on specialty businesses: rare diseases, oncology, immunology, and MS), Sanofi Pasteur (vaccines), General Medicine and Emerging markets (including generics and consumer healthcare), and Merial (Animal Health). Sanofi Genzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on rare diseases and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, which are marketed in countries around the world, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.This is an exciting time at Sanofi: our new CEO, Olivier Brandicourt, announced a new strategy in November 2015. Sanofi will remain a diversified company but with a more focused portfolio and four strategic priorities to 2020: • Reshape the portfolio, focusing on businesses where Sanofi can sustain leadership or build competitive positions • Deliver outstanding launches, with a particular focus on 6 major products• Sustain innovation in R&D, by strengthening the pipeline and delivering on key collaborations such as Regeneron, Alynylam, and Voyager• Simplify the organization. This includes reshaping the plant network, cost reduction to free up funds for reinvestment, and moving to the new global business unit organization. Sanofi is an equal opportunity employer that embraces diversity to foster positive, innovative thinking that will benefit people worldwide. Sanofi is also committed to employing qualified individuals with disabilities and, where warranted, will provide reasonable accommodation to applicants, as well as its employees.Sanofi Genzyme Specialty Care is seeking an experienced business development and strategy executives to take a leadership role as part of Genzyme's Strategy and Business Development team in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, cross-functional and global business environment. The incumbent will use their deep business expertise and industry knowledge to strengthen and expand Sanofi Genzyme's pipeline and portfolio of products by driving strategic business development and partnering initiatives for our Oncology franchise and therapeutic area. The position reports to the Head of Sanofi Genzyme Strategy and Business DevelopmentTitle: Head of Oncology Business Development and Licensing.POSITION OVERVIEW/KEY RESPONSIBILITIES: The successful candidate will be responsible for a broad range of business development activities including opportunity sourcing and review, due diligence, business case development, strategic and valuation analyses, transactional activities, and executing deals.Responsibilities• Lead business development transactions and strategy for a franchise and therapeutic area within Sanofi Genzyme• Lead and direct deal structuring, term sheet and contract development, terms and deal negotiation, and deal execution• Lead team and TA efforts to screen, evaluate, and prioritize external opportunities for collaborations, partnerships, in-licensing, structured transactions and acquisitions• Lead cross-functional teams including senior scientific, technical, finance, and commercial representatives to assess external technology and products• Lead and direct teams in business case development, financial modeling, and accounting and valuation analyses incorporating probability, time, cost, budget impacts, and returns to allow for optimal strategic and investment decision making• Develop and maintain relationships with a wide array of industry participants including management teams of biotech companies, venture capitalists, academic institutions, and investigators, and investment bankers• Represent Sanofi Genzyme at industry, investor, and partnering conferences• Establish relationships and trust while collaborating across all levels of the organization (Executive, R&D, Commercial, Finance, Legal, Regulatory, Manufacturing, etc.)• Present opportunities and make recommendations to executive managementQualificationsBASIC QUALIFICATIONS:BA/BS required; MBA, MD or biomedical PhD is very strongly preferred7+ years of relevant business experience directly related to biotech/pharma industriesValid passport and ability to travel domestically and internationally 20-30%Demonstrated track record of successfully in negotiating and executing partnership/licensing/acquisition deals in pharma and/or biotechPREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:Preferred Qualifications• Experience implementing partnerships within a biotech/pharma organization• Experience as a creative thought leader in deal structuring and execution• Strong judgment and decision-making skills• Result-oriented with highly developed analytical and organizational skills• Extensive finance and accounting skills; strong understating of deal accounting and deal structuring; experience working with external auditors• Demonstrated ability to work in a complex matrix and cross-cultural environment• Established network in the biotech, pharma, and VC industries• Excellent written and verbal communication skills and strong presentation skills• Experience in oncology• Superb strategist who a proven track record of originating new initiatives• Multi-country or multi-functional experience• Demonstrated ability to lead and develop high performing teams• Experience in biotech/pharma strategy consulting, investment banking, or marketingJob:Business DevelopmentPrimary Location:United States-Massachusetts-Cambridge (U.S.)Job Posting:Jan 11, 2017, 10:39:04 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regularp.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal, p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast,font{font-size: 12px !important;font-family: Verdana,Arial,Helvetica,sans-serif !important;}",Head of Oncology Business Development and Licensing Job in Cambridge,"Full Time, Employee","Cambridge , MA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/head-of-oncology-business-development-licensing-job-cambridge-ma-us-179046269.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=18,,General/Other: Business/Strategic Management,962a1e8b2f0d12e43ca4bb024d618f9f
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:08:36:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Loan Originators are members of the company's sales force and are expected to work primarily in the field generating new loans making and maintaining contacts with various referral sources.What You Will Be Doing• Spend more than fifty (50) percent of his or her work time away from office, generating and selling loans offered and soliciting new borrowers and referral sources such as realtors, builders, and financial planners. • Maintains relationships with referral sources.• Meet with prospective clients in person at their place of business to sell loans.• In-person calls to real estate agents, builders, financial planners and other referral sources.• When working in the office, time will be spent on taking loan applications; preparing loan files; attending meetings; completing paperwork; preparing marketing and sales materials; and calling, writing to, or communicating by email with borrowers, prospective borrowers and referral sources. • Comprehends all functions of a real estate transaction in order to advise borrower regarding the same. • Become knowledgeable and adhere to all applicable state and federal laws and/or regulations including, but not limited to, the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, Truth-in-Lending Act, Fair Housing Act, and any related state mortgage banking laws, as well as the rules and ethics of the mortgage banking industry and HUD. • Comprehends financial markets and stays informed of changes relevant to the mortgage industry, including local housing trends, markets and interest rates.• Markets and promotes the various loan products offered. • Handle multiple tasks simultaneously.• Participate in proactive team efforts to achieve departmental and company goals.• Participate by example through the sharing of knowledge and skill to promote a positive team work environment. • Comply with all safety policies, practices and proceduresWhat You Need for this Position• Bachelor’s Degree, preferably in finance, business administration or related field, from a four-year college or university is preferred and• 1-2 years of industry- related experience and/or training are required. A combination of equivalent education and industry-related experience is a acceptable. • Language skill required is ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals or governmental regulations.• Ability to write reports and business correspondence.• Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.• Language skill include the ability to read and interpret instructions, documents and manuals; write routine reports and correspondence; speak effectively before groups of customers, employees or vendors.• Required is that of basic personal computing including electronic mail, word processing, spreadsheets, graphics, etc.For your hard work and dedication, earn a generous salary plus comprehensive benefit package and the opportunity to grow your career path! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Loan Originator (% of the time will be remote) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Nyna Goldberg,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/loan-originator-50-of-the-time-will-be-remote-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178594311.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=3,,,e1ec1262ebb6828720aafd1612ecb837
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:08:36:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Principal Java Developer in Doral, Florida (FL).Responsibilities: Design and Delivery of complex software projects Build solutions in an agile workflow Architect and prototype new solutions and ideas Review code of other team members and provide technical feedback and/or other mentoring duties Scaling software as use of your application grows Mentoring others in the organization Stay up-to-date on the latest industry trends and look for ways to implement new ideas to continually improve your projectsREQUIREMENTS: BS in Computer Science or related discipline Minimum 10 years of experience in software development using Java and related technologies Experienced in Scrum and Agile Methodologies Minimum 5 years of experience developing solutions using Spring Framework Demonstrated experience with Java including project and dependency management with tools like Maven or Gradle Experienced with Web Development using JavaScript Frameworks / Libraries Proven ability to design scalable web services, preferably RESTful Understanding of Java concurrency Experience with Cloud computing (AWS) and No SQL databases (Cassandra) or SOLR is a big plus Experience building Integration solutions using Spring Integration or Camel Experienced building out solutions using workflow tools like Activiti, JMS provider like ActiveMQ Experienced with software practices of Continuous Integration and automated testing Commitment to understanding the business domain Commitment to incorporating quality software practices into all phases of the project life lifecycle Strong problem solving and decision making skills Team player with very good communication skills Self-motivated professional who demonstrates strong technical agility and responsiveness and who is eager to learn and grow within a consulting-like Technology Services organizationKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Principal Java Developer Job in Miami,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Miami, FL 33178",,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-java-developer-job-miami-fl-us-178910819.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),522d75b0f7e683697c8c6f2fbe9ecdfc
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:08:14:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-TimeBrookdale GreenHills Cumberlnd 15 Burton Hills Blvd Nashville, TN 37215Job #: BSL000161244As our dishwasher/kitchen helper you'll play an important part in providing our residents with excellent meals and service.This is a great opportunity for someone looking to gain commercial kitchen experience and eventually work as a cook, server or chef.While your primary roles include washing dishes and keeping the kitchen clean, you'll gain valuable experience helping us prepare meals.You'll also get the chance to interact with residents by setting and clearing tables, bringing out food and cleaning the dining area.And you won't have to worry about late-night hours. This position offers a family-friendly schedule.Your responsibilities would include:* Operating a dish machine to wash dishes, glasses, cups, trays, silverware and food service equipment* Setting up and cleaning the dish machine area; checking temperatures and soap dispensing levels* Preparing food for meals* Assisting in maintaining preparation and service areas in a sanitary condition* Emptying garbage and moving trash to dump siteBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Required skills and qualifications:* High school diploma or GED* Previous restaurant experience preferred* Obtain and hold any local or state required food handling/supervision/sanitation licenses and/or certifications* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Dishwasher / Kitchen Helper Job in Nashville,Part Time Employee,"Nashville, TN 37215",Restaurant/Food Services Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/dishwasher-kitchen-helper-job-nashville-tn-us-178283663.aspx?mescoid=3500609001001&jobPosition=19,,Food Services/Hospitality,bd6e142fff6a27a29d41548d60e58f8b
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:08:05:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Desktop Technician for a 1-day project on 1/16/17 starting at 8:00am in Las Vegas, Nevada (NV). There is a 3-hour minimum for the project. The purpose of this project is to simply swap an old PC with a new one and then drop the old PC off at a FedEx location. This is a one-day project, but upon successful completion will add you to our bench for future projects in the area.REQUIREMENTS: An ideal candidate will have an A+ or Net+ Certification (preferred) and professional experience in a live IT environment (preferred) Any relevant education and/or training will be considered a plus Reliable transportationKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Desktop Technician Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Las Vegas, NV 89144",,http://jobview.monster.com/desktop-technician-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178279966.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=19,19.00 - 19.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),99f2441d7e25141f2b6402312dbf4bae
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:08:04:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a locally operated Propane Gas and Fuel Oil distributor seeking an experienced Propane Operations ManagerThe successful candidate must have a solid background in Operations Management, Routing and Scheduling, Route Distribution, Employee Training, Sales, Customer Service and P&amp;L Management.We are looking for an individual with a strong supervisory background, preferably in the Propane Gas, Utility Natural Gas, Fuel Oil, Industrial Plumbing, Gas Appliance Repair or Gas HVAC business. Qualifications:Responsibilities include interviewing, hiring, and training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems.The Manager is responsible for assisting all employees in meeting the requirements of their individual positions, and for ensuring that all facilities and employees meet or exceed the required safety standards.* Proven track record of success in managing a large district operation.* Develop a Sales and  Growth Action Plan for assigned territory.* Exercises a leadership role that supports and champions customer service as a TOP PRIORITY.* A track record of building a good team, developing and retaining good employees.Ensuring compliance with safety policies, DOT compliance and Hazmat.We are a growth oriented company with opportunity for advancement. Give us a call if we can be of further help or you have any questions. Jim SteinLPGasJobs541-408-9838E-Mail  Careers@LPGasJobs.comwww.LPGasJobs.comOr Fax your correspondence to Jim Stein - 866-583-6330 Report","LPGasJobs - AG Job Application for Propane Operations Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jim Stein Phone 541-408-9838 Fax 866-583-6330,Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/propane-operations-manager-job-mount-airy-nc-us-179207044.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=5,,,c8b2c5decf3c4083a73838a5bd9f71c9
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:07:06:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Based in the beautiful city of Las Vegas, we are an internationally known company focusing on fluid and pump technology! We have been in the business for decades and are constantly pushing boundaries of our niche market. Our technology and products are one of a kind! No one else in our industry can come close to our future advancements. We are looking for an experienced Design Engineer with passion and dedication to make a global impact to join our brilliant team!Top Reasons to Work with Us- Culture: Amazing working environment! - Growth: Unlimited growth potential!- Benefits: Generous benefit package!- Relocation Assistance: Up to $5,000 of reimbursement! (Outside of Nevada)What You Will Be Doing- Prepares proposals to include pump and equipment selections, scope of supply, technical deviations- Works with NCI Engineering to ensure proper selection of products being quoted- International and domestic travel to support customer meetings when required- Works with Sales Directors and other sales personnel to ensure customers are provided with required information- Communicates with customers directly to answer technical questions and respond to bid clarifications- Attend meetings and provide support for improvements in the proposal and sales process, sales database, and all other related activities- Provide support for marketing activities with respect to proposal data, product improvements and product developmentWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Bidding- Proposal- Solidworks- EncompixEducation (MUST):- Bachelor’s in Mechanical EngineeringWhat's In It for You- Vacation/PTO- Medical- Dental- Vision- 401(k)So, if you are a Centrifugal Pump Application Engineer with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Centrifugal Pump Application Engineer - Major Pump Manufacturer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name James Thai,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/centrifugal-pump-application-engineer-major-pump-manufacturer-job-north-las-vegas-nv-us-178650771.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=12,,,c85b5dccd0c5fc14d65bc6fee9d72748
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:07:05:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a key member  of the Interactive Platform D&D team, the Technical Engagement Manager works closely with different groups and stakeholders, Agile Directors, Enterprise Architect, other entities to facilitate technical communications and coordinate the delivery, resolve issues of multiple projects from globally diverse teams.  The Technical Engagement Manager is responsible for ensuring that project delivery is of high quality, globally consistent, strategically aligned, and meets customer requirements Technical Engagement Manager’s primary responsibility is to coordinate and facilitate timely and consistent  interaction of the globally disparate teams that contribute to the overall delivery of commercially available products Timely closure of queries and issues different teams like systems and NMG Provide stakeholders with timely and accurate information to be used in corrective or business as usual progress initiatives Provides technical consultation to local teams and global team within the organization consistent with the architectural principals of the Enterprise Architect Work on some stories that interfaces with other products Successfully communicating conceptual  ideas and design rationale to culturally diverse audiences Keeps the team members informed of changes in design decisions, processes and policies. Assists in the definition and implementation of solutions that will improve the global consistency of product performance, quality, processes and standards. Ensures team members are following agreed product designs and Aristocrat’s guidelines and coding standards. Mentors and guides team members on proper use of Aristocrat approved technology. Ensures the production of quality software artifacts from  teams and any issue resolutions Ensure quality code is delivered by teams to avoid broken builds that can cause delays to the team. Certifies that teams follow Company programming standards. Focused on cross team success. Works well in a team environment. Assists team members in all areas to achieve successful sprints and retrospectively provides feedback for continuous improvement. Strong understanding of the Agile scrum methodology and how to work within an agile scrum environment across geographic boundaries. Performs other duties as assigned.",Software Engineer Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89119","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/software-engineer-job-las-vegas-nv-us-176347349.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2daa8149f130e44900ced28e59e5194e
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:06:57:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary RETAIL RESET MERCHANDISER KROGER PART TIME   Do you enjoy being creative and working independently? Our part time Retail Reset Merchandiser job needs an independent individual who has great attention to detail. This position is responsible for showcasing brand name products inside Kroger stores, to increase sales and product exposure. The ideal candidate will be able to build and maintain attractive displays, which will help create brand awareness and increase sales. If this sounds like you, then take this chance to join a company that offers competitive pay rates and top-notch training. Advantage Solutions jobs provide an opportunity to work with the leading sales and marketing agency in all of North America.   RESPONSIBILITIES:   Reset Activity, Shelf Conditions and Schematics Completion Implement customer approved schematics/Plan-O-Grams/MODs with all items tagged and approved by store management Must be able to take direction regarding tagging, rotating and placing products on shelf Administration/Reporting: Will complete (web based) accurate and timely reporting, recaps, timesheets, expense reports, etc.   QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or equivalent  Previous retail experience (preferred) Strong self-management skills Ability to complete daily procedures and responsibilities without direct supervision Ability to communicate effectively both internally to Advantage Solutions management and externally with Customers Must demonstrate good judgment and show respect for others  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Retail Reset Merchandiser Kroger Part Time Job in Las Vegas,Part Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-reset-merchandiser-kroger-part-time-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178663875.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,bb9b4a486a27e61549d6ed5717fd049f
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:06:31:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details: Job Title               :  Sr. Business Analyst Location               :  OMAHA, NE - 68124 Duration               :  6 months contract   Job Description:  Primary Job Duties and Responsibilities (Essential Job Functions) Lead identification and documentation of business rules and acceptance criteria for capital as well as operations and maintenance projects for development of new software applications or enhancing existing ones. Create screen and report mockups as appropriate. (60 – 70%) Analyze or lead the analysis of business processes to determine appropriate improvements, business rules, and acceptance criteria, to facilitate the delivery of application development and support services as well as formulating plans to address future enhancements to ensure business and information technology alignment of resources and priorities. (20 – 30%) Lead user groups in assessing enhancement alternatives and in identifying and prioritizing system enhancement and change requests. (10 – 20%) Perform research and fact-finding to develop business rules, acceptance criteria, screen and report mockups, processes and process improvements. (10 – 20%) Act and liaison between business and information technology. (5 – 10%) Perform any additional responsibilities as assigned. (0-5%)   Communications / Contacts Internal – IT management and staff; other business groups   External – Contractors Performance Expectations (Key Success Factors) Demonstrated advanced understanding of principles of Agile software development methodology. Demonstrated ability to lead multi-disciplined teams in gathering business rules and acceptance criteria for Agile projects. Demonstrated ability to apply advanced analytical skills to solving complex business and software application problems. Demonstrated ability to establish and maintain strong relationships. Demonstrated ability to participate on tams that result in contribution to achievement of team goals and objectives. Demonstrated ability to perform assignments with little direction, within determined timeframes, and with high degree of accuracy. Maintain the professional competence, knowledge and skills necessary to effectively complete responsibilities; enhance job knowledge and abilities by taking personal responsibility for professional development and training. Maintain sensitive and confidential information regarding company information. Adhere to and support all company policies and procedures, including workplace safety rules.   Position Requirements Bachelor’s degree in information systems, computer science or related technical field; or equivalent work experience. (Typically six years of related, progressive work experience would be needed for candidates applying for this position who do not possess a bachelor’s degree.) Four years or more of demonstrated experience in business analyst, programmer analyst and/or systems analyst role on Agile projects. Demonstrated experience with Microsoft Office applications including Microsoft Project and Enterprise Project Management. Knowledge of the gas industry is a plus. Experience with project methodologies including project management tools, estimating, and documentation of requirements, use cases and test plans. Effective oral and written communications skills, including presentation, training and interpersonal skills. Effective analytical, problem solving and decision-making skills. Ability to prioritize and handle multiple tasks and projects concurrently.   Thanks and  Regards, Vikas Vaishnav IT Resource Specialist ASK Staffing Inc., | Global Delivery Center Direct: 678-487-8561 Email: vikasv@askstaffing.com",Sr. Business Analyst Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE 68124",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-business-analyst-job-omaha-ne-us-179162032.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=17,,Business/Strategic Management,85d369c3fc64c11b3856d8a636659ba4
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:06:27:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window has an exciting opening on behalf of our client, one of the fastest and most successful marketing and advertising firms in the Las Vegas area and they are currently going through a nationwide expansion.Get your foot in the door and grow within our client’s company. They are looking to train the right individual to become a Marketing Manager.You might get along with our client if…? If you like to laugh (think Mitch Hedberg, The Hangover, Tosh.0, Step Brothers, etc.)? If you are not a Negative Nancy or Debbie Downer? If sometimes you’ll look down at your watch 3 consecutive times and still not know what time it is? If you totally take back all those times you didn’t want to nap when you were younger?  If you feel there is great need for a sarcasm font? Job hunting can be stressful, that’s why you shouldn’t take yourself too seriously. Our client is now hiring for an entry level Marketing Manager. Their expanding firm has had a very successful past developing entry level candidates into competitive representatives that in turn become top performing Marketing Managers.They are currently seeking an entry level candidate with the “winning mindset” to develop a very lucrative business career.  Our client WANTS to develop and train their own people from the ground up, starting with entry level sales and marketing. Candidate promotion and pay is based on performance starting at the entry level and is NOT based on seniority. This is an entry level sales and marketing position.RequirementsOUR CLIENT DOES NOT DO DOOR-TO-DOOR SALES OR STRAIGHT COMMISSION.Our client’s company policy is to train people from scratch, so only send your resume if one of the following applies:1.      You have a sense of humor (in case you didn’t get that earlier)2.      You work with the utmost honesty and integrity3.      You work harder than everyone you know and put 100% into your work4.      Individuals must be hard working, motivated, and willing to learn5.      Must have excellent communication skills, be goal oriented and ambitious6.      Willing to be trained in sales, customer service, campaign management, test market development and public relations This is a great position for the right candidate. If you believe you are up for the challenge, please submit your resume today!",Direct Marketing Manager Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89130",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/direct-marketing-manager-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178369122.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=1,,Customer Support/Client Care,9a58d534166c75ac7cc70eff7731fac4
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:06:25:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director Portfolio Services. Immediate opportunity for a Director of Portfolio Services to oversee and direct the collection activities, ensure compliance with policy and procedure, and establish divisional goals. EmployerWork for a luxury vacation timeshare that provides its members with an exceptional vacation experience. With access to over 3,700 resorts worldwide, and flexibility in their travel options, allows for a continual growing member base.Director of Portfolio Services Job DutiesAs the Director of Portfolio Services you will be responsible for the collection activities in a call center atmosphere for a 10+ member team, develop and manage collection strategies, provide analysis and recommendations on delinquency statistics, and staffing performance. Ideal CandidateThe ideal candidate will have worked in a call center environment managing and leading collection activity, developing and coaching staff, provide strategy for collections, understand a client portfolio. Candidate will manage a team of 10+ representatives. Job Requirements2+ years of timeshare collections and strong knowledge of timeshare/hotel/resort/travel industry is a MUST!Commitment to Excellence in Customer Service.Experience with collection analytics and call center statistics.Strong written and oral communication skills including effective interpersonal skills.Salary Range & Benefits$85-$100 Depending On ExperienceHealth, Wellness, Flexible Spending Account, Employee Stock Option Purchase Plan, and Healthcare on site are just a few of the multitude of benefits offered.Application ProcessOnce we know you are interested, a Randstad Recruiter will review your resume and contact you to better understand your skills and toll you more about the opportunity. We will meet qualified candidates face to face and our best talent interview with the employer fact to face-we will move quickly.Interviewing now! Click Apply to submit your resume or email jennifer.parkhurst@randstadusa.com. Not ready to apply but want to learn more; please call Jennifer Parkhurst at 702-734-1110",Director,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-portfolio-services-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178762376.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=5,"85,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,4568dd675bdc64e595cc413caf9279a0
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:05:52:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Culinary / Dietary Aide - Full Time - PM Shift - Medical Hill - Oakland, CA ( Job Number: 297827 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Be part of the food team that makes sure our residents' meals not only taste good, but are also good for them. Assist with preparing and serving food as well as cleaning equipment, utensils, and food service areas. You'll enjoy getting to know our residents and they'll certainly appreciate what you do for them.Responsibilities: Prepare resident trays according to instructions/order; employ proper food handling techniques in preparation of food and setting up/serving trays; deliver food, nourishments and supplies to nursing units or other areas as assigned Put stock in food storage areas and refrigerators as assigned Clean, wash and sanitize dishes, silverware and utensils used to serve residents and others Assist in maintaining the general cleanliness of the dishwashing area; clean work area and equipment as assigned. Use proper infection control techniques and protective equipment as needed; perform all duties using proper safety techniques. Attend and participate in in-service education opportunities Perform other duties as assigned Dietary Aide Food Preparation Dietician Nutrition Services Food Services Food Server Meal Server #MON-NCD Qualifications Must have knowledge of safe food preparation and handling techniques and work cooperatively as a member of a team. Should be patient and polite and able to communicate effectively with residents, their family members, other staff, referral sources and physicians. Education at the tenth grade level or above is desirable, along with experience in a dietary department, or large volume food preparation and service. Must be able to read, speak and understand the English language. Should understand the principles of growth and development for the entire life span and be able to provide appropriate care for adolescent, adults and geriatric residents. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Food Services Primary Location : CA-Oakland-Kindred Trans. Care & Rehab-Medical Hill Organization : 0603 - Kindred Trans. Care & Rehab-Medical Hill Shift : Evening",Culinary / Dietary Aide - Full Time - PM Shift - Medical Hill - Oakland,"Full Time, Employee","Culinary / Dietary Aide - Full Time - PM Shift - Medical Hill - Oakland, CA ( Job Number: 297827 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Be part of the food team that makes sure our residents' meals not only taste good, but are also good for them. Assist with preparing and serving food as well as cleaning equipment, utensils, and food service areas. You'll enjoy getting to know our residents and they'll certainly appreciate what you do for them.Responsibilities: Prepare resident trays according to instructions/order; employ proper food handling techniques in preparation of food and setting up/serving trays; deliver food, nourishments and supplies to nursing units or other areas as assigned Put stock in food storage areas and refrigerators as assigned Clean, wash and sanitize dishes, silverware and utensils used to serve residents and others Assist in maintaining the general cleanliness of the dishwashing area; clean work area and equipment as assigned. Use proper infection control techniques and protective equipment as needed; perform all duties using proper safety techniques. Attend and participate in in-service education opportunities Perform other duties as assigned Dietary Aide Food Preparation Dietician Nutrition Services Food Services Food Server Meal Server #MON-NCD Qualifications Must have knowledge of safe food preparation and handling techniques and work cooperatively as a member of a team. Should be patient and polite and able to communicate effectively with residents, their family members, other staff, referral sources and physicians. Education at the tenth grade level or above is desirable, along with experience in a dietary department, or large volume food preparation and service. Must be able to read, speak and understand the English language. Should understand the principles of growth and development for the entire life span and be able to provide appropriate care for adolescent, adults and geriatric residents. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Food Services Primary Location : CA-Oakland-Kindred Trans. Care & Rehab-Medical Hill Organization : 0603 - Kindred Trans. Care & Rehab-Medical Hill Shift : Evening",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/culinary-dietary-aide-full-time-pm-shift-medical-hill-oakland-ca-job-oakland-ca-us-178892754.aspx?mescoid=2900523001001&jobPosition=7,,Food Services/Hospitality,f77617ef9bf4c60d206894e121d5b367
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:05:51:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"TIMET Overview Titanium Metals Corporation (“TIMET”) offers a full range of titanium products, including ingot and slab, forging billet and mill forms. TIMET, a Division of Precision Cast Parts (PCC), is a worldwide, diversified manufacturer of complex metal components and products that serves the aerospace, power, and general industrial markets.  PCC has over 160 plants and has a presence in twenty-six states in the US and in over a dozen countries.  PCC is relentless in its dedication to being a high-quality, low-cost and on-time producer; delivering the highest value to its customers and shareholders while continually pursuing strategic, profitable growth.  On January 29, 2016, PCC became an independent subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, Inc.   Job Summary Devise and carry out projects and conduct evaluations of products and components for TIMET/PCC operations and customers. An engineer at this level is expected to be capable of working with minimal supervision and of providing clear direction to technician staff supporting those projects and evaluations. Participate in multidisciplinary teams and capable of reporting and presenting work outside the company. Support production operations as well as completing Research Projects that contribute to long term growth in sales revenues. Support to internal and external customers particularly in support of TIMET Marketing strategies is also a major contribution of R&D engineers. The R&D department is the center of TIMET’s metallurgical knowledge. As such, R&D engineers are expected to develop high-level expertise in areas that support operational activities. Thus R&D engineers are expected to provide the Corporation with academic excellence combined with knowledge of operational realities. Essential Functions Conduct evaluations of products/components for TIMET/PCC companies and its customers and/or provide direct support for production – 40% Conduct process/product development activities in support of TIMET– 25% Provide technical support in response to inquiries made to TIMET – 20% Contribute to longer term R&D projects (e.g., alloy development, process technology) by conducting projects consistent with the R&D strategy. – 15% Travel: up to 20% and maintain a valid Driver’s License. Additional Responsibilities Commitment to “Supply Chain” Improvement and Customer Focus. Strong facilitation, communication, and presentation skills. The ability to organize and manage multiple priorities.   Education and Experience BS or MS in materials, mechanical, or aeronautical engineering with an emphasis on engineering metals from an accredited university. 2 years of work experience preferred. Engineering experience at OEM, fabricator, or material manufacturer preferred.   Relevant experience in one or more of the following fields is required: Primary metal manufacturing/processing Heat treatment of aerospace alloys Titanium metallurgy Titanium fabrication/forming Process-Microstructure-Property relationships Competencies Outstanding written and oral communication skills, particularly with technical reports and presentations. Analytical and creative thinking and the ability to clearly communicate such ideas/concepts. Experience in SEM, microanalysis, and EBSD analysis is preferred Sound reasoning skills and decision making. Ability to work independently with little supervision and high personal accountability. Ability to effectively work in diverse multi-disciplinary teams. Special Skills A degree in metallurgy or relevant engineering/scientific discipline is required. Previous work experience in an industrial or academic R&D setting is required. In exceptional circumstances relevant experience may replace a formal qualification. 2-3 Years relevant experience in a research or development role in manufacturing particularly in the aerospace sector is desired. The position requires sound scientific/research reasoning skills to provide support relevant to the customer or operations. Good general computer skills are essential. Click Here To Applyhttps://precast.mua.hrdepartment.com/pm_module/cgi-bin/click.cgi?job_id=13268&site_id=35",Research Engineer - Metallurgy Job in Henderson,Full Time,"Henderson, NV 89015",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/research-engineer-metallurgy-job-henderson-nv-us-179225303.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=9,,,895f3eeb2bf5ffd8905279d179f72c57
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:05:30:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have a passion for products? Do you want to build a business from the ground up? Do you have proven analytical capabilities, exceptional communication, project management skills, and the ability to multi-task and thrive in a fast-paced environment? If yes, you should consider Amazon Private Label. The US Private Label team is looking for a customer-obsessed Sr. Product Manager to help drive one of the most exciting categories at Amazon.com. In this role, you will be in charge of:- Building and managing a new business from the ground up. - Identifying new product development opportunities for our brands and bringing them to market.- Coordinating product development across international, cross-functional teams.- Designing and implementing new processes to help scale the business. The ideal candidate should be passionate about products, have strong product development and process design skills as well as outstanding project management abilities. S/he should excel in both strategic thinking and tactical execution, as responsibilities range from creating business plans to driving product development. The candidate should also feel comfortable dealing with ambiguity and working in a very entrepreneurial environment. The Sr. Product Manager will interact with and influence multiple teams across the organization (US and global).Traits of success:Understand market trends and build business cases for new product opportunities.Manage product lifecycle from ideation through commercialization.Be a smart, hard-working and creative person who loves products, loves solving difficult problems and ""getting it done.""Be comfortable collaborating and influencing team members including retail, sourcing, legal, patent, social compliance and product compliance.Be responsible for building and executing on new initiatives and roadmaps each year.Partner with country teams to launch products globally.Have the technical aptitude to quickly grasp complex technical issues and communicate directly with technical teams. 3 years in product management and/or project management is required Bachelor’s degree in either a technology or business discipline Proficiency in Excel Strong analytical skills Strong verbal and written communication skills MBA preferred Competence with SQL (basic queries) Ability to manage multiple projects - work prioritization, planning and task delegation Proven track record of taking ownership and driving results on technical projects Exceptional communication, analytical and problem solving skills Knowledge of Ecommerce Experience within a consumer goods/retail company",Sr. Product Manager - Private Label Job in Seattle,Full Time,"Seattle, WA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-product-manager-private-label-job-seattle-wa-us-178383322.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2f286eff57c5be3aca629213b872456b
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:05:28:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"***Warning*** No SLUG Zone. If you don't deserve a 6 figure income, you need not apply! If you are a slug that likes to wait for things to happen, you need not apply! If you aren’t into taking responsibility for your career, you need not apply! If you aren’t into growing and learning, please contact the next employer on the list. If you are into making excuses and passing the buck please call our competition. If you are Johnny Jobhopper and just looking for the next place to land, land elsewhere.The Job Window has an exciting opportunity for a Sales Professional on behalf of our client, a progressive marketing firm located in Las Vegas.If you are ready to take responsibility, build quality relationships with our team and clients, increase sales, make a positive impact on a team, be a member of our community, follow through, move the needle, continue to grow personally, make something happen, and help us continue to grow our client’s business you have found the right spot. If you are willing to:Work 40 hours per week.Cultivate and grow business with friends and families.Develop lasting customer relationships.Our client is looking for a winner to join their team of high performance sales professionals. They are Las Vegas's fastest growing and most progressive marketing firm.RequirementsThe ideal candidate will be able to manage their own business-within-a-business, hit our client’s high standards, take massive amounts of action, have lots of fun and grow fast with our client’s company. This firm understands that a compensation package must be aggressive to continue to build our team.Our client offers a salary plus commissions, flexible scheduling, and ongoing training. Benefits are based on performance not tenure. You'll be surrounded with winners driven to be the best.What are you waiting for?Here’s what you have to look forward to if you can make the cut as a Sales Professional:You'll get the best training in the business and the support of a super team.The most creative aggressive marketing and sales strategy in the market.Sales management team whose primary objective is to help you grow and succeed, not demotivate you with brow beatings and negative B.S. Competitive compensation package with an hourly rate plus performance bonuses. Who knows? It may be the best move you ever make….you’ll never know unless you try!   Our client specializes in in-store promotional marketing, sales, and customer acquisitions. Through their innovative approach to direct marketing, they are able to offer their clients 100% return on their marketing investments - a statement few other marketing companies can make.By focusing their efforts on an in-store, face to face, relationship-based marketing approach, they are able to bring clients life-long customers with increased name-brand recognition and sales and high levels of customer loyalty.Our client’s goal is to see leaders develop, both personally and professionally.  They prove their results to clients through the continual growth of their business throughout the United States.",Sales Professional Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89130",Retail;Telecommunications Services;Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-professional-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178973065.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,Customer Support/Client Care,5b5f4761b841760fa69bd02ee45cd771
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:04:29:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PROFILE:Staffs and professionally develops a sales team of direct reports (primarily AE) and assists them in career planning. Directs and manages the sales activities and performance of the team. Drives business results by achieving revenue equipment contribution targets. Leverages the customer base and champions the expansion of services across the business line.JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESLeads, motivates, and counsels the sales team, to meet or exceed budgeted sales revenue, gross profit, unit placement, expense and equipment contributions projections while maintaining teamwork and the highest level of customer service.Responsible for up to $3-$4.8 million for revenue expectations and for selling expense limitations.Plans, coaches, trains, advises, and reviews with individual sales representative their progress in achieving individual and team revenue targets and assist them in their career planning, training and growth; recommends and facilitates appropriate development opportunities.Manages SMART process through Account Planning sessions, territory reviews, RAPs, Sales Manager RAP and GOAL Setting.Schedules and hosts periodic informational team meetings and team-building exercises. Supports and advocates headquarter initiatives.Manages day-to-day employee relations' issues.Aligns sales representative's approach and customer understanding with RICOH's strategic direction.Facilitates a team-based, inclusive work environment to promote sales across the business line and drive employee and customer retention.Ensures reports are conducting strategic account planning with key customer accounts.Builds Tier 2 account structure and territories for sales representatives.Recruits, interviews and hires sales professionals.Works with customer and appropriate internal staff to resolve customer issues and complaints.Proactively builds an internal and external pipeline of sales representative candidates and introduce RICOH's products and services via outreach efforts.Evaluates performance data.Participates in fiscal year business planning.Measures success of cross business line salesFacilitates communication and cooperation between team and marketplaces.Performs other duties as assigned.QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Experience, and Certifications)Typically Required:4-year college degree or equivalent in a related field.3 years industry related sales experience with sales management experience.Ricoh is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer -- Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled.",Commercial Sales Manager Job in Alexandria,Full Time/ Employee,"Commercial Sales Manager Job in Alexandria 22314, Virginia US",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-sales-manager-job-alexandria-va-us-179182639.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=2,,Business/Strategic Management,ed6b184e925a80d9fb673f161175c68f
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:04:28:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Registered Nurse (RN) - OR Circulator - Las Vegas, NV USr Healthcare is currently looking for a Registered Nurse (RN) - OR Circulator for facilities in Las Vegas, NV. Qualifications: Current State RN licensureOne Year Recent OR Circulating ExperienceBLS from the American Heart AssociationGraduate of an accredited nursing program If interested, please click APPLY to submit your resume for consideration. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlansox/cjt1/01.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",USR Healthcare Job Application for Registered Nurse (RN) - OR Circulator - Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name USR Healthcare,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-or-circulator-las-vegas-nv-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178704927.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=4,,,90e1d505c051f2e04bc780ae2816c359
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:04:28:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Administrative Assistant: Up to $50,000/yearAbout the Job:Growth driven company is seeking an administrative assistant. To be part of this team the right candidate will provide support to management by scheduling appointments, organizing and maintaining paper and electronic files and providing a pleasant and informative rapport with client?le. Skills/Responsibilities:? Excellent computer skills used for various applications, such as database management and word processing.? Answer telephones and give information to callers, take messages, and transfer calls to appropriate individuals? Create, maintain, and enter information into databases.? Set up and manage paper or electronic filing systems, recording information, updating paperwork, such as correspondence, or other material. ? Greet visitors with enthusiasm and handle their inquiries or direct them to the appropriate personal according to needs. ? Maintain scheduling and event calendars, confirm appointments for clients, customers, or supervisors. ? Complete forms in accordance with company procedures. Education/Qualifications:AA Business Administration preferred. Two to five years of experience required. Knowledge of office software including Word, Excel, Power Point and Outlook is a must. We are looking for an administrative assistant with excellent customer and personal service skills. This position offers full benefits, vacation and paid time off. Please respond with your resume if interested and qualified!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1108227 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Up to $,Full Time Employee,"Irvine, CA 92612",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/up-to-50-000-administrative-assistant-job-irvine-ca-us-179109029.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),58ffb9fe0173f62b2e049fa54003fd38
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:04:27:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Immediate need for Candidate with Data Entry and Scanning experience seeking flexible schedule, professional work environment and opportunity for full time job. Type 35 wpm with accuracy, familiar with MS Word/Excel and able to multi-task will be keys to success in this well-known, established organization. Will be responsible for perform data entry/, file contracts and assist with various clerical projects. Great benefits. Apply for this great position as a data entry today! If interested, please forward a resume to S Borton for immediate consideration. We are an equal employment opportunity employer. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1107509 Job Experience:,, MS Word/Excel, Type 50WPMAlpha Numerical 12,000 +Years of Experience Required:",Data Entry Job in Las Vegas,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Las Vegas, NV 89146",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178967002.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cbdf4f25981662c48188543bfb112838
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:03:30:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Aramark’s leisure group specializes in lodging, recreation, conference centers and meeting services. The scope of our operations includes lodging, conference and meeting space, houseboats and other marine activities, retail merchandise, casual and fine dining experiences, and interpretive tours in some of this country's most pristine protected lands and national parks. We have been active partners with the National Park Service for over 20 years, providing high-quality visitor services in numerous locations across the United States. We are one of the nation’s leading managers of conference centers with a strong focus on customer experience. We are considered a premier provider of professional services by clients and competition alike, committed to providing high-quality recreation, hospitality and authentic experiences to clients and visitors from all over the world. Responsibilities Position Summary:The purpose of this job is to help ensure guest satisfaction by maintaining all dishes, pots, pans, silverware, glasses, equipment, and kitchen utensils, in a clean and sanitized condition. In addition, this job requires that the employee keep the dishwashing machine station, three compartment sink and related areas clean. Essential Functions: Able to follow directions Perform repetitive tasks Stand for extended periods of time Work in an environment that at times can be hot and humid Work with a diverse team Understand basic kitchen sanitation Work holidays, weekends and varied shifts Maintain a neat and orderly work station Know and comply with all company policies and procedures regarding safety, security, emergencies and energy Report to work on time and in complete uniform Other duties as assigned Status and Scope: Food Service Workers report to the BOH Manager Position requires the ability to be detail oriented, have a strong customer service focus, and a positive attitude Must be able to work efficiently – prepared to help wherever needed Qualifications Qualifications: Minimum of one year experience Understanding of basic kitchen sanitation Equipment Used:Dishwashing Machine, Three Compartment Sink, Temperature Gauges Travel Requirements:   Little or No Travel (>10%) Lifting Requirements:  MEDIUM - Lifting 50 pounds maximum with frequent lifting and/or carrying objects weighing up to 25 pounds. Physical Requirements:   BENDING                     FREQUENT                                                KEYING/FINGERING     FREQUENT                                                HEARING                      CONSTANT                                                REACHING                   CONSTANT                                                SEEING                        CONSTANT                                                SPEAKING                   CONSTANT                                                STANDING                    CONSTANT                                                WALKING                     CONSTANT                                                LIFTING                        CONSTANT",General Utility Worker (Dishwasher) - Baylor Medical Center at Grapevine Job in Grapevine,Full Time,"Grapevine, TX 76051",All,http://jobview.monster.com/general-utility-worker-dishwasher-baylor-medical-center-at-grapevine-job-grapevine-tx-us-178889307.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),958f8d4d74eea44c6bc3e868a213c90c
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:03:16:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Location: Mounds View, MN               Duration: 8+ Month  Must have:·         Five years of IT project management experience·         Excellent Oracle and Written communication·         Experience in PowerPoint presentation in front of senior management team·         Works effectively and independently in a dynamic environment.·         Responsible, takes ownership of Macro support issues, and follows through to closure with in defined SLA.·         Ability to multi-task and work with multiple technical teams such as basis, security etc. Preferred·         Experience in Business Intelligence project management. (Development or Support) Education·         Bachelor’s Degree Required Business Intelligence support project manager·         Primary responsibility involves BI operations management, issues/escalations and conflict management and coordinate with Business and IT teams on and off shore.·         Responsible for driving release and change management and transition from development to support for BI projects and programs. Ensure that knowledge transfer takes place to enable support team to take over support and operation.·         Ensure customer satisfaction targets are achieved and enhance customer service by owning service delivery professionally and adhering to System uptime SLA.·         Lead the resolution of major incidents/P1 for the BI space.·         Communicate with stakeholders for planned/unplanned data processing delays or report distribution delays or data quality issues.·         Monitor the various BI support/Admin ticket buckets in and make sure that the tickets are closed in a timely manner.·         Conduct review meetings with BI support teams to drive down the ticket counts, improve the process.·         Conduct monthly meeting with BI team management to review the ticket counts and process improvement opportunities.·         Gather and track relevant metrics that enables BI to have monthly meeting with stakeholders who have SLA with BI.·         Provide feedback loop to development team on post go live issues to assist in the improvement in first time quality.·         Work with offshore BI support leads and hand off /take over relevant information when shift starts/ends.·         Familiarize and keep up with client BI landscape, customer base and BI solutions.·         Actively contribute to Knowledge base and provide creative ideas for knowledge management and continuous improvement within the organization·         Manage and control changes in BI landscape and approve the changes. Report",Integrated Resources,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Location: Mounds View, MN               Duration: 8+ Month  Must have:·         Five years of IT project management experience·         Excellent Oracle and Written communication·         Experience in PowerPoint presentation in front of senior management team·         Works effectively and independently in a dynamic environment.·         Responsible, takes ownership of Macro support issues, and follows through to closure with in defined SLA.·         Ability to multi-task and work with multiple technical teams such as basis, security etc. Preferred·         Experience in Business Intelligence project management. (Development or Support) Education·         Bachelor’s Degree Required Business Intelligence support project manager·         Primary responsibility involves BI operations management, issues/escalations and conflict management and coordinate with Business and IT teams on and off shore.·         Responsible for driving release and change management and transition from development to support for BI projects and programs. Ensure that knowledge transfer takes place to enable support team to take over support and operation.·         Ensure customer satisfaction targets are achieved and enhance customer service by owning service delivery professionally and adhering to System uptime SLA.·         Lead the resolution of major incidents/P1 for the BI space.·         Communicate with stakeholders for planned/unplanned data processing delays or report distribution delays or data quality issues.·         Monitor the various BI support/Admin ticket buckets in and make sure that the tickets are closed in a timely manner.·         Conduct review meetings with BI support teams to drive down the ticket counts, improve the process.·         Conduct monthly meeting with BI team management to review the ticket counts and process improvement opportunities.·         Gather and track relevant metrics that enables BI to have monthly meeting with stakeholders who have SLA with BI.·         Provide feedback loop to development team on post go live issues to assist in the improvement in first time quality.·         Work with offshore BI support leads and hand off /take over relevant information when shift starts/ends.·         Familiarize and keep up with client BI landscape, customer base and BI solutions.·         Actively contribute to Knowledge base and provide creative ideas for knowledge management and continuous improvement within the organization·         Manage and control changes in BI landscape and approve the changes.",,http://jobview.monster.com/bi-project-manager-job-saint-paul-mn-us-179099646.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=18,,,db1e673d634f854a50e5cf0e4b198d06
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:03:16:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Why hire new managers when you can train new ones?  If you’re a motivated, competitive professional looking to apply yourself in a leadership role, look no further!  The Job Window is hiring for a Junior Marketing Manager Trainee on behalf of our client, one of the leading brand management and advertising firms in city! This firm is looking for an entry level candidate looking to begin their career in promotional sales and marketing.  Our client provides personalized marketing and consulting services to their large portfolio of clients and they have recently signed on with their largest client to date!  Our client is expecting unprecedented growth in the upcoming year! They are in immediate need of a Junior Marketing Manager Trainee with great communication skills who can work hard in an entry level leadership role.This position is entry level, so all experience levels will be considered.  As a Junior Marketing Manager Trainee, our client will ensure you learn all aspects of the business, giving you the knowledge to be developed into a management role within months, not years!  This firm will take the time to cross-train you in all aspects of management, including sales, customer service, training and supervising individuals and teams, office administration, human resources, sales management, client management, and finances.  Join a company that will give you valuable experience and set you on the path to long-term success!  You will gain valuable experience in a wide range of fields that will give you the tools to a successful career in any industry! Benefits of the Junior Marketing Manager Trainee Position:Travel and networking opportunity.Full comprehensive training with a national manager.Flexible scheduling.A place where you can grow personally, professionally, and socially.A company providing rapid advancement into management.Responsibilities of the Junior Marketing Manager Trainee:Interact directly with customers to portray a positive image of client brands and increase sales.Assist the Senior Marketing Manager with identifying target markets and building an account base for clientele.Provide excellent customer service and distribute marketing materials at on-site marketing campaigns.Drive sales by serving as a primary customer service liaison and building authentic relationships with customers.Introduce and market new products by developing new customer service and marketing plans.RequirementsQualifications of the Junior Marketing Manager Trainee:No experience is required.  However, any experience in sales, customer service, direct marketing, brand marketing, product marketing, public relations, advertising, communications, client relations, telecommunications, telesales, and other roles providing front-line marketing assistance is a plus!Excellent interpersonal skills are required for daily customer and client contact.Able to provide outstanding customer service and maintain knowledge of company standards and procedures.Excellent communication skill, both written and verbal.Able to interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic, and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting.Able to work independently and as a motivated team player.Key Words: Entry Level, Brand/Product Marketing, Account Management, Business Development, Sales / Marketing Strategizing, Product Management, Direct Marketing (CRM), Sales Executive, Marketing Assistant, Account Sales",Junior Marketing Manager Trainee Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89108",Retail;Advertising and PR Services;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-marketing-manager-trainee-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178630265.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=8,,Customer Support/Client Care,e9d23bf867ccbc49d7474e51ce1361a0
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:03:06:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Analyst Associate Ready to advance your Business Analyst Career? Randstad Professionals San Francisco specializes in Accounting and Finance talent and we are continuously recruiting for Business Analyst Associates. Business Analyst Job Duties As a Business Analyst Associate you will provide basic analytical support through the examination and interpretation of data in support of cross-functional business operations. You will assist in the development of annual operating plans, capital budgets and forecasts, and in building business cases for new business initiatives. You will analyze the actual results against plan and forecast and recommend interventions where appropriate. You will provide support in the development, preparation and analysis of reports for management review. You will assist in defining business requirements and provide analysis toward operational efficiency, identifying opportunities for improvement in operational performance and notifying management of issues and problems requiring immediate attention. Ideal Candidate The ideal candidate for this position has knowledge of automated systems in a production or operations environment, and is familiar with analyses such as: GAP analysis, process mapping, root-cause analysis, risk analysis and requirements gathering. They have the ability to identify, analyze and resolve problems related to business operations and can utilize a statistical analysis methodology. They also have good interpersonal and verbal/written communication skills, and have good math, analytical and problem-solving skills. They are comfortable with the use of analytical tools (e.g. MiniTab, Excel graphs). Job Requirements• B.A./B.S. degree or equivalent experience• Knowledge of PCs and related software applications• MS Office and SharePoint experience preferred Application Process Once we know you're interested, a Randstad Professionals recruiter will review your resume and contact you to better understand your skills and tell you more about the opportunity. We will meet qualified candidates face to face, and our best talent interviews with the employer face to face - we will move quickly! Interviewing now! Click Apply to submit your resume today. Not ready to apply but want to learn more? Call or email Laurel Thornton at (415) 733-7507 or laurel.thornton@randstadusa.com",Business Analyst Associate Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94108",All,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-associate-job-san-francisco-ca-us-179198778.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=8,,Business/Strategic Management,3ea54cca80f6790bb99f6a3f82995585
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:02:52:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Operations Manager-Education Services The ABM Operations Manager is responsible for the day-to-day operation and administrative activities at multiple school buildings within an assigned district. Leads custodial teams to ensure performance is satisfactory according to the clients’ contractual requirements. Develops and implements cost control measures and level of service standards to ensure compliance with customer specifications / contract requirements for assigned school buildings. Oversees inspections, quality control measures, and the inventory control of equipment and supplies for the assigned school buildings. Essential Duties Coordinate service activities for assigned school buildings.  Ensure that services are performed as contracted and at the intended profit margins Control supplies, equipment, and personnel necessary to meet customer specifications Interact with customers daily to obtain feedback on services and special needs and troubleshoot potential problems and concerns Manage the company’s quality control monitoring and safety programs at the assigned school buildings Conduct quality of service inspections at assigned school buildings Develop operational improvement plans and implements process changes within assigned school buildings Ensure compliance with company policies and procedures and all federal, state and local government regulations Ensure that all paperwork, including terminations, labor variance action plans, and operational models is complete and accurate and is submitted to the district/hub in a timely manner Analyze and manage, in a proactive manner, both the financial and the operational performance of the assigned school buildings Ensure that payroll is accurate and submitted to the appropriate payroll personnel in a timely manner and, when applicable, correct any payroll discrepancies Work with Regional Operations Director monthly on P & L budget reports Responsible for the overall direction, coordination, and evaluation of personnel within the assigned buildings Carry out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the company’s policies and applicable laws Responsible for directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining subordinates; addressing complaints, resolving problems, and terminating employees Perform other duties as assigned by Regional Operations Director   *Job duties may be modified at any time Minimum Requirements Bachelor’s Degree preferred not required Must have a minimum of two (2) years of supervisory experience in facilities services and or customer oriented environment managing multiple clients Experience in cost estimating/pricing work required Must have working knowledge of OSHA safety regulations and chemical handling/storage procedures Must be able to write reports and business correspondence and effectively present information and respond to questions from managers and customers",Operations Manager-Education Services (Vancouver,Full Time Employee,"Vancouver, WA 98660",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-manager-education-services-vancouver-wa-job-vancouver-wa-us-179120692.aspx?mescoid=1100038001001&jobPosition=4,,Business/Strategic Management,845fb27d24af00f3edb91fa96326354e
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:02:37:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"TraditionsSipiritsOKLAHOMA'S PREMIERHOSPITALITY MANAGEMENT PROVIDERIT'S A NEW YEAR FOR.NEW BEGININGS!We believe in exceeding our employees' expectations by treating them like family and acknowledging them as our most valuable assets. We're welcoming motivated, smiling people with a heart for hospitality to our family!OPEN POSITIONSSHIFT MANAGERSEXPEDITORSCOOKSSERVERSHOSTSDISHWASHERSWINE CART ATTENDANTSOUS CHEFBANQUET CAPTAINSHOUSEMENBAR MANAGERSBEVERAGE SERVERSBARTENDERSSTOCK CLERKCASHIERSBARBACKSApply online at www.traditionsspirits.com or in person at theTraditions Spirits Administrative Office at WinStar11073 Rogers Rd. Thackerville, OK 73459 (580) 276-9523Click here to see Newspaper ad",Cooks,Full Time,"Thackerville, OK 73459",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/cooks-cashiers-hosts-beverage-servers-bartenders-inventory-control-manager-job-thackerville-ok-us-178819643.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=1,,,3fde333e2423f511503cf67d07d78f08
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:02:36:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Piscataway, NJ that is seeking an experienced Product Engineering Manager to manage an engineering team with the goal of developing new products while ensuring the continued success of existing product lines.Summary:The client is growing as the result of new products and a strong position within the industry. To meet and continue this growth, their engineering department is expanding and offering both challenging and rewarding positions. This position will oversee a number of product lines as well as be responsible for the development of new products to increase sales. The candidate will support sales on sales calls, providing capabilities presentations and finding solutions and new products during field visits. Presentations and strong interaction with various governing and industry committees is also essential.REQUIREMENTS: This position requires a degree in Mechanical Engineering or Engineering Management and 10 years of professional experience Experience managing engineers is a must Extensive experience in Product and Design Engineering is required Up to 25% travel is required at certain times throughout the year Experience in the rail industry or with hose assemblies will be extremely beneficialKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Product Engineering Manager Job in Piscataway,"Full Time, Employee","Piscataway, NJ 08854",,http://jobview.monster.com/product-engineering-manager-job-piscataway-nj-us-178571743.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=12,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),1125e82d3176b9d0ba9d36bb19c358bc
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:02:27:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking Merchandise Specialist! Do you possess strong organizational skills? Do you love working on a team?Do you have previous professional experience? If so, we would love for you to join our team as a Merchandise Specialist! APPLY today because openings are limited! Merchandise Specialist pay: $17 an hour Merchandise Specialist Duties: • Execute site merchandising strategies and define experience tactics for subcategories (i.e. Patio furniture, Outdoor rugs, etc) to meet business objectives. Strategies and tactics include, but not limited to: navigation, product placement, search optimization, page content, product information etc• Responsible for partnering with merchant partners (i.e. Buyers) to develop and prioritize experiences and site initiatives to best drive subcategory goals• Responsible for partnering with external marketing teams (i.e. Email, Social, SEM etc) to prioritize promotions & placements to best drive subcategory goals• Implement site merchandising strategies that focus on key conversion drivers, optimal site presentation, maximizing guest engagement and shopping experience, and drives multichannel efforts• Ensure site appropriately communicates key messages/promotions• Measures KPIs and provides in-depth performance analysis• Stays current with ecommerce, market and industry trends Requirements :• Two or four year college degree in IT, business or marketing• 1-2 years of experience in using an Ad Server, Media Planning and/or relevant interactive Marketing• Excellent communication and relationship building skills• Exceptional attention to detail and ability to understand complex dependencies• Strong analytical and critical thinking abilitiesIf you love working with a team and have strong organizational skills, apply today for the Merchandise Specialist opportunity! Email qualified resumes to Rebekah.Dake@randstadusa.com",Merchandise Specialist Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Minneapolis, MN 55403",All,http://jobview.monster.com/merchandise-specialist-job-minneapolis-mn-us-179126231.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=16,17.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,Business/Strategic Management,859885199d1b86a887808f52d0f863af
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:01:22:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Business Analyst SeniorLocation: Rancho Cordova, CADuration: 5+ Months DAY TO DAY RESPONSIBILITIES OF THIS POSITION AND DESCRIPTION OF PROJECT:Provides analytical support for multiple, complex, projects simultaneously, establishes work plans and timelines; coordinates with internal and external sources. Make presentations to various levels of management. Works under limited supervision, using established procedures. Advanced knowledge of automated systems in a production or operations environment. Ability to identify, analyze and resolve complex cross-functional problems related to business operations statistical analysis methodology. Advanced knowledge of and ability to perform analyses such as, GAP analysis, process mapping, root-cause analysis, risk analysis and requirements gathering. Advanced knowledge of PCs and related software applications. Excellent interpersonal and verbal/written communication skills. Excellent writing and presentation skills. Highly developed math, analytical and problem-solving skills and use of analytical tools (e.g. MiniTab, Excel graphs). Demonstrated project management skills. B.A/B.S. degree and five years related experience and/or training, or equivalent combination of education and experience.RESPONSIBILITIES:•       Leads cross-functional business process improvement efforts across Product & Marketing.•       Leads the development of documentation and complex analysis of as-is and to-be business processes.•       Exercises independent judgment in developing methods, techniques and evaluation criteria for obtaining results.•       Creates PDLC process artifacts, including SIPOCs process flows and risk analyses.•       Identifies solutions to process gaps or risks to leadership in order reduce opportunities for process failure.•       Defines highly complex business requirements and provides analysis toward operational efficiency and drives change within the organization.•       Provides highly complex analytical support and interpretation of data in order to support cross-functional business operations.•       Provides input for strategic designs and key performance indicators to better align and measures business unit goals and objectives.•       Develops and presents complex analyses and recommendations for Senior/Executive Management. REQUIREMENTS:·         B.A/B.S. degree and two or more years of related experience and/or training, or equivalent combination of education and experience.·         Business Process Analysis/Re-engineering:·         Ability to create SIPOCs, process workflows and other standard process artifacts.·         Uses a defined process to determine existing gaps, requirements for closing those gaps, and as a means to measure progress of the transition and transformation.·         Demonstrated experience leading and driving business process re-engineering efforts through the use of data-driven techniques.·         Demonstrated skills in business process modeling and analysis.Problem Solving Skills:·         Strong logical skills and ability to suggest viable options as the solutions of the problems.·         Quick learner who is easily able to learn new products, systems, applications and technologies.Communication Skills:·         Strong oral and written business communication.·         Strong presentation skills, and ability to communicate with various audiences, including end users, managers, and members of the IT team.Analytical Skills:·         Strong analytical, problem-solving and critical thinking skills.·         Ability to analyze the functional processes and suggest effective solutions.·         Ability to test, modify, compile, and execute concepts of the project.·         Experience in conducting Cross Functional Gap Analysis.·         Extensive experience in creating both ""As Is"" and ""To Be"" process modeling.Technical Skills:·         Good understanding of general system development concepts and principles, programming structures and models, Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC), technical writing, basic programming languages, etc.·         Ability to know when to apply SDLC vs. Agile methods.·         Proficient in Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel, Visio and PowerPoint Preferred Qualifications: •       Six Sigma or Lean certification•       Understanding of the product development life cycle•       Understanding of how to apply key performance indicators to control business processes Seshu Sarvepalli | Latitude36 Inc | Sr. IT RecruiterDesk : 510.210.8644 | Cell : 615.203.0108Email :  SSarvepalli@lat36.com | Web : www.Lat36.com39465 Paseo Padre Parkway, Suite #3000, Fremont, CA 94538.",Business Process Analyst Job in Rancho Cordova,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Rancho Cordova, CA 95670",,http://jobview.monster.com/business-process-analyst-job-rancho-cordova-ca-us-178917176.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=6,,Business/Strategic Management,a118617f503f04000055103f682f7706
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:01:22:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Title: Independent Designer Location: San Francisco, CA Contract   Our client is seeking an Independent Designer Responsibilities:  Content and Design Specialist for FinOps, which is responsible for scaling best practices and efficiencies in 500+ cities. Liaise between FinOps and our internal customers around the world to help us share and organize information better. The ideal candidate for this role should have stellar planning and storytelling skills, attention to detail, and the ability to move quickly, sometimes with limited direction. In this role you will keep a pulse on the company, using constant feedback to help evolve our company-wide FinOps space on the Uber intranet / wiki product. You will work extensively with cross functional teams and product users to identify pain points and find creative solutions to complex problems. The most appealing candidates are excited about internal tools and the impact they can make on how their coworkers do their job. Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree or higher. Great design instincts and product taste. Superior written and verbal communication skills. Customer obsession. Excellent communication and the ability to initiate, cultivate, and maintain key stakeholder relationships. Flexible, with a willingness and aptitude to learn new tasks and adapt to change. Proactive, self-starter who can work well both independently and as part of a team. Expertise with Atlassian Confluence, MediaWiki, and/or other internal collaboration and knowledge - sharing suites. Extensive and relevant technical background or CS degree. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmatrix/cjt/image1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmatrix/cjt/image2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmatrix/cjt/image3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Matrix Resources Job Application for Independent Designer - FinOps Content and Design Specialist | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Full Time,"Title: Independent Designer Location: San Francisco, CA Contract   Our client is seeking an Independent Designer Responsibilities:  Content and Design Specialist for FinOps, which is responsible for scaling best practices and efficiencies in 500+ cities. Liaise between FinOps and our internal customers around the world to help us share and organize information better. The ideal candidate for this role should have stellar planning and storytelling skills, attention to detail, and the ability to move quickly, sometimes with limited direction. In this role you will keep a pulse on the company, using constant feedback to help evolve our company-wide FinOps space on the Uber intranet / wiki product. You will work extensively with cross functional teams and product users to identify pain points and find creative solutions to complex problems. The most appealing candidates are excited about internal tools and the impact they can make on how their coworkers do their job. Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree or higher. Great design instincts and product taste. Superior written and verbal communication skills. Customer obsession. Excellent communication and the ability to initiate, cultivate, and maintain key stakeholder relationships. Flexible, with a willingness and aptitude to learn new tasks and adapt to change. Proactive, self-starter who can work well both independently and as part of a team. Expertise with Atlassian Confluence, MediaWiki, and/or other internal collaboration and knowledge - sharing suites. Extensive and relevant technical background or CS degree.",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/independent-designer-finops-content-design-specialist-job-san-francisco-ca-us-178902178.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=2,,,ed93ef00ebee2b265b4fb4322caf6976
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:01:22:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  718703Apex Systems Inc. In Las Vegas Nevada is looking for a Business Analyst who is interested in taking on a new and exciting job!  If you have a desire to learn new processes, systems, and grow with this organization please send us your resume.  We're excited to tell you more about these new career opportunities!General Requirements:Windows 7 experienceHotel Kiosk experience PCI compliant processesEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Business Analyst Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-job-las-vegas-nv-us-179214401.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0cfe8e1701c1cf62f02c27ea0e259616
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:01:22:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director Nursing & Clinical Services - Webster, TX ( Job Number: 289333 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a hospital setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare. Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Directs and coordinates functions and activities of nursing department and assigned clinical operation departments.  Consults with and advises Administrator on the general operation of the hospital.  Develops nursing and clinical department's goals, objectives, standards of performance, policies and procedures.  Organizes nursing and clinical departments according to administrative and nursing service guidelines; ensures compliance with legal, organizational, and medical staff standards.  Has authority and responsibility for establishing, directing, and implementing the Standards of Nursing Practice and the clinical operations and financial matters related to all nursing and clinical care areas and functions.  In a Network Market receives direction from and has a staff reporting relationship with the Network Market Sr CCO/CCO. Nursing Director, Clinical Director, Director of Nursing and Clinical Services, DON, Director Nurs, Hospital Nurse Director, Hospital DON,77598 #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Qualifications: Education: Bachelors degree in healthcare administration, business administration, finance, or clinical specialty. Equivalent combination of education, training, and experience may substitute for education requirements. Licenses/Certification: Registered Nurse in the state. Experience: Minimum of three years experience in healthcare administration/management. Minimum of three years experience in hospital management in an inpatient, acute care environment. Graduate level education may substitute on a year-to-year basis for the required experience If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee /font> . Job : Nursing Primary Location : TX-Webster-Kindred Hospital Clear Lake Organization : 4874 - Kindred Hospital Clear Lake Shift : Day #CJT-jobBodyContent p {margin: 0px!important;}",Director Nursing & Clinical Services - Webster,"Full Time, Employee","Director Nursing & Clinical Services - Webster, TX ( Job Number: 289333 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a hospital setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare. Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Directs and coordinates functions and activities of nursing department and assigned clinical operation departments.  Consults with and advises Administrator on the general operation of the hospital.  Develops nursing and clinical department's goals, objectives, standards of performance, policies and procedures.  Organizes nursing and clinical departments according to administrative and nursing service guidelines; ensures compliance with legal, organizational, and medical staff standards.  Has authority and responsibility for establishing, directing, and implementing the Standards of Nursing Practice and the clinical operations and financial matters related to all nursing and clinical care areas and functions.  In a Network Market receives direction from and has a staff reporting relationship with the Network Market Sr CCO/CCO. Nursing Director, Clinical Director, Director of Nursing and Clinical Services, DON, Director Nurs, Hospital Nurse Director, Hospital DON,77598 #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Qualifications: Education: Bachelors degree in healthcare administration, business administration, finance, or clinical specialty. Equivalent combination of education, training, and experience may substitute for education requirements. Licenses/Certification: Registered Nurse in the state. Experience: Minimum of three years experience in healthcare administration/management. Minimum of three years experience in hospital management in an inpatient, acute care environment. Graduate level education may substitute on a year-to-year basis for the required experience If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee /font> . Job : Nursing Primary Location : TX-Webster-Kindred Hospital Clear Lake Organization : 4874 - Kindred Hospital Clear Lake Shift : Day #CJT-jobBodyContent p {margin: 0px!important;}",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-nursing-clinical-services-webster-tx-job-webster-tx-us-179097891.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=20,,Business/Strategic Management,aac40ef60e8d51e0e6179ddfd0035d0b
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:01:22:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"St. Louis Community College is a multi-campus district comprised of four campuses and six satellites serving 718 square miles of St. Louis city and county and portions of Jefferson and Franklin counties. The college employs over 3,000 full and part time faculty, administrators, staff, and student employees. One of the most rewarding things about working at St. Louis Community College is the chance to make a tangible difference in people's lives. At St. Louis Community College, we expand minds and change lives every day. We create accessible, dynamic learning environments focused on the needs of our diverse communities.St. Louis Community College is more than just a great place to get a quality education—it’s also a great place to work. The College offers its employees (based on employee group) competitive wages, great health and retirement benefits, paid vacation, holiday leave and winter break, tuition waiver and reimbursement, professional development, free parking on all campuses, and much more!Position Duties and Responsibilities:Responsible for the hiring and supervision of direct reports, provides input into hiring of professional and associate tutors when appropriate, has total oversight of campus-wide Academic Support services. Duties include: providing budget oversight and assessment of program effectiveness for all tutoring areas, and handling of student concerns or issues. Works collaboratively with faculty, other departments, and divisions including Student Affairs, Assessment, and other campus Academic Support managers. Performs marketing responsibilities and supports online education initiatives.Required Qualifications:Master’s degree or equivalent and over three (3) years of relevant full-time experience.Preferred Qualifications:Three years of management experience in a higher education environment.Special Instructions to Applicants:STLCC currently has two openings for this position title. One position will be at the Florissant Valley campus and one is at the Meramec campus. Candidates who want to be considered for both positions must apply to both postings.",Manager,Full Time Employee,"Saint Louis, MO 63102",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-academic-support-services-job-saint-louis-mo-us-178894004.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,Education/Training,d83cef51f2109d9d5cf39882bcf2c600
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:01:22:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Sales Manager The Las Vegas Review-Journal is seeking a strategic, dynamic and driven sales leader to lead a high-performing sales team selling multimedia advertising and marketing solutions to local business accounts.  The Sales Manager is an integral part of the advertising and marketing relationship with our advertisers, and has the primary responsibility for leading and directing sales activity and coaching their team to meet and exceed revenue goals and expected results. In this role you will:·         Supervise, coach, and direct day-to-day selling activities for a team of advertising Account Executives.·         Drive team’s daily, weekly, and monthly sales activity for achievement of KPIs and revenue goals.·         Establish and implement sales strategies that integrate digital assets into traditional advertising campaigns.·         Establish and implement sales strategies and promotions for growing revenues and increasing market share.·         Work with team to drive account retention, growth strategies, and new business development.·         Ensure the team sells audience-based solutions that include the appropriate array of Review-Journal products and services that meet the advertisers’ expressed needs.·         Ensure accuracy and integrity of rates.·         Provide coaching and training to develop sales team.·         Sustain strong client relationships and ensure exceptional client satisfaction at all times.Requirements/Skills Bachelor’s degree in Business, Marketing, Advertising, or similar field, or equivalent work experience.Five or more years of experience directly managing an outside sales team with a proven track record of goal attainment.Experienced using sales CRM required. Digital advertising sales experience preferred.  Social media marketing experience a plus.Strong communication and presentation skills are essential.Experienced using Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) required. What We OfferCompetitive Base Salary + Un-capped Bonus ProgramMileage, Business Expense, and Cell Phone Reimbursement Comprehensive Health, Dental, and Vision CoverageLife Insurance 401(k) Savings PlanPaid Time Off/Paid Company HolidaysEmployee Discount ProgramInvestment in Your Professional DevelopmentAbout the Las Vegas Review-JournalThe Las Vegas Review-Journal is a single resource that gives local businesses the unique ability to deliver their marketing message to either a broad audience, or with laser-focus to exactly the audience they desire in exactly the manner in which their desired audience prefers to receive their marketing message.  The Las Vegas Review-Journal reaches nearly 1 million adults in Clark County each and every day.  An advertiser would need to buy all 4 TV stations or 8 radio stations to reach the same audience of adults that The Las Vegas Review-Journal reaches in the Las Vegas valley every morning.  And we reach them through multiple media across every platform.  The Las Vegas Review-Journal puts our advertisers’ message where their target audience is at any point in time.  And, ReviewJournal.com has more views and more unique visitors than any other local media website in Nevada.  No other advertising media can deliver the audience that The Las Vegas Review-Journal can deliver each and every day. The Las Vegas Review-Journal is an equal opportunity employer.  We are a drug-free workplace and require pre-employment drug screening.  Some positions require a copy of the candidate’s driving record and proof of automobile insurance.   Report","Las Vegas Review Journal/Sun Las Vegas Review Journal/Sun Job Application for Advertising Sales Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Address 1111 W. Bonanza RoadLas Vegas, NV",,http://jobview.monster.com/advertising-sales-manager-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178892236.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=1,,,99cbd41d7ac26fc42b82d448c62a7e47
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:01:22:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Taxi Cab Driver Jobs·Annual Bonus Programs · Earn up to 55% Commission · Full Health Care Benefits · 401k w/Company Match · Full or Part-time shifts available! Basic Driver Qualifications: · 3-year DMV print out  Minimum 21 years old · DOT physical · Metroscope · Pre-employment drug testing APPLY AT FRIASJOBS.COM OR IN PERSON AT Frias Human Resources  5110 S. Valley View Open M-F, 8am - 5pm  702.798.3499Provided by The Las Vegas Review Journal Report","Frias Transportation Mgmt Job Application for Taxi Cab Driver | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Frias Jobs Phone 702-798-3499 Address 5110 S. Valley ViewLas Vegas, NV 89118",All,http://jobview.monster.com/taxi-cab-driver-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178978202.aspx?mescoid=5301047001001&jobPosition=5,,,84c4789939697128b4e7f3bbb68c1a93
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:00:45:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dietary Aide Full-Time ( Job Number: 298216 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Be part of the food team that makes sure our residents' meals not only taste good, but are also good for them. Assist with preparing and serving food as well as cleaning equipment, utensils, and food service areas. You'll enjoy getting to know our residents and they'll certainly appreciate what you do for them.Responsibilities: Prepare resident trays according to instructions/order; employ proper food handling techniques in preparation of food and setting up/serving trays; deliver food, nourishments and supplies to nursing units or other areas as assigned Put stock in food storage areas and refrigerators as assigned Clean, wash and sanitize dishes, silverware and utensils used to serve residents and others Assist in maintaining the general cleanliness of the dishwashing area; clean work area and equipment as assigned. Use proper infection control techniques and protective equipment as needed; perform all duties using proper safety techniques. Attend and participate in in-service education opportunities Perform other duties as assigned Dietary Aide Food Preparation Dietician Nutrition Services Food Services Food Server Meal Server #MON-NCD Qualifications Must have knowledge of safe food preparation and handling techniques and work cooperatively as a member of a team. Should be patient and polite and able to communicate effectively with residents, their family members, other staff, referral sources and physicians. Education at the tenth grade level or above is desirable, along with experience in a dietary department, or large volume food preparation and service. Must be able to read, speak and understand the English language. Should understand the principles of growth and development for the entire life span and be able to provide appropriate care for adolescent, adults and geriatric residents. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Food Services Primary Location : IN-Terre Haute-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Southwood Organization : 0113 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Southwood Shift : Day",Dietary Aide Full-Time Job in Terre Haute,"Full Time, Employee","Dietary Aide Full-Time ( Job Number: 298216 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Be part of the food team that makes sure our residents' meals not only taste good, but are also good for them. Assist with preparing and serving food as well as cleaning equipment, utensils, and food service areas. You'll enjoy getting to know our residents and they'll certainly appreciate what you do for them.Responsibilities: Prepare resident trays according to instructions/order; employ proper food handling techniques in preparation of food and setting up/serving trays; deliver food, nourishments and supplies to nursing units or other areas as assigned Put stock in food storage areas and refrigerators as assigned Clean, wash and sanitize dishes, silverware and utensils used to serve residents and others Assist in maintaining the general cleanliness of the dishwashing area; clean work area and equipment as assigned. Use proper infection control techniques and protective equipment as needed; perform all duties using proper safety techniques. Attend and participate in in-service education opportunities Perform other duties as assigned Dietary Aide Food Preparation Dietician Nutrition Services Food Services Food Server Meal Server #MON-NCD Qualifications Must have knowledge of safe food preparation and handling techniques and work cooperatively as a member of a team. Should be patient and polite and able to communicate effectively with residents, their family members, other staff, referral sources and physicians. Education at the tenth grade level or above is desirable, along with experience in a dietary department, or large volume food preparation and service. Must be able to read, speak and understand the English language. Should understand the principles of growth and development for the entire life span and be able to provide appropriate care for adolescent, adults and geriatric residents. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Food Services Primary Location : IN-Terre Haute-Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Southwood Organization : 0113 - Kindred Trans Care and Rehab-Southwood Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/dietary-aide-full-time-job-terre-haute-in-us-179176838.aspx?mescoid=2900523001001&jobPosition=12,,Food Services/Hospitality,91a189a04cbd193af2f136e9fc837fae
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:00:23:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Sales Professional Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89101",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-professional-job-las-vegas-nv-us-178803620.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,1b528323ee52f72ede6fd304e273e410
United States of America,US,01/Dec/2015:00:23:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"We deliver an experience unlike anyone else in the world. Our team is insanely committed to providing the individualized sleep experience.  We will do everything within the power of the universe to ensure our customers ‘know better sleep’ night one and every night thereafter.  Simply put. We deliver a great night’s sleep. So far, we’ve changed over 10 million lives.  We are on a mission. Responsibilities: Sleep Number is hiring Helpers to assist Home Delivery & Assembly Technicians with providing exceptional, personalized, and unforgettable installation, service and education within customers’ home by:·       Assembling the customer’s new Sleep Number bed.·       Getting rid of their old, uncomfortable mattress.·       Cleaning up after yourself.What else do you need to know?This is a full time-time position.You have to be able to lift and carry 200 pounds with a partner (plus you have to be able to bend over, carry a mattress up and down stairs, climb in and out of a truck)Safety is important to us and our customers, so all offers are contingent upon the successful completion of a background check and pre-employment drug screen. You are also required to pass a healthy back assessment.We offer Medical/Dental/Vision insuranceYep, a 401K for your retirementA fantastic employee discount on your very own Sleep Number bedTime off with your family so, paid holidays and paid time offGoing back to school? We can help with that too, tuition reimbursement available...plus you will join a team of the most committed, dedicated and fantastic people you ever meet If you think you have what it takes, apply today!",Field Services Delivery Helper Job in North Las Vegas,,"North Las Vegas, NV 89030",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-services-delivery-helper-job-north-las-vegas-nv-us-178979358.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,Student (High School),a758cc26350eff9cc7797e85fac4cac4
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:23:45:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a VP of Construction with experience, please read on!We are a privately held construction company thriving on the west coast. We have been in business for over thirty years with consistent growth and looking to add to our team. We work on all types of projects including small residential houses to large high rise buildings. We are looking for a true leader who understands all aspects of the contrsruction poject from beginning to end.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Privately Held Company2. Over 25 years being successful!3. Work on Diverse ProjectsWhat You Will Be DoingThe VP of construction will be in charge of every aspect of the construction process. From early stages in early development to making sure the project is running smoothly and on budget, as well as time. We are looking for someone with a proven record of managing successful projects and demonstrarting abilty to handle all documents and paperwork as well.What You Need for this Position- 10+ years experience in a senior construction position - Estimating- Purchasing- Project Management- Civil Engineering- Mechanical Engineering- Structural Engineering- Budget AnalysisWhat's In It for YouCompetitive Salary/ BenefitsSo, if you are a VP of Construction with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for VP of Construction - Estimating,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jason Hutchinson,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/vp-of-construction-estimating-purchasing-project-management-job-seattle-wa-us-176314949.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=15,,,9517173f7d0ed8cf22744294e365ed7c
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:23:31:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Onalaska,Full Time Employee,"Onalaska, WI 54650",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-onalaska-wi-us-176574814.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,e11df0675760825c10bc8723f6dca857
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:23:29:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Manager with experience, please read on!Our client friendly approach aligns insightful team members, who are proactive and committed, with each stakeholder to discover the most expeditious and value driven path to your vision. Our collaborative and energetic teams of construction experts deliver a dependable relationship that is based on transparency and effective communication.We love what we do and take pride in our ability to consistently establish new client relationships, and that 80% of our business comes from repeat clientele.What You Will Be DoingOversee and direct construction projects from conception to completionReview the project in-depth to schedule deliverables and estimate costsOversee all onsite and offsite constructions to monitor compliance with building and safety regulationsCoordinate and direct construction workers and subcontractorsSelect tools, materials and equipment and track inventoryMeet contractual conditions of performanceReview the work progress on daily basisPrepare internal and external reports pertaining to job statusPlan ahead to prevent problems and resolve any emerging onesNegotiate terms of agreements, draft contracts and obtain permits and licencesAnalyse, manage and mitigate risksEnsure quality construction standards and the use of proper construction techniquesWhat You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Project Management- Construction Management- HealthcareSo, if you are a Project Manager with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager - Healthcare Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Aaron Wilks,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-healthcare-construction-job-texas-tx-us-176318487.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=12,,,332bea4e3de3c470ba3377e0c35fda08
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:23:12:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill perform field inspections and observations for transportation projects in the Western USWill provide daily reports of observation and test resultsWill monitor work procedures for compliance with project specificationsWill interact with client representative (supervisors, foremen, project managers, engineers, etc.) at project sitesPerform analysis or calculations to check accuracy, applicability and reasonableness of testing dataDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experience2 to 15+ years of transportation construction experienceRelevant certifications are a plusAbility to read and comprehend basic plans and specificationsAbility to prepare reports and documentationProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerStrong written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work with a teamReliability – must be able to arrive at designated project sites prior to scheduled timesAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and must have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable. Report",Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure,"Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill perform field inspections and observations for transportation projects in the Western USWill provide daily reports of observation and test resultsWill monitor work procedures for compliance with project specificationsWill interact with client representative (supervisors, foremen, project managers, engineers, etc.) at project sitesPerform analysis or calculations to check accuracy, applicability and reasonableness of testing dataDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experience2 to 15+ years of transportation construction experienceRelevant certifications are a plusAbility to read and comprehend basic plans and specificationsAbility to prepare reports and documentationProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerStrong written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work with a teamReliability – must be able to arrive at designated project sites prior to scheduled timesAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and must have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure; Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-inspector-on-call-job-elko-nv-us-174610624.aspx?mescoid=4700828001001&jobPosition=19,,,e1455aa5ff4ba38b4e32a8cfd7bca89f
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:23:12:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Keokuk,Full Time Employee,"Keokuk, IA 52632",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-keokuk-ia-us-176575615.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,f7529103dd49d7c1f00a802b62b005a5
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:22:51:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Augusta,Full Time Employee,"Augusta, GA 30904",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-augusta-ga-us-176575753.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,075973bda1097427951952dfe944174f
United States of America,US,04/Dec/2015:22:30:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Litchfield,Full Time Employee,"Litchfield, MN 55355",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-litchfield-mn-us-176574546.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,0ff7b70d8d9c877d6b1ef88cb43129d8
